Florida, session 2026, SB2500.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the named funds for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the state agency indicated, as the amounts to be used to pay the salaries, other operational expenditures, and fixed capital outlay of the named agencies, and are in lieu of all moneys appropriated for these purposes in other sections of the Florida Statutes. SECTION 1 - EDUCATION ENHANCEMENT "LOTTERY" TRUST FUND The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the Education Enhancement "Lottery" Trust Fund to the state agencies indicated. EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF Funds provided in sections 1 and 2 of this act as Grants and Aids-Special Categories or as Grants and Aids-Aid to Local Governments may be advanced quarterly throughout the fiscal year based on projects, grants, contracts, and allocation conference documents. Of the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 59, 60 through 63, 64A through 71 and 163, 60 percent of general revenue shall be released at the beginning of the first quarter and the balance at the beginning of the third quarter. PROGRAM: EDUCATION - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY 1 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEBT SERVICE - CLASS SIZE REDUCTION LOTTERY CAPITAL OUTLAY PROGRAM FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 72,559,186 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1 shall be transferred using nonoperating budget authority to the Lottery Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund, pursuant to section 1013.71, Florida Statutes, for the payment of debt service. There is appropriated from the Lottery Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund, an amount sufficient to enable the payment of debt service resulting from these transfers. Funds in Specific Appropriation 1 are for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 debt service on all bonds authorized pursuant to section 1013.737, Florida Statutes, for class size reduction, including any other continuing payments necessary or incidental to the repayment of the bonds. These funds may be used to refinance any or all bond series if it is in the best interest of the state as determined by the Division of Bond Finance. 2 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,328,962 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2 for educational facilities are provided for debt service requirements associated with bond proceeds from the Lottery Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund included in Specific Appropriations 17 and 17A of chapter 2012-118, Laws of Florida, authorized pursuant to section 1013.737, Florida Statutes. Funds in Specific Appropriation 2 shall be transferred, using nonoperating budget authority, to the Lottery Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund. There is hereby appropriated from the Lottery Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund an amount sufficient to enable the payment of debt service resulting from these transfers. TOTAL: PROGRAM: EDUCATION - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 78,888,148 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 78,888,148 OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM: STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM - STATE 3 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA'S BRIGHT FUTURES SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 705,181,580 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3, the Bright Futures Scholarship awards for the 2026-2027 academic year shall be as follows: Academic Scholars shall receive an award equal to the amount necessary to pay 100 percent of tuition and applicable fees for fall, spring, and summer terms. Medallion Scholars shall receive an award equal to the amount necessary to pay 75 percent of tuition and applicable fees for fall, spring, and summer terms. A Medallion Scholar who is enrolled in an associate degree program at a Florida College System institution shall receive an award equal to the amount necessary to pay 100 percent of the tuition and applicable fees. For Gold Seal Vocational Scholars and Gold Seal CAPE Scholars, the award per credit hour or credit hour equivalent shall be as follows: Gold Seal Vocational Scholars and Gold Seal CAPE Scholars Career Certificate Program.....................$ 39 Applied Technology Diploma Program.............$ 39 Technical Degree Education Program.............$ 48 Gold Seal CAPE Scholars Bachelor of Science Program with Statewide Articulation Agreement......................$ 48 Florida College System Bachelor of Applied Science Program.............................$ 48 The additional stipend for Top Scholars shall be $44 per credit hour. 4 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS STUDENT FINANCIAL AID FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 102,954,076 Funds in Specific Appropriation 4 are allocated in Specific Appropriation 67. These funds are provided for Florida Student Assistance Grant (FSAG) public full-time and part-time programs. TOTAL: PROGRAM: STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM - STATE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 808,135,656 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 808,135,656 PUBLIC SCHOOLS, DIVISION OF PROGRAM: STATE GRANTS/K-12 PROGRAM - FEFP The calculations of the Florida Education Finance Program (FEFP) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year are incorporated by reference in SB 2502. The calculations are the basis for the appropriations in the General Appropriations Act in Specific Appropriations 5, 6, 88, and 89. 5 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA EDUCATIONAL FINANCE PROGRAM FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 486,211,876 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 5 are allocated in Specific Appropriation 88. 6 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - CLASS SIZE REDUCTION FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 103,776,356 Funds in Specific Appropriations 6 and 89 are provided to implement the requirements of sections 1003.03 and 1011.685, Florida Statutes. The class size reduction allocation factor for prekindergarten to grade 3 shall be $961.90, for grades 4 to 8 shall be $918.41, and for grades 9 to 12 shall be $920.63. The class size reduction allocation shall be recalculated based on enrollment through the October 2026 FTE survey except as provided in section 1003.03(4), Florida Statutes. If the total class size reduction allocation is greater than the appropriation in Specific Appropriations 6 and 89, funds shall be prorated to the level of the appropriation based on each district's calculated amount. The Commissioner of Education may withhold disbursement of these funds until a district is in compliance with reporting information required for class size reduction implementation. TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE GRANTS/K-12 PROGRAM - FEFP FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 589,988,232 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 589,988,232 PROGRAM: WORKFORCE EDUCATION 7 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 129,828,034 Funds in Specific Appropriation 7 are allocated in Specific Appropriation 121. These funds are provided for school district workforce education programs as defined in section 1004.02(25), Florida Statutes. FLORIDA COLLEGES, DIVISION OF PROGRAM: FLORIDA COLLEGES 8 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA COLLEGE SYSTEM PROGRAM FUND FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 239,728,417 Funds in Specific Appropriation 8 are allocated in Specific Appropriation 129. UNIVERSITIES, DIVISION OF PROGRAM: EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES Funds in Specific Appropriations 9 through 13 shall be expended in accordance with operating budgets which must be approved by each university's board of trustees. 9 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - EDUCATION AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 575,117,456 Funds in Specific Appropriation 9 are allocated in Specific Appropriation 152. 10 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - IFAS (INSTITUTE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURAL SCIENCE) FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 17,079,571 11 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - UNIVERSITY OF SOUTH FLORIDA MEDICAL CENTER FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,463,937 12 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA HEALTH CENTER FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,898,617 13 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA STATE UNIVERSITY MEDICAL SCHOOL FROM EDUCATIONAL ENHANCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 824,574 TOTAL: PROGRAM: EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 612,384,155 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 612,384,155 TOTAL OF SECTION 1 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,458,952,642 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,458,952,642 SECTION 2 - EDUCATION (ALL OTHER FUNDS) SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 2 - EDUCATION (ALL OTHER FUNDS) The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the named funds to the Department of Education as the amounts to be used to pay salaries, other operational expenditures, and fixed capital outlay. EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: EDUCATION - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY The Legislature hereby finds and determines that the items and sums designated in Specific Appropriations 15 through 18 and 21 through 22C from the Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund constitute authorized capital outlay projects within the meaning and as required by Article XII, section 9(a)(2) of the Florida Constitution, as amended, and any other law. In accordance therewith, the moneys in the following items are authorized to be expended for the enumerated authorized capital outlay projects. The sum designated for each project is the maximum sum to be expended for each specified phase of the project from funds accruing under Article XII, section 9(a)(2) of the Florida Constitution. The scope of each project shall be planned so that the amounts specified shall not be exceeded, or any excess in costs shall be funded by sources other than this appropriation. Such excess costs may be funded from the Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund only as a result of fund transfers pursuant to section 216.292(4)(c), Florida Statutes. Each project shall be constructed on the site specified. If existing facilities and acquisition of new sites are a part of these projects, each such building and site must be certified to be free of contamination, asbestos, and other hazardous materials before the facility or site may be acquired. The provisions of section 216.301(2), Florida Statutes, shall apply to all capital outlay funds appropriated from the Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 in Specific Appropriations 15 through 18 and 21 through 22C. The Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget shall establish Fixed Capital Outlay budget authority within appropriate accounts to enable expenditure of funds appropriated for the state universities, the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind, the Division of Blind Services, public school districts, public broadcasting stations, and Florida colleges. 14 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT FEE PROJECTS FROM CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 53,789,000 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 14 shall be allocated by the Board of Governors to the state universities on a pro rata distribution basis in accordance with the Board of Governors Legislative Budget Request for funding from the Capital Improvements Fee Trust Fund, as approved on September 11, 2025. Each board of trustees shall report to the Board of Governors the funding allocated to each specific project. 15 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, RENOVATION, AND REMODELING FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 261,035,971 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 15 shall be allocated as follows: Charter Schools........................................... 260,235,971 State University System................................... 800,000 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 15 for charter schools shall be distributed in accordance with section 1013.62, Florida Statutes. Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 15 for universities shall be distributed in accordance with section 1013.64(1), Florida Statutes. 16 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SURVEY RECOMMENDED NEEDS - PUBLIC SCHOOLS FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 10,735,858 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 16 shall be distributed to developmental research (laboratory) schools pursuant to section 1002.32(9), Florida Statutes, and to charter schools sponsored by a state university or Florida College System institution pursuant to section 1002.33(17), Florida Statutes. 16A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FLORIDA COLLEGE SYSTEM PROJECTS FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 185,879,337 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 16A shall be allocated as follows: THE COLLEGE OF THE FLORIDA KEYS Chiller Plant Infrastructure (SF 3063).................... 1,000,000 DAYTONA STATE COLLEGE Aircraft Airframe/Power Plant (SF 2571)................... 1,000,000 Campus Security and Safety Enhancements (SF 2572)......... 1,300,000 EASTERN FLORIDA STATE COLLEGE Dental Program Relocation & Expansion (SF 1048)........... 3,300,000 FLORIDA GATEWAY COLLEGE ADA Compliance/Bathroom Renovation for Howard Conf. Center (SF 2822)........................................ 850,000 FLORIDA SOUTHWESTERN STATE COLLEGE Applied Technologies Facilities Expansion Hendry/Glades Center (SF 1634)........................................ 350,000 Charlotte Campus - Bldg E Health Professions Remodel (SF 3188)................................................... 2,464,530 Charlotte Campus - Bldg G Yarger Science Hall STEM Remodel (SF 1635)....................................... 7,092,094 FLORIDA STATE COLLEGE AT JACKSONVILLE Career Connection Center (SF 2650)........................ 3,500,000 Cecil Training Institute (SF 3038)........................ 5,000,000 GULF COAST STATE COLLEGE HVAC & Other Infrastructure Improvements (SF 3254)........ 2,000,000 Multi-Purpose Teaching Labs Facility (SF 3255)............ 5,760,000 HILLSBOROUGH COMMUNITY COLLEGE Campus Improvements (SF 3592)............................. 50,000,000 Southshore Workforce Education Center (SF 1991)........... 5,000,000 INDIAN RIVER STATE COLLEGE Deferred Maintenance College Wide (SF 2069)............... 3,089,975 Indiantown High School Expansion (SF 2071)................ 9,900,000 LAKE-SUMTER STATE COLLEGE HVAC-Improvements (SF 1900)............................... 430,000 Renovation for Building #6 (SF 1901)...................... 2,000,000 NORTH FLORIDA COLLEGE Welding Program Expansion Project (SF 1552)............... 385,000 NORTHWEST FLORIDA STATE COLLEGE Workforce Innovation Center (SF 3197)..................... 5,000,000 PALM BEACH STATE COLLEGE Boca Raton Administration (AD) Building Remodel (SF 1144). 4,800,000 PASCO HERNANDO STATE COLLEGE Remodel Building N (SF 3769).............................. 2,000,000 PENSACOLA STATE COLLEGE South Santa Rosa Health Science & Nursing Building (SF 3465)................................................... 7,000,000 POLK STATE COLLEGE Northeast Phase I (SF 2310)............................... 7,576,930 SEMINOLE STATE COLLEGE Workforce Building B (SF 1238)............................ 10,000,000 SOUTH FLORIDA STATE COLLEGE Citrus Center-EMS Remodel (SF 3757)....................... 5,983,845 Regional Workforce Transportation and Firearms Training Center (SF 2983)........................................ 5,000,000 ST. JOHNS RIVER STATE COLLEGE Renovation, Classroom Building and Workforce Training Center Addition (SF 3692)............................... 9,386,963 ST. PETERSBURG COLLEGE Applied Health & Student Success Center (SF 3754)......... 5,000,000 STATE COLLEGE OF FLORIDA, MANATEE-SARASOTA Parrish (SF 1119)......................................... 7,500,000 Venice (SF 1118).......................................... 5,000,000 TALLAHASSEE STATE COLLEGE Gadsden Center Expansion - Phase 2 (SF 1459).............. 7,210,000 17 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM PROJECTS FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 233,212,800 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 17 shall be allocated as follows: FLORIDA A & M UNIVERSITY - FLORIDA STATE UNIVERSITY College of Engineering Building C (SF 1542)............... 20,000,000 FLORIDA A & M UNIVERSITY College of Pharmacy and Pharmaceutical Sciences (SF 1528). 7,000,000 FLORIDA ATLANTIC UNIVERSITY Health Professions Clinical Training and Research Facility (SF 1000)...................................... 10,000,000 FLORIDA GULF COAST UNIVERSITY AB10 Health Sciences Building (SF 3181)................... 27,412,800 Babcock Ranch Learning, Research and Outreach Facility (SF 3182)............................................... 22,000,000 FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL UNIVERSITY Hebert Wertheim College of Medicine Academic Health Sciences/Clinical Facility (SF 1137).................... 10,000,000 FLORIDA POLYTECHNIC UNIVERSITY Student Achievement Center (StAC) (SF 2336)............... 10,000,000 UNIVERSITY OF CENTRAL FLORIDA Discovery and Innovation Hub (SF 2590).................... 10,000,000 Workforce Entrepreneurship Resource eXchange (SF 2166).... 5,000,000 UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA Advanced Brain Research and Innovation (SF 3716).......... 20,000,000 Campus Infrastructure Enhancement (SF 3689)............... 1,000,000 Dental School Building.................................... 20,000,000 Hamilton School Building Additional Space Renovation (SF 2399)................................................... 1,800,000 Norman Fixel Institute for Neurological Diseases.......... 12,500,000 IFAS - Animal Sciences Expansion & Renovation............. 4,000,000 IFAS - Florida 4-H Camp Cherry Lake Outdoor Learning Center Facilities....................................... 5,000,000 IFAS - TREC Pathology/Tissue Laboratory (SF 1005)......... 5,500,000 UNIVERSITY OF SOUTH FLORIDA College of AI, Cybersecurity and Computing Facility (SF 2934)................................................... 15,000,000 Florida Institute of Oceanography Keys Marine Lab Facility (SF 1018)...................................... 4,000,000 Health Translational Research Institute Facility (SF 3294) 15,000,000 UNIVERSITY OF WEST FLORIDA Critical Infrastructure Expansion - Site Utility Plant (SF 3466)............................................... 8,000,000 18 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SPECIAL FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 369,000,242 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 18 shall be allocated in accordance with section 1013.64(2), Florida Statutes, as follows: Baker Middle School (Year 2 of 3) (SF 2992)............... 51,939,586 Bradford Middle/Senior High School (Year 1 of 3) (SF 2996) 13,169,835 DeSoto High School (Year 2 of 3).......................... 36,307,690 Gadsden PreK-8 (SF 1426).................................. 26,766,081 Hardee Senior High School (Year 1 of 2)................... 68,800,279 Hendry LaBelle High School (Year 3 of 3) (SF 3039)........ 63,340,584 Holmes PK-12 Ponce de Leon School (Year 1 of 3) (SF 3124). 11,548,232 Lafayette PK-12 Combination School (Year 1 of 3) (SF 1450) 13,252,351 Union PK-5 Lake Butler Elementary School (Year 2 of 3) (SF 3074)............................................... 29,519,032 Wakulla High School (Year 3 of 3) (SF 1434)............... 54,356,572 19 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEBT SERVICE FROM CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,958,997 FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 469,946,651 FROM SCHOOL DISTRICT AND COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . 6,840,061 Funds in Specific Appropriation 19 from the School District and Community College District Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund are for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 debt service on bonds authorized pursuant to the School Capital Outlay Amendment, Article XII, section 9(d) of the Florida Constitution, and any other continuing payments necessary or incidental to the repayment of the bonds. These funds may be used to refinance any or all series if it is in the best interest of the state as determined by the Division of Bond Finance. If the debt service appropriated for this program in Specific Appropriation 19 is insufficient due to interest rate changes, issuance timing, or other circumstances, the amount of the insufficiency is appropriated from the School District and Community College District Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund. 20 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL DISTRICT AND COMMUNITY COLLEGE FROM SCHOOL DISTRICT AND COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . 128,000,000 21 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FLORIDA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF AND BLIND - CAPITAL PROJECTS FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 11,882,154 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 21 are provided to the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind for preventative maintenance. 22 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DIVISION OF BLIND SERVICES - CAPITAL PROJECTS FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 820,000 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 22 are provided for the Division of Blind Services for repair and maintenance projects at the Daytona facility and Tampa district office. 22A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PUBLIC BROADCASTING PROJECTS FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 7,566,202 Funds in Specific Appropriation 22A are provided for the following projects to correct health and safety issues, correct building deficiencies, and complete renovations at public broadcasting stations: WFIT-FM, Melbourne - Replace Satellite Dish............... 98,962 WFSU-TV/FM, Tallahassee - Repaint Studio to Transmitter Link Tower.............................................. 64,000 WJCT-TV/FM, Jacksonville - Replace HVAC Chiller - Phase I. 758,750 WJCT-TV/FM - Jacksonville - Renovate Restrooms - Phase II. 311,110 WMFE-FM, Orlando - Replace Roof - Phase II................ 4,286,435 WMNF-FM, Tampa - Replace HVAC system - Phase II........... 847,246 WQCS-FM, Ft. Pierce - Replace Tower....................... 733,600 WUFT-TV/FM, Gainesville - Replace Tower Lights............ 218,599 WUSF-FM, Tampa/St. Petersburg - Replace Backup Tower...... 79,500 WUSF-FM Tampa/St. Petersburg - Replace Roof............... 168,000 22B FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PUBLIC SCHOOL PROJECTS FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 18,220,000 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 22B shall be allocated as follows: Dixie District School Consolidation- Old Town Elementary Classroom Addition (SF 1500)............................ 500,000 Glades - School District Roofing Project (SF 3287)........ 4,500,000 Hardee - Renovation of 1948 High School to Consolidate School District Office (SF 3543)........................ 12,000,000 Hernando County School District - Space Hub and Incubation Center (SF 3278)............................. 350,000 Liberty - School District School Safety Window Hardening (SF 1462)............................................... 120,000 Walton - Seacoast Collegiate High School Dual Enrollment and Workforce Center Expansion (SF 3202)................ 750,000 22C FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY VOCATIONAL-TECHNICAL FACILITIES FROM PUBLIC EDUCATION CAPITAL OUTLAY AND DEBT SERVICE TRUST FUND 3,700,000 Nonrecurring funds in Specific Appropriation 22C shall be allocated as follows: Lake Technical College Workforce Education Center South (SF 1910)............................................... 3,700,000 TOTAL: PROGRAM: EDUCATION - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,767,587,273 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,767,587,273 VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION For funds in Specific Appropriations 24 through 37A for the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, the Department of Education is the designated state agency for purposes of compliance with the Federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended. If the department identifies additional resources that may be used to maximize federal matching funds for the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, the department shall submit a budget amendment prior to the expenditure of the funds, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. APPROVED SALARY RATE 47,752,554 24 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 878.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,772,459 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 292,494 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 54,021,399 25 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,628,520 26 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,686 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,764,837 27 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - ADULTS WITH DISABILITIES FUNDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,083,047 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 27, recurring funds are provided for the following base appropriations projects: Adults with Disabilities - Helping People Succeed......... 109,006 Broward County Public Schools Adults with Disabilities.... 800,000 Flagler Adults with Disabilities Program.................. 535,892 Gadsden Adults with Disabilities Program.................. 100,000 Gulf Adults with Disabilities Program..................... 35,000 Jackson Adults with Disabilities Program.................. 1,019,247 Leon Adults with Disabilities Program..................... 225,000 Miami-Dade Adults with Disabilities Program............... 1,125,208 Arc of Palm Beach County - formerly known as Palm Beach Habilitation Center..................................... 225,000 Sumter Adults with Disabilities Program................... 42,500 Tallahassee State College Adults with Disabilities Program 25,000 Taylor Adults with Disabilities Program................... 42,500 Wakulla Adults with Disabilities Program.................. 42,500 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 27, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Arc of South Florida - Culinary Training for Individuals with Disabilities and Mental Illness (SF 1405).......... 956,194 Boca School for Autism: Bridge to Success (B2S) Micro-Enterprise Vocational Job Training Program (SF 1039)................................................... 200,000 Brevard Adults with Disabilities Project (SF 1260)........ 300,000 Bridging the Gap in Employment for People with Unique Abilities (SF 1358)..................................... 800,000 Els Center for Autism Specialized Workforce Training Program (SF 2031)....................................... 350,000 HabCenter Boca Raton - Employment and Empowerment Programs for Individuals with Disabilities (SF 2112).... 350,000 Jacksonville School for Autism Supportive Transition & Employment Placement (STEP) Program (SF 2696)........... 300,000 NextStep Autism Transition Program (SF 3137).............. 400,000 The Voice Inside: Youth Mental Health, Success, & Employment for All Abilities (SF 2153).................. 350,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 27, $750,000 in recurring funds is provided for the Inclusive Transition and Employment Management Program (ITEM), which shall be used to provide young adults with disabilities who are between the ages of 16 and 28 with transitional skills, education, and on-the-job experience to allow them to acquire and retain permanent employment, pursuant to section 1007.36, Florida Statutes. 28 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,000 29 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,961,015 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,608,886 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 29, $1,018,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is appropriated for the High School High Tech Program. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 29, $325,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Florida Alliance for Assistive Services and Technology (FAAST) (SF 1656). 30 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - INDEPENDENT LIVING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,582,004 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,087,789 Funds in Specific Appropriation 30 the recurring sums of $1,232,004 from the General Revenue Fund and $5,087,789 from the Federal Rehabilitation Trust Fund shall be allocated to the Centers for Independent Living and shall be distributed according to the formula in the most recently approved State Plan for Independent Living. From the Federal Rehabilitation Trust Fund allocation, $3,472,193 shall be funded from Social Security reimbursements (program income) provided that the Social Security reimbursements are available. The State Plan for Independent Living may include provisions related to financial needs testing and financial participation of consumers, as agreed upon by all signatories to the plan. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 30, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Community Transition Services for Adults with Disabilities (SF 1389). 31 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PURCHASED CLIENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,158,559 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 113,424,062 32 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 779,482 33 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 97,655 34 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 57,151 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,062 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 254,162 35 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 154,316 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 515,762 36 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION SERVICES FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 252,732 37 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 293,178 37A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITY REPAIRS MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 350,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 37A are provided for Learning Independence for Tomorrow (LiFT): Family Resource Center for Neurodiverse Families (SF 2473). TOTAL: VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 60,125,237 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 207,547,020 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 878.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 267,672,257 BLIND SERVICES, DIVISION OF APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,226,214 38 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 279.75 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,532,041 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 510,029 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,607,190 39 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 161,282 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 326,329 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,079 40 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 415,191 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 40,774 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,473,307 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 44,395 41 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY REHABILITATION FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 847,347 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,100,913 42 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54,294 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 235,198 43 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 44 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 120,000 45 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CLIENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,904,159 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,762,812 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 252,746 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 45, recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following base appropriations projects: Blind Babies Successful Transition from Preschool to School.................................................. 2,438,004 Blind Children's Program.................................. 200,000 Florida Association of Agencies Serving the Blind......... 500,000 Lighthouse for the Blind - Miami.......................... 150,000 Lighthouse for the Blind - Pasco/Hernando................. 50,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 45, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Florida Association of Agencies Serving the Blind (FASB) (SF 1224)............................................... 350,000 Lighthouse of Broward for the Blind & Visually Impaired - Vital Living for Seniors Program (SF 3441).............. 350,000 Maintaining Independence for the Blind - Rehabilitation Services for Individuals with Vision Loss (SF 3009)..... 150,000 Mobile Education Center Services to Blind and Low Vision Residents Access Expansion (SF 1393)............. 848,000 46 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 56,140 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 875,000 47 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - INDEPENDENT LIVING SERVICES FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,000 48 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 70,768 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 144,435 49 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LIBRARY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 89,735 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 49, $50,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Braille & Talking Book Library (base appropriations project). 50 SPECIAL CATEGORIES VENDING STANDS - EQUIPMENT AND SUPPLIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 200,000 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,639,345 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,044,821 51 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,158 52 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,162 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,915 FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 93,452 53 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 686,842 54 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION SERVICES FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 249,902 55 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM FEDERAL REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 243,315 55A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITY REPAIRS MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 350,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 55A are provided for the Florida Center for the Blind - Workforce Education and Training Center for Visually Impaired Adults (SF 2919). TOTAL: BLIND SERVICES, DIVISION OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 25,684,119 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 56,817,957 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 279.75 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 82,502,076 PROGRAM: PRIVATE COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES Prior to the disbursement of funds from Specific Appropriations 56 through 58, each institution shall submit a proposed expenditure plan to the Department of Education pursuant to the requirements of section 1011.521, Florida Statutes. 56 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - MEDICAL TRAINING AND SIMULATION LABORATORY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 56, $3,500,000 in recurring funds is appropriated for a base appropriations project for the University of Miami Medical Training and Simulation Laboratory. 57 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HISTORICALLY BLACK PRIVATE COLLEGES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,104,285 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 57, $30,771,685 is provided for the following institutions, which shall only be expended for student access and retention, or direct instructional purposes: Bethune-Cookman University................................ 16,960,111 Edward Waters University.................................. 6,429,526 Florida Memorial University............................... 7,382,048 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 57, $1,000,000 in recurring funds is provided for the Edward Waters University - Institute on Criminal Justice (base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 57, $1,332,600 in nonrecurring funds is provided for the Edward Waters University - EWU Living, Learning, and Community Multiplex (SF 2652) 58 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PRIVATE COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,245,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 58, $5,000,000 in recurring funds is provided Florida Southern College to support general operations, student access and retention, or instructional programs. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 58, $5,000,000 in recurring funds is provided for the following base appropriations projects: Embry-Riddle - Aerospace Academy.......................... 3,000,000 Jacksonville University - EPIC............................ 2,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 58, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Embry-Riddle Aeronautical University Embry-Riddle Aeronautical University & University of Central Florida Hypersonic Equipment (SF 2573).......... 2,500,000 Jacksonville University's Accelerated Nursing Programs (SF 3177).................... 350,000 Saint Leo University Nursing Program Expansion to Meet Regional Demand (SF 2277)................................................... 350,000 Webber International University Safety Enhancement Initiative (SF 3529)................... 45,000 59 SPECIAL CATEGORIES EFFECTIVE ACCESS TO STUDENT EDUCATION GRANT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 136,901,500 Funds in Specific Appropriation 59 are provided for the Effective Access to Student Education (EASE) Grant Program. Funds shall be used to support 38,272 qualified Florida resident students at $3,500 per student for tuition assistance pursuant to sections 1009.89 and 1009.521, Florida Statutes. From these funds, a maximum of $5,000,000 may be used for the EASE Plus incentive program to provide an additional award to support students enrolled in upper-level courses within quality, high-demand programs at institutions eligible for the Effective Access to Student Education Grant Program under sections 1009.89 and 1009.521, Florida Statutes. Eligible programs include Teaching, Nursing, Allied Health, Agriculture/Veterinary Science, Cyber Security, and Digital Arts/Computer Graphics. The Office of Student Financial Assistance may prorate the EASE award in the second term and provide a lesser amount if the appropriated funds are insufficient to fully award all eligible students. Additionally, the office may reallocate funds between institutions if an eligible institution fails to reach its estimated 2026-2027 enrollment. The office shall prorate the EASE Plus award based on the number of eligible students. The office may reallocate undisbursed funds from the EASE Plus incentive program to the EASE Grant program if the funds appropriated for the EASE Grant program are insufficient to provide the full award amount to all eligible students. By February 1, 2027, the Department of Education must submit a report detailing eligibility metrics, the number of awards, the average award amount, and program enrollment by institution to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. 59A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITY REPAIRS MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,135,967 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 59A, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Edward Waters University EWU Living, Learning, and Community Multiplex (SF 2652)... 667,400 Florida Southern College Workforce Readiness Expansion (SF 2340)................... 3,775,000 Palm Beach Atlantic University LeMieux Center for Public Policy (SF 1683)................ 350,000 Webber International University Safety Enhancement Initiative (SF 3529)................... 343,567 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PRIVATE COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 191,886,752 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 191,886,752 OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM: STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM - STATE 60 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - OPEN DOOR GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 60, $15,000,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for District Workforce Education to implement the provisions relating to the Open Door Grant Program in section 1009.895, Florida Statutes. The base allocation for each eligible district is $50,000 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 60, $20,000,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for the Florida College System to implement the provisions relating to the Open Door Grant Program in section 1009.895, Florida Statutes. The base allocation for each eligible institution is $50,000 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. 61 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - BENACQUISTO SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,172,921 62 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FIRST GENERATION IN COLLEGE MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,617,326 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 62, $2,654,332 shall be allocated to First Generation in College Matching Grant Programs at Florida colleges for need-based financial assistance as provided in section 1009.701, Florida Statutes. If required matching funds are not raised by participating Florida colleges or state universities by December 1, 2026, the remaining funds shall be reallocated to First Generation in College Matching Grant Programs at Florida colleges or state universities that have remaining unmatched private contributions. 63 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PREPAID TUITION SCHOLARSHIPS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,000,000 64 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ABLE, INCORPORATED FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,770,000 64A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - RURAL INCENTIVE FOR PROFESSIONAL EDUCATORS (RIPE) PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 64A are provided to the Department of Education for the Rural Incentive for Professional Educators (RIPE) Program pursuant to section 1009.635, Florida Statutes. 65 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AID - NURSING STUDENT LOAN REIMBURSEMENT/ SCHOLARSHIPS FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,233,006 66 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS MARY MCLEOD BETHUNE SCHOLARSHIP FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 160,500 FROM STATE STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 160,500 67 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS STUDENT FINANCIAL AID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 205,412,333 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 4 and 67, the sum of $307,061,409 is provided pursuant to the following guidelines: Florida Student Assistance Grant - Public Full & Part Time 236,044,017 Florida Student Assistance Grant - Private................ 23,612,502 Florida Student Assistance Grant - Postsecondary.......... 6,430,443 Florida Student Assistance Grant - Career Education....... 3,309,050 Children/Spouses of Deceased/Disabled Veterans............ 35,566,577 Florida Work Experience................................... 1,569,922 Rosewood Family Scholarships.............................. 256,747 Florida Farmworker Scholarships........................... 272,151 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 67, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Honorably Discharged Graduate Assistance Program, which is a base appropriations project. Such funds are provided for supplemental need-based veteran educational benefits and shall be used to assist in the payment of living expenses during holiday and semester breaks for active duty and honorably discharged members of the Armed Forces who served on or after September 11, 2001. To ensure students in both public and private institutions have an opportunity to receive funding, allocations to institutions shall be prorated based on the number of total eligible students at eligible institutions. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 67, $305,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Randolph Bracy Ocoee Scholarship Program. The program shall provide up to 50 scholarships to eligible students annually, in an amount up to $6,100, not to exceed the amount of the student's tuition and registration fees. To be eligible for an award, a student must: be a direct descendant of victims of the Ocoee Election Day Riots of November 1920 or a current African-American resident of Ocoee; meet the general eligibility requirements for student eligibility as provided in section 1009.40, Florida Statutes; file an application within the established time limits; and be enrolled as a degree-seeking or certificate-seeking student at a state university, Florida College System institution, Historically Black College or University, or a career center authorized by law. The department shall rank eligible initial applicants for the purpose of awarding scholarships based on need, as determined by the department. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 4 and 67, the maximum grant to any student from the Florida Public, Private, Career Education, and Postsecondary Assistance Grant Programs shall be $3,260. Institutions that received state funds in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for student scholarships or grants administered by the Office of Student Financial Assistance shall submit the following two reports in a format prescribed by the Department of Education; both due by December 1, 2026. A report of the following information by institution: 1) federal loan information, including the total federal loan amounts disbursed and total number of students who received federal loans; and 2) student level data for all grants, scholarships, and awards to students who applied for and/or received state-funded tuition assistance and aid. 68 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS OUT-OF-STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT EQUIVALENCY REIMBURSEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 250,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 68 are provided for reimbursement for law enforcement equivalency training. The department, in consultation with the Department of Law Enforcement, shall reimburse eligible applicants who relocate from outside the state or who transition from service in the special operations forces to become a full-time law enforcement officer within this state for eligible expenses incurred while obtaining a Florida law enforcement officer certification. Funds shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis pursuant to section 1009.8961, Florida Statutes. 69 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS FLORIDA FIRST RESPONDER SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 69 are provided for the Florida First Responder Scholarship to assist in the recruitment of first responders within the state by providing financial assistance to trainees who enroll in an approved training program at a Florida College System institution or school district technical center. Funds shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis pursuant to section 1009.896, Florida Statutes. 70 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - DUAL ENROLLMENT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,050,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 70 are provided to support public postsecondary institutions and an independent college or university, which is not for profit, is accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, and confers degrees as defined in section 1005.02, Florida Statutes, in providing dual enrollment pursuant to section 1009.30, Florida Statutes. 71 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS GRADUATION ALTERNATIVE TO TRADITIONAL EDUCATION (GATE) SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 71 are provided to support public postsecondary institutions in providing the Graduation Alternative to Traditional Education (GATE) program pursuant to section 1009.711, Florida Statutes. TOTAL: PROGRAM: STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM - STATE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 332,433,080 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,393,506 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 333,826,586 PROGRAM: STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM - FEDERAL 72 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS STUDENT FINANCIAL AID FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 73 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS TRANSFER DEFAULT FEES TO THE STUDENT LOAN GUARANTY RESERVE TRUST FUND FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM - FEDERAL FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 105,000 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 105,000 EARLY LEARNING PROGRAM: EARLY LEARNING SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,828,730 74 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 97.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,555,739 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,571,748 75 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 118,840 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 220,160 76 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 455,745 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 658,048 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 265,163 77 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 15,000 78 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,150,211 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 3,187,328 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 225,000 79 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PARTNERSHIP FOR SCHOOL READINESS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,228,957 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 16,391,043 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 3,900,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 79, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund that shall be allocated as follows: Childcare Network Educator Tool Kits for Florida's Military Kids (SF 3150)................................. 60,000 ECS4Kids Early Learning Center (SF 3374).................. 15,000 Florida Center for Early Childhood Professional Recognition (SF 3595)................................... 350,000 Miami-Dade County Public Schools VPK Expansion of Parental Choice Programs (SF 1812)...................... 250,000 Preschool Emergency Alert Response System (PEARLS) (SF 1035)................................................... 395,000 Seminole County Public Schools' Center for Early Learning (SF 2725)............................................... 350,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 79, $10,000,000 in recurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund are provided for the Teacher Education and Compensation Helps Program (T.E.A.C.H.) as provided in section 1002.95, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 79, $1,400,000 in recurring funds and $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Welfare Transition Trust Fund are provided for the Home Instruction Program for Pre-School Youngsters (HIPPY) (SF 3630) to deliver high quality school readiness curriculum directly to parents so they may strengthen the cognitive and early literacy skills of at risk children. Early learning coalitions will work with HIPPY program staff to identify participant families based on poverty, parents' limited education, and willingness to actively participate in all aspects of the HIPPY program (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 79, $3,500,000 in recurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund is provided to the Division of Early Learning for purposes of implementing the provisions of section 1002.82(2)(o), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 79, $1,808,957 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund (recurring base appropriations project) and $2,891,043 in nonrecurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund are provided for the Children's Forum to continue the Help Me Grow Florida Network (SF 1780). 80 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL READINESS SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 155,995,939 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 871,209,466 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 500,000 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 94,112,427 The school readiness program reimbursement rates for the 2026-2027 fiscal year are incorporated by reference in SB 2502. The school readiness program reimbursement rates are the basis for this specific appropriation. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, $978,367,832 is provided for the School Readiness Program and is allocated to early learning coalitions as follows: Alachua................................................... 10,782,812 Bay, Calhoun, Gulf, Franklin, Washington, Holmes, Jackson. 17,086,759 Brevard................................................... 23,794,822 Broward................................................... 97,702,332 Charlotte, DeSoto, Highlands, Hardee...................... 12,097,460 Columbia, Hamilton, Lafayette, Union, Suwannee............ 10,095,678 Dade, Monroe.............................................. 130,426,063 Dixie, Gilchrist, Levy, Citrus, Sumter.................... 12,109,621 Duval..................................................... 56,580,869 Escambia.................................................. 15,817,704 Hendry, Glades, Collier, Lee.............................. 38,035,541 Hillsborough.............................................. 78,714,219 Lake...................................................... 14,505,549 Leon, Gadsden, Jefferson, Liberty, Madison, Wakulla, Taylor.................................................. 21,465,565 Manatee................................................... 16,659,622 Marion.................................................... 15,381,555 Martin, Okeechobee, Indian River.......................... 12,185,993 Okaloosa, Walton.......................................... 9,824,746 Orange.................................................... 74,837,684 Osceola................................................... 20,350,819 Palm Beach................................................ 75,369,121 Pasco, Hernando........................................... 23,134,272 Pinellas.................................................. 33,797,040 Polk...................................................... 40,519,737 St. Johns, Putnam, Clay, Nassau, Baker, Bradford.......... 23,784,080 St. Lucie................................................. 19,348,359 Santa Rosa................................................ 5,976,655 Sarasota.................................................. 10,447,262 Seminole.................................................. 14,781,011 Volusia, Flagler.......................................... 28,977,854 Redlands Christian Migrant Association.................... 13,777,028 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, provided for the School Readiness Program and allocated to the early learning coalitions, the Division of Early Learning shall have the ability to reallocate funds between early learning coalitions if an early learning coalition does not have eligible children on its waiting list and has met its expenditure cap pursuant to section 1002.89, Florida Statutes. At least 14 days prior to reallocating any funds, the division shall submit written notification to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee which includes the total amount of school readiness funds being reallocated and the early learning coalitions involved in the reallocation. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, $950,000 in recurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund shall be used to allocate School Readiness Fraud Restitution payments collected in the prior year. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, $40,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Education to administer the differential payment program allocation established pursuant to section 1002.89(1)(c), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, $70,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund is provided to the Division of Early Learning to administer the Gold Seal Quality Care program allocation established pursuant to section 1002.89(1)(b), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund is provided to the Division of Early Learning to administer the special needs differential allocation established pursuant to section 1002.89(1)(d), Florida Statutes. For the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, expenditures for Gold Seal Quality Care Program and special needs differential payments directly to child care providers shall be reported as direct services. The Division of Early Learning shall have the authority to reclassify these payments by the early learning coalitions and statewide contractors to meet targeted federal requirements to the extent allowable in the state's approved Child Care and Development Fund Plan. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, $30,000,000 in recurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund is provided to expand the provision of services to low income families at or below 70 percent of the state median income as long as the income does not exceed 85 percent of the state median income. Local matching funds can be derived from local governments, employers, charitable foundations, and other sources so that Florida communities can create local partnerships focused on using the state and local funds for direct services and expanding the number of school readiness slots. To be eligible for funding, an early learning coalition must match its portion of the state funds with a dollar-for-dollar match of local funds. The Division of Early Learning shall establish procedures for the match program which shall include giving priority to early learning coalitions whose local match complies with federal Child Care and Development Block Grant matching requirements. The Division of Early Learning shall provide a report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1, 2026, that includes the following information about the division's allocation of the $30,000,000 in local matching funds provided in Specific Appropriation 81 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida: (1) the amount of funds allocated to each early learning coalition and a breakdown, by coalition, of the amount of funds expended by the coalition on direct services and the amount expended by the coalition on expanding school readiness slots, and (2) the total number of school readiness slots funded by each early learning coalition with the local matching funds. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 80, provided to the Redlands Christian Migrant Association, the Division of Early Learning shall reimburse the association for their school readiness services at the association's approved Fiscal Year 2024-2025 rates. 82 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS- EARLY LEARNING STANDARDS AND ACCOUNTABILITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,319,772 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 3,151,748 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 82, $3,151,748 in recurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund and $2,319,772 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to the Department of Education to continue the implementation of the Voluntary Prekindergarten Program Assessments as required in section 1002.68, Florida Statutes. 83 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,046 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 14,319 84 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - VOLUNTARY PREKINDERGARTEN PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 433,773,635 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 84, $430,999,744 in recurring funds is provided for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program as provided in sections 1002.51 through 1002.79, Florida Statutes, and shall be allocated to early learning coalitions as indicated below. Pursuant to the provisions of section 1002.71(3)(a), Florida Statutes, for Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the base student allocation per full-time equivalent student for the school year program shall be $3,029, and the base student allocation for the summer program shall be $2,586. The allocation shall include five percent in addition to the base student allocation to fund administrative and other program costs of the early learning coalitions related to the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 84, $430,999,744 shall be allocated as follows: Alachua................................................... 3,916,228 Bay, Calhoun, Gulf, Franklin, Washington, Holmes, Jackson. 4,609,912 Brevard................................................... 13,076,141 Broward................................................... 37,348,791 Charlotte, DeSoto, Highlands, Hardee...................... 4,784,828 Columbia, Hamilton, Lafayette, Union, Suwannee............ 2,823,338 Dade, Monroe.............................................. 60,411,017 Dixie, Gilchrist, Levy, Citrus, Sumter.................... 4,952,609 Duval..................................................... 22,521,052 Escambia.................................................. 4,272,445 Hendry, Glades, Collier, Lee.............................. 23,218,655 Hillsborough.............................................. 30,764,542 Lake...................................................... 7,783,967 Leon, Gadsden, Jefferson, Liberty, Madison, Wakulla, Taylor.................................................. 6,800,079 Manatee................................................... 8,376,347 Marion.................................................... 5,527,521 Martin, Okeechobee, Indian River.......................... 7,059,864 Okaloosa, Walton.......................................... 6,143,938 Orange.................................................... 35,065,933 Osceola................................................... 9,918,893 Palm Beach................................................ 31,604,665 Pasco, Hernando........................................... 17,556,120 Pinellas.................................................. 13,365,708 Polk...................................................... 13,281,144 St. Johns, Putnam, Clay, Nassau, Baker, Bradford.......... 17,515,563 St. Lucie................................................. 7,963,561 Santa Rosa................................................ 3,079,499 Sarasota.................................................. 5,090,263 Seminole.................................................. 11,217,790 Volusia, Flagler.......................................... 10,949,331 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 84, $2,773,891 in recurring funds are provided to the Department of Education to establish the Voluntary Prekindergarten Summer Bridge Program established pursuant to section 1008.25(5)(b), Florida Statutes. 85 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,607 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 10,692 86 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,248,383 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,312,628 87 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 166,702 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 225,056 TOTAL: PROGRAM: EARLY LEARNING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 604,049,576 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,969,826 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 97.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,605,019,402 PUBLIC SCHOOLS, DIVISION OF PROGRAM: STATE GRANTS/K-12 PROGRAM - FEFP The calculations of the Florida Education Finance Program (FEFP) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year are incorporated by reference in SB 2502. The calculations are the basis for the appropriations in the General Appropriations Act in Specific Appropriations 5, 6, 88, and 89. 88 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA EDUCATIONAL FINANCE PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,341,536,058 FROM STATE SCHOOL TRUST FUND . . . . 458,438,902 Funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88 shall be allocated using a base student allocation of $5,422.60 for the FEFP. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, $100,344,840 is provided for school districts and charter schools to use for increased personnel compensation costs or to provide salary increases to full-time classroom teachers and certified prekindergarten teachers funded in the Florida Education Finance Program, and other instructional personnel. Each school district and charter school shall use 0.63 percent of its base FEFP funding amount as provided in SB 2500. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, 8.52 percent, or $1,357,044,417, of the base Florida Education Finance Program funding is provided to maintain prior year salary increases provided to classroom teachers and other instructional personnel pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. Funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88 are provided for the supplemental allocation for juvenile justice education programs allocated pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. The allocation factor shall be $920.01. The comparable wage factor (CWF) for each school district shall be calculated and applied to the Florida Education Finance Program pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. The additional value of the full-time equivalent (FTE) student membership for the small district factor pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes, is 1.0373. Total Required Local Effort for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 shall be $11,195,422,835. The total amount shall include adjustments made for the calculation pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. The maximum nonvoted discretionary millage which may be levied pursuant to the provisions of section 1011.71(1), Florida Statutes, by district school boards in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 shall be 0.748 mills. This millage shall be used to calculate the discretionary millage compression supplement pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. To be eligible for the supplement, a district must levy the maximum. Funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88 are provided for the State-Funded Discretionary Contribution pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. Funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88 are based upon program cost factors for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 as follows: 1. Basic Programs A. K-3 Basic................................................1.107 B. 4-8 Basic................................................1.000 C. 9-12 Basic...............................................0.965 2. Programs for Exceptional Students A. Support Level 4..........................................3.515 B. Support Level 5..........................................5.906 3. English for Speakers of Other Languages ....................1.161 4. Programs for Grades 9-12 Career Education...................1.090 Funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88 are provided for the Exceptional Student Education (ESE) Guaranteed Allocation pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. The ESE Guaranteed Allocation funds are provided in addition to the funds for each eligible exceptional student in the per full-time equivalent (FTE) student calculation. School districts that provided educational services in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for exceptional students who are residents of other school districts shall not discontinue providing such services without the prior approval of the Department of Education. The ESE Guaranteed Allocation factor is $2,164.20. The additional value of the full-time equivalent (FTE) student membership for small school district exceptional student education pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes, is 43.35 per weighted FTE. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, $290,000,000 is provided for Safe Schools activities and shall be allocated as follows: $250,000 shall be distributed to each district, and the remaining balance shall be allocated pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. Funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88 are provided for the Educational Enrichment Allocation pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, $565,994,313 is provided for Student Transportation pursuant to section 1011.68, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, school districts and charter schools shall provide at a minimum $300 per eligible classroom teacher to fund the Florida Teachers Classroom Supply Assistance Program pursuant to section 1012.71, Florida Statutes. Funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88 for the Federally Connected Student Supplement shall be allocated pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. The total number of federally connected students and the total number of students with disabilities shall be multiplied by 3 percent and 10.5 percent of the base student allocation respectively. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, $180,000,000 is provided for the Mental Health Assistance Allocation pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, $596,771,896 is provided for the Academic Acceleration Options Supplement pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. The Declining Enrollment Supplement shall be calculated based on 10 percent for non-fiscally constrained counties and 25 percent for fiscally constrained counties of the decline between the prior year and current year unweighted public FTE students pursuant to section 1011.62, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 5 and 88, $4,482,590,649 is provided for the Education Scholarship Program pursuant to section 1011.687, Florida Statutes. 89 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - CLASS SIZE REDUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,462,597,956 FROM STATE SCHOOL TRUST FUND . . . . 86,161,098 Funds in Specific Appropriations 6 and 89 are provided to implement the requirements of sections 1003.03 and 1011.685, Florida Statutes. The class size reduction allocation factor for prekindergarten to grade 3 shall be $961.90, for grades 4 to 8 shall be $918.41, and for grades 9 to 12 shall be $920.63. The class size reduction allocation shall be recalculated based on enrollment through the October 2026 FTE survey except as provided in section 1003.03(4), Florida Statutes. If the total class size reduction allocation is greater than the appropriation in Specific Appropriations 6 and 89, funds shall be prorated to the level of the appropriation based on each district's calculated amount. The Commissioner of Education may withhold disbursement of these funds until a district is in compliance with reporting information required for class size reduction implementation. TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE GRANTS/K-12 PROGRAM - FEFP FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 14,804,134,014 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 544,600,000 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,348,734,014 PROGRAM: STATE GRANTS/K-12 PROGRAM - NON FEFP Funds provided for school district matching grants and regional education consortium programs in Specific Appropriations 95 and 102, 60 percent shall be released to the Department of Education at the beginning of the first quarter and the balance at the beginning of the third quarter. The Department of Education shall disburse the funds to eligible entities within 30 days of release. Funds provided for the School Recognition Program, Educator Professional Liability Insurance and Teacher and School Administrator Death Benefits in Specific Appropriations 91, 97, and 98, shall be fully released to the Department of Education at the beginning of the first quarter. Funds in Specific Appropriations 90 through 113 shall be used to serve Florida students. 90 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - THE CHRIS HIXON, COACH AARON FEIS, AND COACH SCOTT BEIGEL GUARDIAN PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 90 shall be used to certify and train school guardians as provided in section 30.15, Florida Statutes. 91 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL RECOGNITION PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 133,060,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 91 are provided to the Department of Education and shall be allocated to school districts pursuant to section 1008.36, Florida Statutes. School districts shall provide expenditure details by school and by school district to the department. The department shall submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature by June 30, 2027, which details how the funds were spent by each school and school district. 91A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - ASSISTANCE TO LOW PERFORMING SCHOOLS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 91A may be used to contract for the operation of the Florida Partnership for Minority and Underrepresented Student Achievement and to achieve the partnership's mission as provided in section 1007.35, Florida Statutes. The funds shall be expended for professional development for classroom teachers of advanced courses. 92 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - TAKE STOCK IN CHILDREN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,125,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 92 are provided for the Take Stock in Children program (recurring base appropriations project). 93 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - MENTORING/STUDENT ASSISTANCE INITIATIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,180,808 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 93, the following projects are funded with recurring funds and shall be allocated as follows: Best Buddies (recurring base appropriations project)...... 700,000 Big Brothers Big Sisters (recurring base appropriations project)................................................ 2,980,248 Florida Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs (recurring base appropriations project)................................. 3,652,768 Teen Trendsetters (recurring base appropriations project). 300,000 YMCA State Alliance/YMCA Reads (recurring base appropriations project)................................. 764,972 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 93, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds and shall be allocated as follows: Ladies Learning to Lead (SF 2908)......................... 250,000 Overtown Youth Center College and Career Readiness (SF 1043)................................................... 350,000 Sowing SEEDS Project (SF 2828)............................ 132,820 United Foundation of Central Florida's - Youth Innovation & Empowerment Initiative (UFCF-YIEI) (SF 2766).......... 350,000 YMCA State Alliance/ YMCA Reads (SF 2642)................. 350,000 Youth Matter Mentorship Program (SF 2199)................. 350,000 93A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COLLEGE REACH OUT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 94 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA DIAGNOSTIC AND LEARNING RESOURCES CENTERS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,700,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 94 shall be allocated to the Multidisciplinary Educational Services Centers as provided in section 1006.03, Florida Statutes, as follows: University of Florida..................................... 1,450,000 University of Miami....................................... 1,450,000 Florida State University.................................. 1,450,000 University of South Florida............................... 1,450,000 University of Florida Health Science Center at Jacksonville............................................ 1,450,000 Keiser University......................................... 1,450,000 Each center shall provide a report to the Department of Education by September 1, 2026, for the prior fiscal year that shall include the following: (1) the number of children served, (2) the number of parents served, (3) the number of persons participating in in-service education activities, (4) the number of districts served, and (5) specific services provided. 95 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL DISTRICT EDUCATION FOUNDATION MATCHING GRANTS PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 95 are provided as challenge grants to public school district education foundations for programs that serve low-performing students, technical career education, literacy initiatives, Science, Technology, Engineering, Math (STEM) Education initiatives, increased teacher quality and/or increased graduation rates as provided in section 1011.765, Florida Statutes, and initiatives that advance student resiliency, citizenship, character, and life skill development. The amount of each grant shall be equal to the private contribution made to a qualifying public school district education foundation. In-kind contributions shall not be considered for matching purposes. Administrative costs for the program shall not exceed five percent. Prior to the release of any funds provided in Specific Appropriation 95 to any public school district education foundation, the public school district foundation must certify to the Commissioner of Education that the private cash has been received by the public school education foundation seeking matching funds. The Consortium of Florida Education Foundations shall be the fiscal agent for this program. 97 SPECIAL CATEGORIES EDUCATOR PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,021,560 98 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TEACHER AND SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR DEATH BENEFITS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 45,521 99 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 557,876 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 56,012 100 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - AUTISM PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 100 to support Autism Centers as provided in section 1004.55, Florida Statutes, and shall be allocated as follows: Florida Atlantic University............................... 1,386,508 Florida State University (College of Medicine)............ 1,483,072 University of Central Florida............................. 2,467,195 University of Florida (College of Medicine)............... 1,431,006 University of Florida (Jacksonville)...................... 1,276,630 University of Miami (Department of Psychology) including $499,979 for activities in Broward County through Nova Southeastern University................................. 2,218,340 University of South Florida/Florida Mental Health Institute............................................... 1,737,249 The Department of Education, upon request by the Autism Centers, may reallocate funds based on the funding formula used by the centers. Summaries of outcomes for the prior fiscal year shall be submitted to the Department of Education by September 1, 2026. 101 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANT & AIDS ARTICULATED HEALTH CARE PROGRAMS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 102 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - REGIONAL EDUCATION CONSORTIUM SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,400,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 102, $5,400,000 in recurring funds is provided to the consortium services organizations to implement section 1001.451, Florida Statutes, and to conduct regional delivery of educational services to small and rural districts to improve student achievement through technical assistance and school improvement strategies. Each eligible consortium services organization will receive a grant of $150,000 per school district and eligible member for delivery of services within the participating district. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 102, $25,000,000 in recurring funds is provided for the Rural School District Supplemental Services Grant Program established pursuant to section 1001.4511, Florida Statutes. These funds shall be allocated to each eligible consortium services organization as follows: Heartland Educational Consortium.......................... 5,555,149 North East Florida Educational Consortium................. 11,912,923 Panhandle Area Educational Consortium..................... 7,531,928 103 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TEACHER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,979,426 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 103, the following shall be allocated from recurring funds: Mental Health Awareness and Assistance Training as provided in section 1012.584, Florida Statutes.......... 5,500,000 Principal of the Year as provided in section 1012.986, Florida Statutes........................................ 29,426 School Related Personnel of the Year as provided in section 1012.21, Florida Statutes....................... 370,000 Teacher of the Year as provided in section 1012.77, Florida Statutes........................................ 880,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 103 for the Teacher of the Year Program are provided for financial awards, in conjunction with any private donations, resulting in district participants and three charter school participants receiving a minimum total award amount of $10,000; the selected finalists receiving a minimum total award of $20,000; and the Teacher of the Year receiving a minimum total award amount of $50,000. Funds in Specific Appropriation 103 for the School Related Personnel of the Year Program are provided for financial awards of up to $5,000 for participants of the program; the selected finalists receiving a total award of up to $6,500; and the School Related Personnel of the Year receiving a total award amount of up to $10,000. Funds in Specific Appropriation 103 for Principal, Teacher, or School Related Personnel of the Year may be disbursed to districts, schools, or individuals. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 103, $3,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for Computer Science Certification and Teachers Bonuses and shall be allocated to school districts pursuant to section 1007.2616, Florida Statutes. The department shall submit a report to the Legislature by June 30, 2027, which details how the funds were allocated by school district. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 103, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following: Florida Rural Digital Literacy Program (FRDLP) (SF 1336).. 1,500,000 L.E.A.D. (Law Enforcement Against Drugs and Violence)- Statewide Implementation (SF 2415)...................... 350,000 Uplifting School Mental Health Support across the State of Florida (SF 1981).................................... 350,000 104 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - STRATEGIC STATEWIDE INITIATIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 46,306,183 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following: All Pro Dad/iMOM Fatherhood Literacy and Family Engagement Campaign (SF 1427)........................... 1,300,000 American History Live (SF 3098)........................... 120,000 Big Brothers Big Sisters Bigs Inspiring Scholastic Success (BISS) Project (SF 3236)........................ 350,000 Defibrillate Manatee CPR in Schools Implementation (SF 1290)................................................... 403,651 Education Technology Inventory Dashboard & Clearinghouse (SF 2835)............................................... 350,000 Florida Alliance of Boys & Girls Clubs - Workforce Development Programs (SF 1375).......................... 350,000 Florida Arts and Tourism Economic Development Initiative (SF 3687)............................................... 350,000 Florida Debate Initiative (SF 1588)....................... 2,400,000 Learning Blade - STEM, Computer Science and CTE Career Awareness for Middle Schools (SF 2250).................. 350,000 MagicSchool Pilot Program (SF 3750)....................... 350,000 Mobile Museums of Tolerance - Florida (SF 1220)........... 350,000 Public Safety Resiliency Fund (SF 3228)................... 350,000 School Bond Issuance Database (SF 1265)................... 350,000 Securing the Continuation of the State Science & Engineering Fair of Florida: Project Year 4 of 5 (SF 2307)................................................... 150,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $1,073,911 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for use of the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool at all public school sites, pursuant to section 1006.1493, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $3,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education to implement the provisions pursuant to section 1001.212(6), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $5,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education to support the Regional Literacy Teams pursuant to section 1008.365, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $4,702,500 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education to support the Charity for Change Program pursuant to section 1003.4206, Florida Statutes. No later than September 30, 2027, the Department of Education shall provide a report to the Governor and Legislature on the Charity for Change program. The report must include information on the following: 1) student performance on the character education component pursuant to section 1003.42 (2)(t), Florida Statutes; 2) the number of participating schools and students, by district; and 3) funds raised for the program. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $400,000 in recurring funds and $600,000 in nonrecurring funds are provided to the Department of Education to implement the Early Childhood Music Education Program established pursuant to section 1003.481, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $2,000,000 in recurring funds is provided for the Florida Institute for Charter School Innovation pursuant to section 1004.88, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $3,306,121 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education to provide grants to schools. Funds shall be prioritized for districts in fiscally constrained counties as described in section 218.67(1), Florida Statutes, for participation in the Florida Safe Schools Canine Program pursuant to section 1006.121, Florida Statutes. The regional consortium service organizations shall notify their fiscally constrained member districts of the availability of these funds to assist districts in participating in the program. Any appropriated funds that have not been designated for fiscally constrained districts by December 15, 2026, may be awarded to other school districts who apply to participate in the program. The Department of Education shall notify all districts of the availability of these funds to assist them in participating in the program. Such schools may apply for funds which may be used as the required monetary contribution of such schools for the purchase, training, or caring for a firearm detection canine and other costs associated with participation in the program. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $5,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education to implement section 1006.07(7)(j), Florida Statutes, requiring each district school board to establish a threat management coordinator for the school district. Each district will receive an amount based on its size: $55,000 (small), $60,000 (medium), $75,000 (large), or $115,000 (very large) as determined by the department. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $3,000,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for the Civics Literacy Captains and Coaches Initiatives. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $1,500,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for the Civics Professional Development Initiative. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $5,000,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for the Florida Civics Seal of Excellence Program. The amount of the stipend is $3,000 for completing the Florida Seal of Excellence endorsement coursework. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $1,500,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for the Florida Civics and Debate Initiative. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $200,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for the Patriotic Displays in Classrooms and is contingent upon SB 420 becoming a law. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 104, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education to provide grants to school districts and charter schools to support the implementation of technology-based enhancements to improve school safety and security. These enhancements may include, but are not limited to, access control systems, weapons detection systems, and active shooter response systems. The department shall establish deadlines for districts or charter schools to apply for the grant, maximum grant award levels per recipient, and criteria that will be used to evaluate and score each grant proposal. At a minimum, evaluation criteria should consider project cost effectiveness, implementation feasibility, long-term funding sustainability, local match considerations, and the lack of other available resources particularly in fiscally constrained counties as described in section 218.67(1), Florida Statutes. 105 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOLS OF HOPE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 105 are provided for the Schools of Hope Program, pursuant to section 1002.333, Florida Statutes. 106 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - NEW WORLD SCHOOL OF THE ARTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 106 are provided for the New World School of the Arts as provided in section 1002.35, Florida Statutes. 107 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SEED SCHOOL OF MIAMI FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,932,320 Funds in Specific Appropriation 107 are provided for the SEED School of Miami as provided in section 1002.3305, Florida Statutes. The Department of Education is authorized to supplement quarterly payments up to the amount appropriated for operational expenses in the event the student population falls short of forecasted enrollment. 108 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL AND INSTRUCTIONAL ENHANCEMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 42,504,321 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 108, the following appropriation projects are funded with recurring funds and shall be allocated as follows: African American Task Force (recurring base appropriations project)................................. 100,000 AMI Kids (recurring base appropriations project).......... 1,100,000 Florida Holocaust Museum (recurring base appropriations project)................................................ 600,000 Girl Scouts of Florida (recurring base appropriations project)................................................ 267,635 Holocaust Memorial Miami Beach (recurring base appropriations project)................................. 66,501 Holocaust Task Force (recurring base appropriations project)................................................ 100,000 State Science Fair (recurring base appropriations project) 72,032 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 108, $2,000,000 in recurring funds is provided for the Safer, Smarter Schools Program pursuant to section 1003.4204, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 108, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following: Afterschool Programing for Franklin County (SF 1485)...... 107,240 Agricultural Technology & Workforce Education Initiative (SF 3279)............................................... 350,000 Applied Water Resource Technology Career Training Program (SF 3536)............................................... 775,000 ARK Innovation Center at Pinellas County Schools (SF 2506) 350,000 Bay District Schools - Deane Bozeman School Agriculture Center (SF 3107)........................................ 50,000 Boca Raton High School Robotics Lab and Teams Expansion (SF 3388)............................................... 350,000 Career Pathways - Building Florida's Workforce (SF 3189).. 350,000 Cathedral Arts Project Education Programs (SF 2691)....... 350,000 Charlie Ward Champions Ranch Phase 1A: Multi-Sport Field, Cafe/Program Building & Programs (SF 1558).............. 300,000 Clay County District Schools: Expansion of Workforce Development (SF 2953)................................... 350,000 Closing Florida's Reading Gap: Building the Workforce of Tomorrow Through Early Literacy (SF 1282)............... 350,000 Colonial High School Flight Academy FAA Approved Simulator (SF 2171)..................................... 99,000 ConnectED Polk Prosperity Through Career Pathways Initiative (SF 2349).................................... 350,000 Crestview Robotics and STEM Hub (CRASH) --- STEM Expansion and Workforce Pipeline (SF 3454).............. 250,000 Empowered of Central Florida expansion of the Rock Program Into Levy, Citrus & Sumter (SF 1703)............ 350,000 Future Health Heroes One-Year Healthcare Workforce Accelerator (SF 3259)................................... 350,000 Hands of Mercy Everywhere Teen Moms and At-Risk Youth Vocational Training (SF 1341)........................... 350,000 HAPCO Music & Culinary Education Program (SF 2769)........ 200,000 High School Internship Program in Integrated Mathematical Oncology (SF 2865)...................................... 100,000 inSIGHT Through Education Traveling Holocaust Exhibit (SF 1120)................................................... 165,000 Jacksonville Arts & Music School Inc. (JAMS): WAL (What A Leader Training Program) (SF 2669)...................... 200,000 Jewish Day School Student Transportation Safety Initiative (SF 2127).................................... 3,500,000 K12 Student Engagement at the Kennedy Space Center (SF 2006)................................................... 350,000 Links to Success (SF 3539)................................ 585,000 Miami-Dade County Public Schools Early Childhood Education Learning Labs (SF 1773)....................... 350,000 Miami-Dade County Public Schools SpaceHUB @ Booker T. Washington High School (SF 3646)........................ 220,000 Miami-Dade County Public Schools SpaceHUB @ Hialeah-Miami Lakes Senior High School (SF 2952)...................... 350,000 National Flight Academy (SF 3455)......................... 650,000 Nicklaus Children's Student-Athlete EKG Screening Program (SF 1151)............................................... 500,000 Okaloosa County Schools Classroom Technology (SF 3242).... 350,000 Osceola County School District 24/7 Security Operations Center (SF 1612)........................................ 350,000 Pasco High School Athletic Complex (SF 3418).............. 200,000 Pasco Schools STEM Career Pathways Pilot (SF 3272)........ 350,000 Pinellas County: Expanding Access to Youth Athletics and Water Safety (SF 1792).................................. 880,000 Planned to A.T. Financial Literacy Curriculum Expansion in Duval County Public Schools (SF 2701)................ 100,000 Project MPACT (Making Priorities Align for Community Transformation) (SF 2758)............................... 125,000 Putnam County School District- Engineering Pathways and Aviation Maintenance (SF 2583).......................... 350,000 Roosevelt Elementary School Program Enhancements (SF 3065) 440,000 Scouting - Character Education Outreach (SF 2248)......... 350,000 Soaring Forward: Soar in 4 Lab Expansion (Manatee) (SF 1036)................................................... 250,000 South Florida Trauma Response, Crisis, and Resilience Program (SF 2550)....................................... 350,000 State Academic Tournament (SF 2322)....................... 250,000 STEM and AI Esports Workforce Development Project (SF 1972)................................................... 350,000 StrongHer Mind, StrongHer Future (SF 2782)................ 55,000 The Busch Wildlife Sanctuary Environmental Education Program (SF 2018)....................................... 350,000 The Center Presents Wonder Works - Florida Youth Innovation and Workforce Skills Initiative (SF 3402).... 350,000 The Dali: Expanding Education and Outreach (SF 2862)...... 500,000 The Florida Talent Pipeline: Connecting Classrooms to Careers (SF 2839)....................................... 350,000 The Last Ones of Auschwitz Teaching Through Testimony (Book Program) (SF 2723)................................ 487,500 The Shul of Bal Harbour Family Initiative: Jewish Mothers & Babies of South Florida (SF 2638)..................... 350,000 Victory High Schools (SF 3742)............................ 300,000 Virtual Tutoring Program Supporting Duval County Public School Students (SF 2687)............................... 350,000 West Technical Education Center Glades Workforce Expansion (SF 1083)..................................... 350,000 WOFT - Teacher Safety Training Program (SF 1890).......... 950,000 Young Musicians Unite: Student Retention and Engagement Initiative (SF 1128).................................... 350,000 Young Singers of the Palm Beaches Afterschool Music Program (SF 1691)....................................... 164,413 Youth Summer, Camera, Action! (SF 3096)................... 140,000 ZeroEyes AI Firearm Detection Franklin County (SF 1444)... 15,000 ZeroEyes AI Firearm Detection Miami-Dade (SF 1403)........ 350,000 ZeroEyes AI Gun Detection Technology - Hernando (SF 3648). 240,000 ZeroEyes AI Gun Detection Technology Seminole County (SF 1917)................................................... 250,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 108, $15,000,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education to provide grants to full-time Jewish day schools and Jewish preschools as provided in section 1001.2921, Florida Statutes, for costs associated with contracted security guards who are licensed and regulated by the state to provide professional detection, prevention, and security services to the eligible schools, and expenses related to transportation for students, parents, and staff. 109 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - EXCEPTIONAL EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,509,462 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,499,354 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 109, recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated as follows: Auditory-Oral Education Grant Funding (recurring base appropriations project)................................. 750,000 Florida Diagnostic and Learning Resources System Associate Centers as provided in section 1006.03, Florida Statutes........................................ 577,758 Learning Through Listening (recurring base appropriations project)................................................ 1,141,704 Special Olympics (recurring base appropriations project).. 250,000 The Family Cafe (recurring base appropriations project)... 350,000 The Bridge to Speech Program as provided in section 1002.391, Florida Statutes.............................. 1,750,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 109 for Auditory-Oral Education Grants shall only be awarded to Florida public or private nonprofit school programs serving deaf children in multiple counties, from birth to age seven, including rural and underserved areas. These schools must solely offer auditory-oral education programs, as defined in section 1002.391, Florida Statutes, and have a supervisor and faculty members who are credentialed as Certified Listening and Spoken Language Specialists. The amount of the grants shall be based on the specific needs of each eligible student. Each eligible school that has insufficient public funds to provide the educational and related services specified in the Individual Education Plan (IEP) or Individual Family Service Plan (IFSP) of eligible students aged birth to seven years may submit grant applications to the Department of Education. Applications must include an itemized list of total costs, the amount of public funds available for those students without the grant, and the additional amount needed for the services identified in each student's respective IEP or IFSP. The department shall develop an appropriate application, provide instructions and administer this grant program to ensure minimum delay in providing the IEP or IFSP services for all eligible students. Each school shall be accountable for assuring that the public funds received are expended only for services for the eligible student as described in the application and shall provide a report documenting expenditures for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to the department by September 30, 2027. Funds provided for the Bridge to Speech Program shall only be awarded to Florida nonprofit schools or programs serving children who are deaf or hard of hearing in multiple counties, from age 2.9 through age six, including rural and underserved areas. These schools or programs must solely offer auditory-oral education programs, as defined in section 1002.391, Florida Statutes, and have a supervisor and faculty members who are credentialed as Certified Listening and Spoken Language Specialists each day the child is in attendance or has letter of endorsement for this project from Deaf Kids Can. Grants to be awarded and first payment received by September 1st of each year and payments monthly thereafter. No later than September 30, 2027, the Department of Education shall submit a report on the Bridge to Speech program to the Governor, President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives that provides the following information: (1) the number of children with hearing loss served, disaggregated by service type and delivery method (center-based or virtual); (2) types and frequency of services provided, including speech, language, audiology, and parent education; (3) student progress in speech, language, and academics based on evaluations; (4) professional development and technical assistance delivered; and (5) total expenditures and program reach, including families and professionals supported. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 109, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the School District Exceptional Student Evaluation grant program to assist districts in complying with section 1002.394(7)(b), Florida Statutes. School districts that wish to participate in the grant program must report the number of Individual Education Plans and matrix of services developed for students, or in process of being developed, on a Family Empowerment Scholarship for the 2026-2027 school year to the Department of Education by December 15, 2026. No later than January 15, 2027, the department shall provide funding of no more than $2,000 per each Individual Education Plan reported by a district. If the appropriation is not sufficient, funding must be prorated based on the number of plans reported by districts. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 109, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated as follows: Bridging the Gap: Therapeutic Education with the No Limits Method (SF 3301)................................. 350,000 Broward Schools - Strengthening ESE Support (SF 3643)..... 350,000 Live with LEV Beyond the Bell (SF 1797)................... 90,000 Miami Lighthouse Academy, LLC (SF 1630)................... 200,000 Personalized Learning Initiative for K-12 Education (SF 3240)................................................... 350,000 Specialized Education Services for Okaloosa County (SF 3456)................................................... 350,000 The Family Cafe (SF 1028)................................. 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 109 for The Family Cafe are supplemental and shall not be used to replace or supplant current funds awarded for The Family Cafe project. Funds in Specific Appropriation 109 from the Federal Grants Trust Fund shall be allocated as follows: Florida Instructional Materials Center for the Visually Impaired as provided in section 1003.55, Florida Statutes................................................ 270,987 Multi-Agency Service Network for Students with Severe Emotional/Behavioral Disturbance as provided in section 1006.04, Florida Statutes............................... 750,322 Portal to Exceptional Education Resources as provided in section 1003.576, Florida Statutes...................... 786,217 Resource Materials Technology Center for Deaf/Hard-of-Hearing as provided in section 1003.55, Florida Statutes........................................ 191,828 Very Special Arts (recurring base appropriations project). 334,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 109, $166,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund is provided for the Very Special Arts Program (SF 3631). 110 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF AND THE BLIND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 77,664,362 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,900,810 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,810,173 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 110, the school shall contract for health, medical, pharmaceutical, and dental screening services for students. The school shall develop a collaborative service agreement for medical services and shall maximize the recovery of all legally available funds from Medicaid and private insurance coverage. The school shall report to the Legislature by June 30, 2027, information describing the agreement, services provided, budget and expenditures, including the amounts and sources of all funding used for the collaborative medical program and any other student health services during the 2026-2027 fiscal year. 111 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 209,785 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 53,369 111A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PUBLIC SCHOOLS SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,330,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 111A, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds that shall be allocated as follows: Academy at the Farm Middle School (SF 3129)............... 350,000 Bay District Schools - Deane Bozeman School Agriculture Center (SF 3107)........................................ 200,000 Jacksonville Classical Academy Soccer / Football Field (SF 2597)............................................... 2,000,000 Miami-Dade County Public Schools SpaceHUB @ Booker T. Washington High School (SF 3646)........................ 130,000 Pasco High School Athletic Complex (SF 3418).............. 2,550,000 Soaring Forward: Soar in 4 Lab Expansion (Manatee) (SF 1036)................................................... 100,000 112 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PUBLIC SCHOOL HARDENING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 112 are provided for the School Hardening Grant program to improve the physical security of school buildings based on the security risk assessment required by section 1006.1493, Florida Statutes. By December 31, 2026, school districts and charter schools receiving School Hardening Grant program funds shall report to the Department of Education, in a format prescribed by the department, the total estimated costs of their unmet school campus hardening needs as identified by the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool (FSSAT) conducted pursuant to section 1006.1493, Florida Statutes. The report should include a prioritized list of school hardening project needs by each school district or charter school and an expected timeframe for implementing those projects. In accordance with section 119.071(3)(a), Florida Statutes, data and information related to security risk assessments administered pursuant to section 1006.1493, Florida Statutes, are confidential and exempt from public records requirements. Funds may only be used for capital improvements. Funds shall be allocated using a tiered funding approach based on a combination of the number of school facilities located within a district and whether the district is designated as a fiscally constrained county. No district shall be allocated less than $10,000 per facility. Funds shall be provided based on district application, which must be submitted to the Department of Education by February 1, 2027. The Department of Education shall have the ability to reallocate funds between school districts if a school district fails to fully utilize their awarded allocation. 113 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITY REPAIRS MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,111,813 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 113, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds that shall be allocated as follows: Achievement Centers: Safe and Secure Learning Environments (non-profit) (SF 1113)..................... 121,116 Boys & Girls Club & Teen Workforce Readiness Center of West Palm Beach (SF 1690)............................... 350,000 Boys & Girls Clubs of Central Florida June Family Branch - Gym Expansion Capital Project (SF 1952)............... 350,000 Boys & Girls Clubs of St. Lucie County Lincoln Park Clubhouse (SF 1994)..................................... 350,000 Branches Allapattah (SF 1063)............................. 500,000 Building a Home FORE Our Future: Youth Character and Development Program Expansion (SF 1873)................. 350,000 Carol Boies Teen Center/Facility Improvements (SF 1143)... 350,000 Center for Creative Education (CCE): Ending the Cycle of Elementary Illiteracy (SF 1138)......................... 350,000 Charlie Ward Champions Ranch Phase 1A: Multi-Sport Field, Cafe/Program Building & Programs (SF 1558).............. 666,697 Chi Chi Rodriguez Youth Foundation - Chi Chi Academy Upgrade & Expansion (SF 2476)........................... 350,000 ECS4Kids Early Learning Center (SF 3374).................. 235,000 Holy Trinity Episcopal School (HTES) Expansion Project (SF 1889)............................................... 350,000 Immersive Holocaust Survivor Testimony Theater (SF 3184).. 250,000 Jacksonville Arts & Music School Inc. (JAMS): WAL (What A Leader Training Program) (SF 2669)...................... 150,000 Junior Achievement of North Florida Experiential Learning Center (SF 2813)........................................ 350,000 Links to Success (SF 3539)................................ 115,000 Private School Safety Compliance Project (SF 2007)........ 214,000 The Children's Complex Roof Replacement (SF 1217)......... 350,000 Treasure Coast Wildlife Education Center (SF 2151)........ 350,000 Youth Summer, Camera, Action! (SF 3096)................... 10,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 113, $5,000,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Education as fixed capital outlay to provide grants to full-time Jewish day schools and Jewish preschools as provided in section 1001.2921, Florida Statutes. Grants must be awarded no later than December 1, 2026. TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE GRANTS/K-12 PROGRAM - NON FEFP FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 465,638,437 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,324,718 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 473,963,155 PROGRAM: FEDERAL GRANTS K/12 PROGRAM 114 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - PROJECTS, CONTRACTS AND GRANTS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,999,420 115 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FEDERAL GRANTS AND AIDS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 353,962 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,546,067,351 116 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DOMESTIC SECURITY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,409,971 TOTAL: PROGRAM: FEDERAL GRANTS K/12 PROGRAM FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,555,830,704 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,555,830,704 PROGRAM: EDUCATIONAL MEDIA & TECHNOLOGY SERVICES 117 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CAPITOL TECHNICAL CENTER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 224,624 118 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PUBLIC BROADCASTING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,518,721 The funds provided in Specific Appropriation 118 shall be allocated as follows: Florida Channel Closed Captioning......................... 390,862 Florida Channel Satellite Transponder Operations.......... 800,000 Florida Channel Statewide Governmental and Cultural Affairs Programming..................................... 497,522 Florida Channel Year Round Coverage....................... 3,224,067 Florida Public Radio Emergency Network Storm Center....... 256,270 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 118, "Governmental Affairs for Public Television" shall be produced by the same contractor selected by the Legislature to produce "The Florida Channel". From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 118 for the Florida Channel Satellite Transponder Operations, the Florida Channel shall contract for the leasing, management and operation of the state transponder with the same public broadcasting station that produces the Florida Channel. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 118, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided for the University of Florida, Florida Public Radio Emergency Network (FPREN) Storm Center (SF 2817). TOTAL: PROGRAM: EDUCATIONAL MEDIA & TECHNOLOGY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 5,743,345 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,743,345 PROGRAM: WORKFORCE EDUCATION 119 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS PERFORMANCE BASED INCENTIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 119 shall be provided by the Department of Education to district workforce education programs for students who earned industry certifications during the 2025-2026 academic year. Funding shall be based on students who earned industry certifications with a school district postsecondary funding designation on the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List. By October 31, 2026, the Chancellor of the Division of Career and Adult Education shall identify the associated industry certifications and shall prepare a report for each certification to include cost, percent employed, and average salary of graduates. These performance funds shall not be awarded for certifications earned through continuing workforce education programs. School districts shall maintain documentation for student attainment of industry certifications that are eligible for performance funding. The Auditor General shall verify compliance with this requirement during scheduled operational audits of the school districts. If a district is unable to comply, the district shall refund the performance funding to the state. The Department of Education may prorate the award if the funds appropriated are insufficient to provide a full award for all eligible earned industry certifications. Priority in the distribution of funds must be given to certifications earned in the highest tier, based upon the anticipated average wages of all occupations to which each certification is linked on the Master Credentials List, as reported annually to the Legislature pursuant to section 1011.80, Florida Statutes. The Department of Education shall report the number and title of industry certifications awarded per tier pursuant to section 1011.80, Florida Statutes, and per award amount by institution by October 31, 2026, to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget. 120 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - ADULT BASIC EDUCATION FEDERAL FLOW-THROUGH FUNDS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 63,288,749 121 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 359,521,768 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 7 from the Educational Enhancement Trust Fund and Specific Appropriation 121 from the General Revenue Fund, $486,349,802 in recurring funds and $3,000,000 in nonrecurring funds are provided for school district workforce education programs as defined in section 1004.02(25), Florida Statutes, and is allocated as follows: Alachua................................................... 348,348 Baker..................................................... 337,387 Bay....................................................... 3,418,600 Bradford.................................................. 1,207,711 Brevard................................................... 3,646,905 Broward................................................... 86,774,552 Charlotte................................................. 4,441,933 Citrus.................................................... 3,764,510 Clay...................................................... 1,177,859 Collier................................................... 14,662,748 Columbia.................................................. 312,174 Miami-Dade................................................ 94,617,049 DeSoto.................................................... 742,191 Dixie..................................................... 223,458 Escambia.................................................. 5,632,522 Flagler................................................... 1,109,738 Franklin.................................................. 221,304 Gadsden................................................... 972,727 Glades.................................................... 218,756 Gulf...................................................... 223,209 Hamilton.................................................. 221,235 Hardee.................................................... 223,991 Hendry.................................................... 1,325,260 Hernando.................................................. 954,180 Hillsborough.............................................. 60,772,695 Indian River.............................................. 1,824,669 Jackson................................................... 250,416 Jefferson................................................. 221,439 Lafayette................................................. 222,076 Lake...................................................... 7,611,838 Lee....................................................... 12,227,218 Leon...................................................... 9,824,309 Liberty................................................... 234,483 Madison................................................... 220,409 Manatee................................................... 10,773,727 Marion.................................................... 5,084,161 Martin.................................................... 1,313,231 Monroe.................................................... 679,185 Nassau.................................................... 281,165 Okaloosa.................................................. 2,997,769 Orange.................................................... 36,244,591 Osceola................................................... 10,971,677 Palm Beach................................................ 24,033,892 Pasco..................................................... 3,883,202 Pinellas.................................................. 28,921,112 Polk...................................................... 11,297,505 Saint Johns............................................... 5,082,771 Santa Rosa................................................ 2,600,527 Sarasota.................................................. 11,477,471 Sumter.................................................... 241,708 Suwannee.................................................. 3,697,976 Taylor.................................................... 3,440,530 Union..................................................... 222,797 Wakulla................................................... 225,305 Walton.................................................... 1,709,763 Washington................................................ 3,981,838 For programs leading to a career certificate or an applied technology diploma, and for adult general education programs, tuition and fees shall be assessed in accordance with section 1009.22, Florida Statutes. Funds collected from standard tuition and out-of-state fees shall be used to support school district workforce education programs as defined in section 1004.02(25), Florida Statutes, and shall not be used to support K-12 programs or district K-12 administrative indirect costs. The funds provided in Specific Appropriations 7, 120, and 121 shall not be used to support K-12 programs or district K-12 administrative indirect costs. The Auditor General shall verify compliance with this requirement during scheduled audits of these institutions. Pursuant to the provisions of section 1009.26(1), Florida Statutes, school districts may grant fee waivers for programs funded through Workforce Development Education appropriations for up to eight percent of the fee revenues that would otherwise be collected. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 7 and 121, each school district shall report enrollment for adult general education programs identified in section 1004.02, Florida Statutes, in accordance with the Department of Education instructional hours reporting procedures. The Auditor General shall verify compliance with this requirement during scheduled operational audits of the school districts. District superintendents shall certify that workforce education enrollment and performance data used for funding allocations to districts is accurate and complete in accordance with reporting timelines established by the Department of Education. If the district's workforce education programs are operated through a charter technical career center as provided by section 1002.34, Florida Statutes, the director appointed by the charter board may certify the enrollment and performance data. Upon certification, the district data shall be considered final for purposes of use in state funding formulas. After the final certification, the department may request a supplemental file in the event that a district has reported a higher level of enrollment or performance than was actually achieved by the district. 122 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT CAPITALIZATION INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 79,325,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 122 are provided to the Department of Education to implement the Workforce Development Capitalization Incentive Grant Program pursuant to section 1011.801, Florida Statutes. 123 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - PATHWAYS TO CAREER OPPORTUNITIES GRANT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 123, $15,000,000 in recurring funds is provided for the Pathways to Career Opportunities Grant Program. The Department of Education shall administer the grant program, determine eligibility, and distribute grants. Grantees include high schools, career centers, charter technical career centers, Florida College System institutions, and other entities authorized to sponsor an apprenticeship or preapprenticeship program, as defined in section 446.021, Florida Statutes. The funds may be used for related technical instruction and to establish new apprenticeship or preapprenticeship programs or expand existing programs. Applicants must provide projected enrollment and projected costs for the new or expanded apprenticeship program. The department shall give priority to apprenticeship programs with demonstrated statewide or regional demand. Grant funds may be used for instructional equipment, supplies, personnel, student services, and other expenses associated with the creation or expansion of an apprenticeship program or other related technical instruction. Grant funds may not be used for indirect costs. Grant recipients must submit quarterly reports in a format prescribed by the department. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 123, $5,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to enhance the Pathways to Career Opportunities grants to include a specific sub-initiative for the Grow Your Own Teacher Registered Apprenticeship Program Expansion. 124 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - VOCATIONAL FORMULA FUNDS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 94,363,333 125 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - NURSING EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000,000 The funds in Specific Appropriation 125 are provided for the Prepping Institutions, Programs, Employers, and Learners through Incentives for Nursing Education (PIPELINE) Fund to reward performance and excellence among nursing education programs at school district postsecondary technical career centers that offer a licensed practical nurse program pursuant to section 1009.897, Florida Statutes. Funds shall be allocated as follows: Bay....................................................... 677,924 Bradford.................................................. 781,850 Broward................................................... 2,518,571 Charlotte................................................. 503,328 Citrus.................................................... 379,871 Collier................................................... 1,165,885 Desoto.................................................... 222,222 Miami-Dade................................................ 1,314,781 Gadsden................................................... 263,150 Hillsborough.............................................. 474,046 Indian River.............................................. 353,265 Lake...................................................... 678,393 Lee....................................................... 1,119,826 Leon...................................................... 506,210 Manatee................................................... 486,960 Marion.................................................... 673,459 Okaloosa.................................................. 674,355 Orange.................................................... 640,878 Osceola................................................... 295,749 Pinellas.................................................. 1,649,033 Polk...................................................... 1,076,010 Saint Johns............................................... 697,520 Santa Rosa................................................ 578,119 Sarasota.................................................. 525,806 Suwannee.................................................. 415,558 Taylor.................................................... 612,055 Walton.................................................... 354,457 Washington................................................ 360,719 The Department of Education shall report the number of nursing education program completers, by program; first-time National Council of State Boards of Nursing Licensing Examination passage rate of the institution's nursing education program completers, by program; and institution type as specified in section 1009.897(2), Florida Statutes, by October 1, 2026, to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget. 126 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - STRATEGIC STATEWIDE INITIATIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 126, $2,000,000 is provided for startup grants to school districts and Florida College System institutions to fund some or all of the initial costs associated with the creation of the Graduation Alternative to Traditional Education (GATE) program pursuant to section 1011.804, Florida Statutes. Grantees include school district career and adult education centers, charter technical career centers, and Florida College System institutions. Applicants must provide projected enrollment and projected costs for their respective GATE programs. The Department of Education shall administer the grant program, determine eligibility, and distribute grants. The department shall make the grant application available to potential applicants no later than August 15, 2026. In distributing the funds, the department shall include a minimum amount per program and a variable amount based on the projected enrollment of the program. Grant funds may not be used for indirect costs. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 126, $1,000,000 is provided for the GATE Program Performance Fund established pursuant to section 1011.8041, Florida Statutes. Incentive funds are to be awarded to school districts and Florida College System institutions based upon student performance outcomes achieved by GATE program students during the 2026-2027 academic year. The Department of Education shall distribute the awards by June 1, 2027, and establish procedures and timelines for school districts and colleges to report earned performance outcomes for funding. The department may allocate any funds not obligated by June 1, 2027, to districts and colleges who have earned awards, based on the percentage of earned outcomes. 126A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL AND INSTRUCTIONAL ENHANCEMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,738,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 126A, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: ABC Institute Flagship Apprenticeship Training Academy (SF 1711)............................................... 2,000,000 CodeBoxx: Building Florida's Technology Workforce (SF 1724)................................................... 500,000 Florida Agriculture & Energy Education Initiative (SF 2889)................................................... 350,000 Fort Lauderdale Aviation Technical Training Program (SF 2140)................................................... 350,000 George T. Baker Aviation and Aerospace Technical College - Equipment (SF 2197)................................... 100,000 Ignite Tutoring Fellowship: College Students Education-to-Workforce Development Pipeline (SF 2101)... 500,000 Jacksonville Sports Foundation - Florida Sports Workforce Apprenticeship Initiative (SF 2651)..................... 250,000 Lotus House Education and Employment Program for High Special Needs Women (SF 1860)........................... 200,000 Path to College Workforce Development & Career Readiness (SF 2639)............................................... 350,000 Project BUILD SWFL Heavy Equipment Simulator Workforce Training Initiative (SF 3246)........................... 250,000 ReUp's College & Credential to Workforce Initiative (SF 2694)................................................... 350,000 Southwest FL Public Service Academy Critical First Responder Facility, Safety & Security Updates (SF 1636). 188,000 Southwest Florida Welding Workforce Development Program (SF 3535)............................................... 1,500,000 Technician Apprenticeship Program and Education Partnership (SF 2607)................................... 350,000 Virtual Dropout Retrieval Program for Adults (SF 3499).... 500,000 126B GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITY REPAIRS MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 512,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 126B, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Heights CareerTech Institute (SF 2083).................... 350,000 Southwest FL Public Service Academy Critical First Responder Facility, Safety & Security Updates (SF 1636). 162,000 TOTAL: PROGRAM: WORKFORCE EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 498,596,768 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 157,652,082 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 656,248,850 FLORIDA COLLEGES, DIVISION OF PROGRAM: FLORIDA COLLEGES Funds in Specific Appropriations 8 and 127 through 132 are provided as grants and aids to support the operation of Florida College System institutions. Funds provided to each college are contingent upon that college following the provisions of chapters 1000 through 1013, Florida Statutes, which relate to colleges. Any withholding of funds pursuant to this provision shall be subject to the approval of the Legislative Budget Commission. 127 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS PERFORMANCE BASED INCENTIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 127 are provided to colleges for students who earn industry certifications during the 2026-2027 academic year. Funding shall be based on students who earn industry certifications with a college postsecondary funding designation on the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List. The Department of Education shall distribute the awards by June 1, 2027, and establish procedures and timelines for colleges to report earned certifications for funding. The department may allocate any funds not obligated by June 1, 2027, to schools who have earned awards, based on the percentage of earned certifications. By October 31, 2026, the Chancellor of the Florida College System shall identify the associated industry certifications and shall prepare a report for each certification to include cost, percent employed, and average salary of graduates. These performance funds shall not be awarded for certifications earned through continuing workforce education programs. Industry certifications earned by students enrolled in the 2025-2026 academic year which were eligible to be included in the funding allocation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and were not included in the final disbursement due to the early data reporting deadline may be reported by colleges and included in the allocation of funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Colleges shall maintain documentation for student attainment of industry certifications that are eligible for performance funding. The Auditor General shall verify compliance with this requirement during scheduled operational audits of the colleges. If a college is unable to comply, the college shall refund the performance funding to the state. The Department of Education may prorate the award if the funds appropriated are insufficient to provide a full award for all eligible earned industry certifications. Priority in the distribution of funds must be given to certifications earned in the highest tier, based upon the anticipated average wages of all occupations to which each certification is linked on the Master Credentials List, as reported annually to the Legislature pursuant to section 1011.81, Florida Statutes. The Department of Education shall report the number and title of industry certifications awarded per tier pursuant to section 1011.81, Florida Statutes, and per award amount by institution by October 31, 2026, to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget. 128 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS STUDENT SUCCESS INCENTIVE FUNDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 128, $17,000,000 is provided for the 2+2 Student Success Incentive Fund to support college efforts to improve the success of students enrolled in associate of arts degree programs in completing critical college credit courses, graduating with associate of arts degrees, and transferring to baccalaureate degree programs. These funds shall be allocated as follows: Eastern Florida State College............................. 685,486 Broward College........................................... 962,320 College of Central Florida................................ 326,765 Chipola College........................................... 112,228 Daytona State College..................................... 393,084 Florida Southwestern State College........................ 469,757 Florida State College at Jacksonville..................... 383,055 The College of the Florida Keys........................... 21,115 Gulf Coast State College.................................. 155,459 Hillsborough College...................................... 795,889 Indian River State College................................ 736,523 Florida Gateway College................................... 75,828 Lake-Sumter State College................................. 321,266 State College of Florida, Manatee-Sarasota................ 306,350 Miami Dade College........................................ 2,078,716 North Florida College..................................... 43,416 Northwest Florida State College........................... 163,147 Palm Beach State College.................................. 722,792 Pasco-Hernando State College.............................. 654,774 Pensacola State College................................... 243,607 Polk State College........................................ 141,025 St. Johns River State College............................. 230,961 St. Petersburg College.................................... 917,765 Santa Fe College.......................................... 1,031,401 Seminole State College of Florida......................... 758,049 South Florida State College............................... 81,419 Tallahassee State College................................. 1,230,007 Valencia College.......................................... 2,957,796 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 128, $13,000,000 is provided for the Work Florida Student Success Incentive Fund to support college strategies and initiatives to align career education programs with statewide and regional workforce demands and high paying job opportunities. These funds shall be allocated as follows: Eastern Florida State College............................. 384,101 Broward College........................................... 740,517 College of Central Florida................................ 314,719 Chipola College........................................... 109,793 Daytona State College..................................... 372,871 Florida Southwestern State College........................ 406,987 Florida State College at Jacksonville..................... 645,017 The College of the Florida Keys........................... 35,523 Gulf Coast State College.................................. 167,482 Hillsborough College...................................... 712,265 Indian River State College................................ 433,548 Florida Gateway College................................... 189,470 Lake-Sumter State College................................. 76,217 State College of Florida, Manatee-Sarasota................ 206,813 Miami Dade College........................................ 2,908,450 North Florida College..................................... 69,882 Northwest Florida State College........................... 124,425 Palm Beach State College.................................. 663,545 Pasco-Hernando State College.............................. 161,160 Pensacola State College................................... 225,446 Polk State College........................................ 209,018 St. Johns River State College............................. 117,854 St. Petersburg College.................................... 562,201 Santa Fe College.......................................... 233,310 Seminole State College of Florida......................... 782,336 South Florida State College............................... 132,433 Tallahassee State College................................. 206,486 Valencia College.......................................... 1,808,131 129 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA COLLEGE SYSTEM PROGRAM FUND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,514,632,691 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 8 from the Educational Enhancement Trust Fund and Specific Appropriation 129 from the General Revenue Fund, $1,750,810,108 is provided for operating funds and approved baccalaureate programs and shall be allocated as follows: Eastern Florida State College............................. 57,066,008 Broward College........................................... 120,314,164 College of Central Florida................................ 43,579,894 Chipola College........................................... 17,761,007 Daytona State College..................................... 64,540,481 Florida SouthWestern State College........................ 53,338,250 Florida State College at Jacksonville..................... 93,271,075 The College of the Florida Keys........................... 12,954,194 Gulf Coast State College.................................. 29,593,238 Hillsborough College...................................... 93,304,532 Indian River State College................................ 64,040,000 Florida Gateway College................................... 21,746,825 Lake-Sumter State College................................. 26,698,601 State College of Florida, Manatee-Sarasota................ 36,024,779 Miami Dade College........................................ 235,580,059 North Florida College..................................... 12,800,976 Northwest Florida State College........................... 31,798,495 Palm Beach State College.................................. 86,655,409 Pasco-Hernando State College.............................. 52,997,197 Pensacola State College................................... 65,245,651 Polk State College........................................ 52,784,694 Saint Johns River State College........................... 37,901,949 Saint Petersburg College.................................. 98,759,924 Santa Fe College.......................................... 57,931,546 Seminole State College of Florida......................... 60,828,882 South Florida State College............................... 26,907,995 Tallahassee State College................................. 47,280,698 Valencia College.......................................... 149,103,585 Included within the total appropriations for Florida College System institutions in Specific Appropriation 129, recurring funds are provided for the following base appropriations projects: Chipola College Civil and Industrial Engineering Program.................. 200,000 Daytona State College Advanced Technology Center................................ 500,000 Hillsborough College Regional Transportation Training Center................... 2,500,000 Pasco-Hernando State College STEM Stackable............................................ 2,306,271 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 129, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Chipola College Workforce Program Expansion - Welding Technology and Advanced Manufacturing (SF 3130)........................ 350,000 Hillsborough College Artificial Intelligence Program Support (SF 2306)......... 350,000 Lake-Sumter State College Creation of an Agricultural Workforce Program (SF 1902)... 350,000 Miami Dade College Institute for Freedom in the Americas (SF 2634)........... 350,000 Pensacola State College All Campuses - Expanding Military & Veterans Service Center (SF 3459)........................................ 250,000 South Florida State College Rural Success and Readiness: Testing Center Modernization (SF 2548)............................................... 350,000 South Florida State College is Prepared to Protect: EMS and Fire Readiness (SF 2547)............................ 350,000 Saint Petersburg College Applied Mental Certificate for First Responders (SF 1713). 501,000 Law Enforcement Field Training and Support (SF 2465)...... 350,000 The College of the Florida Keys Marine and Maritime Professional Institute at The College of the Florida Keys (SF 2593)........................... 350,000 Prior to the disbursement of funds in Specific Appropriations 8 and 129, colleges shall submit an operating budget for the expenditure of these funds as provided in section 1011.30, Florida Statutes. The operating budget shall clearly identify planned expenditures for baccalaureate programs and shall include the sources of funds. For advanced and professional, postsecondary vocational, developmental education, educator preparation institute programs, and baccalaureate degree programs, tuition and fees shall be assessed in accordance with section 1009.23, Florida Statutes. For programs leading to a career certificate or an applied technology diploma, and for adult general education programs, tuition and fees shall be assessed in accordance with section 1009.22, Florida Statutes. Pursuant to the provisions of section 1009.26(1), Florida Statutes, Florida colleges may grant fee waivers for programs funded through Workforce Development Education appropriations for up to eight percent of the fee revenues that would otherwise be collected. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 8 and 129, each Florida college shall report enrollment for adult general education programs identified in section 1004.02, Florida Statutes, in accordance with the Department of Education instructional hours reporting procedures. The Auditor General shall verify compliance with this requirement during scheduled operational audits of the Florida colleges. Each Florida college board of trustees is given flexibility to make necessary adjustments to its operating budget. If any board reduces individual programs or projects within the Florida college by more than 10 percent during the 2026-2027 fiscal year, written notification shall be made to the Governor, President of the Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Department of Education. 130 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - POST SECONDARY GUARDIAN PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,200,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 130 shall be used to certify and train school guardians as provided in section 30.15, Florida Statutes, and are contingent upon SB 896 or similar legislation becoming a law. The funds provided are supplemental and may not be used to replace or supplant current funds used for institutional police departments. 131 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - NURSING EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 131, $40,000,000 is provided for the Prepping Institutions, Programs, Employers, and Learners through Incentives for Nursing Education (PIPELINE) Fund to reward performance and excellence among nursing education programs at Florida College System institutions pursuant to section 1009.897, Florida Statutes. These funds shall be allocated as follows: Eastern Florida State College............................. 1,209,821 Broward College........................................... 1,367,137 College of Central Florida................................ 1,001,213 Chipola College........................................... 654,808 Daytona State College..................................... 1,808,503 Florida SouthWestern State College........................ 1,494,713 Florida State College at Jacksonville..................... 2,218,262 The College of the Florida Keys........................... 662,553 Gulf Coast State College.................................. 1,636,427 Hillsborough College...................................... 1,186,213 Indian River State College................................ 2,291,116 Florida Gateway College................................... 1,676,105 Lake-Sumter State College................................. 1,092,283 State College of Florida, Manatee-Sarasota................ 1,530,501 Miami Dade College........................................ 2,808,311 North Florida College..................................... 473,845 Northwest Florida State College........................... 942,559 Palm Beach State College.................................. 2,008,772 Pasco-Hernando State College.............................. 1,548,353 Pensacola State College................................... 1,397,281 Polk State College........................................ 1,168,387 St. Johns River State College............................. 1,583,802 St. Petersburg College.................................... 1,845,523 Santa Fe College.......................................... 1,300,160 Seminole State College of Florida......................... 1,434,814 South Florida State College............................... 1,381,549 Tallahassee State College................................. 669,075 Valencia College.......................................... 1,607,914 132 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA POSTSECONDARY ACADEMIC LIBRARY NETWORK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,903,169 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 132 provided to the host entity as specified in section 1006.73(6), Florida Statutes, $1,642,808 shall be released to the Florida Postsecondary Academic Library Network at the host entity at the beginning of the first quarter, and $2,533,700 shall be released at the beginning of the second quarter in addition to the normal releases. The additional releases are provided to maximize cost savings through centralized purchases of subscription-based electronic resources and low-cost, no-cost, or open-access electronic textbooks. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 132, $241,500 is provided to expand access to career centers for the following services: FloridaShines website content, college readiness planning tools, academic success worksheets, programs catalog, institution profiles, testing center database, quality/instructional design network, contracting for products and services, and professional development and training. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 132, $750,000 is provided for subscription increases for e-resources such as, a statewide collection of library electronic resources, including scholarly journals, magazines, newspapers, academic streaming videos, research databases, or e-books. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 132, $835,347 is provided for the support of the Library Services and Distance Learning & Student Services divisions of the host entity. Administrative costs shall not exceed five percent. 133 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMMISSION ON COMMUNITY SERVICE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,483,749 133A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITY REPAIRS MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 600,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 133A, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Pasco-Hernando State College West Campus YMCA (SF 3281)................................ 350,000 Pensacola State College All Campuses - Expanding Military & Veterans Service Center (SF 3459)........................................ 250,000 TOTAL: PROGRAM: FLORIDA COLLEGES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,621,819,609 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,621,819,609 STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION From the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 134 through 148, the Commissioner of Education shall prepare and provide to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Executive Office of the Governor on or before October 1, 2026, a report containing the following: the federal indirect cost rate(s) approved to be used for the 12 month period of the 2026-2027 fiscal year and the data on which the rate(s) was established; the estimated amount of funds the approved rate(s) will generate; the proposed expenditure plan for the amount generated; and the June 30, 2026, balance of all unexpended federal indirect cost funds. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 134 through 148, the Department of Education shall publish on the Florida Department of Education website by December 31, 2026, from each school district's Annual Financial Report, expenditures on a per FTE basis for the following fund types: General Fund, Special Revenue Fund, Debt Service Fund, Capital Project Fund and a Total. Fiduciary funds, enterprise funds, and internal service funds shall not be included. This funding information shall also be published in the same format on each school district's website by December 31, 2026. Funds provided in Specific Appropriations 134 through 148 from the Working Capital Trust Fund shall be cost-recovered from funds used to pay data processing services provided in accordance with section 216.272, Florida Statutes. APPROVED SALARY RATE 61,684,814 134 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 914.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,396,206 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 9,105,060 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 3,834,540 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,800,153 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 17,557,007 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,189,578 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,427,711 FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 98,948 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 376,390 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 517,120 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 7,476,505 135 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 315,328 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 199,054 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 103,040 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 44,160 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 489,396 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 235,298 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,507 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,311 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 61,251 136 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,689,386 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,406,375 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 858,980 FROM EDUCATIONAL MEDIA AND TECHNOLOGY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 133,426 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 898,664 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,703,663 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,433 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 514,776 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 800,556 FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 26,050 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 295,667 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 135,350 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 606,077 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 136, $45,187 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education to pay the state's dues to the Interstate Commission on Educational Opportunity for Military Children for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 136, $46,623 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education for the anticipated membership dues and/or fees for the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. 137 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 45,970 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 144,428 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 7,440 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 15,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 241,756 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,375 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,960 FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 6,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,000 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 3,150 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 47,921 138 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ASSESSMENT AND EVALUATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 80,039,518 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,315,367 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 40,153,877 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 7,322,185 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 138, $8,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education to fund the costs associated with providing college entrance assessments to each public school student in grade 11, including students attending public high schools, alternative schools, and the Department of Juvenile Justice education programs. Priority shall be given to students on the direct certification list or the student's household income level does not exceed 185 percent of the federal poverty level. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 138, $628,928 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education for the development of the Florida Teacher Excellence Examination (FTEE) pursuant to chapter 2025-107, Laws of Florida. 139 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 400,391 140 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,216,976 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 739,054 FROM CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 300,000 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 1,396,609 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 488,200 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,376,770 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 405,405 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,009,208 FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 19,893 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 374,193 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 42,250 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 1,043,604 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $300,000 in recurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Education to implement the customer service survey established pursuant to section 1002.82(3), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $6,400,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education to implement the provisions of section 1006.07(4), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $1,345,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education for the ongoing operational costs associated with the Workforce Development Information System Career and Technical Education Data Analytics Dashboard established pursuant to section 1008.40, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $150,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to issue a grant award to a state university to carry out the requirements of the Family Empowerment Scholarship Program in accordance with section 1002.394, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $4,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Career Planning and Work-Based Learning Coordination System. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education for the ongoing operations of a grant applications solution that processes grant applications from entities receiving state and/or federal funds. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $1,800,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education for maintenance and support cost for the School Choice Online Portal for Students and Parents pursuant to section 1001.10(9), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $845,250 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education for the ongoing operational costs associated with the School Choice Web Application and Database. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, 3,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education for the statewide transparency tool. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 140, $3,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Education to enhance the Collaborate Plan Align Motivate Share (CPALMS) system. This funding is for the maintenance, data costs, high-quality instructional and educational materials for teachers, parents, and students to use as well as teachers to plan their instruction, collaborate, and engage in online professional development courses. 141 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 483,189 Funds in Specific Appropriation 141 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 142 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 142, $1,500,000 is provided to the Department of Education for the cloud-based secure School Environmental Safety Incident Reporting (SESIR) system. Of these funds, 75 percent shall be held in reserve. All general revenue funds not held in reserve, shall be fully released. The department is authorized to submit quarterly budget amendments to request release of funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. The amount requested to be released in each budget amendment may not exceed the sum of the department's planned project expenditures for the subsequent three-month period. Release is contingent upon submission of the following: (1) an updated and comprehensive operational work plan; (2) a detailed monthly spend plan for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 with expenditures broken down by deliverable that identifies all planned project work and costs specified in the current project schedule; and (3) a copy of the project status report from the most recently completed quarter at the time of submission which provides justification of any variance from the most recently submitted project schedule and spend plan. The department shall submit quarterly project status reports to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee no later than thirty days from the close of the previous month. Each status report must include copies of each relevant task order(s), contract(s), purchase order(s), and invoice(s). The status report must also describe progress made to date for each project milestone and deliverable, planned and actual completion dates, planned and actual costs incurred, and any current project issues and risks. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 142, $4,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the Department of Education for the cloud-based secure statewide information sharing system of the threat management portal. Of these funds, 75 percent shall be held in reserve. All general revenue funds not held in reserve shall be fully released. The department is authorized to submit quarterly budget amendments to request release of funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. The amount requested to be released in each budget amendment may not exceed the sum of the department's planned project expenditures for the subsequent three-month period. Release is contingent upon submission of the following: (1) an updated and comprehensive operational work plan; (2) a detailed monthly spend plan for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 with expenditures broken down by deliverable that identifies all planned project work and costs specified in the current project schedule; and (3) a copy of the project status report from the most recently completed quarter at the time of submission which provides justification of any variance from the most recently submitted project schedule and spend plan. The department shall submit quarterly project status reports to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee no later than thirty days from the close of the previous month. Each status report must include copies of each relevant task order(s), contract(s), purchase order(s), and invoice(s). The status report must also describe progress made to date for each project milestone and deliverable, planned and actual completion dates, planned and actual costs incurred, and any current project issues and risks. 143 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,175 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 85,882 Funds in Specific Appropriation 143 are provided to maintain the current level of office productivity software licenses, related security and cloud-based services equivalent to the services previously provided through the Enterprise Cybersecurity Resiliency category within the Department of Management Services. 144 SPECIAL CATEGORIES EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 200,000 145 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 290,888 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 81,261 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 39,883 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 18,536 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 157,978 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,632 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,895 FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 764 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,291 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,827 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 66,827 146 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 122,252 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 22,216 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 16,082 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,072 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 76,116 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,476 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,692 FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 314 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,966 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,849 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 27,370 147 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,328,506 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,812,778 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 1,182,628 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 359,082 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,020,431 FROM INSTITUTIONAL ASSESSMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 367,808 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,304,995 FROM NURSING STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 31,540 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 101,291 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 74,885 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 1,330,164 148 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,443,728 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 106,140 FROM EDUCATIONAL CERTIFICATION AND SERVICE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 92,106 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,227 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 429,212 FROM STUDENT LOAN OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 782,203 FROM TEACHER CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 39,999 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 5,602,912 TOTAL: STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 166,302,513 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 149,139,021 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 914.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 315,441,534 UNIVERSITIES, DIVISION OF PROGRAM: EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES Funds in Specific Appropriations 9 through 13 and 149 through 170 are provided as grants and aids to support the operation of state university entities. Funds provided to each university entity are contingent upon that university entity following the provisions of chapters 1000 through 1013, Florida Statutes, which relate to state universities. Any withholding of funds pursuant to this provision shall be subject to the approval of the Legislative Budget Commission. 149 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - MOFFITT CANCER CENTER AND RESEARCH INSTITUTE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,576,930 Funds in Specific Appropriation 149 shall be transferred to the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute to support the operations of this state university system entity. Funds in Specific Appropriation 149 may be transferred to the Agency for Health Care Administration and used as state matching funds for the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute to adjust the Medicaid inpatient reimbursement and outpatient trend adjustments applied to the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute and other Medicaid reductions to its reimbursements up to the actual Medicaid inpatient and outpatient costs. In the event that enhanced Medicaid funding is not implemented by the Agency for Health Care Administration, these funds shall remain appropriated to the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute to continue the original purpose of providing research and education related to cancer. 150 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - POST SECONDARY GUARDIAN PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,800,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 150 shall be used to certify and train school guardians as provided in section 30.15, Florida Statutes, and are contingent upon SB 896 or similar legislation becoming a law. The funds provided are supplemental and may not be used to replace or supplant current funds used for institutional police departments. 151 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - NURSING EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,000,000 The funds in Specific Appropriation 151, are provided for the Prepping Institutions, Programs, Employers, and Learners through Incentives for Nursing Education (PIPELINE) Fund to reward performance and excellence among nursing education programs at state universities pursuant to section 1009.897, Florida Statutes. These funds shall be allocated as follows: University of Florida..................................... 4,492,623 Florida State University.................................. 3,342,237 Florida A&M University.................................... 1,500,059 University of South Florida............................... 6,233,006 Florida Atlantic University............................... 2,786,646 University of West Florida................................ 4,423,927 University of Central Florida............................. 7,222,647 Florida International University.......................... 3,657,024 University of North Florida............................... 3,674,313 Florida Gulf Coast University............................. 2,667,518 152 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - EDUCATION AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,239,737,960 FROM PHOSPHATE RESEARCH TRUST FUND . 5,234,908 The named university entities are authorized to expend tuition and fees that are collected during the 2026-2027 fiscal year and carried forward from the prior fiscal year and that are appropriated into local accounts pursuant to section 1011.4106, Florida Statutes. The expenditure of tuition and fee revenues from local accounts by each university entity is contingent upon each university entity complying with the tuition and fee policies established in Part II of chapter 1009, Florida Statutes. By October 1 each year, the Board of Governors must submit a report detailing the actual and estimated tuition and fee revenues for each university entity as deposited in the Education and General Student and Other Fees Trust Fund to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. Funds from the General Revenue Fund provided in Specific Appropriations 152 through 162 to each of the named university entities are contingent upon each university entity complying with the tuition and fee policies established in Part II of chapter 1009, Florida Statutes. However, the funds appropriated to a specific university entity shall not be affected by the failure of another university entity to comply with this provision. Funds in Specific Appropriations 9 through 13 and 152 through 170 shall be expended in accordance with operating budgets that must be approved by each university's board of trustees. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 9 from the Educational Enhancement Trust Fund and Specific Appropriation 152 from the General Revenue Fund, $3,786,955,416 is allocated as follows: University of Florida..................................... 677,078,658 Florida State University.................................. 593,958,536 Florida A&M University.................................... 115,157,023 University of South Florida, Tampa........................ 436,636,274 Florida Atlantic University............................... 177,594,090 University of West Florida................................ 103,610,281 University of Central Florida............................. 334,025,296 Florida International University.......................... 349,608,441 University of North Florida............................... 129,109,371 Florida Gulf Coast University............................. 121,421,243 New College of Florida.................................... 37,278,649 Florida Polytechnic University............................ 44,932,255 State University Performance Based Incentives............. 645,000,000 Incentives for Programs of Strategic Emphasis............. 18,485,299 Florida Hillels Jewish Student Safety Initiative (SF 2792) 1,810,000 Jewish Campus Life Initiative: Standing Against Antisemitism Across Florida (SF 2819)................... 900,000 Student Nurse Intern Program for Recruitment and Retention (SF 2580)..................................... 350,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 152, as listed above, include recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund for the following base appropriations projects: Florida A&M University Crestview Education Center................................ 1,500,000 Florida Atlantic University Max Planck Scientific Fellowship Program.................. 889,101 Florida International University FIUnique.................................................. 3,900,000 Florida State University Student Veterans Center................................... 500,000 University of North Florida Advanced Manufacturing & Materials Innovation............. 855,000 University of West Florida School of Mechanical Engineering.......................... 1,000,000 Veteran & Military Student Support........................ 250,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following appropriations projects: Florida A&M University FAMU: Civic Engagement Institute (SF 2672)................ 350,000 FAMU: Expand Doctoral-to-Workforce Pathways in Agriculture & Farming (SF 2893)......................... 3,000,000 Florida Atlantic University Center for Educational Strategy and Innovation (SF 1175).. 350,000 Florida International University FIU Global Jewish Studies (SF 2044)....................... 350,000 Florida Polytechnic University Rising to 3,000: Expanding Florida Poly's Economic Impact (SF 2335)............................................... 350,000 Florida State University FSU College of Law - Election Law Center (SF 1540)........ 350,000 FSU Institute for Pediatric Rare Diseases (SF 1294)....... 350,000 University of Central Florida Center for Community Schools Youth Conflict Resolution/Peer Support (SF 2761)....................... 150,000 Center for the Study of Human Trafficking and Modern Slavery (SF 1924)....................................... 350,000 RESTORES PTSD Clinic for Florida's Veterans & First Responders (SF 2000).................................... 1,000,000 University of Florida Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) Computer System Modernization (SF 3645)................................. 350,000 Forensic Interview Center (SF 3656)....................... 350,000 University of South Florida USF National and Critical Infrastructure Security Initiatives (SF 3146)................................... 350,000 University of West Florida UWF Digital Credential Wallet (SF 3460)................... 250,000 Undergraduate tuition shall be assessed in accordance with section 1009.24, Florida Statutes. Tuition for graduate and professional programs and out-of-state fees for all programs shall be established pursuant to section 1009.24, Florida Statutes. No state university may receive general revenue funding associated with the enrollment of out-of-state students. Each university board of trustees is given flexibility to make necessary adjustments to its operating budget. If any board reduces individual programs or projects within the university by more than 10 percent during the 2026-2027 fiscal year, written notification shall be made to the Governor, President of the Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Board of Governors. Funds in Specific Appropriation 152 from the Phosphate Research Trust Fund are provided for the Florida Polytechnic University. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $645,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided for State University System Performance Based Incentives. The funds available for allocation to the universities based on the performance funding model shall consist of the state's investment of $350,000,000 in nonrecurring funds, plus an institutional investment of $295,000,000 in recurring funds to be redistributed from the base funding of the State University System. The Board of Governors shall allocate all appropriated funds for State University System Performance Based Incentives based on the requirements in section 1001.92, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $10,500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida Institute for Child Welfare at Florida State University pursuant to section 1004.615, Florida Statutes. The Institute shall establish a program to identify, describe, and catalogue best practices within the community-based care model. Such best practices may include, but are not limited, management practices, administrative structure, internal and external communication, quality assurance, contract management, program development and creation, and child and family outcome monitoring. The Institute shall provide quarterly implementation status reports to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee; the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee; the chair of the Senate Committee on Children, Families, and Elder Affairs; and the chair of the House Health and Human Services Committee. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $18,485,299 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided as Incentives for Programs of Strategic Emphasis during the 2026-2027 academic year pursuant to section 1009.26, Florida Statutes. Universities are eligible to receive funds based on the number and value of waivers provided in ten Programs of Strategic Emphasis and two in teacher education programs identified by the Board of Governors. The following two-digit CIP codes, as reported by the National Center for Education Statistics, are not eligible for Incentives for Program of Strategic Emphasis: 09, 19, 25, 31, 35, 36, 42, 45, and 50. The Board of Governors shall distribute the funds for waivers provided during the fall, spring, and then summer academic terms. Remaining funds shall be distributed based on waivers provided during the spring academic term. The Board of Governors shall establish procedures and timelines for universities to report the number and value of waivers in order to receive incentive funds. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $20,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the University of Central Florida. These funds shall be placed in reserve. The Board of Governors is authorized to submit a budget amendment requesting release of these funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. Release of these funds is contingent upon the University of Central Florida's approval by the Board of Governors as a preeminent state research university, pursuant to section 1001.7065, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $10,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Hamilton Center for Classical and Civic Education at the University of Florida established pursuant to section 1004.6496, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $10,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the New College of Florida for operational enhancements as determined by the President and Board of Trustees. Of the funds provided, a minimum of $5,000,000 shall be used to provide scholarships to students. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $250,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida State University Florida Center for Reading Research for the development and delivery of a literacy-focused online professional development system for Florida teachers as provided in section 1001.215, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 152, $15,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Adam Smith Center for Economic Freedom at Florida International University. 153 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA POSTSECONDARY ACADEMIC LIBRARY NETWORK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,421,847 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 153 provided to the host entity as specified in section 1006.73(6), Florida Statutes, $1,642,808 shall be released to the Florida Postsecondary Academic Library Network at the host entity at the beginning of the first quarter, and $2,533,700 shall be released at the beginning of the second quarter in addition to the normal releases. The additional releases are provided to maximize cost savings through centralized purchases of subscription-based electronic resources and low-cost, no-cost, or open-access electronic textbooks. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 153, $750,000 is provided for subscription increases for e-resources such as, a statewide collection of library electronic resources, including scholarly journals, magazines, newspapers, academic streaming videos, research databases, or e-books. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 153, $835,347 is provided for the support of the Library Services and Distance Learning & Student Services divisions of the host entity. Administrative costs shall not exceed five percent. 154 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA AGRICULTURAL AND MECHANICAL UNIVERSITY AND FLORIDA STATE UNIVERSITY COLLEGE OF ENGINEERING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,256,475 155 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - IFAS (INSTITUTE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURAL SCIENCE) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 194,456,701 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 155, recurring funds are provided for the following base appropriations projects: Animal Agriculture Industry Science & Technology.......... 2,240,000 Cervidae Disease Research................................. 2,000,000 Florida Shellfish Aquaculture............................. 250,000 Forestry Education........................................ 1,110,825 Statewide Water Budget Data Analytics Pilot Project w/ DEP 1,381,200 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 155, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided for the University of Florida IFAS - Crop Transformation Center (SF 1243). 156 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - UNIVERSITY OF SOUTH FLORIDA MEDICAL CENTER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 85,908,706 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 156, recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following base appropriations projects: Center for Neuromusculoskeletal Research.................. 300,000 Veteran PTSD Study........................................ 125,000 Veteran PTSD & Traumatic Brain Injury Study............... 250,000 Veteran Service Center.................................... 175,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 156, $200,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided for the Center for Neuromusculoskeletal Research (SF 2816). 157 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA HEALTH CENTER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 123,146,162 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 157, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following appropriations projects: University of Florida - Florida AI for Health Institute (FAIHT) (SF 1978)....................................... 4,000,000 University of Florida: Biomedical Innovation and Technology - Scripps (SF 2060).......................... 350,000 158 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS LASTINGER CENTER FOR LEARNING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,180,571 Funds in Specific Appropriation 158 are provided to the University of Florida Lastinger Center for Learning to support the development and implementation of statewide initiatives to support early learning coalitions, school districts, and schools in improving student achievement in reading and mathematics as provided for in section 1004.561, Florida Statutes. A maximum of $4,000,000 may be used by the center for general operations related to these programs and initiatives. The remaining funds shall be allocated initially as provided below with the center authorized to shift funding among the various programs for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 based on actual participation and demonstrated need. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 158, $8,000,000 in recurring funds and $12,000,000 in nonrecurring funds are provided to the center to implement the New Worlds Tutoring program pursuant to sections 1004.561 and 1008.366, Florida Statutes. These funds shall be distributed to school districts to implement the program in their respective districts or used by the center to provide direct or contracted support and services to districts. The center shall establish performance metrics to monitor the success of the program and to use in the management of grant awards for districts and contracted services. At a minimum, these metrics should include data on student attendance in tutoring sessions, student or parent satisfaction with tutoring sessions, and progress monitoring of student achievement. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 158, $18,430,571 in recurring funds is provided to the center to implement the New Worlds micro-credential program, mathematics micro-credential, and reading endorsement incentives established pursuant to sections 1002.995, 1003.485, 1004.561, and 1012.586, Florida Statutes. Incentives may be provided to early learning coalition personnel and school district literacy coaches who earn a micro-credential or school district staff who earn a literacy coach endorsement. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 158, $3,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the center to provide a system of professional learning for the early learning coalitions established pursuant to section 1002.83, Florida Statutes, that significantly improves child care instructor quality. The center shall consult with the early learning coalitions and the Department of Education in the development and provision of this system. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 158, $1,750,000 in recurring funds is provided to the center for the development and delivery of a literacy-focused online professional learning system for teachers as provided in section 1001.215, Florida Statutes, and for Literacy Coach Endorsements and the Literacy Leadership Professional Learning Series. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 158, $2,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the center for the grants awarded pursuant to section 1002.321, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 158, $1,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the center to implement the mathematics professional learning and micro-credential program pursuant to section 1004.561, Florida Statutes. 159 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA STATE UNIVERSITY MEDICAL SCHOOL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,359,083 160 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS UNIVERSITY OF CENTRAL FLORIDA MEDICAL SCHOOL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31,814,672 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 160, $337,000 in recurring funds is provided for Crohn's and Colitis Research (base appropriations project). 161 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL UNIVERSITY MEDICAL SCHOOL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,503,594 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 161, $1,500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Neuroscience Centers of Florida Foundation (base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 161, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided for the Florida International University - FIU Pediatric Cancer Elimination Program (SF 2923). 162 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FLORIDA ATLANTIC UNIVERSITY MEDICAL SCHOOL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,747,039 163 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,475,378 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 163 $7,140,378 is provided for student financial assistance. A minimum of 75 percent of the funds shall be allocated for need-based financial aid. Funds in Specific Appropriation 163 shall be allocated as follows: University of Florida..................................... 1,737,381 Florida State University.................................. 1,467,667 Florida A&M University.................................... 624,417 University of South Florida............................... 801,368 Florida Atlantic University............................... 399,658 University of West Florida................................ 157,766 University of Central Florida............................. 858,405 Florida International University.......................... 540,666 University of North Florida............................... 200,570 Florida Gulf Coast University............................. 98,073 New College of Florida.................................... 204,407 Florida Polytechnic University............................ 50,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 163, the Board of Governors Foundation shall distribute $335,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to state universities for Johnson Scholarships in accordance with section 1009.74, Florida Statutes. Sixty percent of such funds shall be released at the beginning of the first quarter and the balance at the beginning of the third quarter. 164 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA POSTSECONDARY COMPREHENSIVE TRANSITION PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,200,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 164, a maximum of $2,500,000 may be used by the Florida Center for Students with Unique Abilities to administer the Florida Postsecondary Comprehensive Transition Program (FPCTP). These funds are for costs solely associated with the center serving as the statewide coordinating center for the program. The remaining funds in Specific Appropriation 164 are provided for FPCTP grants pursuant to section 1004.6495(5)(b)5., Florida Statutes, and for FPCTP Scholarships for students who are enrolled in eligible programs. The maximum annual grant award shall be $500,000 per institution. The maximum annual amount of the scholarship shall be $15,000 for students who meet the eligibility requirements of section 1004.6495(7), Florida Statutes. 165 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - INSTITUTE FOR HUMAN AND MACHINE COGNITION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,339,184 The funds in Specific Appropriation 165 shall be transferred to the Institute for Human and Machine Cognition to support the operations of this state university system entity. 165A AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FLORIDA CENTER FOR NURSING - UNIVERSITY OF SOUTH FLORIDA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,000,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 165A, $7,000,000 is provided to the Florida Center for Nursing at the University of South Florida as authorized in section 464.0195, Florida Statutes. Funds shall be used to address supply and demand for nursing, including issues of recruitment, retention, and utilization of nurse workforce resources. In addition, the center shall use these funds to administer the Linking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) Fund pursuant to section 1009.892, Florida Statues, and provide technical assistance to grant applicants and recipients. The remaining shall be allocated according to the guidelines below, with the center authorized to shift funding among the various programs for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 based on actual participation and need. These funds are contingent upon SB 2516 or similar legislation becoming a law. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 165A, $6,000,000 is provided for the Linking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) Fund to incentivize collaboration between nursing education and related health science programs and healthcare partners. These funds shall be provided to state universities. Sixty percent of such funds shall be released at the beginning of the first quarter and the balance at the beginning of the third quarter. These funds are contingent upon SB 2516 or similar legislation becoming a law. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 165A, $24,000,000 is provided for the Linking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) Fund to incentivize collaboration between nursing education and related health science programs and healthcare partners. Funds shall be provided to eligible school district postsecondary technical career centers under section 1001.44, Florida Statutes, charter technical career centers under section 1002.34, Florida Statutes, Florida College System institutions, or independent non-profit colleges or universities, or independent schools, colleges, or universities with an accredited program as defined in section 464.003, Florida Statutes which are located in this state and licensed by the Commission for Independent Education pursuant to section 1005.31, Florida Statutes. Sixty percent of such funds shall be released at the beginning of the first quarter and the balance at the beginning of the third quarter. These funds are contingent upon SB 2516 or similar legislation becoming a law. 166 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) - FLORIDA HEALTH CARE DATA REPOSITORY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 565,040 167 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,908,629 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 167, $10,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the Florida Center for Cybersecurity at the University of South Florida as authorized in section 1004.444, Florida Statutes. Funds shall be used to position Florida as the national leader in cybersecurity and its related workforce through education, research, and community engagement; assist in the creation of jobs in the state's cybersecurity industry and enhance the existing cybersecurity workforce; act as a cooperative facilitator for state business and higher education communities to share cybersecurity knowledge, resources, and training; seek out partnerships with major military installations to assist, when possible, in homeland cybersecurity defense initiatives; and attract cybersecurity companies to the state with an emphasis on defense, finance, health care, transportation, and utility sectors. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 167, $500,000 in recurring funds is provided to operate and maintain a Cyber Attack and Simulation Range to provide training and testing in a highly technical, simulated environment. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 167, $25,000,000 in recurring funds is provided to the University of South Florida to implement the provisions of section 1004.444, Florida Statutes. The funds in Specific Appropriation 167, $408,629 in funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Northwest Regional Data Center (NWRDC) at the Florida State University for logging and cloud storage to address audit findings of the State Data Center included in State of Florida Auditor General Information Technology Operational Audit Report Number 2022-179 that was previously provided through the Enterprise Cybersecurity Resiliency category within the Department of Management Services. 168 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,603,669 FROM PHOSPHATE RESEARCH TRUST FUND . 2,045 169 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA CENTER FOR AUTISM AND NEURODEVELOPMENT - UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,000,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 169, a maximum of $4,500,000 is provided to the Florida Center for Autism and Neurodevelopment within the University of Florida College of Medicine to develop and implement the programs and services pursuant to section 1004.551, Florida Statutes. These funds are for costs associated with the center's role as the statewide coordinating body, administrator, and fiscal agent for these programs. The remaining funds shall be used by the center to support and implement various programs established in sections 1003.5711, 1003.5712, and 1004.551, Florida Statutes. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 169, a maximum of $2,000,000 may be used by the center to strengthen Florida's behavioral health and education workforce through a multidisciplinary graduate training initiative. The center shall use these funds to expand capacity in critical shortage areas by funding graduate assistantships, faculty supervision, internships, and post-doctoral associates. These critical shortage areas include behavior analysis, education, speech-language pathology, occupational therapy, and other school-related disciplines. 170 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY SCHOOL GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,216,736 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 170, a maximum of $3,281,000 may be used by the University of Central Florida Center for Community Schools to administer the Community School Grant Program (CSGP) pursuant to section 1003.64, Florida Statutes. These funds are for costs solely associated with the center to serve as statewide coordinating center to provide technical assistance, certification, assessment and evaluation, and grant administration in the establishment and support of community schools in Florida. In addition, a maximum of $750,000 may be used for data and reporting management technologies, evaluations and statewide sustainability convenings. The remaining funds are provided for CSGP implementation and planning grants pursuant section 1003.64, Florida Statutes. Indirect costs are unallowable, but up to ten percent of administrative costs may be used for direct administrative support. 170A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITY REPAIRS MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 535,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 170A are provided for the Florida Hillels Jewish Student Safety Initiative (SF 2792). TOTAL: PROGRAM: EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,092,753,376 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,236,953 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,097,990,329 BOARD OF GOVERNORS APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,789,841 171 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 66.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,364,473 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,024,368 172 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 62,371 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 18,948 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,315 173 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 736,982 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 144,799 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,000 173A AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - PROJECTS, CONTRACTS AND GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 250,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 173A, $500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Greater Miami Jewish Federation - Miami Alliance Against Antisemitism (SF 2146). 174 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,782 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,950 175 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,034,903 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 70,000 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000 176 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,864 177 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,491 FROM DIVISION OF UNIVERSITIES FACILITY CONSTRUCTION ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,626 178 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 366,279 TOTAL: BOARD OF GOVERNORS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 11,099,145 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,548,006 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 66.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,647,151 TOTAL OF SECTION 2 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 22,880,265,971 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,456,752,066 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,234.75 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 29,337,018,037 TOTAL: EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF (SECTIONS 1 AND 2) EDUCATION/EARLY LEARNING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 604,049,576 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,969,826 EDUCATION/PUBLIC SCHOOLS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 15,774,112,564 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,986,223,770 EDUCATION/FL COLLEGES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,621,819,609 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 239,728,417 EDUCATION/UNIVERSITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,092,753,376 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 617,621,108 EDUCATION/OTHER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 787,530,846 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,071,161,587 EDUCATION RECAP FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 22,880,265,971 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,915,704,708 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,234.75 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,795,970,679 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 137,282,153 SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the named funds to the Agency for Health Care Administration, Agency for Persons with Disabilities, Department of Children and Families, Department of Elder Affairs, Department of Health, and Department of Veterans' Affairs as the amounts to be used to pay the salaries, other operational expenditures, and fixed capital outlay of the named agencies. AGENCY FOR HEALTH CARE ADMINISTRATION From the funds in Specific Appropriations 179 through 237, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall enter into a single Medicaid financial data sharing agreement with the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability (OPPAGA) and the vendor it selects. The vendor selected by OPPAGA shall include an actuary who is not associated with the Florida Medicaid Program or any Medicaid managed care organization that is currently contracting with the state of Florida. The data sharing agreement shall include, but not be limited to, Medicaid eligibility data, Medicaid claims data, Achieved Savings Rebate financial data submissions, Florida Medicaid Management Information System encounter data and other supporting information from the agency and the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care plans. The agreement shall include the underlying data relied upon by the agency and the contracted actuary in their development of the Medicaid capitation rates, including, but not limited to, data associated with the development of the base data costs, adjustments made to the base data, documents associated with the trend assumption in developing the capitation rates and other supporting information. The data agreement shall be in accordance with industry standard HIPAA and HITECH compliance standards for data and document management. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall provide to OPPAGA, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee the following contractually required reports submitted by the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care plans to the agency as outlined in the single Medicaid financial data sharing agreement, within 10 days of receipt by the agency: - Administrative Subcontractors and Affiliates Report - Annual and Quarterly Reports for Chronic Disease Management - Denial, Reduction, Termination or Suspension of Services Report - Performance Improvement Projects (PIP) Quarterly progress reports - Performance Measures Report and Measure Action Plan - Provider Complaint Report - Special Populations Care Coordination Report - Value Based Purchasing Report PROGRAM: ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT From the funds in Specific Appropriations 179 through 189, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall provide a monthly reconciliation report for all Administrative Trust Fund revenues, expenditures, and cash balances. The report shall include expenditures to date by category and revenue collections to date for each month and shall be reconciled to state accounting records. The agency shall provide applicable state accounting reports to validate the reconciliation report. The report shall also include expenditure projections by category and revenue projections for the remainder of the fiscal year by month (including the methodologies used to determine those projections). The monthly report shall be submitted to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,172,298 179 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 242.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,955,761 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 20,658,890 180 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 757,009 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,375,216 181 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 302,216 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,639,082 182 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 226,539 183 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 108,789 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,782,799 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 183, $400,000 in recurring funds from the Administrative Trust Fund is provided for the Bureau of Financial Services Enterprise Financial System. 184 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 450,107 Funds in Specific Appropriation 184 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 185 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 405,055 186 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,228 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 126,575 187 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,346 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 193,232 188 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,685 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 73,870 189 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,867,996 TOTAL: PROGRAM: ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 5,630,141 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 33,349,254 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 242.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 38,979,395 PROGRAM: HEALTH CARE SERVICES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 190 through 237, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall provide written notification, including copies of any official communication, to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee within five business days of receipt of any official federal communications from the Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, or other subordinate entities regarding: deferrals, disallowances, compliance actions, approvals or denials of requested programmatic changes, funding adjustments, including changes to federal funding levels, grants or waivers, federal audit findings that could impact program funding or compliance, new federal mandates or guidance that may require legislative or budgetary adjustments, and federal legal challenges or settlements that affect the Florida Medicaid Program or the Children's Health Insurance Program (CHIP). The agency must also provide written notification within five business days of transmitting any official communication to the federal entities described above related to any of the matters described in this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 190 through 237, the Agency for Health Care Administration, unless specifically authorized by law, may not make payments from state funds to satisfy, offset, or respond to federal disallowances, deferrals, compliance actions, audit findings, or related federal enforcement actions, or reduce or modify federal fund draws based on such actions. CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE 190 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA HEALTHY KIDS CORPORATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 128,761,515 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 288,101,739 Funds in Specific Appropriations 190 and 193 are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to contract with the Florida Healthy Kids Corporation to provide comprehensive health insurance coverage, including dental services, to Title XXI children eligible under the Florida KidCare Program and pursuant to section 624.91, Florida Statutes. The corporation shall use local funds to serve non-Title XXI children that are eligible for the program pursuant to section 624.91(3)(b), Florida Statutes. The corporation shall return unspent local funds collected in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to provide premium assistance for non-Title XXI eligible children based on a formula developed by the corporation. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 190, $8,596,329 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $19,234,145 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are appropriated to the Agency for Health Care Administration to maintain the combined-risk model for premiums in the Florida Healthy Kids program. 191 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,684,219 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 873,685 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 3,768,842 192 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES - FLORIDA HEALTHY KIDS ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,524,394 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 14,598,223 193 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA HEALTHY KIDS CORPORATION DENTAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,424,124 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 21,086,321 Funds in Specific Appropriation 193 are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration for Florida Healthy Kids dental services to be paid a monthly premium of no more than $19.24 per member per month. 194 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDIKIDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,387,485 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 17,389,416 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 54,546,226 195 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CHILDREN'S MEDICAL SERVICES NETWORK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 152,679,612 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,236,162 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 341,075,391 TOTAL: CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 323,461,349 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 743,676,005 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,067,137,354 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 196 through 237, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall submit a report detailing the outcomes of the behavior analysis services risk corridor included in the 2025-2026 rate year for the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program. The report must include, by managed care plan, the differential between projected utilization and costs included in the capitated rates and actual utilization and costs incurred, the amount of profit retained by the managed care plan, the amount of savings returned to the state, and all associated data and calculations. The agency shall submit the report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by February 1, 2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 196 through 237, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall submit an annual report detailing the achieved savings rebate program of the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program pursuant to section 409.967, Florida Statutes. The report must include, by managed care plan, total achieved savings calculated for the applicable contract year, the amount of rebates owed to the state, the amount of rebates collected, the timing of collection, any disputes, adjustments, or deferrals of all or a portion of the repayment owed by a managed care plan, and all associated data, assumptions, and calculations. The agency shall notify the Legislature of any such deferral and provide the rationale and fiscal impact associated with the deferral. The agency shall submit the report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1, 2026. APPROVED SALARY RATE 45,164,363 196 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 640.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,602,777 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 57,812,218 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 196, $1,872,875 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund is appropriated to the Agency for Health Care Administration and 14 full-time equivalent positions with the associated salary rate of 1,260,000 are authorized for the purpose of implementing the Florida Rural Health Transformation Program. The agency must provide written notification and supporting documentation of any changes in federal funding, including grant amendments, to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives within five business days of any official federal communication. 197 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 144,643 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 2,442,559 198 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,027,481 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 7,138,134 199 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,341 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 13,341 200 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT NURSING HOME AUDIT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,307,653 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 1,609,095 Funds in Specific Appropriation 200 are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to contract with certified public accounting firms for auditing Medicaid-participating nursing homes and intermediate care facilities for individuals with developmentally disabilities (ICF/IDD). The audits shall validate the accuracy and reasonableness of cost information reported by these facilities. 201 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,132,939 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,874,788 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 85,755,495 In order to preserve the limits of Specific Appropriation 201, no funds shall be used for the FX project to replace the Florida Medicaid Management Information System and Medicaid fiscal agent. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 201, the Agency for Health Care Administration may contract with the Florida Medical Schools Quality Network created under section 409.975(2), Florida Statutes, to develop quality metrics for Medicaid eligible persons, which are Application Programming Interface (API) compatible with the agency and Medicaid managed care organizations and quality initiatives pursuant to section 409.975, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 201, $10,804,253 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund is provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to contract for an enhanced provider network auditing program to monitor access to care within the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program and to ensure compliance with section 409.967(2)(c)(1), Florida Statutes. The program shall include monthly automated reviews and audits of provider network data, as well as periodic secret shopper reviews, including telephonic and on-site verification of information reported by the managed care plans. Network monitoring results shall be made available to the public through a web-based reporting center in a timely manner, not to exceed 10 working days following finalization of each review. The agency shall provide written justification to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee for any direction to the vendor to cease review activity or to exclude from publication any monitoring results for a specific provider or network. The agency shall forward a copy of all program reports to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee within three business days of receipt by the agency. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 201, $4,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to support prescription drug price negotiation and purchasing activities. These funds shall be held in reserve. The agency may submit a budget amendment, pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting the release of funds authorizing the direct purchase of prescribed drug products by or on behalf of eligible state agencies. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 201, $1,323,600 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $1,676,400 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to support a pilot program for technology integration between skilled nursing facilities and hospitals to reduce avoidable hospitalizations by improving the quality of patient care, workflow efficiency, and clinical transparency. The agency shall select two pilot Medicaid regions: one primarily urban and one primarily rural. Participating skilled nursing facilities must adopt certified, interoperable clinical technologies with real-time alerting capabilities that also provide clinical insights into patient care and meet applicable state certification and interoperability standards. Participation by facilities shall be voluntary. From pilot program funds, the agency shall establish supplemental payments for participating skilled nursing facilities, structured as an annual per-licensed-bed payment. Fifty percent of payment shall be distributed upon approved participation. Receipt of the remaining fifty percent of payments shall be contingent upon documented reductions in avoidable hospitalizations, demonstrated improvements in care coordination and workflow efficiency, and compliance with data integration, interoperability, and reporting requirements established by the agency. In support of the pilot program, the agency shall competitively procure a single certified electronic health record technology with real-time alerting capabilities to support interoperable, enterprise-level integration across skilled nursing facilities, hospitals, and Medicaid managed care organizations. By November 1, 2027, the agency shall submit a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives evaluating the outcomes of the pilot program, including reductions in avoidable hospitalizations, impacts on Medicaid expenditures, effects on resident outcomes and quality of life, and recommendations regarding statewide implementation. 201A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,500,000 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 2,500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 201A, $1,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to UF Health Jacksonville - Operating Support (SF 2653). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 201A, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund is provided to eBrief: Technology to Improve Incontinence Care in Florida's Nursing Homes (SF 3792). 203 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA HEALTH CARE CONNECTION (FX) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,323,612 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 23,692,834 Funds in Specific Appropriation 203 are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration for activities of the Florida Health Care Connections Project (FX) that comply with all applicable federal and state laws and requirements, including, but not limited to, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Interoperability and Patient Access Rule CMS-9115 and published Medicaid Information Technology Architecture (MITA) frameworks and guidelines. From these funds, the following amounts are appropriated for the implementation and operation of FX components in production or planned for delivery in Fiscal Year 2026-2027, which were competitively procured and received proper review and approval under the FX governance structure prior to July 1, 2026: FX Enterprise Project Services and Hardware/Software Renewals............................. $3,164,960 Integration Services/Integration Platform and Enterprise Data Warehouse Operations & Maintenance.... $10,000,000 CMS Interoperability Patient Access Rule Implementation (CPARI) ................................ $3,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 203, $1,250,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $3,750,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to augment existing agency resources to transition the primary operation and maintenance responsibilities for the FX Integration Services/Integration Platform and the FX Enterprise Data Warehouse from the current vendors to agency resources within the project. The agency must submit a transition plan to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the Chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the Chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by October 1, 2026. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 203, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to contract for a comprehensive, independent technical architecture and feasibility assessment of the agency's Medicaid management information system (MMIS), including components completed under the FX project. 204 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDICAID FISCAL CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,172,571 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 53,677,531 205 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDICAID PEER REVIEW FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,093,903 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 4,403,348 206 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 192,742 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 245,889 207 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,165 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 180,663 208 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 77,870 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 167,446 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 59,615,697 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 253,513,341 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 640.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 313,129,038 MEDICAID SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS From the funds in Specific Appropriations 209 through 237, the Agency for Health Care Administration, upon receipt of any official communication from the Department of Health and Human Services, federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, other subordinate entities regarding unallowable payments or expenditures in violation of the Florida Managed Medical Assistance 1115 waiver's special terms and conditions, which have or may result in a requirement for the state to repay federal funds, shall provide written notification and copies of the official communication, to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee within three business days of the date of the communication. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund to implement the Low Income Pool component of the Florida Managed Medical Assistance demonstration up to the total computable funds authorized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. The budget amendment must include the final terms and conditions of the Low Income Pool, a proposed distribution model by entity and a listing of entities contributing intergovernmental transfers to support the state match required. Low Income Pool payments to providers are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. The Agency for Health Care Administration is prohibited from seeking federal approval to amend the Special Terms and Conditions for the Low Income Pool before a 14-day prior notification is provided to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. Such notification is subject to the legislative review and objection provisions of section 216.177, Florida Statutes. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund to implement fee-for-service supplemental payments and manage a supplemental payment plan to support access to high quality care provided by doctors of medicine, osteopathy and dentistry as well as other licensed health care practitioners acting under the supervision of those doctors pursuant to existing statutes and written protocols employed by or under contract with a medical or dental school in Florida or a public hospital through a minimum fee schedule calculated as a supplemental per member per month payment, based on the amount allowable under the state plan amendment and historic utilization of services; or to implement fee-for-service supplemental payments and to increase reimbursement for physicians and dentists employed by or under contract with a Florida medical or dental school or a public hospital and practitioners under the supervision of those physicians or dentists to the level provided for these physicians and practitioners pursuant to a minimum fee schedule calculated as a supplemental per member per month payment based on the historic utilization of services by Medicaid eligible children. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. Payments to providers pursuant to this section of proviso shall not be considered a component of the provider payment calculation specified in section 409.975(6), Florida Statutes, and are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund for a certified public expenditure program for Emergency Medical Services. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall seek a state plan amendment/waiver to implement this program pursuant to 42 CFR 433.51. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. Payments to providers under this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund to implement the federally approved Directed Payment Program and fee-for-service supplemental payments for cancer hospitals that meet the criteria in 42 U.S.C. s.1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v), and achieve the quality metrics in the pre-print approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a minimum fee schedule calculated as a supplemental per member per month payment. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. In addition to the proposed amendment, the agency must submit a proposed distribution model by entity and a proposed listing of entities contributing intergovernmental transfers to support the state match. Payments to providers under this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund to implement the Disproportionate Share Hospital Program. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. The budget amendment must include a proposed distribution model by entity and a proposed listing of entities contributing intergovernmental transfers and certified state expenditures to support the state match required. Disproportionate Share Hospital Program payments to providers are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and certified state expenditures. In the event that these funds are not available, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds from the Grants and Donations Trust and Medical Care Trust Fund to implement fee-for-service inpatient and outpatient supplemental payments for specialty hospitals providing comprehensive acute care services to children that as of January 1, 2022, are (i) separately licensed by the state pursuant to section 395.002(28), Florida Statutes,(ii) are in Medicaid Regions I or E, and (iii) are defined as IPPS Exempt children's hospitals by the federal government. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting the spending authority to implement the fee-for-service payments which will be excluded from the calculation of the prepaid plan per member per month payments. The budget amendment must include a proposed distribution model by entity and a proposed listing of entities contributing intergovernmental transfers and certified state expenditures to support the state match required. The hospital rate enhancements are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and certified state expenditures. In the event that these funds are not available, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 209 through 237, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall provide a quarterly reconciliation report of all Medicaid service appropriation expenditures and fund sources. The reconciliation shall compare actual expenditures paid through each specific appropriation category by fund either through the Florida Medicaid Management Information System (FMMIS) or the Agency for Health Care Administration to expenditure estimates forecast through the Social Services Estimating Conference Medicaid services forecasting model, as directed in section 216.136(6), Florida Statutes. The comparison shall include fund source detail for each comparison. For any category where a variance is identified, the agency shall submit a written corrective action plan to address each variance by category and fund source. The reconciliation shall be submitted to the Executive Office of the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than 30 days after the close of each quarter. The agency may submit budget amendments to the Legislative Budget Commission to realign appropriation categories based on the reconciliation pursuant to the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. 209 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CASE MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,418 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 27,123 210 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,169,448 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 27,063,505 212 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEVELOPMENTAL EVALUATION AND INTERVENTION/ PART C FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,205 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 35,719 213 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SHANDS TEACHING HOSPITAL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,673,569 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 213 shall be primarily designated for transfer to the Agency for Health Care Administration's Grants and Donations Trust Fund for use in the Medicaid program. Should the agency be unable to use the full amount of these designated funds as Medicaid match, the remaining funds may be used secondarily for payments to Shands Teaching Hospital to continue the original purpose of providing health care services to indigent patients through Shands Healthcare System (recurring base appropriations project). 214 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HEALTHY START SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,318,143 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 30,796,919 215 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRAINING, EDUCATION, AND CLINICALS IN HEALTH (TEACH) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,000,000 216 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 122,254,998 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 158,132,590 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 355,087,709 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $84,309,648 from the General Revenue Fund, $44,122,500 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, and $162,648,702 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to fund the Statewide Medicaid Residency Program and the Graduate Medical Education Startup Bonus Program. Of these funds, $191,080,850 shall be used to fund the Statewide Medicaid Residency Program in accordance with section 409.909(3), Florida Statutes. Of these funds, $52,500,000 shall be distributed to the two hospitals with the largest number of graduate medical residents in a statewide supply/demand deficit. The remaining funds shall be used to fund the Graduate Medical Education Startup Bonus Program in accordance with section 409.909(5), Florida Statutes, and are provided for the following specialties and subspecialties, both adult and pediatric, that are in statewide supply/demand deficit: allergy or immunology; anesthesiology; cardiology; colon and rectal surgery; emergency medicine; endocrinology; family medicine; gastroenterology; general internal medicine; geriatric medicine; hematology; oncology; infectious diseases; neonatology; nephrology; neurological surgery; obstetrics/gynecology; ophthalmology; orthopedic surgery; pediatrics; physical medicine and rehabilitation; plastic surgery/reconstructive surgery; psychiatry; pulmonary/critical care; radiation oncology; rheumatology; thoracic surgery; urology; and vascular surgery. Funding for the Graduate Medical Education Startup Bonus Program is contingent on the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donation Trust Fund. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $35,298,000 from the General Revenue Fund and $44,702,000 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to fund the Graduate Medical Education Slots for Doctors Program in accordance with section 409.909(6), Florida Statutes, and are provided for the following physician specialties and subspecialties, both adult and pediatric, that are in statewide supply/demand deficit: allergy or immunology; anesthesiology; cardiology; colon and rectal surgery; emergency medicine; endocrinology; family medicine; gastroenterology; general internal medicine; geriatric medicine; hematology; oncology; infectious diseases; neonatology; nephrology; neurological surgery; obstetrics/gynecology; ophthalmology; orthopedic surgery; pediatrics; physical medicine and rehabilitation; plastic surgery/reconstructive surgery; psychiatry; pulmonary/critical care; radiation oncology; rheumatology; thoracic surgery; urology; and vascular surgery. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall annually submit a Graduate Medical Education Slots for Doctors report on the number of newly created resident full-time equivalent (FTE) positions by each eligible hospital and qualifying institution, including the physician specialty or subspecialty in statewide supply/demand deficit associated with the newly created FTE. The agency shall submit the report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by April 1, 2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $2,647,350 from the General Revenue Fund and $3,352,650 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration for the Slots for Doctors Program established in section 409.909, Florida Statutes, for up to 10 newly created positions for each designated behavioral health teaching hospital designed under section 395.902(4), Florida Statutes. The agency shall allocate $150,000 for each newly created position. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $73,243,350 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $92,756,650 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to statutory teaching hospitals as defined in section 408.07(46), Florida Statutes, which provide highly specialized tertiary care including: comprehensive stroke and Level 2 adult cardiovascular services; NICU II and III; and adult open heart; and has more than 30 full-time equivalent (FTE) residents over the Medicare cap in accordance to the CMS-2552 provider 2021 fiscal year end federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Healthcare Cost Report Information System data extract on December 1, 2022, schedule E-4, line 6 minus schedule E-4, line 5, shall be designated as a High Tertiary Statutory Teaching Hospital and eligible for funding calculated on a per GME resident-FTE proportional allocation that shall be in addition to any other GME funding. Of these funds, $78,309,504 shall be first distributed equally to hospitals with greater than 500 unweighted 2022-2023 fiscal year FTEs. The remaining funds shall be distributed proportionally based on the total unweighted 2022-2023 fiscal year FTEs. Payments to providers under this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $9,045,112 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $11,454,888 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to fund up to $150,000 per full-time equivalent (FTE) in primary care as defined in section 409.909, Florida Statutes, and training in Medicaid Region A. Payments are distributed proportionally per all the filled State Fiscal Year 2023-2024 Statewide Medicaid Residency Program approved Graduate Medical Education FTEs. Payments to providers under this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $2,007,574 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $2,542,426 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to fund up to $175,000 per full-time equivalent (FTE) in primary care as defined in section 409.909, Florida Statutes, and training in public hospitals in Medicaid Region B. Payments are distributed proportionally per the filled State Fiscal Year 2023-2024 Statewide Medicaid Residency Program approved Graduate Medical Education FTEs. Payments to providers under this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $10,501,155 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $13,298,845 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to fund full-time equivalents (FTEs) in primary care as defined in section 409.909, Florida Statutes, and training in Medicaid Region F with traditional primary care demand greater than supply by 85 percent or more as documented in the IHS Markit Florida Statewide and Regional Physician Workforce Analysis: 2019 to 2035, 2021 Update to Projections of Supply and Demand: Exhibit 23 Physician Gap divided by Supply by Specialty and Medicaid Region, 2035. The first distribution of these funds in the amount of $4,500,000 shall be distributed proportionally per-FTE to hospitals with greater than or equal to 14 percent Medicaid utilization, based on the 2023 Florida Hospital Uniform Reporting System data as of November 1, 2024. The funds shall be distributed proportionally per the filled primary care State Fiscal Year 2023-2024 Statewide Medicaid Residency Program approved Graduate Medical Education FTEs. Payments to providers under this section of proviso are contingent upon approval of the nonfederal share provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $1,941,390 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $2,458,610 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to fund up to $200,000 per filled Fiscal Year 2023-2024 unweighted FTE resident, fellow or intern position in an accredited program who rotates through mental health and behavioral health facilities licensed under chapter 394, Florida Statutes, to address the severe deficit of physicians trained in these specialties. Payments to providers under this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $16,678,305 from the Grants and Donations Trust fund and $21,121,695 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to fund up to $200,000 per the filled State Fiscal Year 2024-2025 Statewide Medicaid Residency Program approved Graduate Medical Education FTEs in an accredited program at specialty hospitals providing comprehensive acute care services to children pursuant to section 395.002(28), Florida Statutes, with Medicaid inpatient utilization equal to or greater than 50 percent and are in a county with greater than 250,000 Medicaid enrollees in 2023, to address the severe deficit of physicians trained in these pediatric specialties and subspecialties. Payments to providers under this section are in addition to other funding these hospitals are qualified to receive under this line item and are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund to manage an indirect medical education program for institutions participating in a graduate medical education program. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. Payments to institutions pursuant to this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund to manage a nursing workforce expansion and education program for institutions participating in a nursing education program. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. The budget amendment shall identify the educational institution partnering with the teaching hospital. Institutions participating in the nursing workforce expansion and education program shall provide quarterly reports to the Agency for Health Care Administration detailing the number of nurses participating in the program. Payments to institutions pursuant to this section of proviso are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 216, $593,204 in nonrecurring funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $751,243 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provide to Citrus Health Network, Inc. to fund psychiatry residency slots for Federally Qualified Health Centers that hold continued institutional accreditation from the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education in adult and child psychiatry (SF 1366). 217 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOSPITAL INPATIENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 165,934,590 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 42,300,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,360,493 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 341,400,307 FROM PUBLIC MEDICAL ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 47,450,732 FROM REFUGEE ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . 940,068 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 217, the Agency for Health Care Administration may establish a global fee for bone marrow transplants and the global fee payment shall be paid to approved bone marrow transplant providers that provide bone marrow transplants to Medicaid beneficiaries. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 217 and 222, $4,363,629 from the General Revenue Fund and $5,526,737 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to make Medicaid payments for pediatric lung, adult lung, heart, liver, and adult and pediatric intestinal/multi-visceral transplants in Florida at global rates. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall set the global fee for facilities and physicians that provide these transplant procedures at the respective rates for pediatric lung transplants $458,192 and $66,766; adult lung transplants $335,461 and $54,001; adult heart transplants $220,914 and $42,526; adult liver $156,439 and $44,183; and intestinal/multi-visceral transplants $736,379 and $81,820. The payments shall be used to pay approved transplant facilities global facility and physician fees for providing these transplant services to Medicaid beneficiaries. The agency is authorized to seek any federal waiver or state plan amendment necessary to implement this provision. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 217 and 219, the criteria for the High Medicaid Provider Adjustor shall be hospitals with Medicaid utilization equal to or greater than 50 percent. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 217, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall continue a Diagnosis Related Grouping (DRG) reimbursement methodology for hospital inpatient services as directed in section 409.905(5)(c), Florida Statutes. Base Rate............................................ $3,348.57 Neonates Service Adjustors: Severity Level 1 ............................ 1.0 Severity Level 2 ............................ 1.52 Severity Level 3 ............................ 2.310 Severity Level 4 ............................ 2.310 Neonatal, Pediatric, Transplant Pediatric, Mental Health and Rehab DRGs: Severity Level 1 ............................ 1.0 Severity Level 2 ............................ 1.52 Severity Level 3 ............................ 2.310 Severity Level 4 ............................ 2.310 Normal Newborn DRGs: Severity Level 1 ............................ 1.419 Severity Level 2 ............................ 1.419 Severity Level 3 ............................ 2.049 Severity Level 4 ............................ 2.363 Obstetrics DRGs: Severity Level 1 ............................ 1.419 Severity Level 2 ............................ 1.419 Severity Level 3 ............................ 2.049 Severity Level 4 ............................ 2.363 Outlier Threshold ................................... $60,000 Free Standing Rehabilitation Provider Adjustor ...... 3.046 Rural Provider Adjustor ............................. 2.345 Long Term Acute Care (LTAC) Provider Adjustor ....... 2.272 High Medicaid Provider Adjustor ..................... 1.964 Marginal Cost Percentage ........................... 60% Marginal Cost Percentage for Pediatric Claims Severity Levels 3 or 4 ............................. 80% Marginal Cost Percentage for Neonates Claims Severity Levels 3 or 4 ............................. 80% Marginal Cost Percentage for Transplant Pediatric Claims Severity Levels 3 or 4 ...................... 80% Documentation and Coding Adjustment (per year)....... 1/3 of 1% Level I Trauma Add On ............................... 17% Level II or Level II and Pediatric Add On ........... 11% Pediatric Trauma Add On ............................. 4% From the funds in Specific Appropriation 217 and 223, $193,075 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $244,538 in recurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to establish a Diagnosis-Related Grouping (DRG) reimbursement methodology for critical access hospitals, as defined in section 408.07, Florida Statutes. The methodology shall provide inpatient reimbursement amounts comparable to those paid under the federal Medicare program. Managed care plans participating in the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program shall pass through 100 percent of the DRG increase to the critical access hospitals through an equivalent increase in provider reimbursement rates. Each plan shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that the full amount of the DRG increase was paid directly to eligible providers, and shall submit provider-level payment data sufficient to verify compliance. The agency shall publish revised fee schedules resulting from this appropriation and Statewide Medicaid Managed Care plans shall update systems with the revised schedule no later than 90 days after the publication of the revised fee schedule. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 217, 219, and 223, $37,451,990 from the General Revenue Fund and $47,434,660 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to nonprofit hospitals that as of January 1, 2022, are separately licensed by the state as specialty hospitals providing comprehensive acute care services to children pursuant to section 395.002(28), Florida Statutes, as of the date of enactment of this bill into law, and remain so licensed and qualify for the High-Medicaid DRG and EAPG Policy Adjustor. Payments to these hospitals must be distributed to qualifying hospitals proportionately via average per claim (per discharge) amounts through the DRG and EAPG payment method based on each hospital's total of Simulated DRG and Trauma Add-On Payments plus Simulated EAPG payments to the total of these payments for all qualifying hospitals. Payment of these funds to an individual qualifying specialty hospital is contingent on that hospital entering into full network contracts with each applicable Medicaid managed care plan in the state by July 30, 2026, for a term of the entire fiscal year at a minimum. 218 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOSPITAL INSURANCE BENEFITS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,077,734 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 1,364,862 219 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOSPITAL OUTPATIENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,108,510 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 62,022,451 FROM PUBLIC MEDICAL ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,768,022 FROM REFUGEE ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . 472,514 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 219, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall implement an Enhanced Ambulatory Patient Grouping (EAPG) reimbursement methodology for hospital outpatient services as directed in section 409.905(6)(b), Florida Statutes. Ambulatory Surgical Center Base Rate......$226.76 Hospital Outpatient Base Rate.............$373.66 Rural Hospital Provider Adjustor...........1.5254 High Medicaid Provider Adjustor............2.0951 Documentation and Coding Adjustment............0% From the funds in Specific Appropriation 219 and 223, $7,741,492 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $9,804,954 in recurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to establish an Enhanced Ambulatory Patient Group (EAPG) reimbursement methodology for critical access hospitals, as defined in section 408.07, Florida Statutes. The methodology shall provide outpatient reimbursement amounts comparable to those paid under the federal Medicare program. Managed care plans participating in the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program shall pass through 100 percent of the EAPG increase to the critical access hospitals through an equivalent increase in provider reimbursement rates. Each plan shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that the full amount of the EAPG increase was paid directly to eligible providers, and shall submit provider-level payment data sufficient to verify compliance. The agency shall publish revised fee schedules resulting from this appropriation and Statewide Medicaid Managed Care plans shall update systems with the revised schedule no later than 90 days after the publication of the revised fee schedule. 220 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OTHER FEE FOR SERVICE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 201,856,359 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 4,840,597 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,743,862 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 331,538,288 FROM REFUGEE ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . 88,960,438 Funds in Specific Appropriation 220 are for the inclusion of freestanding dialysis clinics in the Medicaid program. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall limit payment to $125.00 per visit for each dialysis treatment. Freestanding dialysis facilities may obtain, administer and submit claims directly to the Medicaid program for End-Stage Renal Disease pharmaceuticals subject to coverage and limitations policy. All pharmaceutical claims for this purpose must include National Drug Codes (NDC) to permit the invoicing for federal and/or state supplemental rebates from manufacturers. Claims for drug products that do not include NDC information are not payable by Florida Medicaid unless the drug product is exempt from federal rebate requirements. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 220, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall work with dialysis providers, managed care organizations, and physicians to ensure that all Medicaid patients with End Stage Renal Disease (ESRD) are educated and assessed by their physician and dialysis provider to determine their suitability for all types of home modalities. Further, the agency shall consult with the dialysis community concerning suitable voluntary reporting to the state Medicaid program on members' home modality suitability. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 220, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall apply a recurring methodology to establish clinic services rates taking into consideration the reductions imposed on or after October 1, 2008, in the following manner: (1) the agency shall divide the total amount of each recurring reduction imposed by the number of visits originally used in the rate calculation for each rate setting period on or after October 1, 2008, which will yield a rate reduction per diem for each rate period; (2) the agency shall multiply the resulting rate reduction per diem for each rate setting period on or after October 1, 2008, by the projected number of visits used in establishing the current budget estimate which will yield the total current reduction amount to be applied to current rates; and (3) in the event the total current reduction amount is greater than the historical reduction amount, the agency shall hold the rate reduction to the historical reduction amount. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 220 and 223, $400,360 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $506,567 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to buy back clinic services rate adjustments, effective on or after July 1, 2008, and are contingent on the nonfederal share being provided through grants and donations from state, county or other governmental funds. Authority is granted to buy back rate reductions up to, but not higher than, the amounts available under the authority appropriated in this Specific Appropriation. In the event that the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to continue reimbursements at the higher amount. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 220 and 235, $21,086,619 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $26,704,460 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to buy back hospice rate reductions, effective on or after January 1, 2008, and are contingent on the nonfederal share being provided through nursing home quality assessments. Authority is granted to buy back rate reductions up to, but no higher than, the amounts available under the budgeted authority in this Specific Appropriation. In the event that the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to continue reimbursements at the higher amount. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 220, $24,990,000 from the Medical Care Trust Fund is provided for the Florida Assertive Community Treatment (FACT) Team Services as a Medicaid state plan covered service. Medicaid coverage for the FACT Team Services is contingent on the availability of state matching funds of $11,025,588 from the Medical Care Trust Fund being provided in Specific Appropriation 370. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 220 and 223, $1,323,600 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $1,676,400 in recurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are appropriated to the Agency for Health Care Administration to provide coverage for eligible Medicaid recipients for prosthetic and orthotic durable medical equipment related to Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) Level II L-code: L0113; L0637 through L0640; L1320; L1907; L3766; L5615; L5781 through L5783; L5856; L5973; L6025; L6880; L6694; L6696; L6698; L6704; L6721; L6722; L7181; L7259; L7400; L7401; L7403; and L7404. The agency shall calculate payment rates and amend applicable fee schedules for any listed codes that do not have a current Medicaid payment rate established. Implementation of coverage and reimbursement for these procedure codes is subject to federal approval. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 220 and 223, $10,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $12,665,458 in recurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are appropriated to the Agency for Health Care Administration to provide equal rate increases for Federally Qualified Health Centers and Rural Health Clinics, effective October 1, 2026. Managed care plans participating in the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program shall pass through 100 percent of the fee increase to Federally Qualified Health Centers and Rural Health Clinics through an equivalent increase in provider reimbursement rates. Such increases shall be implemented as a separate, identifiable payment or rate component and no later than the effective date of the fee increase. Each plan shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that the full amount of the fee increase was paid directly to eligible providers, and shall submit provider-level payment data sufficient to verify compliance. The agency shall publish revised fee schedules resulting from this appropriation and Statewide Medicaid Managed Care plans shall update systems with the revised schedule no later than 90 days after the publication of the revised fee schedule. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 220 and 223, $6,622,745 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $8,388,009 in recurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to implement a tiered reimbursement model for Statewide Inpatient Psychiatric Program services. Prior to implementation, the agency shall provide the final tiered reimbursement model to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representative Budget Committee. 221 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PERSONAL CARE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 88,654,553 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 113,319,937 222 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PHYSICIAN AND HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,943,276 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 3,543,106 FROM TOBACCO SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . 15,898,906 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 81,921,261 FROM PUBLIC MEDICAL ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,114,334 FROM REFUGEE ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . 10,736,942 223 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PREPAID HEALTH PLANS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,677,836,140 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 105,369,926 FROM TOBACCO SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . 192,523,349 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,753,403,261 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 10,243,184,340 FROM PUBLIC MEDICAL ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 915,381,744 FROM REFUGEE ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . 90,925,648 The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to expend funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the Medical Care Trust Fund to manage a directed payment program for hospitals providing inpatient and outpatient services to Medicaid managed care enrollees. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting spending authority to manage the program. Directed payments to hospitals pursuant to this section of proviso shall not be considered a component of the provider payment calculation specified in section 409.975(6), Florida Statutes, and are contingent upon the nonfederal share being provided through intergovernmental transfers in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. In the event the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to make payments under this section of proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 223, $4,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund and $5,066,183 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided for flexible services for persons with severe mental illness or substance abuse disorders, including, but not limited to, temporary housing assistance, subject to federal approval under section 409.906(13)(d), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 223, the Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to add U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved continuous glucose monitors and related supplies required for use with those monitors as a pharmacy point-of-sale benefit for all enrollees. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 223, $81,816,665 from the General Revenue Fund and $109,388,441 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are placed into unbudgeted reserve. The Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to submit a budget amendment to request release of funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statues. The release of funds is contingent upon submission of a report on the Quality Withhold Incentive component of the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program for the period of October 1, 2025, through September 30, 2026. The report must include, by managed care plan, the amount of capitation rate withheld, the amount of quality withhold distributed, the amount directed to the Quality Bonus Pool, the amount distributed from the Quality Bonus Pool, and all associated performance measure data and calculations. 224 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PRESCRIBED MEDICINE/DRUGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,153,418 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 23,416,496 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 131,950,000 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 54,606,736 FROM REFUGEE ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . 2,862,133 225 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDICARE PART D PAYMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,106,559,964 226 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE INPATIENT PSYCHIATRIC SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 122,242 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 154,810 The funds in Specific Appropriation 226 are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration for services for children in the Statewide Inpatient Psychiatric Program. The program shall be designed to permit prior authorization of services, monitoring and quality assurance, discharge planning, and continuing stay reviews of all children admitted to the program. 227 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUPPLEMENTAL MEDICAL INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,155,624,679 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 1,600,587,177 228 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDICAID SCHOOL REFINANCING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,000,000 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 103,886,947 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 228, $4,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund and $5,066,183 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided for school-based services, pursuant to section 409.9072, Florida Statutes, provided by private schools or charter schools that are not participating in the school district's certified match program under section 409.9071, Florida Statutes, to children younger than 21 years of age with specified disabilities who are eligible for Medicaid and Part B or Part H of the Individuals with Disabilities Act (IDEA), or the exceptional student education program, or who have an individualized educational plan. TOTAL: MEDICAID SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 9,711,337,246 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 16,980,093,252 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,691,430,498 MEDICAID LONG TERM CARE 229 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ASSISTIVE CARE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,568,085 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 1,985,851 230 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PILOT PROGRAM FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 55,909,438 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 70,804,684 The funds in Specific Appropriation 230 are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to support capitation payments for individuals enrolled in the Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities Comprehensive Managed Care (ICMC) program pursuant to s. 409.9855, Florida Statutes. Funds are provided to support the enrollment of individuals who are currently on the waiting list for Home and Community Based Waiver services at the Agency for Persons with Disabilities who voluntarily elect to participate in the ICMC. The agency may request spending authority in accordance with the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to implement the ICMC program. 231 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOME AND COMMUNITY BASED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 196,973 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 249,449 232 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITIES/ INTELLECTUALLY DISABLED - SUNLAND CENTER FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 87,668,227 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 232, 233, 234, 235, and 236, the Agency for Health Care Administration, in consultation with the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, is authorized to transfer funds, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to Specific Appropriation 254 for the Developmental Disabilities Home and Community Based Waiver. Priority for the use of these funds will be given to the planning and service areas with the greatest potential for transition success. 233 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITIES/ DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED COMMUNITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 204,113,066 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,261,750 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 294,283,394 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 233, $28,261,750 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $35,791,170 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to buy back intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled rate reductions, effective on or after October 1, 2008, and are contingent on the nonfederal share being provided through intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled quality assessments. Authority is granted to buy back rate reductions up to, but not higher than, the amounts available under the budgeted authority in this Specific Appropriation. In the event that the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to continue reimbursements at the higher amount. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall not pay any legal judgments, settlements, lawsuit damages or awards imposed by a court as the result of any legal proceeding relating to prior fiscal years without specific authority in the General Appropriations Act. 234 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NURSING HOME CARE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 85,537,997 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 16,729,472 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,139,612 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 165,150,015 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 234, the Agency for Health Care Administration is authorized to transfer funds in accordance with the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to Specific Appropriation 231 specifically for slots under the Model Waiver and Specific Appropriation 235 Statewide Medicaid Managed Care Long-Term Care Waiver to transition the greatest number of appropriate eligible beneficiaries from skilled nursing facilities to community-based alternatives in order to maximize the reduction in Medicaid nursing home occupancy. Priority for the use of these funds will be given to the planning and service areas with the greatest potential for transition success. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 234 and 235, $486,555,451 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and $616,182,270 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to buy back nursing facility rate reductions, effective on or after January 1, 2008, and are contingent on the nonfederal share being provided through nursing home quality assessments. Authority is granted to buy back rate reductions up to, but not higher than, the amounts available under the budgeted authority in these Specific Appropriations. In the event that the funds are not available in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund, the State of Florida is not obligated to continue reimbursements at the higher amount. 235 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PREPAID HEALTH PLAN/LONG TERM CARE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,989,960,568 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 308,100,403 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 479,586,935 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 4,789,760,129 236 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE MENTAL HEALTH HOSPITAL PROGRAM FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 7,406,122 237 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PROGRAM OF ALL-INCLUSIVE CARE FOR THE ELDERLY (PACE) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 109,450,466 FROM MEDICAL CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 138,603,223 All Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) organizations funded from the funds in Specific Appropriation 237 must enter into a contract with the Agency for Health Care Administration that outlines quality and performance standards, claims payment and claims filing requirements, accountability measures and reporting requirements. Any entity that the Legislature has approved to enroll participants residing in a specific geographic area in a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) may transfer such approval, and assign its Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) contract, to any other entity meeting federal requirements upon the prior approval of the Agency for Health Care Administration, subject to any other required federal approvals. Any such approved transfer shall include the transfer of any appropriated funds by the Legislature to such Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE), and all future appropriations in respect of such Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) shall be made to the approved transferee. The Agency for Health Care Administration shall submit a monthly Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) report detailing all PACE providers. The report shall include each providers authorized service area and allocated slots, slots funded, total enrollments, actuarial dual rate, estimated monthly claims, and estimated cumulative claims. The report shall also include a separate section dedicated to the status of all providers with applications pending approval by the agency or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) that includes the name of the organization, the service area requested, the number of slots requested, the date the agency received the application, the date of agency approval, and the date of last submission to the federal CMS. Additionally, the report shall include, by county, a listing of PACE providers currently operational or seeking approval in each county, the status of each provider's operations in that county, the number of enrollees per provider during the reporting month, and the cumulative number of unique individuals served during the fiscal year. The agency shall submit reports to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 237, $16,096,474 from the General Revenue Fund and $20,386,921 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration for new PACE programs that have been approved in an area where an existing program has been established and operated for at least 10 years, pursuant to section 430.84(3)(b), Florida Statutes. These funds shall be placed in reserve. Upon state and federal approval of the PACE program application, the agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment requesting release of funds, subject to the notice, review and objection provisions of section 216.177, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 237, $170,535 from the General Revenue Fund and $215,990 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to authorize and fund 100 new Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) slots in Highlands County, effective June 1, 2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 237, $1,025,740 from the General Revenue Fund and $1,299,146 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to authorize and fund 100 new Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) slots in Collier County, effective January 1, 2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 237, $501,119 from the General Revenue Fund and $634,690 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to authorize and fund 50 new Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) slots in Lee County, effective January 1, 2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 237, $260,537 from the General Revenue Fund and $329,983 from the Medical Care Trust Fund are provided to authorize and fund 50 new Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) slots in Escambia, Santa Rosa, and Okaloosa counties, effective April 1, 2027. TOTAL: MEDICAID LONG TERM CARE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,446,736,593 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,416,729,266 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 9,863,465,859 PROGRAM: HEALTH CARE REGULATION HEALTH CARE REGULATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 38,603,361 238 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 681.00 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 56,937,870 239 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 2,033,314 FROM QUALITY OF LONG-TERM CARE FACILITY IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . 78,501 240 EXPENSES FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 7,401,754 241 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 85,427 242 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 390,500 FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 12,152,132 FROM QUALITY OF LONG-TERM CARE FACILITY IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . 5,924,096 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 242, $5,000,000 from the Quality of Long-Term Care Facility Improvement Trust Fund is provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration to support activities that benefit nursing home residents and that protect or improve their quality of care or quality of life. These funds shall be placed in reserve. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment requesting release of the funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. The budget amendment shall include a detailed operational work plan and spending plan. The agency shall submit reports to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by June 30, 2027 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 detailing how the funds were allocated by nursing home, funds spent, funds remaining, and how the activities have benefitted, protected, or improved quality of life and quality of care for nursing home residents. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 242, $2,500,000 in recurring funds from the Health Care Trust Fund is provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration for the Background Screening Clearinghouse. 243 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 388,550 244 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 140,269 245 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND . . . . 224,934 TOTAL: HEALTH CARE REGULATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 390,500 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 85,366,847 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 681.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 85,757,347 TOTAL: AGENCY FOR HEALTH CARE ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 13,547,171,526 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,512,727,965 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,563.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 38,059,899,491 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 100,940,022 AGENCY FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM: SERVICES TO PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES HOME AND COMMUNITY SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 26,158,993 246 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 487.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,306,201 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,440,898 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,276,738 247 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,887,060 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,570,464 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 179,699 248 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,091,294 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,300,765 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 193,061 249 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,060 250 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANT AND AID INDIVIDUAL AND FAMILY SUPPORTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,580,000 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,106,771 Funds in Specific Appropriation 250 expended for developmental training programs shall require a 12.5 percent match from local sources. In-kind match is acceptable provided there are no reductions in the number of persons served or level of services provided. 251 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ROOM AND BOARD PAYMENTS FOR DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,639,201 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 251, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities is authorized to supplement room and board payments for certain clients. For clients ages 22 and older who receive residential facility habilitation services within an agency-licensed residential facility and whose third-party benefits minus a personal needs allowance of $178.92 per month is less than $583.42 per month, the agency is authorized to pay the residential facility provider the difference between the $583.42 and the amount of the client's third-party benefit less the personal needs allowance of $178.92. For clients ages 21 and under who receive residential facility habilitation services within an agency-licensed residential facility, the agency is authorized to pay the residential facility provider a room and board rate of $583.42 per month. These payments are subject to the availability of funds. The priority for distribution of payments is clients ages 21 and under. 252 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - DENTAL SERVICES FOR THE DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,600,000 In the event the Agency for Persons with Disabilities is unable to competitively procure a contract with a nonprofit organization for a statewide dental services program for the developmentally disabled, funds in Specific Appropriation 252 shall be used by the agency to administer the program until such contract can be executed. The Agency for Persons with Disabilities must submit a quarterly report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee within 30 days after the last business day of the preceding quarter. The report must detail the number of requests received, individuals served, the type of service received, and expenditures by service. The agency must also include the number of requests denied and an explanation of why services were not approved. 253 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 621,387 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 685,322 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 32,018 253A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,258,600 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 253A, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: ADE INC - CULINARY ACADEMY AND SENIOR PROGRAM FOR ADULTS WITH AUTISM and DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES (SF 1004).... 350,000 ARC of the Treasure Coast Health and Wellness Complex (SF 2038)................................................... 100,000 Building Today for Better Tomorrows - The ASHA Neuro-Diverse {new campus) playground (SF 3149)......... 22,000 Club Challenge/Challenge Enterprises of North Florida, Inc. (SF 2958).......................................... 325,000 Crossroads Corral - Equine Assisted Psychotherapy Program (SF 1269)............................................... 106,700 Easterseals Better Together-Improving Autism and Disability Services Statewide Through Collaboration (SF 1116)................................................... 2,500,000 EmpowerAbility Programming for The Villages at Casa Familia (SF 3216)....................................... 400,000 Expansion of David Posnack Jewish Community Centers (JCC) Special Needs Services and Programs (SF 1793)........... 501,200 Independence Landing Workforce Development for Persons with Disabilities (SF 3717)............................. 500,000 Inspire of Central Florida - Operation Giving Real Opportunities for Work (GROW) (SF 1245)................. 350,000 Miami Learning Experience School - Job Readiness Program (SF 1647)............................................... 350,000 North Florida School of Special Education Community Integrated Employment for Workforce Development (SF 2814)................................................... 350,000 Our Pride Academy, Inc. (SF 1194)......................... 350,000 QUANTUM LEAP FARM: EQUINE-ASSISTED THERAPY FOR SPECIAL NEED CHILDREN (SF 2271)................................. 128,700 Special Compass Affordable Housing Readiness and Capacity Building (SF 1322)...................................... 350,000 STARability Foundation Academy Program Expansion (SF 3257) 300,000 The Academy of Spectrum Diversity Expansion of Services Project (SF 2929)....................................... 250,000 The Arc Jacksonville - IDD Family Support & Navigation Pilot (SF 2963)......................................... 350,000 The Arc of Bradford County Rural Work Opportunities for Individuals with Intellectual/Developmental (SF 2995)... 750,000 The Arc of Palm Beach County - Completion of Special Needs Shelter (SF 3435)................................. 750,000 Vision of Hope - Vocational Training Center Expansion (SF 3464)................................................... 175,000 254 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOME AND COMMUNITY BASED SERVICES WAIVER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,014,961,816 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,296 Funds in Specific Appropriation 254 shall not be used for administrative costs. Funds for developmental training programs shall require a 12.5 percent match from local sources. In-kind match is acceptable provided there are no reductions in the number of persons served or level of services provided. The Agency for Persons with Disabilities, in consultation with the Agency for Health Care Administration, shall provide a quarterly reconciliation report of all Home and Community Based Services waiver expenditures from the Agency for Health Care Administration's claims management system with service utilization from the Agency for Persons with Disabilities Allocation, Budget, and Contract Control system. The reconciliation report shall be submitted to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than 30 days after the close of each calendar quarter. The Agency for Persons with Disabilities shall provide to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives monthly surplus-deficit reports projecting the total Medicaid Waiver program expenditures for the fiscal year to date along with any corrective action plans necessary to align program expenditures with annual appropriations within 30 days after the last business day of the preceding month. The surplus-deficit report must also include allocation amounts related to the increased needs of existing waiver clients pursuant to section 393.0662(1), Florida Statutes, and to newly enrolled clients due to removing individuals from the pre-enrollment list. At a minimum, the allocation information shall include the total number of clients approved for an increase in services, the total number of clients enrolled onto the waiver from the pre-enrollment list, the total number of clients disenrolled from the waiver, the number of service units approved by service, and the annualized cost of approved service units. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 254, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities is authorized to use funds, as needed, solely to ensure that individuals in crisis promptly begin receiving waiver services in accordance with section 393.065, Florida Statutes. The agency may not send interest letters, make enrollment offers, or enroll additional individuals from the pre-enrollment list to the waiver unless expressly authorized by the Legislature in the General Appropriations Act. The agency shall submit monthly reports to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, detailing: the number of waiver enrollment offers made; the number of offers accepted and declined, along with the reasons provided for declining an offer; and the length of time each individual remained in a pre-enrollment category before receiving an offer and the length of time between an individual receiving an offer and the initiation of services. The agency shall also provide the average cost per individual during the first, second, and third year of waiver enrollment. The Agency for Persons with Disabilities, in coordination with the Agency for Health Care Administration, shall transfer funds quarterly from the General Revenue Fund to the Medical Care Trust Fund within the Agency for Health Care Administration for the estimated state share for the Home and Community Based Waiver. The estimate shall be based on actual expenditures for the waiver from the prior quarter. Funds for the quarter shall be transferred by the 15th day of each quarter. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 254, $10,040,746 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Agency for Persons with Disabilities to provide a uniform iBudget Waiver provider rate increase. These funds shall be held in reserve. The agency is authorized to submit a budget amendment requesting release of the funds and spending authority pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to implement the rate increase. 255 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 410,948 256 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 87,426 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 80,506 256A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,570,820 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 256A, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following projects: ARC of the Treasure Coast Health and Wellness Complex (SF 2038)................................................... 900,000 Building Today for Better Tomorrows - The ASHA Neuro-Diverse {new campus) playground (SF 3149)......... 32,000 Capstone Adaptive Learning and Therapy Centers - Infrastructure for Child and Adult Disability Care (SF 2609)................................................... 394,600 Connections Autism School & Vocational Center Expansion (SF 2365)............................................... 350,000 Els for Autism Specialized Autism Recreation Complex (SF 2017)................................................... 350,000 Friendship Circle Inclusive Community Center (SF 1663).... 350,000 HorsePlay Therapy Center - Equine-Assisted Regional Rehabilitation Center for Children and Veterans (SF 2564)................................................... 1,000,000 Persaud Legacy Equine Therapy Center (SF 1342)............ 350,000 Pine Castle Community Home (SF 2693)...................... 450,000 Safe Haven Project (Safe and Secure Environments) for I/DD (SF 1057).......................................... 400,000 Special Hearts Farm Forever Home - Residences (SF 1911)... 2,469,220 Sunrise Community Shelter Expansion and Facility Renovation (SF 1007).................................... 350,000 The Arc of Palm Beach County - Completion of Special Needs Shelter (SF 3435)................................. 750,000 The ARC of the St. Johns Transportation Maintenance Facility Expansion and Modernization Project (SF 3238).. 750,000 The Haven - Community Center (SF 1174).................... 750,000 The Nancy C. Detert Residential Community Phase 4&5 (SF 1232)................................................... 350,000 Vision of Hope - Vocational Training Center Expansion (SF 3464)................................................... 575,000 TOTAL: HOME AND COMMUNITY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,073,023,813 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,876,538 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 487.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,104,900,351 PROGRAM MANAGEMENT AND COMPLIANCE APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,759,803 257 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 203.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,145,768 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,244,774 258 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,016,718 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 927,464 259 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,936,755 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,287,075 260 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 236,251 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 124,670 262 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,051 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 777 263 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,626,842 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,618,327 264 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,988,073 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,043,094 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 264, $500,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Special Olympics (recurring base appropriations project). 265 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 834,785 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 490,271 Funds in Specific Appropriation 265 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 266 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 109,578 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 456,603 267 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AGENCY FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES - ICONNECT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,199,845 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,069,284 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 267, $822,133 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund, and $822,132 in nonrecurring funds from the Operations and Maintenance Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Persons with Disabilities to maintain the iConnect system. The agency, at a minimum, shall continue to provide enhanced technical assistance and host feedback and listening sessions with service providers to plan to assist with determining the priority of the enhancements. The agency may not begin compliance monitoring or recoupment of funds during the fiscal year. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 267, $1,204,080 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $1,204,080 in nonrecurring funds from the Operations and Maintenance Trust Fund are provided to the Agency for Persons with Disabilities to contract with the independent software quality assurance and testing provider that performed the iConnect assessment in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to develop detailed requirements and use cases based on the high-level business requirements and to provide procurement planning and support. The agency shall submit the completed detailed requirements and procurement documentation to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by March 15, 2027. The agency may not issue a solicitation or otherwise proceed with procurement for the replacement of the iConnect system until submission of the required documentation and subsequent authorization in the General Appropriations Act. 268 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 78,697 269 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOME AND COMMUNITY SERVICES ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,562,562 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,543,766 270 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,286 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,523 271 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 188,121 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 783,889 TOTAL: PROGRAM MANAGEMENT AND COMPLIANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 30,987,332 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,635,517 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 203.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 57,622,849 DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY CENTERS - CIVIL PROGRAM APPROVED SALARY RATE 70,959,971 272 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,529.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,521,611 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 57,533,056 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 574,691 273 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 968,938 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,065,617 274 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,170,745 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,761,490 275 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 85,493 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 32,972 276 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 788,707 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,110,220 277 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 686,489 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 972,427 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 33,480 278 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED PROFESSIONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,509,720 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,134,217 279 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PRESCRIBED MEDICINE/DRUGS - NON-MEDICAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 361,743 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 36,978 280 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,222,687 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,965,677 281 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 216,405 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 415,245 282 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY AGENCY FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY NEEDS FOR CENTRALLY MANAGED FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 633,891 TOTAL: DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY CENTERS - CIVIL PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 53,166,429 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 73,636,070 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,529.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 126,802,499 DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY CENTERS - FORENSIC PROGRAM APPROVED SALARY RATE 21,930,772 283 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 489.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,198,184 284 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 292,851 285 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,151,190 286 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 76,316 287 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 606,200 288 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 952,637 289 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED PROFESSIONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 350,122 290 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PRESCRIBED MEDICINE/DRUGS - NON-MEDICAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 834,180 291 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,500,558 292 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,751 293 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 113,184 294 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PLANNING AND DESIGN - DEVELOPMENTAL PLANNING AND DESIGN - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY FORENSIC FACILITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 TOTAL: DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY CENTERS - FORENSIC PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 46,094,173 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 489.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 46,094,173 TOTAL: AGENCY FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,203,271,747 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 132,148,125 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,709.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,335,419,872 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 133,809,539 CHILDREN AND FAMILIES, DEPARTMENT OF From the funds in Specific Appropriations 295 through 390A, the Department of Children and Families shall provide written notification, including copies of any official communication, to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee within five business days of receipt of any official federal communications with federal partners, including the Department of Agriculture, Department of Justice, Department of Health and Human Services, the Health Resources and Services Administration, the Administration for Children & Families, or other subordinate entities regarding: deferrals, disallowances, compliance actions, approvals or denials of requested programmatic changes, funding adjustments, including changes to federal funding levels, grants or waivers, federal audit findings that could impact program funding or compliance, new federal mandates or guidance that may require legislative or budgetary adjustments, and federal legal challenges or settlements that affect the Florida Department of Children of Families. The department must also provide written notification within five business days of transmitting any official communication to the federal entities described above related to any of the matters described in this proviso. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 295 through 390A, the Department of Children and Families shall submit monthly reports, beginning August 1, 2026, on the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) payment error rate. The reports shall include, at a minimum: the most recent federal and state payment error rate data; a comparison to prior federal fiscal year performance; county-level payment error rate breakouts; a detailed breakout of quality control errors and case processing errors; identification of the primary factors contributing to the error rate; and a description of staffing levels, training initiatives, and eligibility system or process changes affecting program accuracy. The department shall also submit and regularly update a corrective action plan that identifies specific strategies, implementation timelines, and performance benchmarks for reducing the SNAP payment error rate and mitigating federal fiscal exposure, including any federal penalties, sanctions, or corrective actions imposed or anticipated. The reports must be submitted to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM: EXECUTIVE LEADERSHIP EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 51,682,769 295 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 728.25 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 48,373,770 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 19,065,408 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,220,630 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 2,902,248 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,415 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 798,515 296 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 405,712 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 58,470 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 64,471 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 8,710 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,272 297 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,362,484 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 913,469 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 294,660 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 160,675 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,704 298 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,616 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 106,950 299 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 20,000 300 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 967,344 301 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,007,866 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 265,878 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,033 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 994 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 473 302 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,250,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 302 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 303 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 138,318 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 323,589 304 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE INSTITUTIONAL CLAIMS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,498 305 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 132,912 306 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 139,378 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 24,510 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,110 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 495 307 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,027,897 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,138,303 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,606 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 326,041 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 37,360 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,395 308 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES FIXED CAPITAL NEEDS FOR CENTRALLY MANAGED FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,200,800 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 62,941,683 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 30,952,296 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 728.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 93,893,979 PROGRAM: SUPPORT SERVICES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 15,434,022 309 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 231.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,066,469 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 8,256,440 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,871,791 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 295,212 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 219,541 310 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 143,975 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 231,439 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 144,507 311 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,024,677 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 381,691 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,523,385 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,218 312 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,599 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,299 313 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMPUTER RELATED EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,403,197 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 196,409 FROM ALCOHOL, DRUG ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,474,907 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 482,569 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 71,808 314 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 383 315 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,730,577 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,258,096 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 44,014 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 397 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,693 316 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA SAFE FAMILIES NETWORK (FSFN) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,961,851 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,851,137 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 303,259 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 316, $3,024,114 in recurring funds and $1,046,809 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $2,175,886 in recurring funds and $753,191 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund are provided for the Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System modernization project. The department shall contract with an independent verification and validation (IV&V) provider to provide IV&V services for all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project. The IV&V contract shall require that all deliverables be simultaneously provided to the department, the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity. IV&V services must include, but are not limited to the following: (1) Oversight of all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project; (2) An evaluation of the project's schedule to highlight variances and ensure it aligns with project objectives, remains feasible, and mitigates risks; and (3) A thorough review of all project budget requests and monthly and quarterly reporting submitted by the agency to the Legislature. (4) The monthly IV&V reports shall include technical reviews of all project deliverables submitted or accepted within the reporting period and an analysis of whether: (a) The project is being built and implemented in accordance with defined technical architecture, specifications, and requirements; (b) The project is adhering to established project management and governance processes; (c) Solicitation and procurement documentation of products, tools, or services, and resulting contracts, are compliant with current statutory and regulatory requirements and aligned with project objectives; (d) The outcomes and benefits of services performed are commensurate with the amounts invoiced; and (e) If the project is on track to achieve the original business benefits and project objectives. 317 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ONLINE RECIPIENTS INTEGRATED DATA ACCESS (FLORIDA) TECHNOLOGY SYSTEM FOR PUBLIC BENEFIT ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,655,837 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,948,375 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 282 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 325,000 318 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,749 319 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,012 320 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,936,001 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,531,644 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,058,730 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 260,500 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,350 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,939 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 43,018,327 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 43,765,632 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 231.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 86,783,959 SERVICES PROGRAM: FAMILY SAFETY PROGRAM FAMILY SAFETY AND PRESERVATION SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 261,052,108 321 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 4,582.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 203,201,140 FROM DOMESTIC VIOLENCE TRUST FUND . 418,016 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 42,699,035 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 104,477,411 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,258,611 322 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,223,102 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,271,836 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 31,687 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 2,666,241 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 854,999 323 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,754,960 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,272 FROM CHILD WELFARE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,342 FROM DOMESTIC VIOLENCE TRUST FUND . 58,436 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,710,685 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 13,574,030 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,209,842 324 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 55,003 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,834 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 40,244 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,176 324A LUMP SUM SHARED RISK FUND FOR COMMUNITY BASED PROVIDERS OF CHILD WELFARE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,054,312 325 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CHILD ADVOCACY CENTERS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,957,894 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 325, $4,129,654 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated to the Children's Advocacy Centers throughout the state for the reimbursement of expenses incurred in providing child advocacy center services (recurring base appropriations project). The funds shall be distributed to the Florida Network of Children's Advocacy Centers, Inc., whose Board of Directors shall develop funding criteria and an allocation methodology that ensures an equitable distribution of those funds among network participant centers that meet the standards set forth in section 39.3035, Florida Statutes. The criteria and methodologies shall consider factors that include, but are not limited to, the Center's accreditation status with respect to the National Children's Alliance, the child population of the area being served by the children's advocacy center, and the number of children provided a core service by the Children's Advocacy Center. By a majority vote of the Board of Directors of the Florida Network of Children's Advocacy Centers, funds may be reallocated throughout the year as needed. The Department of Children and Families shall provide an advance payment equal to one-fourth of the allocation upon request, and the Florida Network of Children's Advocacy Centers will invoice against the advance in the final quarter of the fiscal year. The department shall provide to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by August 1, 2026, the contract between the department and the Florida Network of Children's Advocacy Centers, the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 budgets submitted by the local child advocacy centers, and the approved allocation of funds to the local children's advocacy centers. The department shall also provide monthly reports to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee that detail the requests for monthly payments submitted by local children's advocacy centers and the status of those requests for reimbursement. This funding may not be used to supplant local government reductions in Children's Advocacy Center funding. Child Advocacy Centers must certify each fiscal year that funds from this appropriation are not supplanting local governmental funds. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 325, the Florida Network of Children's Advocacy Centers may spend up to $428,240 for administration, contract monitoring, and oversight (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 325, $300,000 from the General Revenue Fund shall be used for forensic interviews, specialized interviews, and medical assessments shared with child protection teams operating in Children's Advocacy Centers. These funds may not be used for administrative support and may not be used to supplant funding for the child protection program operated by the Department of Health (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 325, $100,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided for additional child advocacy services in Walton County and shall be added to the allocation of funds from this appropriation for the Walton County Children's Advocacy Center (recurring base appropriations project). 326 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOME CARE FOR DISABLED ADULTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,987,544 327 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY CARE FOR DISABLED ADULTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,009,755 328 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,510,305 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,038,070 FROM CHILD WELFARE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,797 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,534,881 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 2,323,394 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,110,340 328A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,813,702 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 328A, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: 4KIDS of South Florida - Prevention, Foster Family Recruitment & Hope 4 Healing Project (SF 1633).......... 350,000 Agudath Israel - Florida Ozer Center Project (SF 3517).... 545,000 Align Benefit Corp - Growing OAKS Connection Coordinator Program (SF 1072)....................................... 275,000 All Star Children's Foundation - Campus of Hope & Healing (SF 1212)............................................... 3,000,000 Amigos for Kids - CRADLE Program (SF 3504)................ 150,000 Beverly's Angels - Children's Hero Kits (SF 3382)......... 100,000 Boys Town Central Florida - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3618)... 84,618 Boys Town North Florida - Prevention and Diversion Support Services (SF 1576).............................. 425,155 Boys Town North Florida - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3617)..... 6,359 Brehon Institute - Transitional Housing Services for Family Stabilization (SF 1524).......................... 60,000 Camelot Community Care - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3614)...... 258,490 Camillus House - Phoenix Human Trafficking Recovery Program (SF 1369)....................................... 350,000 Carter's Corner Community Services - 24/7 Dad Initiative (SF 1539)............................................... 350,000 Community Based Connections - ADAM (Awesome Dads Awesome Men) Fatherhood Mentoring Program (SF 1058)............. 330,000 Community Haven - Selby Preschool Pathways to Learning for Children with Disabilities (SF 1076)................ 379,000 Devereux Foundation - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3621)......... 243,159 Every Mother's Advocate - Child Abuse Prevention Services (SF 3484)............................................... 350,000 Exchange Club Family Center (Emerald Coast) - Parent Aide (SF 3194)............................................... 175,000 Family Support Services of North Florida - Bridge to Work Programs to Support Foster Youth (SF 3411).............. 450,000 Florida Network of Children's Advocacy Centers - Bridge the Gap (SF 3427)....................................... 350,000 Forever Family - Media Campaign for Adoption and Foster Care Recruitment (SF 2130).............................. 350,000 Friends of Children and Families - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3613)................................................... 46,979 Hands of Mercy Everywhere - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3620)... 59,267 Hibiscus Children's Center - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3616).. 9,595 Jewish Family Services (JFS) - Summer Camp Scholarship Program (SF 1052)....................................... 250,000 Live the Life Ministries - Community Marriage and Family Pilot Program (SF 2679)................................. 350,000 Man Up and Go - Coaching and Mentoring for Fatherless Youth (SF 2480)......................................... 350,000 Marion County Hospital District -Empowerment Pathway Project/Domestic Violence (SF 1705)..................... 350,000 National Youth Advocate Program - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3622)................................................... 4,311 One Hope United - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3615)............. 153,354 One More Child - Anti-Sex Trafficking (SF 2308)........... 350,000 One More Child - Single Moms Program (SF 2314)............ 350,000 Our Corner - Respite Care Program Expansion (SF 3611)..... 250,000 Safe Families for Children Alliance Florida - Rural Reach Initiative (SF 1431).................................... 317,500 SAFE in the Panhandle - Emergency Safe House (SF 3198).... 487,000 Second Baptist Church of Richmond Heights - Faith Based Support for Youth Activities (SF 3596).................. 300,000 Solo Parent- Support for Single Parent Veterans and First Responders (SF 2334).................................... 1,500,000 The Art of Manhood - Mentoring Services for At-Risk Youth (SF 3204)............................................... 100,000 Twin Oaks Juvenile Development - Embrace Shortfall (SF 3619)................................................... 3,915 329 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,234,075 FROM DOMESTIC VIOLENCE TRUST FUND . 7,576,274 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 28,776,573 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 7,750,000 330 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - GRANTS TO ENHANCE FAMILY SUPPORT AND CHILD WELFARE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,585,000 331 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION AND INTERVENTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,390,131 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,488,375 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 12,701,757 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 331, the Department of Children and Families shall submit a report by December 1, 2026, to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. The report must detail all funds received and expended for child abuse prevention during Fiscal Year 2025-2026. At a minimum, the report must include: the total amount of funding allocated for child abuse prevention programs, by funding source; the amount appropriated to each recipient; a detailed account of expenditures by programmatic use; and a summary, by recipient, of the amount of direct service expenditures to children and families. The Department of Children and Families shall explore opportunities to maximize federal funding for the Healthy Families Program, an evidence-based, voluntary home visiting program that provides family support and coaching to help parents provide a safe and stable environment for their children. The department shall work with Healthy Families Florida to determine whether the state is satisfactorily meeting the documentation standards required for Title IV-E federal reimbursement. With respect to federal claiming, the department and Healthy Families Florida are encouraged to: (1) seek technical assistance or clarification from Healthy Families America, the national policy organization; (2) research how other states are successfully claiming federal reimbursement for Healthy Families services; (3) identify any roadblocks impeding Florida's federal claiming process; and (4) determine any programmatic, operational, or administrative changes needed to maximize federal earnings. The department shall submit a report of the findings to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1, 2026. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 331, the Department of Children and Families and the Department of Health shall work collaboratively with the Florida Association of Healthy Start Coalitions and Healthy Families Florida to identify and implement administrative cost savings through the coordination of shared services. Such efforts shall include but are not limited to: streamlining data sharing and intake processes to reduce redundant data entry and improve participant tracking across programs; coordinating professional development and staff training modules to leverage economies of scale; consolidating public awareness campaigns and outreach materials where program goals overlap; evaluating opportunities for shared administrative functions, such as human resources, IT support, or procurement, at the local coalition and department levels. The departments shall submit a joint report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 31, 2026, detailing the efficiencies identified, implementation timelines, the projected fiscal impact of the cost-saving measures, and recommendations for consolidation of program services. 332 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CHILD PROTECTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 29,963,549 FROM CHILD WELFARE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 286,063 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 15,787,963 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 2,822,333 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,262,655 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,531,459 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 332, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Children and Families for the continuation of a statewide marketing campaign for the recruitment of foster parents and Guardian ad Litem volunteers. The department shall submit an annual report by December 1, 2026 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. The report must provide the following data specific to Guardian ad Litem candidates and foster parents candidates on the number of course enrollments, the number of course completions, and the number of individuals who have submitted an application and been approved as a foster parent or Guardian ad Litem volunteer. 332A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FOSTER AND FAMILY SUPPORT GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 332A, $5,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Foster and Family Support Grant Program to support recruitment of foster and adoptive families through faith-based organizations and to strengthen local capacity to support foster, adoptive, kinship, and families caring for vulnerable children in underserved and rural communities. These funds are contingent upon SB 7018 or similar legislation becoming law. 333 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,645,814 334 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TEMPORARY EMERGENCY SHELTER SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,625,529 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,101,264 335 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - RESIDENTIAL GROUP CARE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,597,300 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 111,445 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 904,391 336 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SPECIAL NEEDS ADOPTION INCENTIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,747,594 337 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STEP INTO SUCCESS WORKFORCE EDUCATION AND INTERNSHIP PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,856,480 The recurring funds in Specific Appropriation 337 are provided to the Department of Children and Families for the statewide expansion of the Step into Success Program. These funds are contingent upon SB 7018 or similar legislation becoming law. 338 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,207,232 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 234,992 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 828,432 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 363,058 339 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY BASED CARE FUNDS FOR PROVIDERS OF CHILD WELFARE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 712,526,518 FROM CHILD WELFARE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,875,853 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 216,963,329 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 45,977,067 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,979,209 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 41,078,586 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 339, core services funds are allocated to the following community-based care lead agencies pursuant to section 409.991, Florida Statutes. The allocations below are subject to the competitive review process. Big Bend CBC (Northwest Florida Health Network)- East..... 35,833,266 Big Bend CBC (Northwest Florida Health Network)- West..... 55,349,576 ChildNet (Broward)........................................ 61,174,917 ChildNet (Palm Beach)..................................... 38,481,867 Children's Network of Hillsborough........................ 75,747,146 Children's Network of Southwest Florida................... 54,106,412 Citrus Family Care Network................................ 76,667,179 Communities Connected for Kids............................ 24,582,489 Community Partnership for Children........................ 43,590,810 Family Partnerships of Central Florida.................... 90,816,162 Family Support Services of North Florida.................. 49,493,431 Family Support Services of Suncoast....................... 87,874,703 Heartland for Children.................................... 47,089,514 Kids Central.............................................. 55,251,850 Kids First of Florida..................................... 12,615,948 Partnership for Strong Families........................... 31,670,446 Safe Children Coalition................................... 35,065,069 St Johns Board of County Commissioners (Family Integrity Program)................................................ 7,749,757 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 339, $4,371,313 from the General Revenue Fund shall continue to be provided to the community- based care lead agency that serves the Sixth Judicial Circuit and $3,863,739 from the General Revenue Fund shall continue to be provided to the community-based care lead agency that serves the Thirteenth Judicial Circuit to improve the safety, permanency, and wellbeing of children in the local child welfare system of care. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 339, each lead agency shall submit a detailed spending plan, approved by its Board of Directors, to the department for all projected expenditures for the fiscal year. The spending plan must demonstrate that core expenditures will not exceed the appropriated amount of core funding and that a certain amount of funding is reserved for unanticipated expenses. Each lead agency will receive its statutory two-month advance; however, the department shall not release additional funds until the department has reviewed and approved the lead agency's spending plan. At any point in time during the year, if a lead agency's actual expenditures project an end of year deficit, the lead agency must submit a revised spending plan to the department. The revised spending plan must reflect actions to be taken to remain within appropriated core funding for the remainder of the fiscal year. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 339, $8,895,697 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to maintain the Extended Foster Care Program to help young adults in foster care successfully transition to adulthood. The Department of Children and Families, in collaboration with the community-based care lead agencies, shall collect and annually report output and outcome data on program participants, including: academic or work performance, placement stability, and financial literacy, and the total number of program participants. For each participant, the report shall also include information specific to each program participant, including the qualifying activity (secondary or post-secondary education, part-time work, or participation in a workforce training program, or inability to work due to a documented disability), the monthly or annual benefit assistance received, a breakdown of the living and/or educational expenses (rent, phone and utility costs, transportation expenses, food, educational materials), and an assessment of continued need. The department shall submit a Fiscal Year 2025-2026 annual report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1, 2026. 339A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - ADOPTION ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS AND MAINTENANCE SUBSIDIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 158,523,378 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 171,968,399 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 14,377,342 Funds in Specific Appropriation 339A are provided to community-based care lead agencies for the payment of adoption assistance subsidies pursuant to section 409.166, Florida Statutes. The Department of Children and Families, in collaboration with the community-based care lead agencies, shall submit by December 1, 2026 an annual report for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. The report must include: the number of participants that entered the Maintenance Adoption Subsidy Program in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and the approved monthly subsidy for each participant. For any annual subsidy payment exceeding $5,000, as outlined in section 409.166, Florida Statutes, the department must provide the justification supporting the enhanced payment determination. By March 31, 2027, the department shall perform a reconciliation of the funding appropriated and the projected expenditures for adoption assistance for each lead agency. Any projected year-end surplus of funding shall, if necessary, be reallocated to the lead agencies that are projecting a fiscal year-end deficit. Any unexpended funds, as determined by a reconciliation of the fiscal year-end actual expenditures, shall revert on June 30, 2027. 339B SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,154,940 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 11,141,162 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 339B, the department shall submit a Fiscal Year 2025-2026 annual report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1, 2026 that includes: program caseload data and applicable room and board payment rates, the number of program participants as of December 31, 2025 who received a room and board rate increase in calendar year 2026, the number of participants working toward Level I licensure who are receiving enhanced room and board rates, and the average length of time it takes participants to obtain Level I licensure. 339C GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - HUMAN SERVICES FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,360,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 339C, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: Brehon Institute - Transitional Housing Services for Family Stabilization (SF 1524).......................... 20,000 Citrus County Children's Advocacy Center - Jessie's Place Building Expansion (SF 3497)............................ 350,000 Dade City Church of God - Lighthouse Christian Academy Roof Repairs (SF 3659).................................. 80,000 Girl Scouts of Gateway Council - Leadership Center Development Project (SF 3027)........................... 500,000 Harbor 58 Ministries - Expand Transitional Housing Campus for Youth Aging Out of Foster Care (SF 2122)............ 100,000 Heartland for Children - Youth Village Foster Care Campus - Asphalt Replacement (SF 2328)......................... 285,000 Heartland for Children - Youth Village Foster Care Campus - Group Home Repairs and Renovations (SF 2330).......... 175,000 New Life Village - Expansion of Affordable Housing Community for Adoptive & Foster Families (SF 2872)...... 250,000 Youth and Family Advocates - The Center for Children and Families (SF 1726)...................................... 600,000 TOTAL: FAMILY SAFETY AND PRESERVATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,298,985,257 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 828,400,160 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4,582.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,127,385,417 PROGRAM: MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 139,181,996 340 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 2,580.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 118,880,967 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 79,691,940 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,672,297 341 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,011,194 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,497 342 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,072,284 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 564,187 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 328,930 343 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 890,375 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 377,471 344 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,920,520 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 483,069 345 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,440,926 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 405,883 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 345, $2,010,050 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Children and Families for mental health facilities safety and security system upgrades. 346 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,087,416 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 346 and 347, the Department of Children and Families shall submit monthly reports, beginning August 1, 2026, detailing forensic and civil waitlist counts and the average admission wait times for forensic and civil placements. The department must also report how many individuals transitioned from a forensic or civil placement to a community setting during the reporting period. The reports shall be submitted to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. 347 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED PROFESSIONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 240,636,020 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 14,604,879 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 347, $44,212,525 in recurring funds and $1,680,329 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to the Department of Children and Families to expand and/or maintain bed capacity in the state mental health treatment facilities. Of these funds, 75 percent shall be held in reserve. The department is authorized to submit budget amendments requesting release of the funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. Release of these funds is contingent upon the submission of specific data. The data shall include three years of outcome data for the state operated mental health treatment facilities compared to the mental health treatment facilities under state contract. The department shall provide the following metrics: Operational metrics system-wide and by facility: forensic and civil waitlist numbers, average forensic and civil admission wait times, and average time for sheriff's office to pick up individuals who are transferred to the custody of the sheriff's office. Quality metrics by facility: patient seclusion and restraint rates, medication error rate, length of stay for forensic and civil patients, and patient satisfaction in care outcomes, dignity, rights, treatment participation, and facility environment. Human Resources metrics by facility: vacancy and turnover rates for key positions nursing (each type), psychologist, psychiatrist, Human Service Worker I-III, Hospital Administrator, Assistant Hospital Administrator, Chief of Nursing Services, and Chief Medical Officer, and the average hourly wages for these positions. Financial metrics by facility: cost per day per forensic bed, civil bed, and overall, and staff augmentation expenditures. The department shall provide national benchmark comparisons for all applicable metrics, where available. By January 1, 2027, the department shall submit an assessment of all potential bed expansion locations within the state mental health treatment facilities. The assessment shall identify spaces that could be converted to patient care units, evaluate vendor, partner, or sister agency locations for additional capacity, and include staffing and operational costs required for each potential expansion. 348 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS - CIVIL AND MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,741,000 349 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PRESCRIBED MEDICINE/DRUGS - NON-MEDICAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,253,066 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,900,961 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 876,992 350 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,125,879 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 584,632 351 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 90,969 352 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 203,937 353 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 483,074 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,238 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 979 TOTAL: MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 464,837,627 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 109,505,955 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,580.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 574,343,582 PROGRAM: ECONOMIC SELF SUFFICIENCY PROGRAM ECONOMIC SELF SUFFICIENCY SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 206,282,158 354 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 4,179.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 153,714,002 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 115,046,669 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,572,241 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 9,488,212 355 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,045,008 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,633,268 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 151,623 356 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,811,665 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 14,393,630 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 989,440 357 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,679 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 24,913 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 474 358 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CHALLENGE GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,016,822 359 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FEDERAL EMERGENCY SHELTER GRANT PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,359,466 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 852,507 360 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HOMELESS HOUSING ASSISTANCE GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,205,056 361 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,860,500 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 32,008,661 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 438,817 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 361, $15,562,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $6,676,900 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund are provided for automated commercial wage verification services for the purpose of acquiring current employment and income information for eligibility determination for public benefit programs, including Medicaid, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance (SNAP), and Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 361, $520,870 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $520,870 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund are provided to the Department of Children and Families for Automated Community Connection to Economic Self Sufficiency (ACCESS) System asset verification services. 362 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,206,951 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,842,947 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 39,977 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 362, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: Alpha & Omega Freedom Ministries - Domestic Violence/Homeless Shelter Program (SF 3566)............. 369,883 Connecting Everyone with Second Chances (CESC) - Emergency Homeless Shelter Services (SF 1477)........... 570,000 Feeding South Florida - Workforce Training Expansion (SF 3525)................................................... 500,000 Lake Cares - Food Insecurity in Lake County (SF 1941)..... 200,000 Metropolitan Ministries - Miracle Place Pasco Family Shelter (SF 1732)....................................... 750,000 National Veterans Homeless Support - Veteran Housing and Homelessness Intervention Program (SF 2409)............. 250,000 Orange County - Homeless Drop-In Overnight Shelter Bus Service (SF 2240)....................................... 350,000 Produce Incentives to Support Local Retailers (SF 2420)... 350,000 The Desire Foundation - Building Capacity to Combat Food Deserts in Central Florida (SF 2947).................... 170,000 363 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - LOCAL SERVICES PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 19,826,410 364 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC ASSISTANCE FRAUD CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,045,198 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,130,835 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 689,593 365 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,406,051 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 932,401 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,454 366 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SERVICES TO REPATRIATED AMERICANS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 40,380 367 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 235,036 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 309,119 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 19,955 368 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS CASH ASSISTANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,635,371 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 12,467,429 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 295 through 368 from the Welfare Transition Trust Fund, the Department of Children and Families shall coordinate with state agencies to identify and maximize opportunities for the state to satisfy its maintenance of effort (MOE) obligation for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) Program. Qualifying state funds identified for this purpose must not be previously obligated as a match for any other federal program. Eligible state expenditures shall be limited to federally allowable TANF activities, including, but not limited to, activities that support family self-sufficiency, child well-being, work participation, and the prevention of dependency, as authorized under Title IV-A of the Social Security Act. The department shall submit a report by December 1, 2026, to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. The report shall detail allowable state funds identified for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and must include, for each program: the state agency and program name, a detailed description of services provided, the specific TANF goals supported by the expenditure, the ability to determine if a family meets TANF purpose supported; the methodology used to determine family income eligibility consistent with TANF requirements; the amount of MOE-eligible funds available, and a formal certification from the contributing agency that the identified funds are not obligated as match for any federal grant program other than TANF. 369 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS NONRELATIVE CARE GIVER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,533,815 370 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS OPTIONAL STATE SUPPLEMENTATION PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,288,124 371 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PERSONAL CARE ALLOWANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,946,064 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,492 372 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS REFUGEE/ENTRANT ASSISTANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,669,660 372A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - HUMAN SERVICES FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,954,329 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 372A, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: Alpha & Omega Freedom Ministries - Domestic Violence/Homeless Shelter Repairs (SF 3566)............. 204,329 One Hopeful Place - Emergency Shelter Support Facility - The Gathering Place (SF 3160)........................... 800,000 Panama City Rescue Mission Homeless Shelter - Bethel Facility (SF 3751)...................................... 350,000 Youth and Family Advocates - Speer Phase II, Affordable and Supportive Housing (SF 1727)....................... 600,000 TOTAL: ECONOMIC SELF SUFFICIENCY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 333,907,671 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 246,989,573 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4,179.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 580,897,244 PROGRAM: COMMUNITY SERVICES COMMUNITY SUBSTANCE ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 13,724,666 373 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 195.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,495,335 FROM ALCOHOL, DRUG ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,183,800 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,723,305 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,719,281 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 436,352 The funds in Specific Appropriations 373 through 390A from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund are provided to the Department of Children and Families to reduce overdose-related deaths by implementing evidence-based prevention, intervention, and treatment strategies, including immediate access to evidence-based treatment models. In collaboration with the managing entities, the Department of Children and Families shall submit a report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1, 2026. The report shall detail how Fiscal Year 2025-2026 funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund were spent. At a minimum, the report must include the following information for each program funded from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund: (1) Program title; (2) Program description and purpose; (3) Identification of recurring and nonrecurring funding; (4) Agency or managing entity responsible for program oversight; (5) Total annual program expenditures; (6) Unexpended program balance; (7) Percentage of the budget expended; (8) Amount of carryforward requested, if applicable; (9) Program initiatives under development; (10) Current outcomes; (11) Implementation barriers or delays, including recommendations to address such challenges; (12) Number of clients served or items distributed; and (13) Type of service provided. Funding provided to Non-Qualified Counties and the Coordinated Opioid Recovery (CORE) program must be reported on a county-by-county basis. 374 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,046,817 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 259,388 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,260,755 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,104 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 68,825 375 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,239,858 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 488,666 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 606,565 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 3,723 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 80,425 376 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PUBLIC SAFETY, MENTAL HEALTH, AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE LOCAL MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000,000 377 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CHILDREN'S ACTION TEAMS FOR MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,555,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 377, 378, 380, 384, and 390A, the Department of Children and Families, in collaboration with the managing entities, shall develop a comprehensive report on all specialty treatment teams (multi-disciplinary clinical teams) designed to provide integrated community-based care for individuals with mental health and/or substance use disorders. The report shall include all Community Action Treatment (CAT) teams (all tiers), Florida Assertive Community Treatment (FACT) teams (all tiers), Family Intensive Treatment (FIT) teams, Mobile Response Teams (MRT), and Forensic Multidisciplinary Teams (FMT) funded by each managing entity. For each team, the report shall detail: service provider, county or circuit served, target population, number of team members, number of individuals served, and number of team encounters per individual, contract amount, and funding type (recurring or nonrecurring). The department shall submit the report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1, 2026. 378 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 356,225,032 FROM ALCOHOL, DRUG ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH TRUST FUND . . . . . 57,710,378 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 17,241,671 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 6,948,619 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 378, the following recurring base appropriations projects are funded from the General Revenue Fund: Citrus Health Network..................................... 455,000 Apalachee Center - Forensic treatment services............ 1,401,600 Henderson Behavioral Health - Forensic treatment services. 1,401,600 Mental Health Care - Forensic treatment services.......... 700,800 Apalachee Center - Civil treatment services............... 1,593,853 Lifestream Behavioral Center - Civil treatment services... 1,622,235 New Horizons of the Treasure Coast - Civil treatment services................................................ 1,393,482 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 378, $1,800,000 from the General Revenue Fund shall continue to be provided for mental health rehabilitation services and supported employment services for individuals with mental health disorders. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 378 and 380, the Department of Children and Families shall submit monthly reports, beginning August 1, 2026, identifying all funded community-based residential forensic and civil treatment beds under managing entity contracts, including the provider's name and facility location. The reports must be submitted to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 373 through 390A, the Department of Children and Families shall submit a report by December 1, 2026, to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. The report shall include the number of Medicaid enrollees receiving mental health services through contracts with the seven regional managing entities, disaggregated by enrollee age, geographic location, and managing entity region, for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and for the first and second quarters of the 2026-2027 fiscal year. The report shall also identify the sources of funds used to support these services and evaluate opportunities to maximize the use of federal matching funds during the same reporting period. The department, in coordination with the managing entities, shall collect and report actual expenditures for all funds managed and administered by the managing entities with the information and format determined by the department. The department shall submit a Fiscal Year 2025-2026 annual report by December 31, 2026, to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. The managing entities shall collect and report output and outcome data to the Department of Children and Families, including: the number and percentage of high utilizers, the number and percentage of individuals who receive outpatient services within seven days after a hospitalization for behavioral health-related issues, the average wait time for initial behavioral health services appointments, and the number and percentage of individuals able to schedule an urgent behavioral health appointment within 24 hours. The managing entities shall submit quarterly update reports to the department no later than 30 days after the close of each calendar quarter. These reports must include a comprehensive list of behavioral health service providers under contract, detailing, at a minimum: each service provider name, contract number, primary service provided, contract period, annual contract or purchase order cost, approximate number of individuals served, and if applicable, the contracted daily bed rate. The department shall reconcile contract amounts with the managing entities' Schedule of Funds for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and, within 30 days of receipt, submit quarterly reports to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. 379 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - BAKER ACT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 78,902,543 380 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY SUBSTANCE ABUSE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 139,315,749 FROM ALCOHOL, DRUG ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH TRUST FUND . . . . . 114,848,191 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 133,816,833 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 94,916,665 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 5,850,004 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,438,065 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 380, the Department of Children and Families shall submit monthly reports, beginning August 1, 2026, identifying all funded community-based residential forensic and civil treatment beds under managing entity contracts, including the provider's name and facility location. The reports must be submitted to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 380, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Children and Families to purchase FDA-approved naloxone hydrochloride, which is approved for prophylactic emergency responder protection, to be available to emergency responders. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 380, $450,000 in recurring funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Children and Families to continue to enhance the current open beds tracking system to include closed loop referral functionality that will provide service outcome data and statistics. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 380, $750,000 in recurring funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund shall be transferred to the Department of Health's Medical Quality Assurance Trust Fund for the integration of non-fatal overdose data into the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program (E-FORCSE) to assist in the prevention and treatment of substance use disorders. The department shall coordinate with the Department of Health to ensure the timely transfer and application of these funds. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 380, $600,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Children and Families to contract with a nonprofit organization for an online resource that identifies high-quality treatment facilities for individuals with substance abuse disorders. The resource shall provide a needs assessment for individuals with substance abuse disorder, identify and compare substance abuse treatment facilities using quality indicators and search filters, and inform users about key elements of high-quality treatment. The Department of Children and Families shall report on site use and referral statistics quarterly to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 380, $12,060,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to implement the Family Intensive Treatment (FIT) team model designed to provide intensive team-based, family-focused, comprehensive services to families in the child welfare system with parental substance abuse. Treatment shall be available and provided in accordance with the indicated level of care required and providers shall meet program specifications. Funds shall be targeted to select communities with high rates of child abuse cases. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 380, the following base appropriations projects are funded with recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: St. Johns County Sheriff's Office Detox Program........... 1,300,000 Here's Help............................................... 200,000 Cove Behavioral Health.................................... 100,000 Centerstone of Florida - Family Intensive Treatment (FIT) Team.................................................... 840,000 381 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CENTRAL RECEIVING FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 72,619,808 Funds in Specific Appropriation 381 shall be allocated as follows: Apalachee Center - Leon, Gadsden, Liberty, Franklin, Wakulla, Taylor, Madison, Jefferson..................... 2,739,126 Aspire Health Partners - Orange........................... 2,666,531 Aspire Health Partners - Seminole......................... 3,172,616 Banyan Health Systems - Miami-Dade........................ 2,000,000 Baptist Health Care (Child/Adolescent only) - Escambia, Okaloosa, Santa Rosa, Walton............................ 3,000,000 BayCare Health System - Pasco............................. 3,000,000 Centerstone of Florida - Manatee.......................... 714,729 Central Florida Behavioral Health Network................. 594,759 Charlotte Behavioral Health Care - Charlotte, DeSoto...... 1,390,635 Circles of Care - Brevard................................. 1,256,239 Citrus Health Network - Miami-Dade........................ 3,400,000 David Lawrence Mental Health Center - Collier............. 1,706,024 First Step of Sarasota - Sarasota......................... 1,675,180 Flagler Health Center - Duval............................. 8,015,100 Henderson Behavioral Health - Broward..................... 4,305,021 Lakeview Center - Escambia................................ 4,720,000 Life Management Center of Northwest Florida - Bay......... 4,000,000 LifeStream Behavioral Center - Citrus, Hernando, Marion, Sumter.................................................. 1,500,000 LifeStream Behavioral Center - Lake....................... 2,001,686 Mental Health Care/Gracepoint - Hillsborough.............. 1,576,711 Mental Health Resource Center - Duval..................... 2,719,456 Meridian - Alachua, Levy, Gilchrist, Putnam, Bradford, Dixie................................................... 2,174,999 Neurobehavioral Hospital - Palm Beach..................... 2,970,000 Park Place - Osceola...................................... 1,951,899 Personal Enrichment through Mental Health Services (PEMHS) - Pinellas...................................... 2,200,000 SalusCare - Lee........................................... 2,782,767 SMA Healthcare - Marion................................... 2,000,000 SMA Healthcare - Volusia.................................. 2,386,330 382 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS & AIDS - NON-QUALIFIED COUNTIES FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,863,003 383 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,802,443 FROM ALCOHOL, DRUG ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH TRUST FUND . . . . . 729,423 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 250,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 529,399 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,599 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 383, $1,500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the department to contract with a nonprofit organization for the distribution and associated medical costs of naltrexone extended-release injectable medication to treat alcohol and opioid dependency (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 383, $250,000 in recurring funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund is provided for the Florida College System and State University System to have a supply of emergency opioid antagonists with an auto-injection or intranasal application delivery system for a person believed to be experiencing an opioid overdose. An opioid antagonist delivery system shall be in each residence hall or dormitory residence owned or operated by the college or university. The department shall transfer the funds to the Department of Education for the Florida College System and State University System and such funds shall be administered by the Board of Governors (recurring base appropriations project). 384 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,912,882 FROM ALCOHOL, DRUG ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH TRUST FUND . . . . . 800,074 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,167,354 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,782,930 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 384, $2,550,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to Valarie's House for grief support services for bereaved children and their families. These funds are contingent upon SB 2518 or similar legislation becoming law. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 384, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: Alpert Jewish Family Service - Community Access Life Line (CALL) Service (SF 2150)................................ 600,000 Alpert Jewish Family Service - Mental Health First Aid of Palm Beach (SF 2521).................................... 500,000 Apalachee Center - Forensic Residential Step-Down Bed Operations (SF 1481).................................... 350,000 Aspire Health Partners - Seminole Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic (SF 1277)...................... 500,000 BayCare Health - Pasco Central Receiving Facility Services (SF 1728)...................................... 1,650,000 Broward County Human Services - Behavioral Health Services (SF 1286)...................................... 350,000 CASL (Renaissance) - Permanent Supportive and Affordable Housing (SF 1626)....................................... 350,000 Centerstone and Aspire Health Partners - Military Veterans and National Guard Mental Health Services (SF 3487)................................................... 1,500,000 Centro Mater Child Care Services - Family Wellness/Mental Health Education Initiative (SF 1859)................... 175,000 Charlotte Behavioral Health Care - Reducing Youth Recidivism - Parent Partner Model (SF 3534)............. 498,025 Circles of Care - Certified Behavioral Health Clinic (CHBCH) (SF 1088)....................................... 500,000 Citrus Health Network - Crisis Stabilization Unit and Assessment & Emergency Services (SF 1367)............... 2,000,000 City of Fort Lauderdale - Behavioral Health Supportive Housing and Wraparound Services (SF 2135)............... 250,000 David Lawrence Centers - Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic (SF 2985)................................. 500,000 David Lawrence Mental Health Center - Pathways to Healing Program (SF 2986)....................................... 375,000 Directions for Living - Baby CAT (SF 2880)................ 670,000 Families First of Palm Beach County - Behavioral Health Services (SF 2220)...................................... 380,287 Faulk Center for Counseling - Mental Health Services for Low-Income Families (SF 1053)........................... 235,500 Flagler Hospital - BRAVE (Be Resilient and Voice Emotions) Program (SF 3426)............................. 350,000 Florida 1.27 - Evidence-Based Training and Support to Help At-Risk Youth Heal from Trauma (SF 3482)........... 300,000 Florida Association of Recovery Residences - Training and Client Assessment (SF 2897)............................. 350,000 Henderson Behavioral Health - Certified Community Behavioral Health Center Expansion (SF 2137)............ 350,000 Lifebuilders of the Treasure Coast - Behavioral Health Residential and Outpatient Services (SF 2552)........... 350,000 Life Management Center of Northwest Forida - Forensic Multidisciplinary Team (SF 3591)........................ 750,000 Life Management Center of Northwest Florida - Functional Family Therapy Team (SF 3647)........................... 500,000 Lifetime Counseling Center - Thrive Within Program (SF 1086)................................................... 350,000 Marion County Senior Services - Senior Crisis Mobile Response Team (SF 1706)................................. 350,000 Mental Health Association in River County - Walk-In, Counseling, and Training Center (SF 3493)............... 350,000 Miami-Dade County Homeless Trust - Project Lazarus Specialized Outreach (SF 1977).......................... 97,081 NAMI Florida - Expanding Florida's Peer Support for Youth and Families (SF 3425).................................. 500,000 NAMI Sarasota and Manatee - Community Care for Families (SF 1868)............................................... 350,000 Okaloosa-Walton Mental Health and Substance Abuse Pre-Trial Diversion Program (SF 3152)................... 325,000 Peace River Center - Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic (SF 2332)................................. 500,019 Peace River Center - Community Mobile Support Team (SF 2333)................................................... 850,000 Project LIFT - Mental Health and Workforce Development (SF 2551)............................................... 350,000 Rales Jewish Family Services - Immediate Need Triage Line (INTL) for Individuals and Families (SF 1054)........... 298,839 RISE Community Solutions - Breakthrough Osceola (SF 1607). 250,461 Samaritan Village - Transitional Safe House Program (SF 2764)................................................... 350,000 She's Thankful - Healing and Empowerment Circles for Survivors of Sexual Trauma in Central Florida (SF 2518). 150,000 SMA Healthcare- Flagler County Central Receiving Facility (SF 2452)............................................... 350,000 Tampa Bay Thrives Youth Mental Wellness Support (SF 2483). 350,000 Twin Oaks Juvenile Development - Competency Restoration Program Expansion for Direct File Youth (SF 1746)....... 2,803,455 Valerie's House - Grieving Children Support Services (SF 3581)................................................... 1,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 384, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund: Bridgeway Center - Okaloosa County Behavioral Health Therapies and MAT Access Initiative (SF 3518)........... 15,000 Broward Health - Integrated Medication Assisted Treatment Response (iMATR) (SF 2206).............................. 650,000 DISC Village - Sustaining Opioid Residential Treatment in Rural North Florida (SF 1429)........................... 500,000 Florida Alcohol and Drug Abuse Association (FADAA) - Extended Release Injectable Naltrexone Program (SF 2502) 650,000 Florida Alliance for Healthy Communities - Network Opioid Addiction Training and Education Program (SF 2120)...... 1,000,000 Florida Alliance of Boys & Girls Clubs - Opioid Awareness and Prevention Program (SF 1755)........................ 1,000,000 Gateway Community Services - Community Outreach Program (SF 3414)............................................... 300,000 Hialeah Community Coalition - Stronger Choices Outreach Program (SF 2217)....................................... 250,000 Memorial Healthcare System - Medication Assisted Treatment for Substance Use Disorders (SF 2205)......... 500,000 Recovery Epicenter Foundation - Respite Recovery Housing Pilot (SF 2868)......................................... 535,500 Seminole County Sheriff's Office - Hope and Healing Center for Opioid/Addiction Recovery (SF 1239).......... 350,000 SMA Healthcare - Substance Abuse Residential and Re-Entry Program (SF 2615)....................................... 500,000 The Pearl Project - Helping Children Impacted by Substance Abuse (SF 1328)............................... 350,000 Tri-County Human Services - Community Detox Beds (SF 2313) 1,350,000 Zero Hour Life Addiction Treatment Center - Peer Specialists Professional Development (SF 3610).......... 30,000 384A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PURCHASE OF THERAPEUTIC SERVICES FOR CHILDREN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,911,958 385 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - INDIGENT PSYCHIATRIC MEDICATION PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,780,276 386 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PURCHASED RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT SERVICES FOR EMOTIONALLY DISTURBED CHILDREN AND YOUTH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,201,779 387 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 365,823 388 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 60,264 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 210 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,632 389 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES - SUBSTANCE ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,473,829 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,524,835 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 731,355 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 389, the managing entities shall work with the Department of Children and Families to collect and report actual expenditures for all funds allocated from this appropriation category with information and format determined by the department. The department shall submit a Fiscal Year 2025-2026 annual report by December 1, 2026, to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. 390 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA ASSERTIVE COMMUNITY TREATMENT (FACT) TEAM SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,888,362 FROM ALCOHOL, DRUG ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,451,869 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 13,849,458 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 390, $11,025,588 from the General Revenue Fund may be provided as the state match for Medicaid reimbursable services provided through the Florida Assertive Community Treatment (FACT) Team services in Specific Appropriation 220. 390A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - HUMAN SERVICES FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,641,461 FROM STATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,900,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 390A, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: Charlotte Behavioral Health Care - Facility Renovations to Support the Parent Partner Model (SF 3534)........... 195,000 Circles of Care - Behavioral Health Facilities Renovation and Safety Improvements (SF 1087)....................... 350,000 Cross Training Ministries - Addiction Treatment Transitional Housing Center (SF 3573)................... 6,000,000 Daniel Memorial - Children's Psychiatric Residential Treatment Cottages (SF 3433)............................ 350,000 Eleos - CSU Facility Improvement - Roof Replacement (SF 1731)................................................... 346,461 Henderson Behavioral Health-Residential Treatment Facility Hurricane Resiliency/Safety Enhancements (SF 2138)................................................... 350,000 IMPACT Foundation of Tallahassee - Campus Expansion (SF 1619)................................................... 350,000 Peace River Center - Gilmore Outpatient Expansion Project (Phase 2) (SF 2331)..................................... 350,000 SMA Healthcare - Marion County Integrated Outpatient Building Renovations (SF 1329).......................... 350,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 390A, the following projects are funded with nonrecurring funds from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund: IMPOWER - Substance Misuse Treatment Program Safety and Recreational Renovations (SF 1266)...................... 500,000 NAMI Hernando - Recovery Community Center (SF 3496)....... 350,000 Phoenix Programs of Florida - Addiction Recovery Diversion Treatment - Support Offices (SF 2873)......... 600,000 SalusCare - Behavioral Health Campus Hardening and Modernization (SF 1988)................................. 450,000 TOTAL: COMMUNITY SUBSTANCE ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 849,439,219 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 505,224,756 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 195.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,354,663,975 TOTAL: CHILDREN AND FAMILIES, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,053,129,784 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,764,838,372 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 12,496.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,817,968,156 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 687,357,719 ELDER AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: SERVICES TO ELDERS PROGRAM COMPREHENSIVE ELIGIBILITY SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,210,947 391 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 227.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,042,889 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,056,289 392 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 227,881 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 223,492 393 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 947,299 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 947,299 394 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 102,665 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 102,664 395 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,331 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 34,329 396 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 70,731 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 70,732 397 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,081 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,306 TOTAL: COMPREHENSIVE ELIGIBILITY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 10,462,877 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,481,111 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 227.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 20,943,988 HOME AND COMMUNITY SERVICES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 398 through 409A, the Department of Elder Affairs shall submit an annual report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 1 of each year. The report must provide a comprehensive accounting of all program allocations for the current fiscal year and include, at a minimum: a detailed schedule of all federal funds received, including the federal program title and assistance listing number, total award amount, and the specific state or local programs supported by such funds; a breakdown of federal and state funding allocated to each Planning and Service Area for each program, including, but not limited to, the Alzheimer's Disease Initiative, Community Care for the Elderly, and Home Care for the Elderly; a description of the formula and methodology used to distribute state and federal funds to each Planning and Service Area, including any weighting factors applied for population, poverty, or specific elder-needs indices; a comparison of current-year allocations to the prior fiscal year, including an explanation for any shifts in funding; and a report identifying any unobligated federal or state funds from the prior fiscal year and the plan for the timely expenditure or reversion of these funds. APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,237,713 398 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 69.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,600,941 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,068,917 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 991,276 399 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 785,098 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 513,936 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 235,907 400 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 703,631 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,205,317 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 435,067 401 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AGING AND ADULT SERVICES TRAINING AND EDUCATION FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 119,493 402 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE INITIATIVE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 74,116,474 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 402, $1,750,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided as a differential unit rate increase of up to 30 percent for those receiving services by an Alzheimer's services adult day care center licensed under section 429.918, Florida Statutes, on or before March 1, 2020. The Department of Elder Affairs shall use the provider's Alzheimer's Disease Initiative Respite In-Facility Reimbursable Unit Rate as its baseline when calculating the differential increase. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 402, $3,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for Alzheimer's respite care services to serve individuals on the waitlist statewide. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 402, the following recurring base appropriations projects are funded from recurring general revenue funds: Alzheimer's Caregiver Projects............................ 234,297 Alzheimer's Community Care Association.................... 1,500,000 Dan Cantor Center - Alzheimer's Project................... 169,287 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 402, the following projects are funded from nonrecurring general revenue funds: Baker Senior Center Naples Dementia Respite Support Program (SF 2982)....................................... 200,000 City of Deerfield Beach Alzheimer's Daycare/Senior Transportation (SF 1794)................................ 300,000 LifeStream Behavioral Center - Dementia and The Baker Act, A Better Path Forward (SF 3262).................... 500,000 403 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY CARE FOR THE ELDERLY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 125,577,779 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 269,851 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,197,752 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 403, $4,000,000 in recurring funds and $3,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to serve elders on the Community Care for the Elderly Program waitlist. The Department of Elder Affairs shall allocate these increased funds to the 11 planning and service areas according to the department's established statewide allocation formula for the Community Care for the Elderly Program. Each Aging Resource Center shall prioritize funding to serve frail seniors on the pre-enrollment list who are most at risk of nursing home placement. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 403, $3,500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to serve elders on the Home Care for the Elderly Program waitlist. Of these funds, $2,000,000 shall be allocated to the 11 planning and service areas based on the number of elders at risk level 5 in each Planning and Service Area as a percentage of the total statewide number of elders at risk level 5. The Department of Elder Affairs shall allocate the remaining increased funds to the 11 planning and services areas according to the department's established statewide allocation formula for the Community Care for the Elderly Program. Each Aging Resource Center shall prioritize funding to serve frail seniors on the pre-enrollment list who are most at risk of nursing home placement. The department shall submit quarterly reports detailing the number of seniors released from the waitlist and enrolled in each of the Home and Community-Based Services program, broken down by planning and service area. Reports shall be submitted to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee no later than 30 days after the close of each calendar quarter with the first report due October 30, 2026. 404 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - OLDER AMERICANS ACT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,186,936 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 174,728,343 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 404, $39,468 in recurring General Revenue funds is provided to the Jewish Community Center for home and community based services for seniors (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 404, the following recurring base appropriations projects are funded from recurring general revenue funds: Aging and Disability Resource Center of Broward County, Inc Provider Service Area (PSA) 10...................... 681,080 Alliance for Aging, Inc................................... 152,626 Alliance for Aging, Inc. - Provider Service Area (PSA) 11. 693,456 Area Agency on Aging of North Florida, Inc................ 105,571 Area Agency on Aging of Pasco - Pinellas, Inc............. 105,571 Area Agency on Aging of Pasco-Pinellas, Inc. - Provider Service Area (PSA) 5.................................... 1,046,000 Areawide Council on Aging of Broward County............... 167,292 City of Hialeah Elder Meals Program....................... 250,000 City of Sweetwater Elderly Activities Center (Mildred & Claude Pepper Senior Center)............................ 418,242 Congregate & Homebound Meals for At-Risk Elderly, Non-Ambulatory, & Handicapped Residents (Allapattah).... 361,543 Elder at Risk Meals (Marta Flores High Risk Nutritional Program for Elders)..................................... 623,877 Holocaust Survivors Assistance Program - Boca Raton Jewish Federation....................................... 92,946 Lippman Senior Center..................................... 228,000 Little Havana Activities and Nutrition Centers of Dade County.................................................. 334,770 Miami Beach Senior Center - Jewish Community Services of South Florida, Inc...................................... 158,367 Michael-Ann Russell Jewish Community Center - Sr. Wellness Center......................................... 83,647 Mid-Florida Area Agency on Aging, Inc. - Model Day Care Project................................................. 105,571 Senior Connection Center, Inc. - Provider Service Area (PSA) 6................................................. 113,000 Seymour Gelber Adult Day Care Program - Jewish Community Services of South Florida, Inc.......................... 23,234 Southwest Social Services................................. 653,501 St. Ann's Nursing Center.................................. 65,084 West Miami Community Center - City of West Miami.......... 69,071 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 404, the following projects are funded from nonrecurring general revenue funds: Age Well (SF 1585)........................................ 600,000 Allapattah Community Action Center Senior Meals & Supplemental Services (SF 1105)......................... 286,925 Axiom Behavioral Health Geriatric Care (SF 1216).......... 800,000 Baker Senior Center Naples Geriatric Mental Health Services (SF 2984)...................................... 110,000 Boulevard Heights Community Center Senior Program Expansion (SF 1121)..................................... 170,000 Bridging the Digital Divide for Older Adults in Florida - Technology Literacy Training from OATS (SF 3056)........ 350,000 City of Hialeah Elder Meals Program (SF 2230)............. 350,000 City of West Park Senior Program (SF 1986)................ 400,000 Clay County Nutrition Access for Seniors Project (SF 3073) 250,000 Coming Home Senior Hospital Transition Program (SF 1618).. 350,000 Dr. Armando Badia Senior Center Meals Program (SF 1749)... 500,000 Elderly Meals Program (SF 3711)........................... 450,000 Faith Based Support for Feeding Elders (SF 3731).......... 300,000 Hialeah Gardens Elder Meals Program (SF 2544)............. 350,000 Hollywood Adult Day Care Center (SF 1674)................. 250,000 Home Delivered Meals for Older Adults in Northeast Florida (SF 2682)....................................... 400,000 JCS Delivers: Expansion of Tailored Grocery Delivery Program for Homebound Very Low-Income Seniors (SF 3036). 250,000 Keep Seniors Off of the Meals on Wheels and Dining Pinellas County Waitlist (SF 2482)...................... 350,000 Key Biscayne Seniors Programming (SF 1141)................ 125,000 Little Havana Activities & Nutrition Centers of Dade County, Inc. (SF 1149).................................. 395,000 Miami Springs Senior Meals and Supplemental Services (SF 2194)................................................... 350,000 North Miami Golden Silver Senior Program (SF 1621)........ 350,000 Nutrition for Elderly & Disabled Seniors Dialysis Patients (SF 1748)...................................... 50,000 NUTRITIONAL EQUITY FOR SENIORS KEEPING KOSHER (NESKK) (SF 1382)................................................... 600,000 Osceola Council on Aging Home Delivered Meals for Rural Seniors Program (SF 1594)............................... 200,000 Project Safe Mind (SF 1645)............................... 350,000 Senior Cancer Support Services Program Miami-Dade County (SF 1012)............................................... 624,000 Senior Connections (SF 2156).............................. 230,000 Strengthening Aging Services in South Florida: Expanded Access to In-Home and Supportive Care (SF 3696)......... 350,000 The LJD Jewish Family & Community Services, Inc.: Holocaust Survivor Support Services (SF 2591)........... 250,000 Treasure Coast Food Bank Senior Food and Resource Program (SF 2063)............................................... 1,310,800 West Miami Senior Activity Center (SF 1044)............... 200,000 405 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,303,090 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 508,925 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,700 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 134,541 406 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 957,034 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 21,937,064 407 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 78,605 408 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,639 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,635 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,182 409 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,407 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 12,381 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,058 409A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - SENIOR CITIZEN CENTERS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,808,700 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 409A, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following projects: Alzheimer's Community Care Critical Support Initiative and Facility Repairs and Renovations (SF 1995).......... 350,000 Building a Caregiver Community Wellness Center-Share the Care (SF 2856).......................................... 500,000 HHA Elderly Affordable Housing - Hoffman Gardens Phase II (SF 2235)............................................... 350,000 South Bay Senior Center Modernization Project (SF 1023)... 400,000 Wakulla Senior Center: Emergency Resiliency and Accessibility Upgrades (SF 1625)........................ 208,700 TOTAL: HOME AND COMMUNITY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 225,136,334 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 209,398,345 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 69.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 434,534,679 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,660,604 410 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 80.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,534,280 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,526,507 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,479,598 411 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,540 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 162,196 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 296,486 412 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 490,258 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 384,307 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 835,494 413 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,000 414 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,406 415 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,382,456 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 112,789 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 230,789 416 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 436,335 417 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 58,768 Funds in Specific Appropriation 417 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 417A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CLIENT INFORMATION AND REGISTRATION TRACKING SYSTEM (ECIRTS) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,652,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 417A are provided to the Department of Elder Affairs for the operations and maintenance costs of the Enterprise Client Information Tracking System (eCIRTS). 418 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,627 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 7,300 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 25,089 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,285 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 418, $200,000 in recurring funds and $50,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Elder Affairs for cybersecurity operations. 419 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,091 420 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,022 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,159 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 7,016 421 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,680 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 17,066 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,424 422 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,657 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 49,782 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 171,091 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 342,906 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 9,649,120 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,706,284 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 80.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,355,404 CONSUMER ADVOCATE SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,608,878 423 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 48.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,578,312 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 412,534 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,955,029 424 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 62,959 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 34,936 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 437,120 425 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 240,959 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 189,540 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 117,489 426 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC GUARDIANSHIP CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,335,128 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 33,526 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 426, $4,373,465 in recurring funding from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Public Guardianship program to account for the increased cost to serve each ward. 427 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,867,896 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 19,369 428 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,284 429 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LONG TERM CARE OMBUDSMAN COUNCIL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 877,388 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 626,020 430 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,092 431 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,682 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,216 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,077 TOTAL: CONSUMER ADVOCATE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 25,038,700 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,835,856 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 48.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 28,874,556 TOTAL: ELDER AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 270,287,031 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 231,421,596 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 425.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 501,708,627 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 24,718,142 HEALTH, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT APPROVED SALARY RATE 24,912,999 432 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 383.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,652,925 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 28,970,942 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 434 and 439, the Department of Health shall provide a status report based on the Five-Year Implementation Plan for Centralized Information Technology Operations, dated October 1, 2025, which details the progress made to date towards achieving the centralized management of information technology intended to streamline security protocols, improve efficiency, and ensure consistent protection across all locations and systems to mitigate cybersecurity threats. The status report shall include any policy, statutory, or budgetary recommendations necessary to achieve an equitable cost share between the offices and divisions of the department and county health departments to maintain the Information Technology Security Modernization and Resiliency Initiative. At least one budgetary recommendation must examine the potential realignment of general revenue funds currently appropriated to county health departments to enable the consolidated purchase of existing information technology commodities and services which will result in an overall cost reduction to county health departments for such information technology commodities and services. The department shall submit the status report to the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget by January 15, 2027. 433 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,911 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,432,880 434 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,811,138 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 14,312,680 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,541,333 435 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - MINORITY HEALTH INITIATIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 45,834,898 436 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SICKLE CELL TREATMENT AND RESEARCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 437 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 63,408 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 173,137 438 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 49,603 439 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,405,572 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 20,689,196 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,107,827 440 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,586,246 Funds in Specific Appropriation 440 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 441 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CENTRALIZED ONLINE REPORTING, TRACKING, AND NOTIFICATION ENTERPRISE (CORTNE) SYSTEM FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 527,200 442 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 702,144 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,684,138 443 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 213,911 444 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 738,731 445 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 539,425 446 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,397 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 110,937 447 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,644 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 112,078 448 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,459,536 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,550,020 TOTAL: ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 77,602,819 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 79,754,038 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 383.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 157,356,857 PROGRAM: COMMUNITY PUBLIC HEALTH COMMUNITY HEALTH PROMOTION APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,764,125 449 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 215.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,906,616 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 333,732 FROM RAPE CRISIS PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,622 FROM TOBACCO SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . 434,978 FROM EPILEPSY SERVICES TRUST FUND . 90,716 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 12,265,560 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,212 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,597,597 FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 733,725 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 449, $418,880 and four positions are provided to implement the Comprehensive Statewide Tobacco Education and Prevention Program in accordance with Section 27, Article X of the State Constitution. 450 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 85,620 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,159,376 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 65,775 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 153,952 FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 70,987 451 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 289,413 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 60,237 FROM RAPE CRISIS PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,000 FROM EPILEPSY SERVICES TRUST FUND . 31,044 FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,047 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,316,157 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,410 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 466,752 FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 292,504 452 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FAMILY PLANNING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,245,455 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,067,783 453 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - EPILEPSY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,168,230 FROM EPILEPSY SERVICES TRUST FUND . 209,547 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 453, $1,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Florida Epilepsy Services Program (FESP)(SF 1368). 454 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS CONTRIBUTION TO COUNTY HEALTH UNITS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,208,862 455 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - PRIMARY CARE PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,682,810 456 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - FLUORIDATION PROJECT FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 150,000 457 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS SCHOOL HEALTH SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,909,412 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 457 from the General Revenue Fund are provided as state match for Title XXI administrative funding for school health services in Specific Appropriations 500 through 502, 505, and 508. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 457, not less than $6,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund shall be provided for the Full Services Schools program pursuant to section 402.3026, Florida Statutes. 458 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,350 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 6,000 459 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - OUNCE OF PREVENTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,900,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 459 are provided to fund a recurring base appropriations project related to the Ounce of Prevention. The Ounce of Prevention shall identify, fund, and evaluate innovative prevention programs for at-risk children and families. The sum of $250,000 shall be used for statewide public education campaigns on television and radio to educate the public on critical prevention issues facing Florida's at-risk children and families. The Ounce of Prevention shall contract with a non-profit corporation that provides matching funds in a three to one ratio. 460 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CRISIS COUNSELING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 29,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 460 are provided for the Pregnancy Support Services Program pursuant to section 381.96, Florida Statutes. The Department of Health shall award a contract to the current Florida Pregnancy Support Services Program contract management provider for this Specific Appropriation. The contract shall provide for payments to such provider of $500 per month per sub-contracted direct service provider for contract oversight, to include technical and educational support. The department is authorized to spend no more than $50,000 for agency program oversight activities. 461 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,904,403 FROM RAPE CRISIS PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 12,587,555 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,005,740 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,145,731 FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 837,595 462 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 48,743,692 FROM RAPE CRISIS PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,645,666 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $1,828,325 in recurring funds and $4,171,675 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the Mary Brogan Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection Program pursuant to section 381.93, Florida Statutes. The department must submit an annual report detailing program funding from all sources and program outputs, including but not limited to, the number of women receiving screenings and diagnostic services, number of services provided by type of service, and non-identifying demographic data such as the age and socioeconomic status of each client. The report must incorporate the report required by s. 381.923, Florida Statutes. The report shall be submitted annually to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 31st of each year. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $5,342,604 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida Council Against Sexual Violence. At least 95 percent of the funds provided shall be distributed to certified rape crisis centers to provide services statewide for victims of sexual assault (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $9,500,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida Association of Free and Charitable Clinics (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $282,039 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Palm Beach County Rape Crisis Center (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $283,643 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to Community Smiles to partner with the Miami Children's Hospital pediatric dental residency program (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $500,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Andrews Institute Foundation's Eagle Fund for rehabilitative services to soldiers wounded during military service (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $2,453,632 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida International University Neighborhood Help program (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $714,519 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the University of Florida College of Dentistry to provide services through a network of community-based clinics (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, $750,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida Heiken Children's Vision Program to provide free comprehensive eye examinations and eyeglasses to financially disadvantaged school children who have no other source for vision care (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 462, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following projects: 26Health- Radiology Services at 26Health (SF 2780)........ 200,000 Advent Health Waterman Community Clinic-Community Care Expansion (SF 1905)..................................... 350,000 Agape Family Health Soutel (SF 2812)...................... 1,000,000 Andrews Research: Regenerative Medicine (SF 3526)......... 400,000 Auditory Oral Services for Children with Hearing Loss (SF 1894)................................................... 350,000 Aventura Jewish Community Center: Transforming Chronic Care Program (SF 2636).................................. 375,000 Breast Screening and Treatment Program (SF 3200).......... 440,000 Department of Health - Centralized Digitization and Automated Workflow Modernization (SF 2539).............. 650,000 Digital Healthcare Access Program (SF 2460)............... 350,000 Digital Vibez Health Initiative for Low Income Families & Elderly (SF 1686)....................................... 350,000 Donate Life Florida - A Commitment to Saving Lives Through Organ Donation (SF 3066)........................ 350,000 Electronic Health Records System Replacement - Phase II Implementation (SF 2001)................................ 350,000 Expanding Access to Dental and Behavioral Healthcare for Floridians (SF 2956).................................... 350,000 Florida Fetal Alcohol Spectrum Disorders (FASD) Center of Excellence: Advancing Statewide Capacity (SF 3037)...... 2,289,600 Florida Heiken Children's Vision Program LLC, a division of Miami Lighthouse (SF 1587)........................... 500,000 Florida Lions Eye Clinic, Inc. - Free Eye Care for Florida Residents (SF 2989)............................. 95,000 Florida Mission of Mercy (SF 1461)........................ 350,000 Florida Telecare Program (SF 2436)........................ 350,000 Guardian Care History Preservation Project (SF 2773)...... 350,000 JHS- Pediatric ED Modernization Project (SF 3478)......... 350,000 Lecom Health: Clinic-Based Services Outreach (SF 1032).... 500,000 Maternal Health Access Expansion at 26Health's Venus Center (SF 2870)........................................ 180,000 Nova Southeastern University Veterans Health (SF 1219).... 7,250,000 Parrish Healthcare Digital Transformation (SF 1997)....... 350,000 Period of PURPLE Crying Shaken Baby Prevention Program (SF 2577)............................................... 500,000 Reach Out and Read Florida: A Children's Literacy Program Through Pediatric Primary Care. (SF 2249)............... 350,000 St. John Bosco Clinic (SF 3505)........................... 350,000 Tallahassee Orthopedic Clinic Foundation, Inc. Stem Cell Research (SF 3235)...................................... 350,000 The Next Step: AI-Driven Discovery Platform for Type 1 Diabetes (SF 2935)...................................... 350,000 UF Health Center for Advanced Therapeutics (SF 2344)...... 350,000 UF Health Central Florida Care Force Expansion Project (SF 2440)............................................... 350,000 UF Health Central Florida Comprehensive Stroke Center (SF 2442)................................................... 436,345 UF Health Mobile Stroke Treatment Unit Network (SF 1704).. 1,681,345 UF Mobile Outreach Clinics (SF 3092)...................... 350,000 Who We Play For: Sudden Cardiac Arrest Prevention (SF 1085)................................................... 350,000 463 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HEALTHY START COALITIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 38,432,541 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,485,431 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 463, the Department of Health and the Department of Children and Families shall work collaboratively with the Florida Association of Healthy Start Coalitions and Healthy Families Florida to identify and implement administrative cost savings through the coordination of shared services. Such efforts shall include but are not limited to: streamlining data sharing and intake processes to reduce redundant data entry and improve participant tracking across programs; coordinating professional development and staff training modules to leverage economies of scale; consolidating public awareness campaigns and outreach materials where program goals overlap; evaluating opportunities for shared administrative functions, such as human resources, IT support, or procurement, at the local coalition and department levels. The departments shall submit a joint report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by December 31, 2026, detailing the efficiencies identified, implementation timelines, the projected fiscal impact of the cost-saving measures, and recommendations for consolidation of program services. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 463, $704,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health to establish the Doula Support for Healthy Births Pilot Program in Broward, Miami-Dade, and Palm Beach counties, targeting pregnant and postpartum women who have overcome or are overcoming substance use disorders. Funds shall be distributed through the Healthy Start Coalitions serving Broward, Miami-Dade, and Palm Beach counties and shall be used to integrate doula services into existing maternal health initiatives and to facilitate outreach and service delivery. The department shall submit quarterly reports to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives within 30 days after the end of each quarter detailing the number of pregnant and postpartum women served, disaggregated by county. A final report shall be submitted no later than October 1, 2027, evaluating the pilot's effectiveness, equity, and quality, and including any recommendations to enhance the integration of doula services into existing maternal health initiatives. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 463, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Nurse Family Partnership Sustainability and Expansion Funding (SF 2338). 464 SPECIAL CATEGORIES JAMES AND ESTHER KING BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH PROGRAM FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,934 464A SPECIAL CATEGORIES HEALTH EDUCATION RISK REDUCTION PROJECT FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 12,686 465 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FEDERAL NUTRITION PROGRAMS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 364,286,258 466 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 60,233 467 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WOMEN, INFANTS AND CHILDREN (WIC) FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 422,828,297 468 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 967 469 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 43,670 FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,526 470 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMPREHENSIVE STATEWIDE TOBACCO PREVENTION AND EDUCATION PROGRAM FROM TOBACCO SETTLEMENT TRUST FUND . 92,031,721 Funds in Specific Appropriation 470 shall be used to implement the Comprehensive Statewide Tobacco Education and Prevention Program in accordance with section 27, Article X of the State Constitution as adjusted annually for inflation, using the Consumer Price Index as published by the United States Department of Labor. The appropriation shall be allocated as follows: State & Community Interventions $15,449,829 State & Community Interventions - AHEC $ 7,438,462 Health Communications Interventions $27,704,239 Health Communications Intervention - Pregnant Women $ 2,975,567 Cessation Interventions $17,218,067 Cessation Interventions - AHEC $10,085,029 Surveillance & Evaluation $ 8,397,581 Administration & Management $ 2,770,644 Funds provided for the Health Communications Intervention component must use strategies targeted toward Florida's youth which integrate information about the consequence of tobacco use and the use of Electronic Nicotine Delivery Systems (ENDS). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 470, the Department of Health may use nicotine replacements and other treatments approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration as part of smoking cessation interventions. All contracts awarded through this Specific Appropriation shall include performance measures and measurable outcomes. The Department of Health shall establish specific performance and accountability criteria for all intervention and evaluation contracts. The criteria shall be based on best medical practices, past smoking cessation experience, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Best Practices for Comprehensive Tobacco Control Programs, and the ability to impact the broadest population. 471 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,199 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,553 FROM RAPE CRISIS PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 621 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 61,573 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 421 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 6,993 FROM PREVENTIVE HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,217 472 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RURAL HOSPITALS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 The funds in Specific Appropriation 472 are provided for the Rural Hospital Capital Improvement Grant Program and shall be allocated pursuant to section 395.6061, Florida Statutes. 472A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - HEALTH FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,350,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 472A, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following projects: 26Health Accessibility Improvements - ADA Compliant Elevator (SF 2779)...................................... 350,000 Agape Family Health Soutel (SF 2812)...................... 1,000,000 Brooks Rehabilitation NextGen Ability Play Zones (SF 3407) 350,000 Gulf Breeze Storm Hardening (SF 3462)..................... 350,000 Hardee County Health Department Improvements (SF 3682).... 7,000,000 Healthcare Network - Caring for Southern Collier County (SF 3010)............................................... 350,000 Jackson Hospital Oncology and Infusion Center Expansion (SF 3133)............................................... 350,000 Lee Health GME Expansion Project Phase I (SF 2009)........ 350,000 MCR Advanced Specialty Institute Renovation (SF 1759)..... 1,400,000 Miami Beach Community Health Center - 710-720 Alton Critical Renovation (SF 1379)........................... 350,000 Moffitt Population Engagement and Research Laboratory (PEARL) Magnolia Expansion (SF 2347).................... 300,000 NCH Marco Island Urgent Care and Community Health Center (SF 3365)............................................... 2,000,000 Restoring Full Inpatient Capacity at Calhoun Liberty Hospital (SF 3111)...................................... 500,000 Volusia Flagler Family YMCA ADA Access Projects (SF 2617). 350,000 YMCA of Florida's First Coast: Lake Brooklyn Water Safety Complex at Camp Immokalee (SF 3072)..................... 350,000 TOTAL: COMMUNITY HEALTH PROMOTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 207,399,486 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 926,633,218 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 215.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,134,032,704 DISEASE CONTROL AND HEALTH PROTECTION APPROVED SALARY RATE 27,399,632 473 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 493.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,303,617 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,807,670 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 16,541,755 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,557,489 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,467,720 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 445,761 474 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 174,350 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 30,674 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,331,288 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 59,060 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,673 475 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,294,796 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 729,127 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,590,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 322,986 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,630,699 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,615 476 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - HIV/AIDS PREVENTION AND TREATMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 29,532,753 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 108,220,428 Funds in Specific Appropriation 476 from the General Revenue Fund may be used to fund Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) and Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS) Patient Care activities, Patient Care Networks, Ryan White Consortia, the AIDS Insurance Continuation Project, and other HIV prevention initiatives. The funds in Specific Appropriation 476 from the Federal Grants Trust Fund are contingent upon sufficient state matching funds being identified to qualify for the federal Ryan White grant award. The Department of Health and the Department of Corrections shall collaborate in determining the amount of general revenue funds expended by the Department of Corrections for AIDS-related activities and services that qualify as state matching funds for the Ryan White grant. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 476, $719,989 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to Jackson Memorial Hospital for the South Florida AIDS Network (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 476, $239,996 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Youth Expressions and Farm Workers programs that provide HIV/AIDS outreach to Haitian and Latino communities (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 476, the Department of Health shall submit monthly reports, beginning August 1, 2026, providing a detailed accounting of the AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP). The reports shall include, at a minimum: all state and federal revenues and expenditures; all manufacturer rebates and other pharmaceutical offsets received or accrued; the total number of individuals participating in the program; participant counts by county of residence or administering organization, as applicable; participant insurance status; the number and type of prescriptions filled, including utilization by drug class; and any other information necessary to provide transparency into program operations, utilization trends, cost drivers, and fiscal sustainability. The department shall include month-over-month and year-to-date trend analyses and shall identify any projected funding shortfalls, enrollment pressures, or operational risks anticipated within the current fiscal year. Reports shall be submitted in a consistent format to allow comparison across reporting periods. The reports shall be submitted to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 476, the Department of Health shall develop and submit proposals to restructure the AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) to improve long-term sustainability and maximize access for eligible individuals within available resources. The proposals shall be designed to ensure the program remains accessible to as many eligible Floridians as possible within existing resources. In developing the proposals, the department shall evaluate and consider best practices and program designs implemented by other states, including, but not limited to: eligibility standards; benefit design; cost-sharing or premium assistance structures; formulary management; utilization management strategies; drug pricing and rebate arrangements, including manufacturer rebates, supplemental rebate agreements, and other pharmaceutical cost-offset strategies consistent with federal Ryan White and ADAP requirements; coordination with Medicaid and Marketplace coverage; and approaches to controlling pharmaceutical and administrative costs. The department shall submit a report by December 1, 2026, to the Governor, the Senate President, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report shall include: at least three restructuring options, including at least one option that may be implemented administratively without statutory change; estimated enrollment impacts, including the number of individuals projected to gain or lose access under each option; estimated fiscal impacts for each option, including anticipated savings or cost avoidance; policy and access tradeoffs associated with each option; and an implementation timeline identifying required administrative, regulatory, or statutory actions. 477 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - HOUSING OPPORTUNITIES FOR PERSONS WITH AIDS (HOPWA) FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 11,322,322 478 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS CONTRIBUTION TO COUNTY HEALTH UNITS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,756,986 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 427,426 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,194,571 479 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 140,894 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 15,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 446,798 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,606 480 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,558,738 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 245,165 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 18,367,229 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,638,038 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,312,643 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,500 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 480, $1,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health to study the long-term health impacts of exposure to blue green algae and red tide toxins to residents, visitors, and those occupationally exposed in Florida. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 480, $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health for the Food and Product Safety Testing Initiative. Funds shall be used solely for public health surveillance, laboratory analysis, and health-based risk assessment of food and consumer products, including comparison to established health screening benchmarks. Activities funded under this initiative shall not include regulatory enforcement, product approval, inspection, or licensing functions. The department shall coordinate with appropriate state agencies with primary regulatory authority over food production, manufacturing, and distribution, as necessary, to avoid duplication of existing regulatory oversight. The department shall submit a quarterly report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee within 30 days after the last business day of each quarter detailing: the amount of funds expended and remaining by major activity category; the number and types of food and consumer product samples tested and the categories of contaminants analyzed; a summary of testing results, including aggregate findings compared to established health-based screening benchmarks and identification of any emerging public health trends; coordination efforts with state agencies having primary regulatory authority to avoid duplication of oversight; confirmation that funds were used solely for public health surveillance, laboratory analysis, and health-based risk assessment and not for regulatory enforcement, inspection, licensing, or product approval activities; and planned testing priorities for the subsequent quarter. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 480, $2,598,682 in recurring funds and $21,624 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to the Department of Health to support the Frontlines of Communities in the United States (FOCUS) program, which provides routine screening for HIV, hepatitis, and syphilis in participating Florida hospitals. The Department of Health shall submit a status report on the FOCUS program to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by December 31, 2026. The report must include, at a minimum: 1. The number and names of hospitals and partner facilities participating in the FOCUS program during the reporting period. 2. The total amount of funding spent, by hospital or partner site. 3. The number of individuals screened for HIV, hepatitis C, and syphilis at each participating location. 4. The number of individuals who received confirmatory testing, were treated, or were successfully linked to care following a positive screening result. 5. A summary of key program outcomes, including new infections identified, linkage-to-care rates, and any changes in screening volume or capacity as services expand. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 480, $2,006,865 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health to maintain support of the department's electronic reportable disease reporting system, referred to as the Merlin system. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 480, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health to contract with a qualified vendor to conduct a comprehensive feasibility study of the state's three public health laboratories in Jacksonville, Miami, and Tampa. The vendor shall evaluate the condition of the current laboratory system and assess options to relocate, modernize, and consolidate operations into a centrally located inland facility. The department shall submit a status report on the study's progress by December 1, 2026, and a final report by June 30, 2027, to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The feasibility study must include, at a minimum: 1. A full inventory and evaluation of existing laboratory equipment at the Jacksonville, Miami, and Tampa public health laboratories, including condition, functionality, and whether the equipment supports current program needs. 2. An assessment of how well each laboratory's equipment, systems, and processes support core public health functions such as newborn screening, infectious disease reporting, and emergency response. 3. A gap analysis identifying any outdated, insufficient, or failing technologies, equipment, or workflows. 4. An evaluation of options to consolidate laboratory operations into a single inland hub, including an assessment of risks associated with keeping laboratories in coastal or flood-prone areas. 5. A record of instances in which environmental hazards associated with keeping laboratories in coastal or flood-prone areas have impacted operations at the laboratories since July 1, 2021. 6. An analysis of rental options for consolidating operations into an existing facility, including size, cost, readiness, biosafety requirements, and federal compliance standards. 7. Recommendations for relocating, modernizing, or consolidating laboratory functions to improve efficiency, reduce duplication, and strengthen statewide disease-testing capacity. 8. A workflow and compliance review to ensure any potentially consolidated facility meets surge capacity needs and supports emergency preparedness. 9. A final written report summarizing all findings, analyses, and recommendations. 481 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,200,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 481, the following projects are funded from nonrecurring general revenue funds: Sickle Cell Center of Excellence- Gainesville Rural Expansion (SF 3737)..................................... 350,000 Sickle Cell Disease Gene Therapy (SF 1622)................ 350,000 University of Miami HIV/AIDS Research at HIV/AIDS and Emerging Infectious Diseases Institute (HEIDI) (SF 1205) 500,000 482 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED PROFESSIONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,995,141 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,443,885 483 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PURCHASED CLIENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 498,687 484 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 157,625 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 113,992 485 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,026,159 486 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 46,781 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,748 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 49,573 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,213 487 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 92,810 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,278 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 99,721 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,339 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,001 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,552 488 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OUTREACH FOR PREGNANT WOMEN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 TOTAL: DISEASE CONTROL AND HEALTH PROTECTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 92,253,178 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 209,601,704 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 493.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 301,854,882 MEDICAL MARIJUANA REGULATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,937,030 490 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 133.00 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,232,080 491 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,125,701 492 EXPENSES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,842,354 493 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,000 495 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 17,926,228 496 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO FLORIDA AGRICULTURAL AND MECHANICAL UNIVERSITY (FAMU) - DIVISION OF RESEARCH FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,311,760 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 496 shall be used exclusively for the purpose of educating minorities about marijuana for medical use and the impact of the unlawful use of marijuana on minority communities to include evidence-based pedagogical studies pursuant to section 381.986(7)(d), Florida Statutes. The Division of Research at Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University shall provide to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Department of Health quarterly update reports no later than 30 days after the close of each calendar quarter beginning July 30, 2026. At a minimum, these reports shall include the adopted fiscal year budget, expenditures to date, estimated expenditures remaining, program objectives, the public education plan with timelines, minority groups targeted, the number of minorities reached by program objective, copies of any documents disseminated during the quarter as part of the public education campaign for educating minorities about marijuana for medical use and the impact of the unlawful use of marijuana on minority communities, a list of all research projects on the impact of the unlawful use of marijuana on minority communities funded under this program, including project status and copies of any studies or reports funded by this program completed or published during the quarter. 497 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 44,896 498 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,500 499 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 47,319 TOTAL: MEDICAL MARIJUANA REGULATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 42,547,838 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 133.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 42,547,838 COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENTS LOCAL HEALTH NEEDS APPROVED SALARY RATE 474,660,212 500 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 8,358.81 FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 694,615,109 501 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 63,811,752 502 EXPENSES FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 136,587,133 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 502, $1,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health to implement a Swim Lesson Voucher Program pursuant to section 514.073, Florida Statutes. Priority will be given to families with autistic children and active-duty military families. The department shall submit an annual report by December 31 of each year detailing the rate of drowning incidents and deaths among children aged four and younger in Florida, including county-level data. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following output measures: the total number of vouchers requested and vouchers awarded, disaggregated by age and by county and the average cost of swimming lesson vouchers, reported by county. 503 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS CONTRIBUTION TO COUNTY HEALTH UNITS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 215,758,626 504 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS COMMUNITY HEALTH INITIATIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,869,514 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 504, the following recurring base appropriations projects are funded with recurring general revenue funds: La Liga - League Against Cancer........................... 1,150,000 Minority Outreach - Penalver Clinic....................... 319,514 Manatee County Rural Health Services...................... 82,283 505 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,235,802 506 LUMP SUM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENTS POSITIONS 50.00 507 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,035,415 508 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 112,243,267 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 508, $7,600,000 in nonrecurring funds from the County Health Department Trust Fund shall be used for the modernization of patient records and practice management processes. Of these funds, up to $1,000,000 shall be used to conduct a data-driven discovery and requirements definition phase prior to the procurement or implementation of any Health Management System electronic health record solution. The discovery and requirements definition phase shall leverage process intelligence and analytics capabilities to objectively analyze and document how business processes are executed in practice across participating counties, based on transactional and event data from existing systems. At a minimum, the discovery activities must include: 1. Ingestion and analysis of system event, transaction, and workflow data from existing HMS and related systems to identify actual end-to-end clinical, administrative, billing, reporting, and data exchange processes. 2. Identification of process variations, bottlenecks, rework, manual workarounds, and policy deviations that impact service delivery, cost, compliance, and performance. 3. Validation of current state processes against documented policies and intended workflows to distinguish between policy design gaps and execution gaps. 4. Definition of future state process models and measurable performance outcomes that the HMS electronic health record solution must support. 5. Translation of validated future state processes into traceable business, functional, technical, interoperability, security, and data requirements suitable for procurement. 6. Development of evidence-based implementation cost estimates, informed by measured process complexity, variation, and volume, including impacts to staffing, change management, integration, data migration, training, and operations. 7. Identification of phased or modular implementation approaches that align validated process scope with available funding while supporting future statewide expansion. The department shall submit a quarterly report to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity, within 30 days after the last business day of each quarter. The report shall summarize discovery and requirements definition activities completed during the quarter; participating counties, systems, and data sources reviewed; key current-state process findings identified through system event and transaction data, including material process variations or inefficiencies; progress toward defining validated future-state processes and requirements; expenditures to date and remaining funds; implementation status; and any material risks or issues requiring legislative awareness. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 508, $1,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health to implement a Swim Lesson Voucher Program pursuant to section 514.073, Florida Statutes. Priority will be given to families with autistic children and active-duty military families. The department shall submit an annual report by December 31 of each year detailing the rate of drowning incidents and deaths among children aged four and younger in Florida, including county-level data. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following output measures: the total number of vouchers requested and vouchers awarded, disaggregated by age and by county and the average cost of swimming lesson vouchers, reported by county. 509 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,500 510 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,719,644 511 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,119,038 512 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,809,117 513 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,176,960 513A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HEALTH FACILITIES REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE - STATEWIDE FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000,000 514 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, AND EQUIPMENT - COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,050,000 FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,417,200 514A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR OF COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 427,713 FROM COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,000,000 TOTAL: COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENTS LOCAL HEALTH NEEDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 219,105,853 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,047,797,937 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 8,408.81 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,266,903,790 STATEWIDE PUBLIC HEALTH SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,589,810 515 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 290.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,590,768 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 430,240 FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,134,861 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,682,261 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 949,645 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,326,762 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,319,656 516 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,083 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 23,992 FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 651,709 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 452,685 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 67,471 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 126,134 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,953 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,098 517 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 293,432 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 18,796 FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 520,404 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,230,017 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 232,387 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 573,192 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,245,717 518 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - LOCAL HEALTH COUNCILS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,111,402 519 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES COUNTY GRANTS FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,696,675 520 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES MATCHING GRANTS FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,181,461 521 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,932 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 61,466 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 56,997 522 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 210,856 523 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - STRENGTHENING DOMESTIC SECURITY - BIOTERRORISM ENHANCEMENTS - HEALTH AND HOSPITALS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 21,160,351 524 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,555,836 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 34,773 FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 765,458 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 963,931 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,781 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,498,582 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 148,500 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 524, $6,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Health to relocate and retrofit the Bureau of Preparedness and Response emergency response facilities. Of the funds provided, $4,000,000 shall be used to enter into a rental agreement for a primary facility, and $2,000,000 shall be used for a one-time retro fit of the facility. From the funds is Specific Appropriation 524, $5,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Funds is provided to the Department of Health for the Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program, contingent upon SB 1060 or similar legislation becoming law. 525 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,763,461 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 65,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 525, $94,867 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Southwest Alachua County Primary and Community Health Care Clinic (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 525, $2,750,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Bitner Plante ALS Initiative (SF 3490). 526 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DRUGS, VACCINES AND OTHER BIOLOGICALS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,360,225 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 119,154,984 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 49,354,218 The funds in Specific Appropriation 526 from the Federal Grants Trust Fund are contingent upon sufficient state matching funds being identified to qualify for the federal Ryan White grant award. The Department of Health and the Department of Corrections shall collaborate in determining the amount of state general revenue funds expended by the Department of Corrections for AIDS-related activities and services that qualify as state matching funds for the Ryan White grant. 527 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - RURAL HEALTH NETWORK GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,166,915 528 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PURCHASED CLIENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,676,352 529 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 198,327 530 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - STATE AND FEDERAL DISASTER RELIEF OPERATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,000,000 531 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - TRAUMA CARE FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,093,747 532 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPINAL CORD RESEARCH FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,000,000 533 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,900,825 534 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,642 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 7,811 FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,064 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,177 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 47,576 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,278 535 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,006 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,568 FROM EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,201 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 42,388 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,625 FROM BRAIN AND SPINAL CORD INJURY REHABILITATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 17,496 FROM RADIATION PROTECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,152 536 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDICALLY FRAGILE ENHANCEMENT PAYMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 610,020 TOTAL: STATEWIDE PUBLIC HEALTH SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 34,888,800 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 253,713,522 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 290.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 288,602,322 PUBLIC HEALTH STATISTICS AND INNOVATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,088,206 537 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 205.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,408,993 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,971,003 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,773,351 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,045,498 538 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 147,401 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 186,351 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 499,387 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 763,157 539 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 507,930 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 265,037 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 868,277 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 39,729 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 715,822 540 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,302 541 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PEDIATRIC RARE DISEASE RESEARCH GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 541 are provided to award grants to support research related to rare pediatric diseases. Funding may be used for scientific and clinical research and studies related to new diagnostics and treatments for rare childhood diseases. 542 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,069,157 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 325,850 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,840,643 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,570,669 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 542, $450,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Birth Defects Registry. From the funds is Specific Appropriation 542, $6,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Bascom Palmer Eye Institute VisionGen Initiative pursuant to section 381.922, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 542, $800,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the operations and maintenance of the Florida Cancer Data System. 543 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,782,956 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 543, the following projects are funded from nonrecurring general revenue funds: 1 Voice Pediatric Cancer Foundation (SF 1710)............. 300,000 Promise Fund (SF 1056).................................... 350,000 544 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 70,850,000 545 SPECIAL CATEGORIES JAMES AND ESTHER KING BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH PROGRAM FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,850,000 546 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WILLIAM G. "BILL" BANKHEAD, JR., AND DAVID COLEY CANCER RESEARCH PROGRAM FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 546, $500,000 from the Biomedical Research Trust Fund is provided to maintain the statewide Brain Tumor Registry Program at the McKnight Brain Institute (recurring base appropriations project). 546A SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA CONSORTIUM OF NATIONAL CANCER INSTITUTE CENTERS PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 111,071,257 FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,428,743 Funds in Specific Appropriation 546A are provided for the Casey DeSantis Cancer Research Program established in section 381.915, Florida Statutes. Cancer centers are eligible for Tier 1, Tier 2 and Tier 3 designation to participate in the Casey DeSantis Cancer Research Program as follows: H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute and Mayo Clinic Comprehensive Cancer Center are eligible for Tier 1 designation as a NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center; the University of Miami Sylvester Comprehensive Cancer Center and the University of Florida Health Shands Cancer Hospital are eligible for Tier 2 designation as an NCI designated cancer center in the Florida Consortium of NCI Centers Program. All cancer centers receiving funding under the Casey DeSantis Cancer Research Program shall submit to the Florida Cancer Data System, on a quarterly basis beginning September 30, 2026, data on new cancer diagnoses and cancer recurrence. All funded cancer centers shall submit to the Department of Health, on a quarterly basis beginning September 30, 2026, data on patient outcomes by cancer type and mortality and survival rates for patients treated as determined by the Department of Health. By January 1, 2027, all funded cancer centers shall submit a report to the Governor, President of the Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Department of Health containing comprehensive findings and protocols of best practices leading to improved outcomes among patients. A cancer center receiving funds pursuant to the Casey DeSantis Cancer Research Program shall be compliant with the requirements of this proviso, and the Department of Health may recover funds awarded for failure to comply with the requirements of this proviso. 546B SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA CANCER INNOVATION FUND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 70,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 546B are provided for the Florida Cancer Innovation Fund. The purpose of the Fund is to award research grants, pursuant to s. 381.915, Florida Statutes, to support innovative cancer research, including emerging research trends and promising practices, which can serve as a catalyst for further exploration. 547 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CANCER CONNECT COLLABORATIVE INCUBATOR FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,000,000 FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 547 are provided to distribute to nonprofit hospitals that as of January 1, 2022, are separately licensed by the state as specialty hospitals providing comprehensive acute care services to children pursuant to section 395.002(28), Florida Statutes, for conducting research to advance the care and treatment of pediatric cancer pursuant to section 381.915, Florida Statutes. 548 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PEDIATRIC CANCER RESEARCH FROM BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 548 are provided for the Live Like Bella Initiative pursuant to section 381.922(2)(c), Florida Statutes, to advance progress toward curing pediatric cancer. 550 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ALZHEIMER RESEARCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 550 are provided for the Ed and Ethel Moore Alzheimer's Disease Research Program established in section 381.82, Florida Statutes. 551 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,362 552 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,081,816 553 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 195 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 540 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,241 554 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HEALTH CARE EDUCATION REIMBURSEMENT AND LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31,000,000 555 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DENTAL STUDENT LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 555 from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the Dental Student Loan Repayment Program and the Donated Dental Services Program to be used as authorized pursuant to sections 381.4019 and 381.40195, Florida Statutes. 556 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HEALTH CARE SCREENING SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 557 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HEALTH CARE INNOVATION REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000,000 558 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,805 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,332 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,269 FROM PLANNING AND EVALUATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,541 558A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - HEALTH FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 350,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 558A, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Moffitt Cancer Center - Digital Pathology Expansion (SF 2864). TOTAL: PUBLIC HEALTH STATISTICS AND INNOVATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 293,705,694 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 216,403,920 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 205.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 510,109,614 PROGRAM: CHILDREN'S MEDICAL SERVICES CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE APPROVED SALARY RATE 22,885,340 559 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 310.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,612,483 FROM DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,393,742 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,124,255 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 559, 561, 565, and 572 the department must establish a statewide fetal alcohol spectrum disorder program to raise awareness of, and train healthcare professionals on, the impacts of alcohol use during pregnancy. 560 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 193,721 FROM DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . 186,177 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 371,175 561 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,924,876 FROM DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,059,625 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,793,828 562 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,700 563 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CHILDREN'S MEDICAL SERVICES NETWORK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,050,187 FROM DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . 859,352 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,904,863 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 9,924,886 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,613,263 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 563, up to $2,500,000 may be used by the Department of Health Children's Medical Services Program to provide benefits authorized in section 391.0315, Florida Statutes, for children with chronic and serious medical conditions who do not qualify for Medicaid or Title XXI of the Social Security Act. The department shall maximize the use of funding provided by federal block grants before utilizing general revenue funds. Children eligible for assistance using these funds must be uninsured, insured but not covered for medically necessary services, or unable to access services due to lack of providers or lack of financial resources regardless of insurance status. The department may serve children on a first-come, first-serve basis until the appropriated funds are fully obligated. Receiving services through the Safety Net Program does not constitute an entitlement for coverage or services when funds appropriated for this purpose are exhausted. The funds in Specific Appropriation 563 shall not be used to support continuing education courses or training for health professionals or staff employed by the Children's Medical Services (CMS) Network or under contract with the Department of Health. This limitation shall include but not be limited to: classroom instruction, train the trainer, or web-based continuing education courses that may be considered professional development, or that results in continuing education credits that may be applied towards the initial or subsequent renewal of a health professional's license. This does not preclude the CMS Network from providing information on treatment methodologies or best practices to appropriate CMS Network health professionals, staff, or contractors. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 563, $280,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Fetal Alcohol Spectrum Disorder program in Sarasota County (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 563, recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following Children's Medical Services specialty contracts: University of South Florida - Regional Perinatal Intensive Care Center................................... 45,000 Johns Hopkins/All Children's Hospital - Hematology/Oncology..................................... 48,500 University of Florida - Regional Perinatal Intensive Care Center.................................................. 50,000 MATCH dba Partnership for Child Health - Craniofacial and Cleft Lip/Cleft Palate.................................. 78,023 Nemours Jacksonville - Hematology/Oncology................ 79,439 Sacred Heart Hospital - Regional Perinatal Intensive Care Center.................................................. 127,788 Children's Diagnostic and Treatment Center - HIV/AIDS.... 138,889 University of South Florida - Disease Management.......... 151,545 Wolfson Children's Hospital - Disease Management.......... 180,000 University of Miami - Comprehensive Children's Kidney Failure Center.......................................... 205,618 University of Miami - Disease Management.................. 207,962 University of South Florida - HIV/AIDS.................... 222,932 University of South Florida - Comprehensive Children's Kidney Failure Center................................... 225,268 University of Florida - HIV/AIDS.......................... 241,927 University of Florida - HIV/AIDS.......................... 250,543 Joe DiMaggio Children's Hospital - Craniofacial and Cleft Lip/Cleft Palate........................................ 255,150 Nicklaus Children's Hospital - Craniofacial and Cleft Lip/Cleft Palate........................................ 255,150 University of Miami - HIV/AIDS............................ 260,269 Sickle Cell Disease Association of Florida, Inc. - Sickle Cell Outreach........................................... 283,860 University of Florida - Disease Management................ 344,258 University of Florida - Hematology/Oncology............... 362,912 University of Florida - Comprehensive Children's Kidney Failure Center.......................................... 390,466 University of South Florida - Tampa Referral Center....... 393,120 University of Miami - Hematology/Oncology................. 404,501 University of Florida - Cranio/Multi-Handicapped.......... 525,043 The Department of Health is authorized to reallocate funding among the above institutions based on contractual negotiations so long as the general revenue allocation is not increased. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 563, recurring funds from the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant Trust Fund are provided for the following Children's Medical Services specialty contracts: Children's Diagnostic and Treatment Center - HIV/AIDS.. 46,296 University of South Florida - HIV/AIDS.................... 74,311 University of Florida - HIV/AIDS.......................... 80,642 University of Florida - HIV/AIDS.......................... 83,514 University of Miami - HIV/AIDS............................ 86,756 University of Florida - Health Care Transition............ 100,000 Orlando Health/Arnold Palmer - Hematology/Oncology........ 110,427 Johns Hopkins/ All Children's - Hematology/Oncology....... 145,500 The Nemours Foundation - Regional Network for Access and Quality................................................. 150,000 MATCH dba Partnership for Child Health - Regional Network for Access and Quality.................................. 150,000 University of Florida - Disease Management................ 130,000 Nemours Jacksonville - Hematology/Oncology................ 238,318 University of Florida - Behavioral Health................. 525,000 University of Miami - Behavioral Health................... 445,000 Florida International University - Behavioral Health...... 445,000 Florida State University - Behavioral Health.............. 525,000 University of South Florida - Behavioral Health........... 153,305 National Institute for Children's Health Quality - QI Learning Collaborative.................................. 597,726 University of Central Florida - Patient-Centered Medical Home.................................................... 755,000 The Department of Health is authorized to reallocate funding among the above institutions based on contractual negotiations so long as the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant Trust Fund allocation is not increased. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 563, $5,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to create a Children's Hearing Aid program within the Department of Health Children's Medical Services program. This program shall provide assistance to families with children 0-18 years of age, who are residents of the State of Florida, and who have been diagnosed with hearing loss by a licensed physician or audiologist. The program will assist with the purchase of hearing aids, assistive listening devices, external cochlear implant processor replacements, earmolds and hearing aid batteries. The program will also assist with payment for associated hearing aid services up to a maximum of $1,000 per ear, per child annually and for services associated with a cochlear implant replacement processor up to a maximum of $1,500 per ear, per child annually. This cap does not include the cost of the device(s), earmolds, or batteries. Children with family incomes at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level guidelines, and children described in section 391.021(2), Florida Statutes, are eligible for the program. Children enrolled or who can qualify for the Florida Medicaid Program or Children's Health Insurance program are not eligible for the program. The department shall provide to the Governor, President of the Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, an annual report for the preceding fiscal year no later than 30 days after the close of the fiscal year on June 30. At a minimum, this report shall include the number of children participating in the program. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 563, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following project. Ascension Sacred Heart Women's Perinatal Specialty Unit (SF 3461)............................................... 900,000 Strengthening Northeast Florida's Pediatric Healthcare Infrastructure (SF 3598)................................ 500,000 564 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - MEDICAL SERVICES FOR ABUSED/NEGLECTED CHILDREN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,810,050 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,763,295 565 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 FROM DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . 6,530,809 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 82,405 FROM MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 281,710 566 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 300,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 566, $300,000 from the General Revenue Fund is provided to A Safe Haven for Newborns (recurring base appropriations project). 567 SPECIAL CATEGORIES POISON CONTROL CENTER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,666,498 568 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 174,641 569 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - DEVELOPMENTAL EVALUATION AND INTERVENTION SERVICES/PART C FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 47,361,173 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 42,833,989 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 569, at least 85 percent of funds distributed to Local Early Steps providers must be spent on direct client services. 570 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 374,154 571 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 82,009 FROM DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . 121,245 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 75,871 572 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 102,548 FROM DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . 102,545 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 43,755 572A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - HEALTH FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 572A, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following projects: BayCare Hospital Manatee Neonatal Intensive Care Unit (SF 1033)................................................... 500,000 TOTAL: CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 120,778,186 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 93,451,644 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 310.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 214,229,830 PROGRAM: HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER AND ACCESS MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE APPROVED SALARY RATE 32,792,168 573 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 646.50 FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,340,101 574 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,786,084 575 EXPENSES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 86,419 FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,680,222 576 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,000 577 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,000 578 SPECIAL CATEGORIES UNLICENSED ACTIVITIES FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,182,680 579 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 414,850 580 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 863,761 FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,969,786 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 580, $750,000 in recurring funds from the Medical Quality Assurance Trust Fund is provided for the integration of non-fatal overdose data into the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program (E-FORCSE) to assist in the prevention and treatment of substance use disorders. The departments shall coordinate with the Department of Children and Families to ensure the timely transfer and application of these funds. 581 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 122,000 582 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 529,841 583 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE LICENSING AND REGULATION SYSTEM FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,047,086 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 583, $1,047,086 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Quality Assurance Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Health to replace and modernize the Medical Quality Assurance Licensing, Enforcement, and Information Database System (LEIDS). 584 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 339,364 585 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 250,779 TOTAL: MEDICAL QUALITY ASSURANCE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 87,648,973 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 646.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 87,648,973 PROGRAM: DISABILITY DETERMINATIONS DISABILITY BENEFITS DETERMINATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 41,839,381 586 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 796.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 830,675 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 924,192 FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 57,179,420 587 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 859,028 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 881,367 FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 27,440,943 588 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 139,839 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 198,434 FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 17,316,483 589 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,000 FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 329,405 590 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 135,331 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 79,818 FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 31,638,543 591 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 280,998 592 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,000 FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 2,334 593 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,071 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,437 FROM U.S. TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 353,109 TOTAL: DISABILITY BENEFITS DETERMINATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,970,944 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 136,632,483 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 796.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 138,603,427 TOTAL: HEALTH, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,047,704,960 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,094,185,277 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 11,882.31 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,141,890,237 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 673,868,903 VETERANS' AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: SERVICES TO VETERANS' PROGRAM VETERANS' HOMES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 594 through 625, the Department of Veterans' Affairs shall provide a monthly reconciliation report for all Operations and Maintenance Trust Fund expenditures and revenues. The report shall include actual expenditures to date by category and revenue collections to date for each month and shall be reconciled to state accounting records. The department shall provide applicable state accounting reports to validate the reconciliation report. The report shall also include expenditure projections by category and revenue projections for the remainder of the fiscal year by month (including the methodologies used to determine those projections); census data for each nursing home or domiciliary operated by the department by month; and a report of departmental use of contract nurse staffing agencies. In the event projected revenues are not sufficient to cover projected expenditures, the department shall submit a written corrective action plan to address the deficit. APPROVED SALARY RATE 67,735,152 594 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,346.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,971,121 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 99,845,181 595 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 162,870 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,950,976 596 EXPENSES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,000 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,607,054 597 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,000 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 896,126 598 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,932,786 599 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 145,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,790 600 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,925,034 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,215,609 601 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RECREATIONAL EQUIPMENT AND SUPPLIES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 99,000 602 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,080,504 603 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 504,228 604 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR OF STATE-OWNED RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES FOR VETERANS FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,288,500 TOTAL: VETERANS' HOMES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 13,204,025 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 170,523,754 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,346.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 183,727,779 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,189,028 605 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 43.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,577,140 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 261,467 606 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,706 607 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,524,959 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,839,391 608 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 120,512 609 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,847,979 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 745,993 611 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 809,133 612 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 36,809 613 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,706 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 712 614 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,334 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 9,970,278 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,847,563 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 43.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,817,841 VETERANS' BENEFITS AND ASSISTANCE APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,490,462 615 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 131.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,106,146 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,565,919 616 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,229 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,263 617 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 240,380 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 475,715 618 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,500 619 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - VETERANS DENTAL CARE GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 619 are provided from recurring funds to the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the veteran dental care grant program established in section 295.157, Florida Statutes. The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall provide a quarterly report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee no later than 30 days after the last business day of each quarter. The report must include the number of veterans served, the type of services provided, and the cost of each service. 620 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,569 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 32,500 620A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,259,204 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 620A, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following projects: Camaraderie Foundation - Veteran/family counseling and suicide prevention (SF 2644)............................ 420,000 Controlled Ketamine Therapy and Neurobiological Restoration Treatments for Veterans (SF 1882)........... 1,034,995 Cryoeeze22 GAP Funding for Veterans recovery (SF 2279).... 350,000 Dogs Inc. Services to Veterans (SF 1230).................. 750,000 Early Warning Cancer Detection for Florida Veterans Exposed to Burn Pits and Toxins (SF 1327)............... 350,000 Five Star Veterans Center Homeless Housing and Re-Integration Project (SF 3386)........................ 374,000 Florida Veteran Coalition - Operation Safe Landing (SF 1061)................................................... 500,000 Florida Veterans Legal Helpline (SF 2273)................. 1,000,000 Folds of Honor Educational Support for Military and First Responder Families (SF 2004)............................ 350,000 Fort Freedom - Veterans Suicide Prevention (SF 3300)...... 667,200 GAMSD - Infrastructure and Operations Support to Expand Capacity to Serve Disabled Veterans (SF 1392)........... 100,000 GovChallenge Krew (SF 2894)............................... 350,000 Home Base Florida Veteran and Family Care (SF 3273)....... 2,500,000 Home365 Veteran Housing Initiative (SF 2126)............ 320,000 Hookin Veterans (SF 3763)................................. 250,000 HURRICANE HARDENING OF VETERANS OF FOREIGN WARS POST 3308 (TALLAHASSEE) & 4538 (Crawfordville) (SF 2909).......... 5,000 K9 Partners for Patriots Veterans Mental Health Initiative: Operation Resilience (SF 2265).............. 281,884 McCormick Research Institute: Equine-assisted Therapy for Veterans with Mental Health Challenges (SF 1606)........ 348,825 Nova Southeastern University/Veterans Trust Race Camp (SF 1288)................................................... 350,000 Operation Healing Forces - Enhanced Resilience, Rehabilitation, and Reintegration Programming (SF 2259). 350,000 Operation Song: Florida's Salute to Service (SF 2269)..... 200,000 Operation Warrior Resolution - Innovative Interventions For Veteran Suicide Prevention (SF 1291)................ 350,000 Operation Warrior Resolution - Veteran Suicide Prevention Through Workforce Development (SF 2288)................. 350,000 Pensacola Veterans & Families Mental Health and Wellness Program (SF 3463)....................................... 750,000 QUANTUM LEAP FARM: EQUINE-ASSISTED THERAPY FOR VETERANS (SF 2270)............................................... 294,700 SOF Missions - Veteran Suicide Prevention (SF 2278)....... 750,000 TF Pineapple Advocacy for Veterans, First Responders and families for Mental Health and Moral Injury (SF 2501)... 350,000 The Blue Angels Foundation (BAF) funding for Critical Veteran Services (SF 3722).............................. 1,500,000 The Fire Watch 'Watch Stander' Program - Predicting and Preventing Veteran Suicides in Florida (SF 2181)........ 462,600 The Transition House Homeless Veterans Program - Osceola (SF 1795)............................................... 400,000 VetConnect Solution - Improving Florida Veteran Experiences (SF 2254)................................... 350,000 Veterans Village - Project of Home Again St Johns Inc. (SF 2614)............................................... 200,000 Vets Feeding Vets (SF 2251)............................... 250,000 Warrior Wellness Program - Veterans Suicide Prevention Program (SF 3523)....................................... 400,000 621 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,301 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,853 622 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,443 FROM OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,485 622A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,195,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 622A, nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the following projects: City of Miami Gardens Veterans Wellness and Resource Center (SF 3026)........................................ 350,000 Five Star Veterans Center Expansion Phase 3 (SF 2654)..... 650,000 GAMSD - Infrastructure and Operations Support to Expand Capacity to Serve Disabled Veterans (SF 1392)........... 1,150,000 Home365 Veteran Housing Initiative (SF 2126)............ 180,000 HURRICANE HARDENING OF VETERANS OF FOREIGN WARS POST 3308 (TALLAHASSEE) & 4538 (Crawfordville) (SF 2909).......... 65,000 K9s For Warriors Training & Rescue Facility (SF 2529)... 1,500,000 Manatee County Veterans Resource Hub and Memorial Park (SF 1958)............................................... 1,500,000 SOF Missions Vet Suicide Prevention Medical Facility (SF 2806)................................................... 1,250,000 Veterans Housing Initiative "VHI" Critical home repair/new construction for low-income vets (SF 1936)... 150,000 Veterans Village - Project of Home Again St Johns Inc. (SF 2614)............................................... 300,000 Zulu Project Roof Renovation for Supportive Veteran Housing in Collier County (SF 3183)..................... 100,000 TOTAL: VETERANS' BENEFITS AND ASSISTANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 32,356,272 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,127,235 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 131.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 37,483,507 VETERANS EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING SERVICES 623 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FLORIDA IS FOR VETERANS, INC.-OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 450,000 624 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - VETERANS EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING SERVICES PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 The recurring funds in Specific Appropriation 624 are provided for the Veterans Employment and Training Services (VETS) Program pursuant to sections 295.21 and 295.22, Florida Statutes. The Veterans Employment and Training Services Program shall provide a quarterly report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee no later than 30 days after the last business day of each quarter. The report must include the number of veterans served by the program, the number of veterans who received training, and the marketing, awareness, and outreach activities directed toward the program's target market, as defined in section 295.21, Florida Statutes. 625 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,416,667 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 625, $416,667 in nonrecurring funds and $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Veterans Affairs for the Occupational License Reciprocity System. The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall submit a report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee for the 2025-2026 fiscal year by October 1, 2026. At a minimum, the report must include all of the following: 1. A program overview and implementation status, including the current phase of implementation, major milestones achieved during the reporting period, and any system enhancements or expansions completed. 2. System usage and performance metrics, including the number of users accessing the system, the number of applications submitted, average processing times, system availability, and any other metrics used to measure system performance. 3. Program outcomes, including the number of occupational license reciprocity determinations processed, approved, denied, or pending, and an assessment of the system's impact on improving access to licensure for eligible veterans, service members, and spouses. TOTAL: VETERANS EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,866,667 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,866,667 TOTAL: VETERANS' AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 59,397,242 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 178,498,552 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,520.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 237,895,794 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 78,414,642 TOTAL OF SECTION 3 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 19,180,962,290 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 29,913,819,887 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 30,596.06 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 49,094,782,177 SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the named funds to the Department of Corrections, Justice Administration, Department of Juvenile Justice, Florida Department of Law Enforcement, Department of Legal Affairs/Attorney General, Florida Gaming Control Commission, and Florida Commission on Offender Review as the amounts to be used to pay the salaries, other operational expenditures, and fixed capital outlay of the named agencies. CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF From the funds in Specific Appropriations 626 through 782, the Department of Corrections shall, before closing, substantially reducing the use of, or changing the purpose of any state correctional institution as defined in section 944.02, Florida Statutes, submit its proposal to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee for review. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 626 through 782, the Department of Corrections may work within its existing budget, including applicable grants, to implement any corrective action plan that is developed as a result of a Prison Rape Elimination Act audit conducted in accordance with Title 28, Part 115 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department may request additional resources required through the Legislative Budget Request process as defined in chapter 216, Florida Statutes. Funds in Specific Appropriations 626 through 782 may not be used to pay for unoccupied space currently being leased by the Department of Corrections in the event the leases are vacant on or after July 1, 2026, and for which it has been determined by the Secretary of the department that there is no longer a need. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 626 through 782, the Department of Corrections shall not overlap positions when currently authorized positions are vacant in excess of five percent. In the event that the department's overall vacancy rate falls below five percent, the department may submit a plan to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee detailing the number of positions it is seeking to overlap, with a detailed justification of the need for each overlapped position. Upon approval of the plan, the department may overlap positions, as approved in the plan for the period authorized by the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 626 through 782, the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall conduct a study examining the Department of Corrections' outsourcing of inmate health care services and inmate food service and whether these contracted services are meeting their intended goals in terms of cost, quality, accountability, and outcomes. At a minimum, the study shall assess, based on available data, whether outsourcing is more cost-effective than state-run services, whether outsourcing has improved service quality and outcomes, whether vendors are meeting contractual obligations, and any unintended consequences of outsourcing. The review shall also compare the outsourcing of health care and food services in state-run prisons to contractor-operated facilities. The study shall provide recommendations on improving or revising outsourcing strategies, including whether the state should continue outsourcing with modifications, increase contractor oversight, renegotiate contracts, develop hybrid service delivery models (including whether outsourcing specific regions of the state would be more cost effective), or bring services back in-house. OPPAGA shall provide a report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than February 1, 2027. PROGRAM: DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATION EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 33,317,188 626 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 505.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 53,469,982 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,042,668 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 103,776 627 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 598,066 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 296,477 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 55,631 628 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,596,765 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 500,000 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,313,200 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,000 629 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FLORIDA FOUNDATION FOR CORRECTIONAL EXCELLENCE, INC. - OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 750,000 630 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,227 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 30,160 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 20,000 631 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,813 632 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,149,967 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 483,797 633 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,500 634 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 410,751 635 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 525,394 636 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 144,792 637 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,949,715 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 57,633 FROM CORRECTIONAL WORK PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 118,860 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 67,107,578 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,557,596 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 505.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 72,665,174 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,504,574 638 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 175.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,676,268 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 518,018 639 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,905 640 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,933,810 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,502,511 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 472,761 641 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 127,720 642 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,749,661 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,909,500 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 176,857 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 642, $10,214,612 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the operations and maintenance of the applications modernized through the technology restoration project. The department shall contract with an independent verification and validation (IV&V) provider to provide IV&V services for all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project. The IV&V contract shall require that all deliverables be simultaneously provided to the department, the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity. IV&V services must include, but are not limited to the following: (1) Oversight of all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project; (2) An evaluation of the project's schedule to highlight variances and ensure it aligns with project objectives, remains feasible, and mitigates risks; and (3) A thorough review of all project budget requests and monthly and quarterly reporting submitted by the agency to the Legislature. (4) The monthly IV&V reports shall include technical reviews of all project deliverables submitted or accepted within the reporting period and an analysis of whether: (a) The project is being built and implemented in accordance with defined technical architecture, specifications, and requirements; (b) The project is adhering to established project management and governance processes; (c) Solicitation and procurement documentation of products, tools, or services, and resulting contracts, are compliant with current statutory and regulatory requirements and aligned with project objectives; (d) The outcomes and benefits of services performed are commensurate with the amounts invoiced; and (e) If the project is on track to achieve the original business benefits and project objectives. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 642, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Enterprise Browser - Florida Department of Corrections (SF 3759). 643 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 360,270 644 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,345,903 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 143,822 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,221 646 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ON-CALL FEES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 185,557 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 26,179 647 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 63,000 648 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 60,678 649 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,270 650 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 970 651 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,460,536 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 176,914 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 29,793 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 65,984,548 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,980,576 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 175.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 71,965,124 PROGRAM: SECURITY AND INSTITUTIONAL OPERATIONS From the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 652 through 689, each correctional facility warden, in conjunction with the Chief Financial Officer of the Department of Corrections, shall submit a report on the allocation of human resources and associated budget by correctional facility to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by July 30th of each year. At a minimum, each correctional facility must identify the number of authorized positions, delineating between filled and vacant, the projected number of employee hours needed to fulfill the operations of each facility, specifically denoting projected overtime hours, the methodology utilized to assign overtime in a uniform and equitable manner, and recruitment efforts and challenges including turnover rates. The department shall submit a comparison of actual utilization to projected estimates. The Inspector General shall certify the information contained in each report and verify its accuracy. ADULT MALE CUSTODY OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 521,030,453 652 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 9,070.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 786,650,215 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 199,410 653 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,218,878 654 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,924,430 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 216,765 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,740,389 655 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,578,666 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 47,205 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 250,000 656 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 62,444,553 657 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,699,044 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 249,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 657, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to continue to provide contracted security staffing at the entrance and exit points at six facilities with high vacancy rates. The department shall evaluate and report on the cost savings associated with using contracted security personnel to perform entrance and exit functions, as compared to the use of certified correctional officers, and shall include recommendations regarding the potential expansion of this initiative. The department shall submit the report to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by March 1, 2027. 658 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FOOD SERVICE AND PRODUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,230,296 659 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 58,181,835 660 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO GENERAL REVENUE FUND FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,800,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 660 are from reimbursements from the United States Government for incarcerating aliens in Florida's prisons. If total reimbursements exceed $6,800,000, the Department of Corrections shall submit a budget amendment in accordance with all applicable provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting additional budget authority to transfer the balance of funds to the General Revenue Fund. 661 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,276,097 FROM SALE OF GOODS AND SERVICES CLEARING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 1,375,896 662 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,989,220 663 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 806,544 664 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 538,462 TOTAL: ADULT MALE CUSTODY OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,001,538,240 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 11,878,665 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 9,070.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,013,416,905 ADULT AND YOUTHFUL OFFENDER FEMALE CUSTODY OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 50,034,640 665 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 731.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 65,738,002 666 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 362,726 667 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,155,561 668 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 65,000 669 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,185,650 670 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 124,752 671 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FOOD SERVICE AND PRODUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 154,732 672 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,505,129 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,497 673 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,796,152 674 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 845,422 675 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 84,764 676 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,788 TOTAL: ADULT AND YOUTHFUL OFFENDER FEMALE CUSTODY OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 85,020,678 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,497 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 731.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 85,027,175 MALE YOUTHFUL OFFENDER CUSTODY OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 19,058,968 676A SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 299.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,719,912 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 17,752 676B OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 52,199 676C EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 198,012 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,511 676D OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,185 676E FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,253,242 676F SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 70,696 676G SPECIAL CATEGORIES FOOD SERVICE AND PRODUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,596 676H SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 628,324 676I SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,163,070 676J SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 370,219 676K SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,752 676L SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,627 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 822 TOTAL: MALE YOUTHFUL OFFENDER CUSTODY OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 30,560,834 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,085 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 299.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 30,584,919 SPECIALTY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 415,801,040 676M SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 7,655.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 638,658,494 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,140 676N OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 840,608 676O EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,970,249 676P OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 720,000 676Q FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,760,105 676R SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,692,670 676S SPECIAL CATEGORIES FOOD SERVICE AND PRODUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,072,824 676T SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 73,801,378 676U SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,543,719 676V SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,572,112 676W SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 636,014 676X SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 198,818 TOTAL: SPECIALTY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 800,466,991 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,140 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 7,655.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 800,470,131 PUBLIC SERVICE WORKSQUADS AND WORK RELEASE TRANSITION APPROVED SALARY RATE 56,638,853 677 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 483.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,666,241 FROM CORRECTIONAL WORK PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,201,920 The general revenue funds provided in Specific Appropriation 677 are provided to the Department of Corrections to ensure all public worksquads currently funded with general revenue funds are maintained. The department shall, before eliminating any general revenue funded public worksquad officer positions, submit its proposal to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee for review and approval. 678 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 461,631 FROM CORRECTIONAL WORK PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 40,000 679 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000 680 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 609,093 681 LUMP SUM CORRECTIONAL WORK PROGRAMS POSITIONS 5.00 FROM CORRECTIONAL WORK PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 420,151 Funds and positions provided in Specific Appropriation 681, from the Correctional Work Program Trust Fund, are provided for interagency contracted services funded by state agencies or local governments. These positions and funds shall be released as needed upon execution of interagency community service work squad contracts. 682 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,558,041 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 682, no privately operated work release center may house more than 200 inmates at any given time. In addition, each facility with 100 or more inmates in its work release program must have at least one certified correctional officer on premises at all times. A person who was a certified correctional officer at the time of separating or retiring from the Department of Corrections in good standing is considered to be a certified correctional officer for this purpose unless his or her certification has been revoked for misconduct. 683 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FOOD SERVICE AND PRODUCTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 38,618 684 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,893,094 685 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 123,153 686 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,096,471 687 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC MONITORING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,754,883 688 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,702 689 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,140 FROM CORRECTIONAL WORK PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,511 TOTAL: PUBLIC SERVICE WORKSQUADS AND WORK RELEASE TRANSITION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 78,218,067 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,675,582 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 488.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 79,893,649 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 33,469,118 690 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 499.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,968,207 691 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,032,901 692 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,611,144 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 200,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 127,505 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 692, $200,000 in recurring funds from the Administrative Trust Fund is provided for the purchase of recruitment items to assist with helping recruit correctional officers. 693 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 203,220 695 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,461,951 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 695, $9,300,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to continue enhancements to the victim notification system (VINE). Fiscally constrained counties are eligible for new funding through December 31, 2026. The enhancements shall provide proactive text, e-mail, and portal access; provide access to bi-directional, real-time communication with law enforcement and applicable criminal justice agencies; provide automated multi-agency notification to be shared with partner agencies; and include a survey tool to gauge victim satisfaction. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 695, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the automated staffing, time management and scheduling system. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 695, $3,000,000 in recurring funds and $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to continue the department's search and analytics technology to enhance public safety program. At a minimum, the program shall provide the department with real-time intelligence from authorized correctional facility communications to mitigate security threats and identify and thwart criminal activity. The program shall capture 100 percent of authorized correctional facility phone conversations and be able to retain historical communications in their entirety. The department shall prepare a report on the number and type of threats mitigated through the use of the program through the end of calendar year 2026. The report shall be submitted to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by March 1, 2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 695, $750,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the following programs: Children of Inmates, Inc. Family Strengthening and Reunification Project (SF 1192)......................... 350,000 Inmate Cellular Communication Interdiction Program (SF 3434)................................................... 350,000 Before and After A/C Pilot Program (SF 2158).............. 50,000 696 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ON-CALL FEES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 374,781 697 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,767,309 698 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,227,068 699 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 353,146 700 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 300,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 700 are provided to Union County for payment in lieu of taxes. 701 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,886 702 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31,884 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 79,352,497 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 327,505 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 499.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 79,680,002 CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR APPROVED SALARY RATE 27,201,618 703 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 529.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,096,139 704 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 88,088,090 705 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 229,061 706 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,939,726 707 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,784,258 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 707, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to continue to provide contracted maintenance staffing for a pilot program at two correctional institutions. The department shall evaluate the cost-effectiveness of contracting for maintenance services, including an analysis of productivity and service quality, as compared to employing state maintenance staff. The department shall submit a report detailing its findings to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by March 1, 2027. 708 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,091,889 709 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 135,387 710 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,224 711 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,198,894 712 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 68,900 713 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,548 714 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES - LEASE PURCHASE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,779,275 Funds in Specific Appropriation 714 are provided for payments required under the master lease purchase agreement used to secure the certificates of participation issued to finance or refinance the following correctional facilities: Graceville Correctional Facility (Jackson County)......... 1,555,250 Blackwater River Correctional Facility (Santa Rosa County) 8,550,625 Lake Correctional Institution Mental Health Facility (Lake County)........................................... 9,237,900 Other Department of Corrections facilities................ 20,435,500 Mayo Annex (Lafayette County), Suwannee Annex (Suwannee County), Lowell Reception Center (Marion County), Lancaster Secure Housing Unit (Gilchrist County), Liberty Work Camp (Liberty County), Franklin Work Camp (Franklin County), Cross City Work Camp (Dixie County), Okeechobee Work Camp (Okeechobee County), New River Work Camp (Bradford County), Santa Rosa Work Camp (Santa Rosa County), Hollywood Work Release Center (Broward County), Kissimmee Work Release Center (Osceola County), Lake City Work Release Center (Columbia County), Santa Fe Work Release Center (Alachua County), Everglades Re-Entry Center (Dade County), Baker Re-Entry Center (Baker County), and Pat Thomas Re-Entry Center (Gadsden County). The funds in Specific Appropriation 714 reflect a reduction of $11,092,075 based on savings realized from bond refinancing. 715 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT REPAIRS/ RENOVATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 750,000 716 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAJOR REPAIRS, RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS TO MAJOR INSTITUTIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,850,000 The recurring general revenue funds appropriated in Specific Appropriation 716 and the nonrecurring general revenue funds appropriated in Specific Appropriation 718 are provided for correctional facilities capital improvements and shall be placed in reserve. The Department of Corrections shall develop an annual correctional facilities capital improvement plan for the use of these funds. At a minimum, the plan shall detail all new fixed capital outlay projects to be requested by the department for the fiscal year, ranked by priority order of completion, location, and estimated cost of completion. The plan must also provide an update on all on-going projects previously funded by the Legislature. All new projects estimated to exceed $5 million shall be outsourced to a competitively procured construction management firm. The department shall submit the correctional facilities capital improvement plan annually by August 1 of each fiscal year to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget. The Department of Corrections shall request the release of funds pursuant to the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. 717 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CORRECTION, ENVIRONMENTAL DEFICIENCIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 718 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY NEW CORRECTIONAL HOUSING UNITS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 52,000,000 718A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 200,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 718A are provided for the Before and After A/C Pilot Program (SF 2158). TOTAL: CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 286,236,391 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 529.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 286,236,391 CONTRACTOR-OPERATED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 723 through 725, $1,217,262 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided as payment in lieu of ad valorem taxation for distribution to local government taxing authorities. Funding is provided as follows: Bay Correctional Facility................................. 269,324 Moore Haven Correctional Facility......................... 339,242 South Bay Correctional Facility........................... 275,560 Gadsden Correctional Facility............................. 100,000 Lake City Correctional Facility........................... 90,236 Sago Palm Facility........................................ 142,900 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 723 through 725, $418,810 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to pay for subject matter experts to conduct medical and mental health site visits of the medical departments of contractor-operated correctional facilities and perform quality management audits. Contractor-Operated Adult Male Operations................. 304,929 Contractor-Operated Adult and Youthful Female Offender Custody Operations...................................... 63,420 Contractor-Operated Male Youthful Offender Custody Operations.............................................. 50,461 APPROVED SALARY RATE 942,276 719 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 15.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,312,405 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 124,131 720 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 237,959 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 14,175 721 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,725 722 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31,000 723 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADULT MALE CUSTODY CONTRACTOR - OPERATED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 182,739,590 FROM CONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,952,561 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 723, $3,651,975 in nonrecurring funds from the Privately Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare Trust Fund is provided to the Florida Department of Corrections for the provision of enhanced in-prison and post-release recidivism reduction programs at the Moore Haven, South Bay and Blackwater River correctional facilities based on the "Continuum of Care Program" which is currently provided to individuals at and who are released from those facilities. With these recidivism reduction programs in place, the above referenced facilities shall be known as Correctional and Rehabilitation Facilities (SF 2106). 724 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADULT AND YOUTHFUL OFFENDER FEMALE CUSTODY CONTRACTOR - OPERATED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,575,973 FROM CONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 597,359 725 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MALE YOUTHFUL OFFENDER CUSTODY CONTRACTOR - OPERATED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,173,039 FROM CONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 195,403 726 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,767 727 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PRIVATE PRISONS - MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR REIMBURSEMENT FROM CONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000,000 728 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,509 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 470 TOTAL: CONTRACTOR-OPERATED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 248,111,967 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,884,099 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 15.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 258,996,066 PROGRAM: COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS COMMUNITY SUPERVISION APPROVED SALARY RATE 161,969,535 729 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 2,782.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 246,222,793 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 180,464 730 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,185 731 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,336,007 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 500,000 732 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31,941 733 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,060,274 734 SPECIAL CATEGORIES BUILDING/OFFICE RENT PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,707,423 Funds in Specific Appropriation 734 are provided to continue rent payments for individual private contracts for rental of office/building space at a rate not to exceed the rate for each contract in effect on June 30, 2026. Price level increases specifically appropriated may be used for rent payments for Department of Corrections' private leases in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. No other funds are appropriated or shall be transferred by the department for such increases. 735 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 770,130 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 735, $500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for Home Builders Institute (HBI) Building Careers for Inmates & Returning Citizens (SF 2418). 736 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ON-CALL FEES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,614,242 737 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,600,000 738 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,385,370 739 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 932,013 740 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC MONITORING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,397,381 741 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 237,353 TOTAL: COMMUNITY SUPERVISION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 300,302,112 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 680,464 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,782.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 300,982,576 PROGRAM: HEALTH SERVICES INMATE HEALTH SERVICES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 742 through 755, the Department of Corrections is authorized to transfer funds to the Agency for Health Care Administration from the General Revenue Fund to purchase prescription drugs pursuant to the parameters of the Canadian Prescription Drug Importation Program, as authorized by section 381.02035, Florida Statutes, for use in state programs as outlined in section 381.02035(3), Florida Statutes. APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,980,391 742 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 152.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,894,240 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 828,565 743 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 390,040 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,474 744 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,583,214 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 55,060 745 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 250,000 746 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,951,678 747 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ON-CALL FEES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 124,166 748 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,000 749 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 361,546 750 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INMATE HEALTH SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 620,905,859 Funds in Specific Appropriation 750 are provided exclusively to pay for contracted statewide inmate health care services. 751 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TREATMENT OF INMATES - GENERAL DRUGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 52,430,179 752 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TREATMENT OF INMATES - PSYCHOTROPIC DRUGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,914,371 753 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TREATMENT OF INMATES - INFECTIOUS DISEASE DRUGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 74,877,529 754 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,037 755 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 274,105 TOTAL: INMATE HEALTH SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 777,009,964 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 885,099 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 152.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 777,895,063 PROGRAM: EDUCATION AND PROGRAMS ADULT SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION, EVALUATION AND TREATMENT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,182,040 756 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 33.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,748,596 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 223,162 757 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 65,370 758 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 68,648 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 75,000 759 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,000 760 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT DRUG ABUSE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,818,682 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,200,000 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,600,000 761 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000 762 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 47,900 TOTAL: ADULT SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION, EVALUATION AND TREATMENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 17,685,826 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,168,532 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 33.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,854,358 BASIC EDUCATION SKILLS From the funds in Specific Appropriation 763 through 772, the Department of Corrections shall provide a report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by January 4, 2027, on the use of funds appropriated for Fiscal Years 2023-2024 through 2025-2026 for the expansion of educational and career and technical education programs. APPROVED SALARY RATE 42,319,899 763 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 714.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 52,774,064 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,575,524 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 866,808 764 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 159,324 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 200,568 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,376,472 765 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,658,074 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,065,000 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,957,002 766 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 200,000 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,126,262 767 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,401,698 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,341,203 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 18,688,650 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 767, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to CareerSource Florida for the development and implementation of a vocational curriculum for inmates in the Florida Correctional System. 768 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 110,000 769 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 205,875 770 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 95,000 771 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 176,638 772 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 143,327 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,094 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,271 TOTAL: BASIC EDUCATION SKILLS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 62,824,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 30,401,854 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 714.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 93,225,854 ADULT OFFENDER TRANSITION, REHABILITATION AND SUPPORT APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,339,909 773 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 82.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,651,715 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 313,783 774 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,503,840 775 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 347,770 776 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,417,781 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,200,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 776, by December 1, 2026, all re-entry programs must provide the following information to the Department of Corrections: the population served by the program including information relating to the criminal history, age, employment history, and education level of inmates served; the services provided to inmates as part of the program; the cost per inmate to provide those services; any available recidivism rates; and any matching funds or in-kind contributions provided to the program. The department shall compile this information and submit a report to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by January 4, 2027. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 776, $8,225,000 in recurring funds and $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for Operation New Hope's re-entry initiatives, as authorized in section 944.7071, Florida Statutes (recurring base appropriations project) (SF 3761). Through its pre-release program (Ready4Release), Operation New Hope will provide pre-release case management, transition planning, career development, and referrals for incarcerated inmates at any Department of Corrections' facility that is within 12 months of release. Through its post-release program (Ready4Work), Operation New Hope will provide post-release services including case management, career development, life skills training, job skills training, family reunification, financial assistance, and job placement assistance to ex-offenders on community supervision, or ex-offenders that have served time at a Department of Corrections' facility, or participants of any State Attorney's Office Diversion or Pretrial Intervention Programs, or adult ex-offenders who served time in a Department of Juvenile Justice facility. The Ready4Work program may provide post-release services to any ex-offender that is within travel distance to a service location. Through its virtual post-release program (Ready4Success), Operation New Hope will provide services to ex-offenders using a virtual (telecommunications, email, online software and video conferencing) platform for ex-offenders not able to attend in-person training. Funds used for the administrative services will be 18 percent of the total funds appropriated. Funds may be used for startup activities for opening of new Ready4Work locations in Florida but may not exceed 25 percent of the total funds appropriated. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 776, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the inspHire program (recurring base appropriations project). Funds used for the administrative services shall be 15 percent of total funds appropriated. inspHire will provide pre-release risk assessment, a plan-of-care, professional development, life management skills training, and referrals for incarcerated inmates who may be eligible for inspHire program services upon release. inspHire will provide post-release services including case management, professional development, life management skills training, job skills training, family reunification, financial assistance and job placement assistance to individuals who are on community supervision, or have served time at a Department of Corrections' facility, or participants of any State Attorney's Office Diversion or Pretrial Intervention Programs, or adult ex-offenders who served time in a Department of Juvenile Justice facility. The inspHire program may provide post-release services to any individual with a lived incarceration experience who is within travel distance to the inspHire location and transitioning back into the communities and workforce of Hillsborough, Pinellas, Pasco, or Polk counties. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 776, $200,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund may be used for Horizon volunteer faith and character peer-to-peer program activities, including Computer Lab, Quest, and Realizing Educational Emotional and Finance Smarts (REEFS) transition programs (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 776, $1,200,000 in recurring funds from the State-Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare Trust Fund is provided for the Certified Peer Specialist Gateway Pilot Program at participating facilities. 776A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,850,000 FROM CONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 470,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 776A, nonrecurring funds are provided for the following appropriations projects: Gateway FDC - Day Reporting Center Pilot Expansion (SF 2860)................................................... 350,000 Palm Beach County RESTORE Reentry Program (SF 1015)....... 350,000 Persevere - Training, Access and Careers through Technology (TACT) Program (SF 1002)..................... 350,000 Re-Entry Alliance Pensacola (REAP) - Escambia and Santa Rosa Counties (SF 3452)................................. 450,000 Reimagined Resources for Re-entry (SF 2179)............... 470,000 Workforce Education on Virtual Reality Devices (SF 1641).. 350,000 777 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,000 778 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 45,544 779 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,261 779A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM CONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 779A, $200,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Privately Operated Inmate Welfare Trust Fund is provided for Reimagined Resources for Re-entry (SF 2179). TOTAL: ADULT OFFENDER TRANSITION, REHABILITATION AND SUPPORT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,853,911 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,183,783 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 82.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,037,694 COMMUNITY SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION, EVALUATION, AND TREATMENT SERVICES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 780 through 782, the Department of Corrections may contract with Florida's managing entities, as authorized by section 394.9082, Florida Statutes, for the statewide management of behavioral health treatment for offenders under community supervision. The entities shall work with the department to develop service delivery strategies that will improve the coordination, integration, and management of behavioral health services to offenders. 780 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 300,000 781 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,100,137 FROM STATE-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 781, $500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for naltrexone extended-release injectable medication to treat alcohol and opioid dependence within the Department of Corrections (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 781, $606,375 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to WestCare Gulf Coast - Florida, Inc. for the Davis-Bradley Mental Health Overlay: Integrated Behavioral Health Treatment Services (SF 3728). 782 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED DRUG TREATMENT/REHABILITATION PROGRAMS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,966,164 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 400,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 782, $600,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for Cove Behavioral Health in Hillsborough County (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 782, $1,226,212 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for community-based treatment provider rate increases. 782A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 350,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 782A are provided for the Davis-Bradley Community-Involvement Center Kitchen Remodel (SF 3795). TOTAL: COMMUNITY SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION, EVALUATION, AND TREATMENT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 30,716,301 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,400,000 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 33,116,301 TOTAL: CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,952,989,905 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 79,057,477 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 23,729.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,032,047,382 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 1,391,790,502 FLORIDA COMMISSION ON OFFENDER REVIEW PROGRAM: POST-INCARCERATION ENFORCEMENT AND VICTIMS RIGHTS APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,349,795 783 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 164.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,735,733 784 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 213,096 785 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 959,700 786 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,771 787 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 260,927 788 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 393,756 789 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 71,622 790 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,600 791 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 59,581 792 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,472,514 TOTAL: PROGRAM: POST-INCARCERATION ENFORCEMENT AND VICTIMS RIGHTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 18,211,300 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 164.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 18,211,300 TOTAL: FLORIDA COMMISSION ON OFFENDER REVIEW FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 18,211,300 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 164.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 18,211,300 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 9,349,795 JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM: JUSTICE ADMINISTRATIVE COMMISSION EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,371,631 793 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 93.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,893,499 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 459,685 794 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 52,416 795 LUMP SUM RESERVE - STATE ATTORNEYS WITH REASSIGNED DEATH PENALTY CASES POSITIONS 10.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 599,860 Funds and positions in Specific Appropriation 795 are provided for a state attorney to prosecute a capital felony case that has been reassigned to that state attorney's office. A state attorney must submit a budget amendment, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to request the allocation of positions and funds from the lump sum appropriation category. A state attorney may continue to use positions and funds allocated from the lump sum appropriation category until such time that the state attorney ceases the prosecution of the reassigned capital felony case. If funds in this specific appropriation are unobligated in the last quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the State Attorney in the Ninth Judicial Circuit may submit a budget amendment to request the transfer of the remaining appropriation on a nonrecurring basis. 795A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,500,000 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 750,000 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 796 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FOSTER CARE CITIZEN REVIEW PANEL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 342,160 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 276,000 797 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SEXUAL PREDATOR CIVIL COMMITMENT LITIGATION COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,950,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 797 are provided for attorney fees and case-related expenses associated with prosecuting and defending sexual predator civil commitment cases. Case-related expenses are limited to expert witness fees, clinical evaluations, court reporter costs, and foreign language interpreters. The maximum amount to be paid by the Justice Administrative Commission for medical experts for sexual predator civil commitment cases is $200 per hour and all related travel costs must be apportioned to the associated case. 798 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,398,765 799 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 710 800 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REIMBURSEMENT OF EXPENDITURES RELATED TO CIRCUIT AND COUNTY JURIES REQUIRED BY STATUTE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,985,600 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 800, $5,485,600 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Clerks of Court for reimbursements for Injunctions for Protection, Baker Act, Marchman Act, and Sexually Violent Predator cases. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 800, $11,700,000 in recurring funds and $4,800,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to the Clerks of Court for reimbursement for jury expenditures. 801 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEGAL REPRESENTATION FOR DEPENDENT CHILDREN WITH SPECIAL NEEDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,765,500 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,201,500 Funds in Specific Appropriation 801 shall be used by the Justice Administrative Commission to contract with attorneys to represent dependent children with disabilities in, or being considered for placement in, skilled nursing facilities and dependent children with certain special needs as specified in section 39.01305, Florida Statutes. The implementation of registries, as well as the appointment and compensation of private attorneys appointed pursuant to section 39.01305, Florida Statutes, shall be governed by the provisions of sections 27.40 and 27.5304, Florida Statutes. The flat fee amount for compensation shall not exceed $1,450 per child per year. No other appropriation shall be used to pay attorney fees and related expenses for attorneys representing dependent children with disabilities and appointments under section 39.01305, Florida Statutes. 802 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENTS FOR QUALIFIED TRANSPORTATION BENEFITS PROGRAM FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 400,000 803 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,088,034 Funds in Specific Appropriation 803 are provided for the Public Defenders' due process costs as specified in section 29.006, Florida Statutes. Funds shall initially be credited for the use of each circuit in the amounts listed below and may be adjusted pursuant to the provisions of section 29.015, Florida Statutes. 1st Judicial Circuit...................................... 894,043 2nd Judicial Circuit...................................... 774,114 3rd Judicial Circuit...................................... 185,078 4th Judicial Circuit...................................... 1,515,394 5th Judicial Circuit...................................... 1,335,206 6th Judicial Circuit...................................... 1,716,049 7th Judicial Circuit...................................... 847,951 8th Judicial Circuit...................................... 569,810 9th Judicial Circuit...................................... 1,824,858 10th Judicial Circuit..................................... 914,630 11th Judicial Circuit..................................... 4,013,169 12th Judicial Circuit..................................... 802,485 13th Judicial Circuit..................................... 2,201,456 14th Judicial Circuit..................................... 356,816 15th Judicial Circuit..................................... 909,094 16th Judicial Circuit..................................... 124,680 17th Judicial Circuit..................................... 1,705,936 18th Judicial Circuit..................................... 699,398 19th Judicial Circuit..................................... 653,387 20th Judicial Circuit..................................... 1,044,480 From the funds credited for use in the following circuits, the amounts specified below shall be transferred in quarterly increments within 10 days after the beginning of each quarter to the Office of the State Courts Administrator on behalf of the circuit courts operating shared court reporting or interpreter services: 1st Judicial Circuit...................................... 190,611 2nd Judicial Circuit...................................... 323,698 3rd Judicial Circuit...................................... 52,251 6th Judicial Circuit...................................... 103,493 7th Judicial Circuit...................................... 37,310 8th Judicial Circuit...................................... 83,798 9th Judicial Circuit...................................... 481,878 10th Judicial Circuit..................................... 68,975 11th Judicial Circuit..................................... 121,996 12th Judicial Circuit..................................... 153,205 13th Judicial Circuit..................................... 784,106 14th Judicial Circuit..................................... 134,089 15th Judicial Circuit..................................... 93,646 16th Judicial Circuit..................................... 74,983 17th Judicial Circuit..................................... 60,851 804 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CHILD DEPENDENCY AND CIVIL CONFLICT CASE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,772,188 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,671,528 Funds in Specific Appropriation 804 are provided for case fees and expenses of court-appointed counsel in civil conflict cases and child dependency cases. The maximum flat fee to be paid by the Justice Administrative Commission for attorney fees for the following dependency and civil cases is set as follows: Admission of Inmate to Mental Health Facility............. 300 Adult Protective Services Act - Ch. 415, F.S.............. 500 Baker Act/Mental Health - Ch. 394, F.S.................... 400 CINS/FINS - Ch. 984, F.S.................................. 750 Civil Appeals............................................. 400 Dependency - Up to 1 Year................................. 1,450 Dependency - Each Year after 1st Year..................... 700 Dependency - No Petition Filed or Dismissed at Shelter.... 200 Dependency Appeals........................................ 1,800 Developmentally Disabled Adult - Ch. 393, F.S............. 400 Emancipation - Section 743.015, F.S....................... 400 Guardianship - Emergency - Ch. 744, F.S................... 400 Guardianship - Ch. 744, F.S............................... 400 Marchman Act/Substance Abuse - Ch. 397, F.S............... 300 Medical Procedures - Section 394.459(3), F.S.............. 400 Parental Notification of Abortion Act..................... 400 Termination of Parental Rights - Ch. 39, F.S. - Up to 1 Year.................................................... 1,800 Termination of Parental Rights - Ch. 39, F.S. - Each Year after first Year........................................ 700 Termination of Parental Rights - Ch. 63, F.S. - Up to 1 Year.................................................... 1,800 Termination of Parental Rights - Ch. 63, F.S. - Each Year after first Year........................................ 700 Termination of Parental Rights Appeals.................... 3,500 Tuberculosis - Ch. 392, F.S............................... 300 805 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,252,078 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 315,200 806 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 42,878 808 SPECIAL CATEGORIES POST-CONVICTION CAPITAL COLLATERAL CASES - REGISTRY ATTORNEYS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 988,310 809 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ATTORNEY PAYMENTS OVER FLAT FEE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,667,589 810 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CRIMINAL CONFLICT CASE COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,039,539 Funds in Specific Appropriation 810 are provided for case fees as specified in section 27.5304, Florida Statutes, and expenses as specified in section 29.007, Florida Statutes, of court-appointed counsel for indigent criminal defendants and for due process costs for those individuals the court finds indigent for costs. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 810, a total of $216,934 shall be transferred in quarterly increments within 10 days after the beginning of each quarter to the Office of the State Courts Administrator on behalf of the circuit courts operating shared court reporting and interpreter services. The maximum flat fee to be paid by the Justice Administrative Commission for attorney fees for criminal conflict cases is set as follows: Postconviction - Rules 3.850, 3.801 & 3.800, Fl.R.Crim. Proc.................................................... 1,250 Capital - 1st Degree Murder (Lead Counsel)................ 25,000 Capital - 1st Degree Murder (Co-Counsel).................. 25,000 Capital - 1st Degree Murder (Non-Death)................... 15,000 Capital Sexual Battery.................................... 4,000 Capital Appeals........................................... 9,000 Contempt Proceedings...................................... 500 Criminal Traffic.......................................... 500 Extradition............................................... 625 Felony - Life............................................. 5,000 Felony - Life (RICO)...................................... 9,000 Felony - Noncapital Murder................................ 15,000 Felony - Punishable By Life............................... 2,500 Felony - Punishable By Life (RICO)........................ 6,000 Felony 1st Degree......................................... 1,875 Felony 1st Degree (RICO).................................. 5,000 Felony 2nd Degree......................................... 1,250 Felony 3rd Degree......................................... 935 Felony or Misdemeanor - No Information Filed.............. 500 Felony Appeals............................................ 1,875 Juvenile Delinquency - 1st Degree Felony.................. 1,500 Juvenile Delinquency - 2nd Degree Felony.................. 1,250 Juvenile Delinquency - 3rd Degree Felony.................. 1,000 Juvenile Delinquency - Felony Life........................ 2,000 Juvenile Delinquency - Misdemeanor........................ 750 Juvenile Delinquency - Direct File or No Petition Filed... 500 Juvenile Delinquency Appeals.............................. 1,250 Misdemeanor............................................... 500 Misdemeanor Appeals....................................... 935 Violation of Probation - Felony (Includes VOCC)........... 625 Violation of Probation - Misdemeanor (Includes VOCC)...... 375 Violation of Probation (VOCC) Juvenile Delinquency........ 500 Funds for costs and related expenses to be paid through Specific Appropriations 804 and 810 shall be subject to the following: The hourly rate for mitigation specialists in capital death cases shall not exceed $75.00 per hour. The maximum amount to be paid by the Justice Administrative Commission for non-attorney due process services other than those specified shall not exceed the rates in effect for the 2007-2008 fiscal year. The maximum amount to be paid by the Justice Administrative Commission for investigators is $50 per hour. The maximum amount to be paid for court reporting and transcribing costs is as follows: 1. Deposition Appearance fees: 1st hour: $75.00; thereafter $50.00 per hour. The fee is to be paid to the court reporter whether or not a transcript is ordered. 2. Deposition transcript fee (Original & one copy): 10 business day delivery: $5.95 per page 5 business day delivery: $7.95 per page 24 hours delivery: $10.95 per page Additional copies: $2.00 per page 3. Appellate/hearing/trial transcript fee (Original & all copies needed with a minimum of 2 copies): 10 business day delivery: $7.95 per page 5 business day delivery: $10.95 per page 24 hours delivery: $13.95 per page Copies (when original previously ordered): $2.00 per page 4. Transcription from tapes or audio recordings (other than depositions or hearings): Either $50 per hour listening fee or $6.50 per page, whichever is greater. 5. Video Services: $150 per hour per location with two-hour minimum. 811 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,766,646 Funds in Specific Appropriation 811 are provided for the State Attorneys' due process costs as specified in section 29.005, Florida Statutes. Funds shall initially be credited for the use of each circuit in the amounts listed below, and may be adjusted pursuant to the provisions of section 29.015, Florida Statutes. 1st Judicial Circuit...................................... 755,469 2nd Judicial Circuit...................................... 401,729 3rd Judicial Circuit...................................... 149,399 4th Judicial Circuit...................................... 551,795 5th Judicial Circuit...................................... 415,044 6th Judicial Circuit...................................... 747,499 7th Judicial Circuit...................................... 562,468 8th Judicial Circuit...................................... 282,874 9th Judicial Circuit...................................... 592,379 10th Judicial Circuit..................................... 368,614 11th Judicial Circuit..................................... 2,639,783 12th Judicial Circuit..................................... 333,152 13th Judicial Circuit..................................... 710,639 14th Judicial Circuit..................................... 140,799 15th Judicial Circuit..................................... 885,042 16th Judicial Circuit..................................... 109,381 17th Judicial Circuit..................................... 1,578,239 18th Judicial Circuit..................................... 450,342 19th Judicial Circuit..................................... 323,086 20th Judicial Circuit..................................... 768,913 From the funds credited for use in the following circuits, the amounts specified below shall be transferred in quarterly increments within 10 days after the beginning of each quarter to the Office of the State Courts Administrator on behalf of the circuit courts operating shared court reporting or interpreter services: 1st Judicial Circuit...................................... 18,232 2nd Judicial Circuit...................................... 16,650 3rd Judicial Circuit...................................... 10,456 6th Judicial Circuit...................................... 25,443 7th Judicial Circuit...................................... 12,818 8th Judicial Circuit...................................... 21,937 9th Judicial Circuit...................................... 26,007 10th Judicial Circuit..................................... 3,980 11th Judicial Circuit..................................... 426,986 12th Judicial Circuit..................................... 19,650 13th Judicial Circuit..................................... 45,716 15th Judicial Circuit..................................... 61,252 16th Judicial Circuit..................................... 4,315 17th Judicial Circuit..................................... 20,081 812 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CAPITAL RESENTENCING DUE PROCESS FUNDING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 250,000 The funds in Specific Appropriation 812 are provided for due process and contracted services related specifically to death penalty proceedings as a result of the Florida Supreme Court decision in Hurst v. State, 202 So. 3d 40 (Fla. 2016). 813 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY AND PUBLIC DEFENDER TRAINING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,529 814 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 600 815 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DUE PROCESS CONTINGENCY FUND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 816 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,238 817 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,230 817A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 350,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 817A are provided for the Hillsborough County Clerk Record Center (SF 3571). TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 139,290,369 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,573,913 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 103.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 153,864,282 PROGRAM: STATEWIDE GUARDIAN AD LITEM OFFICE Funds and positions in Specific Appropriations 818 through 825 shall first be used to represent children involved in dependency proceedings. Once all children in dependency proceedings are represented, the funds may be used to represent children in other proceedings as authorized by law. APPROVED SALARY RATE 44,324,001 818 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 812.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 59,513,832 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,616,986 819 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,495,923 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 751,204 820 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COURT SYSTEM SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,045,656 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 820, $100,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to support the Voices for Children Foundation in Miami-Dade County (recurring base appropriations project). 821 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,861,484 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 370,690 822 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 743,923 823 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GUARDIAN AD LITEM ATTORNEY TRAINING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 225,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 823 may be used by the Guardian ad Litem to provide training for public and private sector attorneys and related personnel who represent children with disabilities in Florida's dependency care system. 824 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 192,196 825 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 165,560 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATEWIDE GUARDIAN AD LITEM OFFICE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 68,243,574 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,738,880 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 812.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 73,982,454 STATE ATTORNEYS The Prosecution Coordination Office's budgeting, legal, training and education needs may be funded by each State Attorney's office within the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 826 through 977. Funding for this office shall not exceed $450,000 from the State Attorney's Revenue Trust Fund. From the positions and funds appropriated from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund in Specific Appropriations 849, 890, 905, 920, 935, 950, and 971, $2,858,668 is provided to prosecute insurance fraud cases and $811,592 is provided to prosecute workers compensation insurance fraud cases, as follows: Insurance Fraud Cases Fourth Judicial Circuit (3 positions)..................... 373,042 Ninth Judicial Circuit (5 positions)...................... 642,096 Eleventh Judicial Circuit (5 positions)................... 928,682 Thirteenth Judicial Circuit (2 positions)................. 226,335 Fifteenth Judicial Circuit (2 positions).................. 238,328 Seventeenth Judicial Circuit (2 positions)................ 238,328 Twentieth Judicial Circuit (2 positions).................. 211,857 Workers Compensation Insurance Fraud Eleventh Judicial Circuit (2 positions)................... 198,461 Thirteenth Judicial Circuit (2 positions)................. 185,199 Fifteenth Judicial Circuit (2 positions).................. 213,966 Seventeenth Judicial Circuit (2 positions)................ 213,966 Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Financial Services shall release 25 percent of the funds to each state attorney's office contingent upon provision by each state attorney's office of the previous quarter's reporting of required information pursuant to a fully executed Memorandum of Understanding between the Department of Financial Services and each state attorney's office. Prior to subsequent quarterly fund releases, each state attorney's office must submit the following caseload data to the Department of Financial Services: the percentage of cases prosecuted of the total number of cases referred by the department; the number of cases not prosecuted, and the reasons prosecution was not pursued; the staff assigned to each case; expenditures made; the current status of each case; the number of allotted positions filled during the quarter; and the percentage of time each filled position's workload was dedicated to insurance fraud or workers' compensation insurance fraud matters. The Department of Financial Services shall determine if case activity warrants the continued release of funds, and shall not release funds for a position that was vacant or for which funds were utilized on services other than the prosecution of insurance fraud and workers' compensation insurance fraud during the quarter, and shall prorate the release of funds for positions that were filled for only a portion of the quarter. PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FIRST JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 16,685,383 826 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 242.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,684,281 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,554,591 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,321,391 827 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,811 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 390,081 829 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 526,288 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,215 830 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 105,190 831 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,404 832 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,562 833 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 47,850 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,432 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,562 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FIRST JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,314,196 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,409,462 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 242.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,723,658 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SECOND JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,048,039 834 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 115.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,836,382 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 731,629 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 905 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,128,394 835 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,576 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 201,768 836 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,741 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 490,129 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 50,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 71,519 837 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 119,770 838 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,675 839 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,000 840 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,829 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,193 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SECOND JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 11,901,528 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,816,994 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 115.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,718,522 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - THIRD JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,259,952 841 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 69.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,772,053 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 957,717 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 389,439 842 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 66,609 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,257 844 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 124,842 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,786 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,701 845 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 111,955 846 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,034 847 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 19,000 848 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,987 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,067 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - THIRD JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,937,916 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,608,556 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 69.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,546,472 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FOURTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 25,877,479 849 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 334.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,602,677 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,895,630 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,424,999 850 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 146,388 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 57,049 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 34,425 852 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 748,271 853 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 279,262 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,008 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 610,800 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 61,845 854 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 214,375 855 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,404 856 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,150 857 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 70,850 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,269 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,416 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FOURTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 33,116,731 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,089,087 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 334.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 40,205,818 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FIFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 18,257,565 858 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 246.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,244,191 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,218,950 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,337,032 859 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 75,264 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 342,707 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 208,981 861 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 403,895 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 61,250 862 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 150,862 863 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,740 864 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 80,872 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,000 865 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 45,510 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,996 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FIFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 23,860,472 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,344,778 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 246.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 30,205,250 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SIXTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 34,670,091 866 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 482.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 42,210,784 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,813,637 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,610,654 867 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 59,973 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 141,311 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 134,676 869 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 556,067 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 732,453 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 454,866 870 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 120,363 871 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,724 872 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,520 873 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 906 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 98,450 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,173 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SIXTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 42,862,974 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,118,583 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 482.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 54,981,557 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 20,135,890 874 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 202.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,914,298 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,148,365 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 39 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,019,325 875 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,770 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 76,640 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,351 877 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 393,474 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 118,874 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 878 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 78,169 879 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 42,964 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,380 880 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,381 881 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 55,725 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,177 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 691 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 25,459,612 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,508,011 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 202.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 29,967,623 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - EIGHTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,337,603 882 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 126.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,528,875 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,472,845 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 804,533 883 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,920 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,863 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,607 884 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 885 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 154,761 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 74,396 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,040 886 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,021 887 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,506 888 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,306 889 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 31,344 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,114 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - EIGHTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,737,368 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,583,763 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 126.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,321,131 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - NINTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 27,841,260 890 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 385.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,224,039 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,253,992 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,853,876 891 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 154,068 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 302,839 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 251,051 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,039 892 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 636,079 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 197,029 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 279,234 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 318,966 893 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 117,892 894 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,662 895 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 55,416 896 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 86,279 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,376 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - NINTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 38,097,264 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,663,573 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 385.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 43,760,837 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - TENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,850,412 897 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 225.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,674,196 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,513,391 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,508,721 898 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 51,229 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 220,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,000 900 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 215,679 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 500,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 247,201 901 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 234,914 902 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,665 903 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,883 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,000 904 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,986 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,547 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,759 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - TENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 18,994,638 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,287,533 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 225.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 29,282,171 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - ELEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 89,220,828 905 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,244.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 76,123,114 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,859,386 FROM CHILD SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . 41,117,862 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 76,487 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,532,456 906 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 122,991 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 261,824 FROM CHILD SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . 100,185 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,000 907 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 240,000 908 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,279,434 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,424,069 FROM CHILD SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . 4,773,578 FROM CIVIL RICO TRUST FUND . . . . . 200,020 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 203,700 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,861,531 909 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 278,987 FROM CHILD SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . 148,676 910 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,000 911 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 188,597 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,082 FROM CHILD SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . 82,698 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - ELEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 77,737,136 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 64,207,541 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,244.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 141,944,677 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - TWELFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 13,838,857 912 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 195.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,800,434 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,742,147 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,421,444 913 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,569 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 81,314 915 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 329,181 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 224,785 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 98,035 916 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 66,890 917 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,361 918 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,267 919 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,721 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,745 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,061 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - TWELFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 18,194,533 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,639,421 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 195.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,833,954 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - THIRTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 25,332,694 920 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 297.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,821,205 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,916,515 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,077,676 921 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 59,360 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 144,580 921A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 160,000 922 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 377,790 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 103,510 923 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 94,668 924 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,627 925 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 580 926 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 80,254 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,235 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - THIRTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 33,275,562 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,579,438 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 297.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 39,855,000 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FOURTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,718,189 927 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 122.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,444,736 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,243,986 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 711,639 928 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,268 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 237,179 930 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 241,412 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,518 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,000 931 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 56,966 932 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,697 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,292 933 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,295 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,048 934 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 441 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,547 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,310 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FOURTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 11,706,849 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,326,485 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 122.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,033,334 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FIFTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 26,014,530 935 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 339.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,962,681 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,626,210 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,711,428 936 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 77,136 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 250,976 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 47,574 938 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 301,694 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 223,129 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 126,608 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 83,002 939 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 369,848 940 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,569 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 7,500 941 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,000 942 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 67,938 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,972 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,787 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - FIFTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 33,430,018 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,517,034 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 339.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 40,947,052 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SIXTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,657,007 943 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 57.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,025,339 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 642,254 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 603,206 944 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,067 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 78,888 945 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 135,049 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 54,509 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 106,514 946 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,730 947 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,041 948 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,615 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,000 949 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,909 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SIXTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,187,111 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,515,010 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 57.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,702,121 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SEVENTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 38,793,508 950 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 499.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 51,027,074 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,166,682 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,672,049 951 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 126,652 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 311,092 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 78,278 952 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 589,116 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 816,244 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 354,837 953 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 112,583 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 157,976 954 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,491 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,510 955 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 121,483 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,000 956 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 105,400 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,420 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,867 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - SEVENTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 52,105,799 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,573,955 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 499.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 60,679,754 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - EIGHTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 20,896,009 957 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 278.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,148,684 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,885,632 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,456,826 958 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,035 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,732 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,977 960 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 410,738 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 888,459 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 64,924 961 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 90,140 962 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,587 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,514 963 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,130 964 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 58,230 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,141 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,057 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - EIGHTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 27,658,404 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,429,402 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 278.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 33,087,806 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - NINETEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,104,197 965 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 165.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,354,034 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,988,552 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,243,824 966 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 231,772 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,588 967 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 61,526 968 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,578 969 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,454 970 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31,091 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,282 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,114 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - NINETEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 14,625,929 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,319,886 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 165.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,945,815 PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - TWENTIETH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 22,960,086 971 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 298.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,167,939 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,562,189 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,767,505 972 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 48,560 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 81,849 972A AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - CRIME PREVENTION INITIATIVES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,000 974 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE ATTORNEY OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 470,374 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 94,087 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 42,944 975 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 134,275 976 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,524 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,000 977 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 59,799 FROM STATE ATTORNEYS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,165 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,838 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE ATTORNEYS - TWENTIETH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 28,769,196 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,735,852 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 298.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 36,505,048 PUBLIC DEFENDERS The Public Defenders Coordination Office's budgeting, legal, training, and education needs may be funded by each Public Defender's office within the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 978 through 1125. Funding for this office shall not exceed $450,000 from the Indigent Criminal Defense Trust Fund. Each Public Defender Office must submit to the Justice Administrative Commission (JAC) a quarterly report detailing the number of appointed and reappointed cases by case type, number of cases closed by case type, number of clients represented, and number of conflicts by case type and the basis for the conflict. The JAC shall compile the reports into a tab delineated spreadsheet format and submit the results to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Criminal and Civil Justice and the chair of the House of Representatives Justice Budget Subcommittee within three weeks after the end of each quarter. PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FIRST JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,278,658 978 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 126.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,950,425 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 329,402 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,952,386 979 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,269 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,785 981 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 191,206 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 500 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 231,265 982 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 95,432 983 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,770 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,770 984 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,331 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 493 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,253 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FIRST JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,195,001 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,678,286 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 126.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,873,287 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SECOND JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,108,073 985 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 86.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,582,683 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 256,666 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 458,838 986 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,527 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 157,710 987 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 72,073 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,677 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 40,000 988 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,663 989 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,067 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000 990 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,464 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 334 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 574 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SECOND JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 8,703,814 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 958,462 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 86.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 9,662,276 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - THIRD JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,891,580 991 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 34.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,986,157 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 339,304 992 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 260 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 104,711 994 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 73,392 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 66,031 995 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 33,403 996 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,560 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,000 997 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 227 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,575 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - THIRD JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,072,596 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 564,024 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 34.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,636,620 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FOURTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,364,294 998 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 156.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,403,037 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 506,296 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,242,025 999 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,958 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 155,589 1001 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 197,334 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,549 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1002 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 101,154 1003 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,305 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,305 1004 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,599 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 729 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,872 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FOURTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 16,661,233 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,130,519 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 156.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 18,791,752 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FIFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,443,739 1005 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 127.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,591,114 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,268,022 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,325,952 1006 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,325 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 254,070 1008 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,359 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 230,316 1009 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,798 1010 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,680 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,321 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,051 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FIFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 11,638,794 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,177,214 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 127.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,816,008 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SIXTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,831,232 1011 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 238.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,607,687 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 985,807 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,419,327 1012 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 81,859 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,986 1014 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 333,965 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 781,794 1015 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 105,194 1016 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 65,000 1017 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 48,181 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,405 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,562 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SIXTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 23,071,692 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,388,075 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 238.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,459,767 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,778,942 1018 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 107.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,490,461 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,976 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 785,261 1019 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 29,043 1020 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 76,731 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 135,000 1021 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,610 1022 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,589 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,589 1023 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,451 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 288 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,663 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,606,263 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,191,430 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 107.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,797,693 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - EIGHTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,742,478 1024 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 74.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,078,838 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,644 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 724,041 1025 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,234 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,745 1026 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 102,968 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 65,000 1027 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,483 1028 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,751 1029 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,622 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,298 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - EIGHTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 8,210,662 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 863,962 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 74.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 9,074,624 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - NINTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,550,576 1030 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 210.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,458,451 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,332,559 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,576,490 1031 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 49,917 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 53,726 1032 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 221,816 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 1033 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,782 1034 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000 1035 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 43,129 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,452 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,282 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - NINTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,773,313 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,212,291 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 210.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 25,985,604 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - TENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,488,041 1036 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 106.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,870,844 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 714,802 1037 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,918 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 103,726 1038 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,237 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 335,000 1039 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,824 1040 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,132 1041 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 441 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,415 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - TENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 11,902,440 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,219,899 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 106.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,122,339 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - ELEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 31,952,005 1042 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 370.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,955,615 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,158,979 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,884,241 1043 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,861 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 72,608 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 119,285 1044 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 185,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 325,000 1045 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 184,473 1046 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,333 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,333 1047 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 82,355 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,851 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,292 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - ELEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 41,250,164 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,761,062 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 370.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 46,011,226 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - TWELFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,328,246 1048 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 95.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,110,104 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,788,918 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 968,484 1049 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,574 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 49,748 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,186 1050 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 172,605 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 282,072 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 1051 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,782 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 117,377 1052 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,438 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 780 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,448 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - TWELFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 9,321,721 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,238,795 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 95.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,560,516 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - THIRTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,190,284 1053 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 210.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,215,790 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,213,049 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,795,345 1054 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 127,629 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 156,304 1055 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 381,876 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 119,288 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 411,976 1056 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 54,048 1057 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,835 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,835 1058 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 51,343 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - THIRTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,728,130 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,804,188 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 210.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,532,318 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FOURTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,322,977 1059 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 67.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,058,524 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 73,969 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 954,965 1060 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,893 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 205,826 1061 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 86,782 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,000 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 237,184 1062 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 17,510 1063 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,855 1064 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,323 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 185 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,659 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FOURTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 7,173,522 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,509,153 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 67.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,682,675 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FIFTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,671,413 1065 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 177.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,974,933 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 178,222 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,677,389 1066 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 32,085 1066A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,000 1067 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 119,103 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 147,000 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 299,174 1068 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,399 1069 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,375 1070 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 460 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,549 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - FIFTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 19,094,036 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,474,653 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 177.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,568,689 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SIXTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,088,222 1071 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 35.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,333,539 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 145,992 1072 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,227 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,745 1073 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 84,846 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,000 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 40,000 1074 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,385 1075 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,170 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,520 1076 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,377 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SIXTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,426,782 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 242,019 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 35.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,668,801 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SEVENTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 18,317,905 1077 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 223.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,499,315 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,251,125 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,777,491 1078 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 85,319 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 51,863 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 103,726 1079 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 134,365 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 1080 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 56,101 1081 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,812 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,812 1082 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 48,759 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 635 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 766 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - SEVENTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 23,771,570 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,445,519 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 223.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 27,217,089 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - EIGHTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,981,125 1083 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 113.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,499,224 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 377,830 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,471 1084 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 113,269 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 152,759 1086 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 373,704 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 121,296 1087 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,951 1088 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,236 1089 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,202 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 920 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,480 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - EIGHTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,008,399 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,694,943 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 113.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,703,342 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - NINETEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,549,785 1090 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 78.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,818,687 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 765,279 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,278,058 1091 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,067 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,261 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 62,236 1092 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,202 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 499,800 1093 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 29,460 1094 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,640 1095 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,282 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 933 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,134 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - NINETEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 7,875,238 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,647,801 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 78.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,523,039 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - TWENTIETH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 10,906,757 1096 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 137.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,034,733 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,779,645 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,129,825 1097 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,660 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,745 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 134,844 1098 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 183,882 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 168,092 1099 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 51,389 1100 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,730 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,730 1101 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,719 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,626 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,497 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS - TWENTIETH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 13,272,724 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,303,393 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 137.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,576,117 PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE DIVISION PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - SECOND JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,248,660 1102 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 35.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,571,935 1103 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,901 1104 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 68,971 1105 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,535 1106 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,862 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - SECOND JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,673,204 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 35.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,673,204 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - SEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,056,901 1107 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 33.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,479,721 1108 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,028 1109 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 56,907 1110 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,840 1111 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,415 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - SEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,568,911 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 33.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,568,911 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - TENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,478,913 1112 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 46.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,459,969 1113 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 755,116 1114 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 144,849 1115 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,568 1116 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,233 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - TENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 7,373,735 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 46.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,373,735 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - ELEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,870,177 1117 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 15.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,625,225 1118 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 518 1119 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,161 1120 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,493 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - ELEVENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 2,637,397 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 15.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,637,397 PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - FIFTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,924,694 1121 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 37.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,328,782 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 175,904 1122 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 58,683 1123 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DEFENDER OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 44,974 FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 150,000 1124 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INDIGENT CRIMINAL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 660 1125 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,311 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PUBLIC DEFENDERS APPELLATE - FIFTEENTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 5,382,067 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 385,247 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 37.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,767,314 CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSELS PROGRAM: NORTHERN REGIONAL COUNSEL CAPITAL JUSTICE REPRESENTATION - NORTHERN REGIONAL COUNSEL APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,201,857 1126 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 27.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,202,807 1127 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CASE RELATED COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 860,199 1128 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 377,030 FROM CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSEL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 124,796 1129 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,307 1130 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000 1131 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,042 TOTAL: CAPITAL JUSTICE REPRESENTATION - NORTHERN REGIONAL COUNSEL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,450,385 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 124,796 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,575,181 PROGRAM: MIDDLE REGIONAL COUNSEL CAPITAL JUSTICE REPRESENTATION - MIDDLE REGIONAL COUNSEL APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,756,788 1132 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 39.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,381,912 1133 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 83,139 1134 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CASE RELATED COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 365,002 FROM CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSEL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 300,000 1135 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 683,259 FROM CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSEL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 133,742 1136 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSEL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 6,768 1137 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 375 1138 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,435 TOTAL: CAPITAL JUSTICE REPRESENTATION - MIDDLE REGIONAL COUNSEL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,523,122 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 440,510 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 39.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,963,632 PROGRAM: SOUTHERN REGIONAL COUNSEL CAPITAL JUSTICE REPRESENTATION - SOUTHERN REGIONAL COUNSEL APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,965,921 1139 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 31.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,079,349 1140 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,890 1141 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CASE RELATED COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 315,621 FROM CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSEL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 333,877 1142 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 673,096 FROM CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSEL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 135,000 1143 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM CAPITAL COLLATERAL REGIONAL COUNSEL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 5,510 1144 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 702 1145 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,415 TOTAL: CAPITAL JUSTICE REPRESENTATION - SOUTHERN REGIONAL COUNSEL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 5,102,073 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 474,387 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 31.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,576,460 CRIMINAL CONFLICT AND CIVIL REGIONAL COUNSELS Each Office of Criminal Conflict and Civil Regional Counsel must submit to the Justice Administrative Commission (JAC) a quarterly report detailing the number of appointed and reappointed cases by case type, number of cases closed by case type, number of clients represented, and number of conflicts by case type and the basis for the conflict. The JAC shall compile the reports into a tab delineated spreadsheet format and submit the results to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Criminal and Civil Justice and the House of Representatives Justice Budget Subcommittee within three weeks after the end of each quarter. PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - FIRST APPROVED SALARY RATE 10,926,742 1146 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 137.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,201,675 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,567,767 1147 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 277,908 1148 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,493,454 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,000 FROM INDIGENT CIVIL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 75,000 1149 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,906 1150 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,245,765 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,129 1151 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 57,228 1152 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,846 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,299 TOTAL: PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - FIRST FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 17,344,782 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,726,195 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 137.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,070,977 PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - SECOND APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,234,444 1153 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 132.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,780,775 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,397,639 1154 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 133,857 1155 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,108,360 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 274,725 1156 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,929 1157 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 524,657 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,000 FROM INDIGENT CIVIL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 75,000 1158 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 49,816 1159 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,283 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,885 TOTAL: PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - SECOND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 16,667,677 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,779,249 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 132.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,446,926 PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - THIRD APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,718,099 1160 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 76.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,717,397 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 859,003 1161 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 92,272 1162 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 527,696 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 69,742 FROM INDIGENT CIVIL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,000 1163 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,596 1164 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 670,291 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 145,020 1165 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,100 1166 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,433 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,828 TOTAL: PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - THIRD FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 10,037,785 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,096,593 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 76.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 11,134,378 PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - FOURTH APPROVED SALARY RATE 10,741,228 1167 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 131.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,617,264 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,888,495 1168 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 77,759 1169 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,448,089 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 220,406 FROM INDIGENT CIVIL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 40,980 1170 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATING EXPENDITURES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,570 1171 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,147 1172 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,137,865 1173 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,682 1174 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,725 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,596 TOTAL: PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - FOURTH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 17,354,101 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,152,477 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 131.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,506,578 PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - FIFTH APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,444,686 1175 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 104.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,910,404 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,516,664 1176 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 146,068 1177 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,800 1178 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,040,929 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 51,701 FROM INDIGENT CIVIL DEFENSE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1179 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 208,162 1180 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 746,667 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,000 1181 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,000 1182 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,762 TOTAL: PROGRAM: REGIONAL CONFLICT COUNSEL - FIFTH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 14,085,992 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,704,165 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 104.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,790,157 TOTAL: JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,153,466,504 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 254,976,464 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 10,451.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,408,442,968 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 797,550,653 JUVENILE JUSTICE, DEPARTMENT OF From the funds in Specific Appropriations 1183 through 1273A, the Department of Juvenile Justice may work within its existing budget, including applicable grants, to implement any corrective action plan that is developed as a result of a Prison Rape Elimination Act audit conducted in accordance with Title 28, Part 115 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department may request additional resources required through the Legislative Budget Request process as defined in chapter 216, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 1183 through 1273A, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall conduct a comprehensive statewide review of county-level data, including a gap analysis of services and programs available across all counties in the state, to evaluate the implementation of juvenile justice policies at the county level. As a result of such review, the department shall prepare a report that includes benchmarking of counties' performance on factors that demonstrate how a county is supporting the department's strategic goals of preventing and diverting more youth from entering the juvenile justice system; providing appropriate, less restrictive, community-based sanctions and services; reserving serious sanctions for youth who pose the greatest risk to public safety; and focusing on rehabilitation. The report shall also include recommendations and strategies that can be implemented by the department or counties to address any identified deficiencies and to assist in developing a statewide, coordinated response across all of Florida's communities to support the department's strategic goals. A copy of the report shall be submitted to the Governor, President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by January 4, 2027. PROGRAM: JUVENILE DETENTION PROGRAM DETENTION CENTERS APPROVED SALARY RATE 77,963,763 1183 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,447.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 52,598,989 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,482,903 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 57,092,028 1184 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 612,913 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 262,392 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,032,313 1185 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,388,031 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 748,073 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 575,000 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,210,968 1186 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,035 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 144,220 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 49,941 1187 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 601,418 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 700,000 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,900,497 1188 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - GRANTS TO FISCALLY CONSTRAINED COUNTIES FOR DETENTION CENTER COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,883,853 1189 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,385,595 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 40,690 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,483,075 1190 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,228,512 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 11,166,006 1191 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,810,038 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 3,511,467 1192 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 137,364 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 134,195 1193 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 178,254 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 13,055 FROM SHARED COUNTY/STATE JUVENILE DETENTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 365,311 1194 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE JUSTICE MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR - STATE OWNED BUILDINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,708,640 TOTAL: DETENTION CENTERS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 81,549,642 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 85,912,134 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,447.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 167,461,776 PROGRAM: PROBATION AND COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS PROGRAM COMMUNITY SUPERVISION APPROVED SALARY RATE 45,317,870 1197 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 822.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 62,642,622 1198 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 640,352 1199 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,037,206 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,092,851 1200 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000 1201 SPECIAL CATEGORIES JUVENILE REDIRECTIONS PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,975,716 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1201 are provided for services to youth at risk of commitment who are eligible to be placed in evidence-based and other alternative programs for family therapy services. These services shall be provided as an alternative to commitment. The Department of Juvenile Justice and each participating court may jointly develop criteria to identify youth appropriate for diversion into the Redirections Program. 1202 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 852,545 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 42,490 1203 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,380,580 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 90,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,200,000 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 81,995 1204 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 234,381 1205 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 254,465 TOTAL: COMMUNITY SUPERVISION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 109,022,867 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,507,336 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 822.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 112,530,203 COMMUNITY INTERVENTIONS AND SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 26,522,076 1206 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 493.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 36,876,591 1207 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,160,581 1208 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,323,924 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,381,642 1209 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000 1210 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 625,680 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,856 1211 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,590,712 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 118,489 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1211, $678,602 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for Integrated Care and Coordination for Youth (ICCY) (SF 1712). 1212 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,274,949 1213 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 154,680 1214 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 157,405 1215 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE JUSTICE MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR - STATE OWNED BUILDINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 270,000 TOTAL: COMMUNITY INTERVENTIONS AND SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 64,439,522 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,527,987 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 493.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 65,967,509 PROGRAM: OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY/ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,346,774 1217 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 177.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,200,782 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 867 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 369,058 1218 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 662,052 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 42,249 FROM JUVENILE JUSTICE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,508 1219 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,618,759 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 140,119 FROM JUVENILE JUSTICE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 1220 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000 1221 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,159,285 1222 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,406 1223 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 542,571 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1224 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 338,849 FROM JUVENILE JUSTICE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,421,058 1225 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 265,998 1226 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 56,523 FROM JUVENILE JUSTICE TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,973 1227 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 58,241 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,719 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,914,466 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,391,551 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 177.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,306,017 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,196,355 1228 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 59.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,598,299 1229 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,363,078 1230 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000 1231 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,486,855 1232 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 229,104 1233 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 940,600 1234 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,673 1235 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,315 1236 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 19,368 1237 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 718,534 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,400,826 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 59.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,400,826 PROGRAM: ACCOUNTABILITY AND PROGRAM SUPPORT CONTRACTING AND QUALITY IMPROVEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,019,299 1238 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 121.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,396,307 1239 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 71,217 1240 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 656,222 1241 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 36,313 1242 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,320 1243 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,115 TOTAL: CONTRACTING AND QUALITY IMPROVEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 11,219,494 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 121.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 11,219,494 PROGRAM: RESIDENTIAL CORRECTIONS PROGRAM From the funds in Specific Appropriations 1244 through 1259, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide a monthly residential resource utilization report that identifies operating capacity, current placements, vacant placements, number of youth awaiting placement, and the percent of use for all residential commitment beds. The department may increase or decrease beds or overlay services provided the change will better serve taxpayers and the youth under its care. Notification and justification of changes will be provided to the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee prior to implementing any change. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 1244 through 1259, the department must also provide a report of serious incidents to the Governor, President of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of Representatives on a quarterly basis. The report must include, at a minimum: the number of incidents and allegations of staff abuse or abuse by another child, including whether or not an allegation was substantiated; descriptions of incidents or allegations of such abuse that resulted in physical injury or significant psychological trauma, or that involved deprivation of food, water, or medical care; and the failure of a provider to report incidents or allegations within required timeframes established by the department. The department must also immediately report the death or serious bodily injury of a youth in a secure or non-secure residential program to the Governor, President of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of Representatives and may make any additional reports that it determines to be appropriate based upon the seriousness of an incident or allegation. MODERATE-RISK RESIDENTIAL COMMITMENT 1244 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 94,412 1245 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA SCHOLARS ACADEMY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,206,293 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,834,183 1246 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 129,295,178 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 650,000 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,631,505 1247 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 55,392 1248 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE JUSTICE MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR - STATE OWNED BUILDINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,581,000 TOTAL: MODERATE-RISK RESIDENTIAL COMMITMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 160,232,275 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,115,688 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 172,347,963 SECURE RESIDENTIAL COMMITMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,310,308 1251 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 89.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,681,270 1252 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,450 1253 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,082,395 1254 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 636,191 1255 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,028,609 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,000,000 1256 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 109,176 1257 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,020 1258 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 51,614 1259 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE JUSTICE MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR - STATE OWNED BUILDINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,589,000 TOTAL: SECURE RESIDENTIAL COMMITMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 47,248,725 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 38,000,000 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 89.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 85,248,725 PROGRAM: PREVENTION AND VICTIM SERVICES DELINQUENCY PREVENTION AND DIVERSION APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,313,258 1261 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 20.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,116,258 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 260,998 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 643,315 1262 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 125,533 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 306,361 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 161,492 1263 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 199,035 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 127,134 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 289,430 1264 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - INVEST IN CHILDREN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000 FROM JUVENILE CRIME PREVENTION AND EARLY INTERVENTION TRUST FUND . . . 1,262,903 1265 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,200 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,200 1266 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PACE CENTERS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,700,045 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,305,995 1267 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEGISLATIVE INITIATIVES TO REDUCE AND PREVENT JUVENILE CRIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,518,991 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1267, $3,205,364 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the following recurring base appropriations projects: AMIkids Gender Specific Prevention Programs............... 3,170,626 Pasco Association for Challenged Kids Summer Camp......... 34,738 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1267, $6,250,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the following programs: Adolescent and Family Outpatient Program Expansion (SF 1147)................................................... 250,000 Adolescent Crisis Mentoring Transportation Services - Caring and Secure Transport (SF 2907)................... 1,500,000 AMIkids Family Centric Services (SF 1529)................. 1,060,000 Delinquency Diversion Program for Children and Youth in Foster Care (SF 1146)................................... 1,000,000 Duval County Youth Mentorship Program (SF 2818)........... 350,000 Florida Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs - Positive Youth Development Program (SF 1940)........................... 350,000 IMPOWER Juvenile Drug Court (SF 1237)..................... 565,000 Nassau County Youth Alternative to Secured Detention (S.W.E.A.T.) (SF 3339).................................. 125,000 Pasco, Pinellas, Hillsborough Counties Youth Advocate Program (SF 2892)....................................... 350,000 Wayne Provision: Career and Life Skills for Reentering Youth (SF 2849)......................................... 350,000 Youth and Police Initiative (YPI) Train the Trainer Model (SF 2740)............................................... 350,000 1268 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,631 1269 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,030,968 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,861,836 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,947,682 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1269, $2,733,686 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to continue the pilot program to serve youth who are dually involved in the delinquency and dependency systems. The department shall competitively procure behavioral health services from a non-profit organization with experience in providing intensive in-home, wraparound services for youth who are dually involved in the delinquency and dependency systems. The pilot program shall, at a minimum, include unified case managers cross-trained in child welfare and juvenile justice and an intensive in-home multidisciplinary team of behavioral health professionals to deliver necessary therapeutic interventions and care coordination across agencies and systems. The department shall coordinate with the Department of Children and Families to establish procedures for the pilot program. The department shall require the selected provider to collect and report output and outcome data on clients and their families including, but not limited to, measures of academic performance, criminal involvement, and placement stability. 1270 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CHILDREN/FAMILIES IN NEED OF SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 44,904,198 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 250,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,018,791 FROM SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 386,497 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1270, $1,215,156 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to competitively procure a contract for up to ten beds for physically-secure placements for youth being served by the statewide children in need of services/families in need of services (CINS/FINS) program. Additionally, the CINS/FINS provider shall demonstrate that it has considered local, non-traditional, non-residential delinquency prevention service providers including, but not limited to, grassroots, community, and faith-based organizations, to subcontract and deliver non-residential CINS/FINS services to eligible youth as defined in chapter 984 and section 1003.27, Florida Statutes, to include areas with high ratios of juvenile arrests per youth 10 to 17 years of age. Such services may be offered throughout the judicial circuit served by the CINS/FINS provider. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1270, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Stop Now and Plan (SNAP) to serve youth who are dually served, or at risk to be dually served, in both the delinquency and dependency systems (SF 1256). Criteria for admittance to the program shall be set by the Department of Juvenile Justice in conjunction with the Department of Children and Families. 1271 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,500 1272 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PRODIGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 656,509 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 843,491 1273 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,971 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,686 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,569 1273A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1273A are provided for the following nonrecurring fixed capital outlay projects: Pace Center for Girls Hernando Building (SF 3266)......... 1,000,000 Pace Center for Girls Manatee Building (SF 2176).......... 2,500,000 TOTAL: DELINQUENCY PREVENTION AND DIVERSION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 90,794,139 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 25,684,080 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 20.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 116,478,219 TOTAL: JUVENILE JUSTICE, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 598,821,956 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 169,138,776 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 3,229.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 767,960,732 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 182,989,703 LAW ENFORCEMENT, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,853,005 1274 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 172.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,813,148 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 268,888 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 988,098 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 11,312,117 1275 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,617 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 209,015 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 79,738 1276 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 854,171 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 173,285 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 603,808 1277 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - CRIMINAL INVESTIGATIONS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 150,000 1278 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY IMPROVEMENT (NCHIP-NARIP) - STATE GOVERNMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,910,162 1279 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY IMPROVEMENT (NCHIP-NARIP) - LOCAL UNITS OF GOVERNMENTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,529,434 1280 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - PROJECT SAFE NEIGHBORHOODS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,500,000 1281 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - BYRNE JUSTICE ASSISTANCE GRANT (JAG) PROGRAM - LOCAL UNITS OF GOVERNMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,835,535 1282 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,616 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,242 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 250 1283 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,650 1284 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,813 1285 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 367,480 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 50,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 218,573 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 152,372 1286 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DOMESTIC SECURITY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 500 1287 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 300,000 1288 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,319 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 159,047 1289 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 1290 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 98,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,000 1291 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - BYRNE JUSTICE ASSISTANCE GRANT (JAG) PROGRAM - STATE GOVERNMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,500,000 1292 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AID - RESIDENTIAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT PROGRAM - LOCAL UNITS OF GOVERNMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,247,724 1293 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AID - RESIDENTIAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT PROGRAM - STATE AGENCY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,100,000 1294 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,617 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,030 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,102 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 34,099 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,529,618 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 42,147,832 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 172.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 48,677,450 AVIATION SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 607,729 1295 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 4.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 676,487 1296 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,063,829 1297 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 72,500 1298 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 787 1299 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SPECIAL CATEGORIES - AIRCRAFT MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,160,148 1300 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,290,576 1301 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,236 TOTAL: AVIATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,264,776 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 787 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,265,563 PROGRAM: FLORIDA CAPITOL POLICE PROGRAM CAPITOL POLICE SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,771,736 1302 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 110.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,938,619 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 9,482,222 1303 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 30,287 1304 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 198,053 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 491,729 1305 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 85,369 1306 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 30,500 1307 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 61,984 1308 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CAPITOL COMPLEX SECURITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,360 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 42,100 1309 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 173,543 1310 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,160 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 64,944 1311 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,000 1312 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,616 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 29,177 TOTAL: CAPITOL POLICE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,165,808 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,495,855 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 110.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,661,663 PROGRAM: INVESTIGATIONS AND FORENSIC SCIENCE PROGRAM CRIME LAB SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 33,398,253 1313 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 470.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 43,763,788 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 651,408 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 15,621 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 6,875,477 1314 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 66,041 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 177,146 1315 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,605,734 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,800,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,028,158 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1315, the Department of Law Enforcement is authorized to distribute rape kits to local law enforcement agencies and rape crisis centers statewide at no cost. In addition, the department is authorized to use additional federal funds and any other available funds contained in Specific Appropriation 1315 for the purpose of processing rape kits. 1316 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - CRIMINAL INVESTIGATIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 741,091 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,379,702 1317 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 643,183 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,223,100 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,332,304 1318 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 168,960 1319 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,738,433 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,687,721 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 500,000 1320 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 294,300 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 404,976 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 150,000 1321 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 78,031 1322 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,000 1323 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 137,463 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,571 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,768 TOTAL: CRIME LAB SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 60,467,902 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,052,074 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 470.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 84,519,976 INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 1325 through 1340, the Department of Law Enforcement shall investigate all use of force incidents that result in the death of an inmate who is in the custody of the Department of Corrections. This requirement applies to uses of force by a law enforcement officer or a correctional officer as those terms are defined in section 943.10, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 1325 through 1340, within existing and any new resources, the Department of Law Enforcement shall, with the agreement of the head of the local law enforcement agency, investigate all use of force incidents that occur within the state and that result in death or serious bodily injury. This requirement applies to uses of force by a law enforcement officer or a correctional officer as those terms are defined in section 943.10, Florida Statutes. APPROVED SALARY RATE 64,879,349 1325 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 733.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 79,892,768 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 229,386 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 14,942,203 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 1325, 1327, 1336, and 1340, the sum of $962,904 from the General Revenue Fund, and ten positions with associated salary rate are provided to perform investigations relating to elections fraud allegations. When these positions are not working on election related investigations, they must be utilized to accelerate ongoing criminal investigations referred to the department by other state agencies or the Chief Inspector General prior to any other assignment. 1326 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 904,869 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 347,947 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 184,214 1327 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,767,110 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 835,647 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 500,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,500 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,948,858 FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 300,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 1327 from the Forfeiture and Investigative Support Trust Fund, up to $25,000 per case, but not exceeding $150,000 in total for all cases, may be expended for rewards leading to the capture of fugitives, if such funds are available. 1328 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 167,894 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 189,509 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 200,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,000 FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 1329 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 501,091 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 600,000 1330 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - S.A.F.E. IN FLORIDA PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 1331 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,396,019 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,329,600 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 25,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,123,990 FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1332 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DOMESTIC SECURITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,290,267 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,522,672 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 500,000 1333 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 51,689,748 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 620,000 FROM FORFEITURE AND INVESTIGATIVE SUPPORT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 300,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1333, $10,132,874 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the following projects: Active Hearing Protection for Florida Sheriffs (SF 2922).. 500,000 Ballistic Film (SF 1046).................................. 200,000 Belle Isle Police Department Emergency Response Equipment Upgrade (SF 2632)....................................... 350,000 Blue 4 Blue (SF 2200)..................................... 150,000 Bowling Green Police Department Public Safety Equipment (SF 3568)............................................... 120,600 BSO RapidHit ID DNA Systems (SF 2945)..................... 348,000 City of Bartow Emergency Rescue Command Vehicle (SF 3576). 486,635 City of Bradenton Police Department Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) Upgrades (SF 2116)....................... 500,000 City of New Smyrna Beach Vehicle Threat Mitigation (SF 1852)................................................... 350,000 City of Palmetto Police Dispatch Software (SF 2115)....... 380,000 City of Sweetwater Police Technology Upgrades (SF 1861)... 350,000 Columbia County Sheriff's Department Truck Purchase (SF 3014)................................................... 124,000 FDLE Intelligence Suite (SF 3688)......................... 700,000 Florida Department of Law Enforcement - Active Shooter Training (SF 3219)...................................... 350,000 Florida Law Enforcement Partnership: Miccosukee Police Fleet Enhancement (SF 3369)............................. 485,000 Hollywood Police Marine Public Safety Initiative (SF 1673) 187,900 Jacksonville Sheriff's Office - Drone First Responder Program (SF 2785)....................................... 610,000 K9s United (SF 2826)...................................... 200,000 MDSO Real Estate Fraud Squad (SF 1226).................... 250,000 Medley Police Department Next Generation Radios (SF 2215). 470,739 Miami Springs Police Department Radio Communications Upgrade (SF 2192)....................................... 500,000 Palm Beach County Sheriff's Office Forensic Genetic Testing Phase 2 (SF 2061)............................... 625,000 Project Cold Case (SF 2714)............................... 250,000 Satellite Beach - Law Enforcement In-Car Cameras, Body Worn Cameras, and Electronic Control Devices (SF 1017).. 750,000 Tampa Jewish Community Preventative Security Initiative (SF 2295)............................................... 525,000 Wandering Rescue and Prevention Project (SF 1001)......... 250,000 Washington County Sheriff's Office Emergency Management Trucks (SF 3226)........................................ 120,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1333, $2,100,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the department to implement an automated analysis and workload optimization solution to support the Internet Crimes Against Children Task Forces. The solution shall ingest and integrate disparate investigative data, automate casework, and provide a standard dashboard visualization for law enforcement investigating crimes against children (SF 3791). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1333, $3,000,000 in recurring funds and $300,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to the department to award grants that support the reduction of internet crimes against children. Funds may be used for, but are not limited to, expenditures related to personnel, overtime, travel, and technology. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1333, $25,906,874 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for salary increases for deputy sheriffs and correctional officers employed by sheriff's offices or boards of county commissioners in fiscally constrained counties, as defined in section 218.67(1), Florida Statutes, as follows: Baker County Sheriff's Office............................. 552,543 Bradford County Sheriff's Office.......................... 858,176 Calhoun County Sheriff's Office........................... 491,216 Columbia County Sheriff's Office.......................... 1,685,240 Desoto County Sheriff's Office............................ 698,952 Dixie County Sheriff's Office............................. 814,881 Franklin County Sheriff's Office.......................... 659,604 Gadsden County Sheriff's Office........................... 783,826 Gilchrist County Sheriff's Office......................... 601,256 Glades County Sheriff's Office............................ 490,396 Gulf County Sheriff's Office.............................. 310,643 Hamilton County Sheriff's Office.......................... 357,607 Hardee County Sheriff's Office............................ 513,744 Hendry County Sheriff's Office............................ 1,082,369 Highlands County Sheriff's Office......................... 1,703,321 Holmes County Sheriff's Office............................ 952,276 Jackson County Sheriff's Office........................... 1,493,408 Jefferson County Sheriff's Office......................... 435,058 Lafayette County Sheriff's Office......................... 430,343 Levy County Sheriff's Office.............................. 1,336,260 Liberty County Sheriff's Office........................... 699,496 Madison County Sheriff's Office........................... 744,108 Okeechobee County Sheriff's Office........................ 1,396,974 Putnam County Sheriff's Office............................ 1,870,818 Suwannee County Sheriff's Office.......................... 964,145 Taylor County Sheriff's Office............................ 494,538 Union County Sheriff's Office............................. 454,552 Wakulla County Sheriff's Office........................... 1,096,737 Washington County Sheriff's Office........................ 913,246 Jackson County Board of County Commissioners.............. 884,243 Gulf County Board of County Commissioners................. 136,898 Funds shall be distributed in quarterly advances and reconciled at the conclusion of each state fiscal year. By October 6, 2026, the sheriff's offices shall report to the Florida Sheriff's Association how funds were distributed to officers. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1333, $5,000,000 in recurring funds and $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to the department for a statewide law enforcement apprenticeship grant program, certified by the Florida Department of Education, to recruit, select, train, certify, and retain Florida sheriff deputy candidates who lack the funds to attend a certified law enforcement academy within the state. The department shall award grants to eligible local law enforcement agencies; however, fiscally constrained counties should receive priority for funds. 1334 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 314,125 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,250 FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1335 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 557,024 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 225,363 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,014,796 1336 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 546,461 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 82,152 1336A SPECIAL CATEGORIES DRONE AS FIRST RESPONDER GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,500,000 1337 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SPECIAL CATEGORIES - AIRCRAFT MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 792,874 1338 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 117,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,400 1340 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 227,899 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 36,271 1340A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,343,750 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1340A are provided for the following nonrecurring fixed capital outlay projects: Charlotte County Sheriff's Warehouse (SF 3675)............ 2,000,000 City of Lighthouse Point - Public Safety Improvement Project (SF 1665)....................................... 225,000 City of Perry Police Department Evidence Management and Security Facility (SF 1553)............................. 250,000 City of Riviera Beach Law Enforcement Training Center (SF 2368)................................................... 350,000 Columbia County Jail Improvements Project (SF 3018)....... 750,000 DeSoto County Jail (SF 3541).............................. 400,000 Diamond of Dreams (SF 2563)............................... 500,000 District 21 Medical Examiner Facility (SF 2433)........... 500,000 Dixie County Sheriff's Office Multipurpose Evidence Building - Phase 3 (SF 2178)............................ 618,750 Florida Sheriff's Youth Learning Center (Phase 3) (SF 1525)................................................... 5,000,000 Franklin County Sheriff's-Judicial & Rehabilitative Center for Excellence (SF 1758)......................... 1,500,000 Gulf County Sheriff's Office Dispatch and Training Center (SF 1507)............................................... 750,000 Hardee County Courthouse Critical Hardening Safety Sally Port (SF 3558).......................................... 2,500,000 Hardening and Renovation of the Jefferson County Jail Facility (SF 1452)...................................... 1,750,000 Hillsborough County Sheriff's Office Regional Training and Leadership Center (SF 2298)......................... 350,000 Holmes County Jail and Rehabilitation Expansion (SF 3220). 1,000,000 Kissimmee Police Evidence Room Expansion Project (SF 1597) 750,000 Madison County Sheriff's Office Consolidated Emergency Communications Center Relocation (SF 2109).............. 1,000,000 Martin County Sheriff's Office PRISM Public Safety-First Mental Health Initiative (SF 2033)...................... 350,000 Nassau County Sheriff's Office K-9 Regional Training Center Public Safety Training Complex (SF 2690)......... 500,000 New Hurricane-Rated Police Department (SF 3101)........... 400,000 New Police Station/Staff Emergency Shelter/City Hall - Municipal Complex (SF 3569)............................. 6,000,000 North Lauderdale City Hall Security Improvements (SF 2748) 500,000 North Miami Beach Police Department Real Time Crime Center (SF 2969)........................................ 400,000 Orange City Municipal Public Safety EOC Complex Hardened Facility Design (SF 2406)............................... 350,000 Pasco Sheriff's Office Trinity Forward Operating Center (SF 1708)............................................... 8,000,000 Police Department Evidence Shed (SF 2341)................. 350,000 Regional Public Safety Training Center (SF 3587).......... 1,500,000 SPPD K-9 Facility (SF 3629)............................... 350,000 Town of Eatonville Public Safety Building Needs Assessment and Pre-Design Study (SF 3651)............... 350,000 Volusia County Sheriff's Office Administrative Complex (SF 2574)............................................... 1,000,000 Washington County Jail Repairs and Rehabilitation (SF 3590)................................................... 1,100,000 TOTAL: INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 207,694,774 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 42,792,883 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 733.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 250,487,657 MUTUAL AID AND PREVENTION SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,320,983 1341 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 53.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,585,120 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 864,119 1342 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 52,344 1343 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,702,099 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 50,000 1344 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,441 1345 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,936 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,662 1346 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,880 1347 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 29,140 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 142 TOTAL: MUTUAL AID AND PREVENTION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 7,422,960 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 920,923 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 53.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,343,883 STATE BOARD OF IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 331,476 1348 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 5.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 491,620 1349 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,053 1350 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 1351 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 150,000 1352 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 1353 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,782 TOTAL: STATE BOARD OF IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 693,455 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 5.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 693,455 PROGRAM: CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION PROGRAM From the funds in Specific Appropriations 1354 through 1374, the Department of Law Enforcement, as defined in the Federal Bureau of Investigation's Criminal Justice Information Services (CJIS) Security Policy, serves as the lead CJIS Systems Agency for the state of Florida and shall enable Florida law enforcement entities to choose from multiple service providers that offer cloud services, as defined in section 282.0041, Florida Statutes, that enable these entities to comply with the CJIS Security Policy. INFORMATION NETWORK SERVICES TO THE LAW ENFORCEMENT COMMUNITY APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,166,118 1354 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 115.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,335,371 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 86,792 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,222,993 1355 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 186,997 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 161,075 1356 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,086,346 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 50,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 7,476,320 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1356, 1357, and 1359, $60,000 in recurring funds and $2,380,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Operating Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Law Enforcement for the Missing and Endangered Persons Information Clearinghouse Upgrade Project. The department shall submit quarterly project status reports to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity no later than thirty days from the close of the previous quarter. Each status report must include copies of new or updated relevant task order(s), contract(s), and purchase order(s). The status report must also describe progress made to date for each project milestone and deliverable, planned and actual completion dates, planned and actual costs incurred, and any current project issues or risks. 1357 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,881,018 1358 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA INCIDENT BASED REPORTING SYSTEM (FIBRS) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,645,722 1359 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,415,942 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 300,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 13,355,150 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1359, $850,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement to update the data flow associated with the Criminal Justice Data Transparency system. 1360 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,294,140 1361 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,032,758 1362 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,191 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 21,250 1363 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,000 1364 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,639 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 36,882 TOTAL: INFORMATION NETWORK SERVICES TO THE LAW ENFORCEMENT COMMUNITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 28,816,918 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 34,090,668 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 115.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 62,907,586 PREVENTION AND CRIME INFORMATION SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 15,011,026 1365 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 283.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,527,507 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 260,994 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 20,395,413 1366 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 681,086 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 192,171 1367 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 180,353 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 628,962 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,160,545 1368 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 489,099 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 20,000 1369 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 93,168 1370 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,660,863 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,533,117 1371 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 12,235 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 176,934 1372 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,160 1373 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 15,600 1374 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,290 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 102,394 TOTAL: PREVENTION AND CRIME INFORMATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,818,204 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 30,427,741 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 283.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 32,245,945 PROGRAM: CRIMINAL JUSTICE PROFESSIONALISM LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS COMPLIANCE APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,941,693 1375 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 41.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 715,857 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 3,429,350 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 12,426 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 160,212 1376 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 184,176 1377 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 332,340 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 64,300 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 20,554 1378 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 47,000 1379 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 35,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 120,000 1380 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 11,503 1381 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,560 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,560 1382 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPECIAL EDUCATION AND TECHNICAL TRAINING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,439,200 1383 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,500 1384 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,460 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 16,489 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 367 TOTAL: LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS COMPLIANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 7,781,093 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,918,761 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 41.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 11,699,854 LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,653,284 1385 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 52.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 234,802 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,958,984 1386 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 134,729 1387 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,234,739 1388 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 45,000 1389 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 725,000 1390 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,750 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 68,341 1391 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,480 1392 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,000 1393 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 730 FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE STANDARDS AND TRAINING TRUST FUND . . . . . . 20,293 TOTAL: LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 2,393,480 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,053,368 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 52.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,446,848 TOTAL: LAW ENFORCEMENT, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 331,048,988 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 193,900,892 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,038.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 524,949,880 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 152,934,652 LEGAL AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF, AND ATTORNEY GENERAL PROGRAM: OFFICE OF ATTORNEY GENERAL VICTIM SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,287,129 1394 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 115.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 379,921 FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,818,982 FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 325,009 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,533,711 FROM FLORIDA CRIME PREVENTION TRAINING INSTITUTE REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 436,617 1395 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 78,401 FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 73,314 FROM FLORIDA CRIME PREVENTION TRAINING INSTITUTE REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,049 1396 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 189,081 FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 982,792 FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 40,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 50,000 FROM FLORIDA CRIME PREVENTION TRAINING INSTITUTE REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 179,370 1397 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 123,407 FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 2,380 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,286 FROM FLORIDA CRIME PREVENTION TRAINING INSTITUTE REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,695 1398 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AWARDS TO CLAIMANTS FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,000,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,600,000 1399 SPECIAL CATEGORIES VICTIM SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 700,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1399, $200,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for Quigley House to provide services to victims of sexual and domestic violence (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1399, $500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida Council Against Sexual Violence (recurring base appropriations project). At least 95 percent of the funds provided shall be distributed to certified rape crisis centers to provide services statewide for victims of sexual assault. 1400 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,242,008 FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,243 FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 1,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 FROM FLORIDA CRIME PREVENTION TRAINING INSTITUTE REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 270,408 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1400, $1,660,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Monique Burr Foundation (MBF) Child Safety Matters Prevention Education program (recurring base appropriations project). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1400, $800,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Florida Sheriffs Association (recurring base appropriations project). These funds shall be used to enhance Crisis Intervention Team (CIT) training for law enforcement and correctional officers in local sheriff's offices and police departments. The training must include evidence-based approaches designed to improve the outcomes of law enforcement interactions with persons who have mental health issues. Agencies who have conducted minimal or no CIT training must be given priority for training. Local law enforcement agencies may use the funds to pay necessary expenditures resulting from a demonstrated financial hardship that currently prevents officers from receiving CIT training. Funds can also be provided to local community mental health providers to provide additional CIT training in partnership with local law enforcement agencies. A maximum of $75,000 of these funds may be used by the Florida Sheriffs Association to hire a contract coordinator. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1400, $700,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Bridging Freedom Program in Pasco County to provide individualized, holistic, therapeutic safe homes for children traumatized by child sex trafficking (recurring base appropriations project). 1400A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,662,110 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1400A are provided for the following programs: Big Brothers Big Sisters School - Bigs in Blue Project (SF 3261)............................................... 750,000 Cuban American Bar Association (CABA) Pro Bono Legal Services (SF 2729)...................................... 500,000 Cuban American Bar Association (CABA) Special Needs Legal Assistance Program (SF 1010)............................ 150,000 Pinellas-Goodwill's Pathways (SF 1730).................... 256,035 Selah Freedom Anti-Sex Trafficking Awareness, Prevention, Victim Outreach & Restoration (SF 1579)................. 687,000 United Way Pasco - Transitional Housing for Survivors of Human Trafficking (SF 3723)............................. 969,075 Women's Center of Jacksonville: Sexual Assault Forensic Exam Program (SF 3417).................................. 350,000 1401 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - MINORITY COMMUNITIES CRIME PREVENTION PROGRAMS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,079,247 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1401 are provided to the following recurring base appropriations projects: Community Coalition, Inc.................................. 950,000 Adult Mankind Organization, Inc........................... 950,000 The Urban League of Broward County, Inc................... 3,179,247 1402 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CRIME STOPPERS FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 4,400,000 1403 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - JUSTICE COALITION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 150,000 1404 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,304 FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 616 FROM FLORIDA CRIME PREVENTION TRAINING INSTITUTE REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 616 1405 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - VICTIM ASSISTANCE SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 103,205,280 1406 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 538 FROM CRIMES COMPENSATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 42,339 FROM CRIME STOPPERS TRUST FUND . . . 591 FROM FLORIDA CRIME PREVENTION TRAINING INSTITUTE REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,855 TOTAL: VICTIM SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 13,402,905 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 146,347,265 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 115.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 159,750,170 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,692,914 1407 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 146.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,487,183 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,915,722 1408 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 86,174 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 181,316 1409 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 991,277 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 904,529 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 30,000 1410 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 84,961 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 472,801 1411 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ATTORNEY GENERAL'S LAW LIBRARY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 690,476 FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,800 1412 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 109,173 1413 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OF THE YEAR PROGRAM AND VICTIM SERVICES RECOGNITION AWARDS PROGRAM FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 20,000 1413A SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,203 1414 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 119,807 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 53,268 FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 73,200 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,000 1415 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 525,369 1416 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 693,143 1417 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,344 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 13,728 1418 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 292 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,696 1419 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 29,820 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 17,748 1420 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,373,902 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,387,745 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 17,229,124 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,078,553 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 146.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 25,307,677 CRIMINAL AND CIVIL LITIGATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 67,919,720 1421 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 808.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 43,317,623 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 16,499,126 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 24,071,400 FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,669,231 FROM MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,303,055 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 805,385 1422 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 171,634 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 133,154 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,179 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 1,127,544 FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,175 FROM MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,583 1423 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,739,805 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,615,455 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,000 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 2,321,137 FROM MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 369,445 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 132,830 1424 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 313,745 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 303,530 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 667,391 FROM MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 44,114 1425 LUMP SUM ATTORNEY GENERAL RESERVE POSITIONS FOR AGENCY CONTRACTS POSITIONS 50.00 The positions in Specific Appropriation 1425 shall be released as necessary to allow the Office of the Attorney General to contract with state agencies to provide legal representation. 1426 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 53,927 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 299,250 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 68,823 1427 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDICAID FRAUD INFORMANT REWARDS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 1428 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ANTITRUST INVESTIGATIONS FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,577,506 1429 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 569,266 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,019,731 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 500,000 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 1,393,399 FROM MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 216,281 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 275,000 1430 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSUMER PROTECTION LITIGATION FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,271,896 1431 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LITIGATION EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 300,000 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 262,500 1432 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 172,889 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 129,544 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 44,428 FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 108,807 FROM MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,250 1433 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 62,376 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 97,661 1434 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,053 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 351 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 1,068 1435 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 103,842 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 64,493 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 76,156 FROM LEGAL AFFAIRS REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 44,495 FROM MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,062 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 391 1436 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,483 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 35,000 FROM LEGAL SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . 223,053 TOTAL: CRIMINAL AND CIVIL LITIGATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 48,818,643 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 83,855,879 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 858.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 132,674,522 PROGRAM: OFFICE OF STATEWIDE PROSECUTION PROSECUTION OF MULTI-CIRCUIT ORGANIZED CRIME APPROVED SALARY RATE 13,663,873 1437 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 140.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 19,120,564 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 433,853 1438 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE PROSECUTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,882,638 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 784,444 1439 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,312 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 407 1440 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,560 1441 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 936 1442 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,139 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,330 TOTAL: PROSECUTION OF MULTI-CIRCUIT ORGANIZED CRIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 27,072,149 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,221,034 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 140.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 28,293,183 PROGRAM: FLORIDA ELECTIONS COMMISSION CAMPAIGN FINANCE AND ELECTION FRAUD ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,093,665 1443 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 16.00 FROM ELECTIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,686,787 1444 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ELECTIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 80,163 1445 EXPENSES FROM ELECTIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 309,479 1446 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ELECTIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 1448 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ELECTIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,533 1449 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ELECTIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,781 1450 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ELECTIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,979 TOTAL: CAMPAIGN FINANCE AND ELECTION FRAUD ENFORCEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,124,722 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 16.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,124,722 FLORIDA GAMING CONTROL COMMISSION PROGRAM: GAMING ENFORCEMENT EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,772,636 1451 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 68.00 FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,418,495 1452 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,175 1453 EXPENSES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,992,286 1454 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 1455 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,203 1455A SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA GAMING CONTROL COMMISSION - LICENSING AND ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1455A are provided to the Florida Gaming Control Commission for the implementation of a modern licensing and enforcement system. 1456 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 458,961 1457 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,809 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1457 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 1458 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 295,000 1459 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 130,589 1460 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 1461 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000 1462 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,704 1463 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 1464 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,000 1465 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,312 1466 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONAL REGULATION - INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 498,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1466 are provided to the Florida Gaming Control Commission to pay for information technology services provided by the Department of Business and Professional Regulation. The funds shall be held in reserve. Upon the execution of a Memorandum of Understanding between the commission and the department, the commission is authorized to submit budget amendments for release of funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,467,534 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 68.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,467,534 GAMING ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,523,409 1467 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 45.00 FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,662,497 1468 EXPENSES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,111,935 1469 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 1470 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 445,000 1471 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 507,360 1472 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF PATROL VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 95,000 1473 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,000 1474 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,394 1475 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,600 1476 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ILLEGAL GAMING DEVICE STORAGE FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,110,000 1477 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,000 1478 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM - PURCHASE OF NEW RADIOS FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 156,854 1479 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,441 TOTAL: GAMING ENFORCEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,206,081 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 45.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,206,081 PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,606,736 1480 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 45.00 FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,977,712 1481 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 901,472 1482 EXPENSES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 564,343 1483 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,032 1484 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,002 1485 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 177,317 1486 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,000 1487 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 68,073 1488 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,063 1489 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PARI-MUTUEL LABORATORY CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1490 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,670 1491 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT FOR PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING COMPLIANCE AND AUDIT SYSTEM FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 296,476 TOTAL: PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,244,160 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 45.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,244,160 SLOT MACHINE REGULATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,691,691 1492 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 51.00 FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,143,401 1493 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,216 1494 EXPENSES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 283,141 1495 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,863 1496 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,000 1497 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMPULSIVE AND ADDICTIVE GAMBLING PREVENTION CONTRACT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,000 1498 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,000 1499 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,743 1500 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,408 1501 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,848 1502 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,873 TOTAL: SLOT MACHINE REGULATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,565,493 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 51.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,565,493 TOTAL: LEGAL AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF, AND ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 106,522,821 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 282,110,721 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,484.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 388,633,542 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 113,251,773 TOTAL OF SECTION 4 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,161,061,474 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 979,184,330 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 41,096.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,140,245,804 SECTION 5 - NATURAL RESOURCES/ENVIRONMENT/GROWTH MANAGEMENT/TRANSPORTATION SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 5 - NATURAL RESOURCES/ENVIRONMENT/GROWTH MANAGEMENT/TRANSPORTATION The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the named funds to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, Department of Environmental Protection, Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission, and Department of Transportation as the amounts to be used to pay the salaries, other operational expenditures, and fixed capital outlay of the named agencies. AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF, AND COMMISSIONER OF AGRICULTURE PROGRAM: OFFICE OF THE COMMISSIONER AND ADMINISTRATION AGRICULTURAL LAW ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 26,743,320 1503 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 347.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 38,041,211 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 33,342 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,303,532 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,620,559 1504 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 102,181 1505 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,750,923 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 171,109 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 50,820 1506 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS DOMESTIC MARIJUANA ERADICATION PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 500,000 1507 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 175,747 1508 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 781,408 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 25,000 1509 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 778,697 1510 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 106,242 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 23,916 1511 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 106,681 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 303 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 572 TOTAL: AGRICULTURAL LAW ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 45,843,090 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,729,153 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 347.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 49,572,243 AGRICULTURAL WATER POLICY COORDINATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,738,428 1512 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 71.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 954,129 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 137,498 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 6,160,191 1513 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,290 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 558,380 1514 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NITRATE RESEARCH AND REMEDIATION FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 615,872 1515 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 21,256 1516 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AGRICULTURAL NONPOINT SOURCES BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES IMPLEMENTATION FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 885,852 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 34,111,520 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1516, $1,500,000 in recurring funds from the Land Acquisition Trust Fund is provided for water supply planning and conservation. 1517 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,053 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 19,259 1517A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY STATEWIDE AGRICULTURAL RESTORATION PROJECTS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 20,000,000 TOTAL: AGRICULTURAL WATER POLICY COORDINATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,057,472 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 62,509,828 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 71.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 63,567,300 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,298,402 1518 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 199.25 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,825,688 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,339,824 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,179 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,202,748 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 296,392 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,718,662 1519 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 122,810 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 54,165 1520 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 72,126 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,523,294 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 157,532 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 70,580 1521 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 1521A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,045,420 1521B SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,000,000 1522 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 41,641 1523 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,632,000 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 618,000 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 900,574 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1523, the following projects are funded in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: A Land Remembered - Pioneers of Florida (SF 1374)......... 500,000 Conserving Urban Agriculture (SF 2155).................... 127,000 Florida Agriculture Restoration & Biochar Initiative (SF 3567)................................................... 2,000,000 1524 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,036 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 56,483 1525 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,500 1526 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 84,000 1527 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,956 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 22,800 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 715 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,070 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,853 1527A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CODE AND LIFE SAFETY - STATEWIDE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,775,000 1527B FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY REPAIR/REPLACEMENT/RENOVATIONS - DIAGNOSTIC LABS FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 469,330 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 37,493,116 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,612,262 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 199.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 55,105,378 DIVISION OF LICENSING APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,340,077 1529 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 261.00 FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,026,233 1530 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 920,129 1531 EXPENSES FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,770,207 1532 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 199,130 1533 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,930,175 1534 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 90,089 1535 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 80,268 TOTAL: DIVISION OF LICENSING FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 36,016,231 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 261.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 36,016,231 OFFICE OF ENERGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 806,538 1536 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 14.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 649,361 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 845,132 1537 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 150,908 1538 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 47,212 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 380,000 1539 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,500 1540 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 52,687 1541 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,256 1542 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,512 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,483 1542A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AND JOBS ACT FUNDING - ENERGY PROGRAMS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 20,314,370 1543 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,800,000 TOTAL: OFFICE OF ENERGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 698,085 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,549,336 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 14.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,247,421 PROGRAM: FOREST AND RESOURCE PROTECTION FLORIDA FOREST SERVICE APPROVED SALARY RATE 66,617,850 1544 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,142.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,529,336 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,838,215 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,631,494 FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 9,577,245 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 92,119,379 1545 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 610,848 FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 570,319 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,163,519 1546 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 63,700 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,427,856 FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,974,124 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 11,779,290 1547 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AMERICA THE BEAUTIFUL PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 565,930 1548 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - VOLUNTEER FIRE ASSISTANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 439,156 1549 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS STATE FOREST RECEIPT DISTRIBUTION FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 595,000 1550 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 466,775 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 678,299 1551 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FORESTRY WILDFIRE PROTECTION/SUPPRESSION EQUIPMENT FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 156,868 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,380,570 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1551, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall replace the most critical wildfire suppression equipment first. Any operator-controlled equipment replaced must be equipped with operator protection systems, including enclosed cabs. 1552 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLE RECREATION PROGRAM FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 651,341 1553 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAND MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 8,902,162 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1553 from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to perform land management activities consistent with the land management mission of the department. From these funds, the department shall submit a detailed spend and activity plan for the funds and shall focus on invasive species removal beyond the recurring funding the department has for land management activities by August 1, 2026. 1554 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 575,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,391,713 FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 477,107 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,053,737 1555 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ON-CALL FEES FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,127,269 FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,000 1556 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 135,172 1557 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 354,969 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,706,083 1558 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,053 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,067 FROM INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . 35,809 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 356,408 1559 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CONSERVATION AND RURAL LAND PROTECTION EASEMENTS AND AGREEMENTS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 200,000,000 1560 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ROADS, BRIDGES, AND STREAM CROSSING MAINTENANCE - DIVISION OF FORESTRY FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 11,356,878 1562 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY REFORESTATION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 4,000,000 1563 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAINTENANCE, REPAIRS AND CONSTRUCTION - STATEWIDE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 4,675,000 1564 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 432,528 TOTAL: FLORIDA FOREST SERVICE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,171,089 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 372,642,130 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,142.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 384,813,219 PROGRAM: AGRICULTURE MANAGEMENT INFORMATION CENTER OFFICE OF AGRICULTURE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,702,666 1565 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 79.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,633,005 FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 257,797 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 2,882,481 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 528,534 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,162,098 1566 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 58,142 1567 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,838,159 FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 387,952 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 5,236,640 1568 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 179,000 1569 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,887,504 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,185,505 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 60,923 1570 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,184,404 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1570 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 1571 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 39,567 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 619,877 1572 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 7,826 1573 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,204 FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,065 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 14,159 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,492 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 7,429 1574 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REGULATORY LIFECYCLE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,208,703 TOTAL: OFFICE OF AGRICULTURE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 19,585,843 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,800,623 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 79.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 34,386,466 PROGRAM: FOOD SAFETY AND QUALITY FOOD SAFETY INSPECTION AND ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,065,701 1575 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 294.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,767,733 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,120,161 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 18,405,970 1576 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 59,740 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 147,904 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 196,905 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 72,172 1577 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,973,022 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 732,195 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,962,519 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 417,150 1578 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,775,500 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 250,747 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 252,333 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 275,000 1578A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 840,282 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 767,214 1579 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 565,595 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 470,707 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 500,000 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 178,244 1580 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54,668 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 107,774 1581 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,418 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 76,414 TOTAL: FOOD SAFETY INSPECTION AND ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 13,056,958 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,933,409 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 294.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 39,990,367 PROGRAM: CONSUMER PROTECTION AGRICULTURAL ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,012,931 1582 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 197.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,442,073 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 665,432 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 9,425,623 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 176,282 FROM PEST CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . 4,419,504 1583 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 192,181 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 278,627 FROM PEST CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . 14,252 1584 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,952 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 544,664 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,052,704 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 368,328 FROM PEST CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . 400,883 1585 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - OPERATION CLEAN SWEEP FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 100,000 1586 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS MOSQUITO CONTROL PROGRAM FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 3,660,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 1586, $230,000 from the General Inspection Trust Fund shall be used to support personnel at the University of Florida Institute of Food and Agricultural Sciences/Florida Medical Entomology Laboratory to perform applied research on the control and management of arthropods, and in particular, biting arthropods of public health or nuisance importance, including but not limited to non-target effects of control measures; pesticide efficacy and resistance; disease and vector surveillance, control, risk prediction; emerging pathogens, mosquito surveillance and trapping systems; mosquito ecology, biology, population dynamics and related topics. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 1586, $500,000 from the General Inspection Trust Fund shall be used for competitive grants as approved by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for applied and basic research into the practical methods of control to be used by local mosquito control agencies, including research into the prevention of mosquito-borne illnesses. The research may be conducted by any public university or college in Florida. 1587 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 210,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 104,013 1587A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 244,250 1588 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 102,958 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 496,278 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 235,124 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 430,990 FROM PEST CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . 206,425 1589 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 109,687 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 69,995 1589A SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA INSTITUTE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURAL SCIENCES - FERTILIZER RATE STUDY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1589A, the University of Florida Institute of Food and Agricultural Sciences (UF/IFAS) must submit status reports biannually to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee. The reports must include progress made to date, planned and actual completion dates, and planned and actual costs incurred (SF 1338). 1590 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,384 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 362 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 31,300 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 712 FROM PEST CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . 15,910 TOTAL: AGRICULTURAL ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,934,054 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,133,839 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 197.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 27,067,893 CONSUMER PROTECTION APPROVED SALARY RATE 18,099,856 1591 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 351.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,886,415 FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,229,668 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 23,228,919 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 585,323 1592 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 316,271 1593 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 162,363 FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 209,425 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 3,344,859 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 231,648 1594 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,687 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 223,437 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,629,400 1594A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 103,828 1595 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,500 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,231,533 1596 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 819,234 1597 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,152 FROM DIVISION OF LICENSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,095 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 101,537 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,492 1598 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FUEL TRANSFER SWITCH MODERNIZATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 TOTAL: CONSUMER PROTECTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,054,930 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 34,295,856 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 351.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 46,350,786 PROGRAM: AGRICULTURAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FRUITS AND VEGETABLES INSPECTION AND ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,546,417 1599 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 112.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,790,776 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 621,777 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 3,053,057 1600 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 366,406 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 15,900 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,147,704 1601 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 583,880 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 274,982 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 567,529 1602 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 23,710 1603 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AUTOMATED TESTING EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 101,041 1604 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CITRUS RESEARCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 200,000,000 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1604, $4,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Agricultural Emergency Eradication Trust Fund shall be transferred to the Citrus Research and Development Foundation Inc., in consultation with the Department of Citrus, to conduct or cause to be conducted, research projects on citrus disease, pursuant to section 581.031(32), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1604, $200,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund shall be transferred to the Citrus Research and Development Foundation Inc., in consultation with the Department of Citrus, to issue a request for proposal to conduct large-scale, field trials that demonstrate the impact of utilizing a combination of management and therapeutic tools for plantings and the rehabilitation of existing trees, including, but not limited to, grove design, planting preparation, pest management, disease management, individual protective covers and, post planting production practices which promote increased production of citrus. During the initial solicitation period, a minimum of $140,000,000 shall be made available for costs directly associated with the acquisition and planting of trees. During the initial solicitation period, at least 60 percent of the appropriated funds shall be made available to growers who, for property tax purposes, have citrus groves greater than or equal to five acres, but less than 2,500 acres. After the initial solicitation distribution, remaining funds are available to all growers. A maximum of two percent of funds provided under the request for proposal for large-scale, science-based, grower driven field trials may be used by the entity administering the program for direct operational and staffing costs. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1604, the Citrus Research and Development Foundation Inc., shall hold quarterly public meetings at locations that best represent all geographic regions of the state with an emphasis on citrus production. The public meetings shall include in-depth reporting on the results of non-confidential completed research projects, current research and planned research projects on citrus disease, including but not limited to, citrus canker and citrus greening. Scientists, growers, industry representatives, and Citrus Research and Development Foundation administrators must be represented at the public meetings. Public meetings shall provide the opportunity for public input, questions, and comments. Funds in Specific Appropriation 1604, outside of direct operational and staffing costs within the Citrus Research and Development Foundation, shall not be used for any administrative assessment fees from external entities. 1605 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 38,428 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 413,122 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 53,762 1606 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - MARKETING ORDERS FROM CITRUS INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,980,000 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,024,082 1607 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 36,874 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 246,762 1607A SPECIAL CATEGORIES CITRUS NURSERY AND PACKING EQUIPMENT GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1607A are provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to provide 70 percent cost-share funding to citrus nurseries and/or packinghouses for purchase or refurbishment of equipment or for related infrastructure repairs to such facilities. To be eligible, a nursery or packing house must be in operation, located in this state, and provide a cost-share of 30 percent of the costs. 1608 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 64,449 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,129 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 18,905 TOTAL: FRUITS AND VEGETABLES INSPECTION AND ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 215,991,854 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,943,421 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 112.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 229,935,275 AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS MARKETING APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,716,737 1609 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 102.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,170,514 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 622,809 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,259,432 FROM MARKET IMPROVEMENTS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 3,348,151 FROM SALTWATER PRODUCTS PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,243,186 FROM FLORIDA AGRICULTURAL PROMOTION CAMPAIGN TRUST FUND . . . 62,812 1610 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,206 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 128,793 FROM MARKET IMPROVEMENTS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 31,747 1611 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 104,774 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 495,649 FROM MARKET IMPROVEMENTS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 877,323 FROM SALTWATER PRODUCTS PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 154,408 FROM FLORIDA WINE TRUST FUND . . . . 9,580 FROM FLORIDA AGRICULTURAL PROMOTION CAMPAIGN TRUST FUND . . . 188,858 1612 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM MARKET IMPROVEMENTS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 10,500 1613 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - VITICULTURE PROGRAM FROM FLORIDA WINE TRUST FUND . . . . 650,000 1614 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA AGRICULTURE PROMOTION CAMPAIGN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,000,000 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,310,000 1615 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CATTLE ENHANCEMENT BOARD FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,500,000 1616 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FEDERAL VALUE OF PRODUCTION SPECIALTY CROP GRANT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,274,659 1617 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FEDERAL SUPPORT FOR FLORIDA AGRICULTURE PROMOTIONS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 206,586 1618 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FUTURE FARMERS OF AMERICA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 1619 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,219 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 76,222 FROM MARKET IMPROVEMENTS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 38,600 FROM SALTWATER PRODUCTS PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 150,000 FROM FLORIDA AGRICULTURAL PROMOTION CAMPAIGN TRUST FUND . . . 75,000 1620 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AGRICULTURAL LEADERSHIP AND EDUCATION FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 300,000 1621 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,063 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 6,423 FROM MARKET IMPROVEMENTS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 15,531 FROM SALTWATER PRODUCTS PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,242 1622 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,604 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,457 FROM MARKET IMPROVEMENTS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 13,983 FROM SALTWATER PRODUCTS PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,847 FROM FLORIDA AGRICULTURAL PROMOTION CAMPAIGN TRUST FUND . . . 243 1622A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAINTENANCE, REPAIRS AND CONSTRUCTION - STATEWIDE FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,853,051 1622B GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FLORIDA HORSE PARK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 350,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1622B are provided for the Florida Agriculture & Horse Park Authority Multi-Purpose Building Phase 3 (SF 3330). 1622C GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY AGRICULTURAL PROMOTION AND EDUCATION FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,578,052 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1622C are provided for the following projects: Arcadia All-Florida Championship Rodeo (SF 3781).......... 1,000,000 Citrus County Fair Association............................ 1,000,000 Clay County FDACS Cattlemen's Kitchen Event Center........ 3,500,000 Greater Jacksonville Agricultural Fair Association........ 1,750,000 Hardee County Fairgrounds................................. 875,000 Jackson County School Board............................... 453,400 Madison County Agricultural Complex....................... 2,000,000 Manatee River Fair Association............................ 1,009,652 Northeast Florida Fair Association........................ 990,000 Polk County New Agri-Center & Equestrian Complex.......... 3,000,000 Sarasota County Agricultural Fair Association Multi-Purpose Facility (SF 1660)........................ 5,000,000 Volusia County Agriculture Center......................... 1,000,000 TOTAL: AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS MARKETING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 43,749,432 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,413,092 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 102.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 63,162,524 AQUACULTURE APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,589,617 1623 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 45.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,667,820 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 1,118,312 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 187,657 1624 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 27,845 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 12,943 1625 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,400,173 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 73,000 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 190,966 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 22,438 1626 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,000 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 12,600 1627 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 580,700 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,002,000 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 105,400 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1627, $500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to Expand Capacity of Clam Aquaculture Research (SF 3165). 1628 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OYSTER PLANTING FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 160,000 1629 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 42,366 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 21,110 1630 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AQUACULTURE DEVELOPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 1631 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,104 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 3,567 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 723 1631A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MOTE MARINE AQUACULTURE TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER/WORKFORCE TRAINING/EDUCATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1631A are provided for the Florida Aquaculture Technology Development and Transfer Initiative (SF 2072). TOTAL: AQUACULTURE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 9,221,163 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,943,561 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 45.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,164,724 ANIMAL PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,601,089 1632 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 115.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,686,829 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 603,573 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 671,434 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,151,055 1633 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,363 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 176,192 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 87,795 1634 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 468,125 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 413,164 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 878,888 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,112,991 1635 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 450,949 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 25,000 1636 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE AGRICULTURAL RESPONSE TEAM (SART) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 300,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1636 are provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to coordinate the state's response to animal and agricultural issues in Florida in the event of an emergency or disaster situation. 1637 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 535,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 495,215 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 323,958 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,639,274 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1637, $500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for Big Dog Ranch Rescue - Animal Abuse Hotline Pilot Program (SF 2738). 1638 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 91,669 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 89,195 1639 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,530 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 5,422 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,508 1639A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - ANIMAL FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 525,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1639A are provided for the following projects: Desoto County Animal Control (SF 3538).................... 175,000 Guardians of Florida Animal Rescue (SF 2727).............. 350,000 TOTAL: ANIMAL PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 11,105,465 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,675,664 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 115.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 18,781,129 PLANT PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL APPROVED SALARY RATE 20,907,605 1640 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 399.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,402,734 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,053,132 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 6,129,165 FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 1,397,057 1641 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,266 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,880,037 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 591,692 FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 590,110 1642 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,261,692 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,212,262 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 214,299 FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 724,622 1643 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 216,195 FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 95,006 1644 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 55,176 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 164,869 FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 1,415,563 1645 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCIES (MEDFLY PROGRAM) FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,214,177 1646 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - BOLL WEEVIL ERADICATION FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 150,000 1647 SPECIAL CATEGORIES APIARIAN INDEMNITIES FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 36,000 1648 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENDANGERED PLANT SPECIES FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 216,000 1649 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CITRUS HEALTH RESPONSE PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,951,247 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,000,000 1650 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CITRUS BUDWOOD NURSERY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1650 are provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to expand the propagation of citrus greening tolerant or resistant citrus sinensis or citrus sinensis-like budwood trees and seedlings, and for operations and maintenance of the greenhouse. 1651 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PLANT PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,098,683 1652 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 211,625 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 112,538 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 105,000 FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 228,049 1653 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 441,316 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 149,887 1654 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA/ INSTITUTE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURAL SCIENCES FOR INVASIVE EXOTICS QUARANTINE FACILITY FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 540,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1654 are provided to the University of Florida Institute of Food and Agricultural Sciences for the Invasive Exotics Quarantine Facility (recurring base appropriations project). 1655 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INVASIVE SPECIES CONTROL FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 500,000 1656 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 127,285 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 11,913 FROM AGRICULTURAL EMERGENCY ERADICATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,158 FROM PLANT INDUSTRY TRUST FUND . . . 67,121 TOTAL: PLANT PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 20,471,918 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 33,123,958 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 399.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 53,595,876 FOOD, NUTRITION AND WELLNESS APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,012,149 1657 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 117.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 218,910 FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,484,024 1658 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 347,284 1659 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,000 FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,031,039 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 174,160 1660 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,488,982,379 The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes to increase Specific Appropriation 1660 in the event requests exceed the amount appropriated for the School Lunch Program. 1661 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM - STATE MATCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,295,134 1662 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL BREAKFAST PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,590,912 1663 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 57,438 1663A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,880 1663B SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - OUNCE OF PREVENTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1663B are provided for the Florida Children's Initiative: Food Security and Nature Connection Project (SF 2867). 1664 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FARMERS FEEDING FLORIDA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 63,000,000 Funds in the Specific Appropriations 1664 are provided to the department to contract with entities that have the ability to manage statewide commodities reimbursement and distribution program. All entities must have been in existence for a minimum of 5 years. Food commodities distributed by entities must be fresh food products grown or produced in Florida. The entities will purchase, transport, and distribute non-Emergency Food Assistance Program (non-TEFAP) fresh food products for the benefit of Florida residents that are food insecure due to lack of local food resources, accessibility, and affordability. The entities shall submit monthly reports to the department that include, at a minimum, the amount of food purchased by commodity type, purchase location, purchase date, delivery date and distribution location. The entities shall submit quarterly supporting documentation to the department that includes, at a minimum, fresh food product purchase receipts, donation receipts, report of new partners, and report of variety of fresh food products provided. From the fund in Specific Appropriation 1664, the entities shall compile and submit quarterly reports that include the amount, distribution location, and a detailed breakout of the types of fresh commodities distributed to food insecure families, local food entities, and community partners. The quarterly reports shall be submitted to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Appropriations committee. Nothing in this section prevents the department from selecting a single administering entity if no other qualified entities exist. In order to leverage and capitalize on existing distribution networks, the department shall ensure that a minimum of $10,000,000 shall be provided to non-administering entities or affiliates to provide transportation and distribution into rural areas. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 1664, any recipient may not allow a candidate of elective office to host a food distribution event during the period of time between the last day of the election qualifying period and the date of the election, if the candidate is opposed for election or re-election at the time of the event. This provision does not apply when the event is in response to a direct emergency. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1664, $3,000,000 is provided for a recurring grant for ongoing operations for any pantry created or expanded pursuant to grants provided in Specific Appropriation 1464C of chapter 2025-198 Laws of Florida. 1664A SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUPPORT FOR FOOD BANK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,875,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1664A, the following projects are funded in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund: Chabad Mitzvah Kitchen (SF 1222).......................... 350,000 Closing the Kosher Meal Gap (SF 3389)..................... 400,000 Cutting Edge Ministries - Food Distribution Operations and Freezer Storage (SF 3701)........................... 475,000 Stamp Out Hunger Food Drive (SF 2350)..................... 350,000 Thrive Together: End Hunger & Wellness Navigation (SF 3289)................................................... 300,000 1665 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 317,000 FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,645,665 FROM GENERAL INSPECTION TRUST FUND . 45,840 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1665, $317,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to for Florida Impact - The Florida Food Security Project (SF 2774). 1665A SPECIAL CATEGORIES FARM SHARE PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1665A are provided to Farm Share. Thirty percent of all food commodities distributed by Farm Share must be fresh Florida products (SF 1734). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1665A, Farm Share shall submit quarterly reports that include the amount and type of fresh produce distributed to needy families, local food entities, and community partners. The reports shall include a detailed breakout of the types of fresh commodities distributed. The quarterly reports shall be submitted to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and the chair of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee by January 1, 2027. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 1665A, Farm Share may not allow any candidate for elective office to host a food distribution event during the period of time between the last day of the election qualifying period and the date of the election, if the candidate is opposed for election or re-election at the time of the event. This provision does not apply when the event is in response to a direct emergency. 1666 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - EMERGENCY FEEDING ORGANIZATIONS FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,900,000 1667 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,446 FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,674 1668 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICES TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,328 TOTAL: FOOD, NUTRITION AND WELLNESS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 84,855,402 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,520,793,711 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 117.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,605,649,113 TOTAL: AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF, AND COMMISSIONER OF AGRICULTURE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 531,289,871 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,213,116,074 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 3,845.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,744,405,945 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 227,799,383 ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 15,023,765 1669 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 213.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 10,061,033 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 265,854 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 109,528 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 12,618,911 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 147,918 1670 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 154,973 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 205,344 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 239,645 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1671 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,502,139 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 32,559 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 151,602 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,000 1672 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 16,275 1673 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 90,000 1674 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 105,703 1675 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 688,022 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 183,794 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 409,107 1676 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 504,440 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1676 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 1677 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEGAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,858,176 1678 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OUTSOURCING/PRIVATIZATION FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 250,000 1679 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 26,113 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 685 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 282 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 32,521 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 381 1680 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1681 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 39,539 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,311 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 47,829 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 352 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,954,036 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 213.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,954,036 FLORIDA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,891,052 1682 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 33.00 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 177,951 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 877,730 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,433,865 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 608,851 1683 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 61,897 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,508 1684 EXPENSES FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 49,010 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 420,810 1685 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 12,195 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,838 1686 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 492,953 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 292,907 1687 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 5,700 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 40,000 1688 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,587 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 17,689 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 28,897 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,270 1689 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,276 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 7,347 TOTAL: FLORIDA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,674,281 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 33.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,674,281 TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,423,864 1690 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 87.00 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 8,492,674 1691 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 1,237,828 1692 EXPENSES FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 759,810 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 4,876,897 1693 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 25,625 1694 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,700 FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 5,019,224 1695 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 1,291,113 1696 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 18,135 1697 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DISASTER RECOVERY SERVICE FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 330,000 1698 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 34,302 1699 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . 5,794,064 TOTAL: TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 27,907,372 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 87.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 27,907,372 PROGRAM: STATE LANDS LAND ADMINISTRATION AND MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,090,579 1700 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 129.00 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,418,753 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,753,781 1701 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 535,774 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 304,172 1702 EXPENSES FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 180,000 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 789,275 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 327,266 1703 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,000 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,920 1704 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 130,000 1705 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF BOATS, MOTORS, AND TRAILERS FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 70,000 1706 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAND MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,660,358 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1706 may be used for resource stewardship, including program management, inventory management, administration, and planning. 1707 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,392,283 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 277,941 1708 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE LANDS STEWARDSHIP FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 350,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 250,000 1709 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TIDE STATIONS AND BENCHMARKS FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,500,000 1710 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 136,074 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 39,785 1711 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,075,000 1712 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 375,000 1713 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 42,448 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 13,160 1714 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY LAND ACQUISITION, ENVIRONMENTALLY ENDANGERED, UNIQUE/ IRREPLACEABLE LANDS, STATEWIDE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1714 are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection to acquire less than fee ownership, such as permanent conservation easements as provided for in s. 259.105, Florida Statutes, and included in the ARC Recommended 2026 Florida Forever Priority List for Less-Than-Fee Projects. 1715 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY WORKING WATERFRONTS PROGRAM FROM FLORIDA FOREVER TRUST FUND . . 2,000,000 1716A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PINELLAS PRESERVE LLC PRESERVATION LAND ACQUISITION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 300,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1716A are provided for the Pinellas Preserve LLC Preservation Land Acquisition (SF 3608). TOTAL: LAND ADMINISTRATION AND MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 35,300,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,742,990 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 129.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 62,042,990 PROGRAM: DISTRICT OFFICES REGULATORY DISTRICT OFFICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 35,871,200 1717 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 555.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,214,715 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,735,826 FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,218,093 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 3,336,448 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,003,144 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 992,889 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 17,340,067 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,720,523 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,597,615 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,914,573 1718 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 40,750 FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 101,229 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 72,455 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 24,989 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 62,896 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 72,132 1719 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 795,752 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 429,726 FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 514,213 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 297,278 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 44,016 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,323,061 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 725,807 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 232,810 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 354,645 1720 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 32,327 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 109,585 FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 79,644 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 1,860 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 9,325 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 8,070 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,550 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 189,145 1721 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 20,976 FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 75,144 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 40,320 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 24,208 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,999 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 209,547 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 129,553 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 31,390 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 59,391 1722 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,298 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,364 FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,491 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 13,684 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,346 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 79,703 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 58,419 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,863 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,937 TOTAL: REGULATORY DISTRICT OFFICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 2,055,092 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 55,390,699 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 555.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 57,445,791 PROGRAM: WATER POLICY AND ECOSYSTEMS RESTORATION WATER POLICY AND ECOSYSTEMS RESTORATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,979,921 1723 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 28.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 348,258 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 622,561 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,158,371 1724 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 288,196 1725 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 87,255 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 197,548 1726 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - NORTHWEST FLORIDA WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT ENVIRONMENTAL RESOURCE PERMITTING PROGRAM FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,851,231 1727 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - NORTHWEST FLORIDA WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT - OPERATIONS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,360,000 1728 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SUWANNEE RIVER WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT - OPERATIONS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,287,000 1729 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SUWANNEE RIVER WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT - ENVIRONMENTAL RESOURCE PERMITTING FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 453,000 1730 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SUWANNEE RIVER WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT - PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 352,909 1731 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICTS - LAND MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 6,887,210 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1731, from the Land Acquisition Trust Fund, $5,110,000 is provided to the Northwest Florida Water Management District and $1,777,210 is provided to the Suwannee River Water Management District. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1731, $500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Northwest Florida Water Management District to manage and operate the Lake Talquin Dam. 1732 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICTS - MFLS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,446,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1732, $1,811,000 is provided to the Northwest Florida Water Management District, and $1,635,000 is provided to the Suwannee River Water Management District, for activities related to establishing minimum flows and levels. 1733 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 125,370 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1733, $5,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the St. Johns River Water Management District to study restoration strategies for Lake Jesup and Lake Apopka. The study must include, but is not limited to, options to remove or mitigate nutrients and invasive species and explore the impacts of raising the average lake level and/or increasing the depth in some or all areas of the lakes. For each lake, the study must also include: (1) Potential environmental impacts to water quality, water supply, and to native wildlife and aquatic plants; (2) Potential economic impacts to property value for surrounding properties and to surrounding businesses; (3) Any potential effects to opportunities for recreational activities, which shall include fishing and hunting; and (4) The estimated cost of constructing each option studied with a target completion date of June 30, 2037. By March 1, 2027, the St. Johns River Water Management District shall submit a report containing the results of the study and any recommendations, to the Governor, President of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of Representatives. 1734 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,305 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,121 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 13,928 1735 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WATER QUALITY ENHANCEMENT AND ACCOUNTABILITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1735, $800,000 in recurring funds and $3,200,000 in nonrecurring funds is provided to the Department of Environmental Protection to continue to expand statewide water quality analytics for the nutrient over-enrichment analytics assessment and water quality information portal to include a comprehensive statewide flood vulnerability and sea level rise data set. 1736 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - OCEAN RESEARCH AND CONSERVATION ASSOCIATION - KILROY MONITORING SYSTEMS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 250,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1736 are provided for the Ocean Research and Conservation Association Water Quality Monitoring Systems Kilroy Network Expansion. 1737 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - INDIAN RIVER LAGOON AND LAKE OKEECHOBEE BASIN - OPERATIONS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 350,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1737 are provided for operations and maintenance for five Indian River Lagoon Land/Ocean Biogeochemical Observatory water quality instruments for the St. Lucie Estuary and surrounding Indian River Lagoon areas. 1738 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE SOUTH FLORIDA WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT - DISPERSED WATER STORAGE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 5,000,000 1739 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 6,782 1739A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY OCKLAWAHA RIVER RESTORATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1739A are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection for the restoration of the Ocklawaha River. 1742 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - INNOVATIVE TECHNOLOGIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1742 are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purpose of supporting the evaluation and implementation of innovative technologies and short-term solutions to combat or clean up harmful algal blooms and nutrient enrichment of Florida's fresh waterbodies, including lakes, rivers, estuaries and canals. Funds may be used for the Department's red tide emergency grant program to support local governments in cleaning beaches and coastal areas to minimize the impacts of red tide to residents and visitors. Funds may also be used to implement water quality treatment technologies, identified by the Department, near water control structures in Lake Okeechobee. 1744 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY NORTHERN EVERGLADES AND ESTUARIES PROTECTION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 74,576,213 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1744, $39,876,213 in recurring funds and $34,700,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Land Acquisition Trust Fund shall be used to implement the Northern Everglades and Estuaries Protection Program, pursuant to section 373.4595, Florida Statutes. 1744A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - C-51 RESERVOIR IMPLEMENTATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 44,500,000 FROM WATER PROTECTION AND SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM TRUST FUND . 30,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1744A are provided for the Palm Beach County C-51 Reservoir, pursuant to section 373.4598, Florida Statutes. 1744B GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EVERGLADES RESTORATION - COMPREHENSIVE EVERGLADES RESTORATION PLAN (CERP) - CENTRAL EVERGLADES PLANNING PROJECT (CEPP) SOUTH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000,000 1744C GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EVERGLADES RESTORATION - COMPREHENSIVE EVERGLADES RESTORATION PLAN (CERP) - CENTRAL EVERGLADES PLANNING PROJECT (CEPP) NORTH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 70,435,980 1744D GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EVERGLADES RESTORATION - COMPREHENSIVE EVERGLADES RESTORATION PLAN (CERP) - CENTRAL EVERGLADES PLANNING PROJECT (CEPP) EAA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,112,889 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 349,858,933 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1744D, $64,000,000 from the Land Acquisition Trust Fund is transferred to the Everglades Trust Fund within the South Florida Water Management District pursuant to section 375.041(3)(b)4., Florida Statutes. 1744E GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EVERGLADES RESTORATION - WESTERN EVERGLADES RESTORATION PROJECT (WERP) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 58,592,198 1744F GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EVERGLADES RESTORATION - CERP - LANDS, EASEMENTS, RIGHT OF WAYS, RELOCATIONS, AND DISPOSALS (LERRDS) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 1744G GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EVERGLADES RESTORATION - LOWER KISSIMMEE BASIN STORMWATER TREATMENT AREA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,000,000 1745 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - HARMFUL ALGAL BLOOMS MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1745 are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection to assist county governments responses to emergency conditions associated with Harmful Algal Blooms (HABs) (which includes, but is not limited to, red tide and blue-green algae blooms) that may impact the public health, Florida's environment and fragile ecosystems, including beaches and wildlife. Funds will implement an emergency grant program for the mitigation of HABs to minimize the impacts to Florida residents and visitors. 1747A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS-SJRWMD - TAYLOR CREEK RESERVOIR WATER SUPPLY PROJECT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,000,000 1748 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT - DOCTORS LAKE NUTRIENT REMOVAL PROJECT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 1751 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - WATER QUALITY IMPROVEMENTS - EVERGLADES RESTORATION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 50,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1751 shall be distributed to the South Florida Water Management District for the design, engineering, and construction of the specific project components designed to achieve the greatest reductions in harmful discharges to the Caloosahatchee and St. Lucie Estuaries as identified in the Comprehensive Everglades Restoration Plan Lake Okeechobee Watershed Restoration Project Final Integrated Project Implementation Report and Environmental Impact Statement dated August 2020. TOTAL: WATER POLICY AND ECOSYSTEMS RESTORATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 378,141,067 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 533,029,191 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 28.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 911,170,258 PROGRAM: WATER RESTORATION ASSISTANCE WATER RESTORATION ASSISTANCE APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,560,757 1752 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 94.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,827,592 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,345,693 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 827,907 FROM WATER PROTECTION AND SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM TRUST FUND . 783,762 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 532,174 1753 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 411,975 FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 9,744 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 88,801 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 86,584 1754 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 582,597 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 314,059 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 85,370 FROM WATER PROTECTION AND SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM TRUST FUND . 42,343 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 130,397 1755 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT/PLANNING GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 665,164 1756 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEEPWATER HORIZON OPERATIONS FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 700,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 50,000 1757 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 745,677 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,018,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1757, $595,677 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Perry Wastewater Infrastructure Equipment (SF 1555). 1758 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARDOUS WASTE CLEANUP FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,780,902 1759 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 11,830 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,303 FROM WATER PROTECTION AND SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM TRUST FUND . 2,180 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,480 1760 SPECIAL CATEGORIES UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK CLEANUP FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 76,578 1761 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WATER WELL CLEANUP FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 894,350 1762 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,921 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 14,797 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,632 FROM WATER PROTECTION AND SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM TRUST FUND . 2,460 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,402 1763 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RESTORE ACT - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 19,401,250 1764 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - FINAL RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 3,000,000 1765 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SPRINGS RESTORATION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 50,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1765 may be used for land acquisition to protect springs and for capital projects that protect the quality and quantity of water that flow from springs. 1766 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HAZARDOUS WASTE CONTAMINATED SITE CLEANUP FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000,000 1766A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - WATER PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 147,851,566 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1766A are provided for the following water projects: Alachua County Newnans Lake System Hydrologic Restoration (SF 1974)............................................... 350,000 Altamonte Springs Upgrading and Expanding the Reuse Augmentation Facility A Regional Solution (SF 1273)... 500,000 Arcadia Downtown Stormwater Improvements (SF 3664)........ 500,000 Arcadia Mills Avenue Drainage Improvement (SF 3665)....... 750,000 Arcadia Wastewater Treatment Plant (SF 3530).............. 350,000 Atlantic Beach Sherman Creek Dredging (SF 2704)........... 650,000 Aventura Country Club Drive Roadway and Stormwater Resilience Improvement (SF 1984)........................ 500,000 Bal Harbour Camden Drive Sanitary Sewer Replacement (SF 1400)................................................... 598,188 Bal Harbour Waterfront Overlook Platforms & Beach Access Improvements (SF 1401).................................. 350,000 Bay County Expand Mouth of Basin in Allanton - Phase 2 (SF 3103)............................................... 500,000 Bay County Nelson Seawall and Outfitting Berth - Phase 2 (SF 3102)............................................... 500,000 Bay County North Bay Water Tank and Pumping Station Project (SF 3106)....................................... 1,000,000 Bay County West Bay Wastewater Capacity Enhancement Phase I Implementation (SF 3125).............................. 1,000,000 Belle Glade - H1 Basin Stormwater Improvements (SF 1111).. 650,000 Belleair Bluff Erosion Control Construction Project (SF 1739)................................................... 350,000 Belleair Drainage Improvement Project (SF 1740)........... 350,000 Biscayne Park Septic to Sewer Conversion Assessment (SF 1770)................................................... 150,000 Blountstown Lift Station & Well Improvements (SF 3117).... 600,000 Bonita Springs Paradise Road Bike Pedestrian Improvement Project (SF 2087)....................................... 650,000 Boynton Beach Sanitary Sewer Collection System Improvements - Bent Tree and Lime Tree Communities (SF 1832)................................................... 500,000 Bradenton Beach Stormwater Flood Resiliency Projects (SF 1862)................................................... 350,000 Bradenton Lift Station 08 Relocation (SF 1870)............ 500,000 Bradenton WRF Injection Well Pump Station (SF 1869)....... 3,000,000 Branford Wastewater Plant Improvements (SF 1559).......... 300,000 Brevard County - Indialantic Stormwater Drainage Project Design - Phase 7 (SF 1182).............................. 105,000 Brevard County - Maemir/Martin/Fiske Area Drainage Improvements - Multi-basin Study (SF 1183).............. 350,000 Brevard County South Beaches 2nd Deep Injection Well (SF 1285)................................................... 350,000 Caloosahatchee Valued Ecosystem Restoration - Phase 9 (SF 2082)................................................... 650,000 Charlotte County Ackerman Septic to Sewer Conversion (SF 3702)................................................... 500,000 Charlotte County Burnt Store Water Reclamation Facility 1.25MGD/ Wastewater Treatment Upgrade (SF 3676)......... 2,500,000 Charlotte County Stormwater System Performance and Flood Resilience (SF 3667).................................... 350,000 Charlotte County West Port Water Reclamation Facility 2.5MGD/Advanced Wastewater Treatment Upgrade (SF 3677).. 500,000 Chattahoochee Force and Watermain Replacement (SF 1449)... 350,000 Citrus County Septic to Sewer Incentive Program (SF 3311). 350,000 Clearwater Lift Station Rehab Program (SF 1729)........... 1,500,000 Collier County Isles of Capri Joint Stormwater - Sewer Project (SF 3004)....................................... 250,000 Coral Gables Gravity Sanitary Sewer Pipe Rehabilitation (SF 1160)............................................... 450,000 Coral Gables Ponce Corridor Waterway Flood Mitigation (SF 1161)................................................... 450,000 Dania Beach SW 34th Court Stormwater Improvement (SF 1650) 500,000 DeBary Eastern Emergency Management System: Resilient Stormwater Improvements (SF 1850)....................... 428,458 DeBary Resilient Streets: Building Infrastructure in Oldest and Lowest Income Neighborhoods (SF 1851)........ 650,000 DeBary's Alexander Island: A Strategic Investment in Florida's Wekiva-Ocala Greenway (SF 1849)............... 1,000,000 Deltona - Sanitary Sewer Pipe & Infrastructure Cured in Place Lining (SF 2410).................................. 500,000 Deltona - Watermain Replacement (SF 2411)................. 500,000 Dunedin Bayshore Water Main Replacement (SF 3579)......... 750,000 Dunedin Marina Hurricane Damage Repair and Restoration (SF 3580)............................................... 1,500,000 Emerald Coast Utilities Authority West Ensley Septic to Sewer (SF 3458)......................................... 1,000,000 Estero Sunny Grove Waste Water Extension Project Phase 2 (SF 2993)............................................... 400,000 Fanning Springs Sprayfield Land Acquisition (SF 2941)..... 600,000 Flagler Beach Wastewater (Reclaimed) Improvements (SF 2448)................................................... 650,000 Florida Aquarium Inc. - Improvements to Resilience and Flood Mitigation (SF 2296).............................. 650,000 Florida Keys Aqueduct Authority Crawl Key Reverse Osmosis Facility (SF 1095)...................................... 5,000,000 Fort Meade Wastewater Lift Station Improvements (SF 3797). 350,000 Frostproof - Lake Clinch Shoreline Stabilization Project (SF 3574)............................................... 2,578,510 Golden Beach Flood Mitigation for South Island (SF 1668).. 900,000 Gulf County Water System (SF 1455)........................ 350,000 Haines City Wastewater Treatment Plant Expansion Project (SF 3303)............................................... 1,650,000 Hallandale Beach Comprehensive Stormwater Management and Flood Mitigation Project (SF 1677)...................... 2,000,000 Hallandale Beach Stormwater Mitigation Project - Northeast Quad Injection Well System (SF 1679).......... 2,000,000 Hilliard Sanitary Sewer Collection System Rehabilitation (SF 2700)............................................... 650,000 Hillsboro Inlet Critical Access and Erosion Control Project (SF 2724)....................................... 750,000 Hillsborough County Advanced Metering Infrastructure (SF 2301)................................................... 350,000 Homestead Potable Water & Storage Capacity Upgrades (SF 1838)................................................... 650,000 Homestead Wittkop Park Water Treatment Plant Upgrades (SF 1839)................................................... 650,000 Homosassa River Restoration Project (SF 3263)............. 1,000,000 Immokalee Water and Sewer District - Northwest Water Treatment Plant (SF 3384)............................... 650,000 Indian Trail Improvement District M-0 Canal West Levee Mitigation and Re-enforcement (SF 2043)................. 350,000 Indiantown Reverse Osmosis Water Treatment Plant (SF 3698) 23,000,000 Institute for Human and Machine Cognition Flood Mitigation Project (SF 3602)............................ 900,000 Key Biscayne Garden District Flood (SF 1140).............. 432,500 Key West Duval Street Mallory Square Area Stormwater Pump Station and Resilience Project Phase 1 (SF 3778)........ 500,000 Kissimmee - East City Drainage Canal Improvement Project (SF 1595)............................................... 500,000 LaBelle Watermain Construction Zone G, H, I (SF 3048)..... 1,000,000 Lady Lake - Water Reclamation Facility (WRF) Expansion, Phase III (SF 1926)..................................... 650,000 Lake Apopka Shoreline Restoration (SF 1933)............... 650,000 Lake Jesup - Restoration of Water Quality via Management of Historical Phosphorus Pollution (SF 3342)............ 3,706,900 Lake Placid Lake June Road West Extension (SF 3338)....... 650,000 Lake Worth Beach - 10th Ave N Water Main Extension (SF 2369)................................................... 350,000 Lake Worth Beach - Force Main Rerouting (SF 2370)......... 350,000 Lake Worth Beach - Master Pump Station Pump Replacement (SF 2371)............................................... 175,000 Lakeland San Gully Road Drainage Stabilization Project (SF 2315)............................................... 650,000 Lauderdale Lakes Canal 3 Stormwater Conveyance and Water Quality Improvement Project (SF 3600)................... 350,000 Lehigh Acres RISE - Resilient Infrastructure for Stormwater & Environment (SF 3055)...................... 350,000 Lighthouse Point - Seawall Improvement Project (SF 1667).. 300,000 Lynn Haven Water Main Replacements (SF 3244).............. 350,000 Madison: Water and Sewer Line Replacement (SF 1515)....... 350,000 Maitland - SCADA System Security Enhancement (SF 1323).... 250,000 Marco Island Waterway Flushing Interconnect (SF 2987)..... 350,000 Margate Stormwater Infrastructure Assessment and Rehabilitation (SF 1176)................................ 350,000 Miami East Flagami Flood Mitigation Improvements (SF 1747) 650,000 Miami Lakes NW 82nd Avenue Drainage Improvements (SF 2183) 650,000 Miami-Dade County Stormwater Local Drainage Improvement on SW 153 St from SW 103 Pl to SW 106 Ave (SF 1413)..... 160,000 Miami-Dade County Stormwater Local Drainage Improvement on SW 200 Ter from SW 129 Ave to SW 130 Ave (SF 1414)... 157,500 Miami-Dade County Water and Sewer Critical Infrastructure Security Enhancements (SF 1834)......................... 650,000 Milton WWTP Directional Drill Project (SF 3457)........... 1,000,000 Miramar SCADA Cybersecurity Upgrades- Water Treatment Facilities (SF 1084).................................... 300,000 Naples Cove Master Stormwater Pump Station Improvements Design (SF 3370)........................................ 1,200,000 Neptune Beach Stormwater Improvements Phase 2 (SF 3332)... 350,000 New Port Richey Elevated Storage Tank Improvements (SF 1736)................................................... 910,000 New Smyrna Beach Turnbull Creek Dredging (SF 1853)........ 400,000 North Bay Village Outfall Valves Upgrade Phase II (SF 2540)................................................... 250,000 North Lauderdale Canal Culverts Replacement (SF 2750)..... 500,000 North Miami Beach Corona Del Mar Sanitary Sewer Expansion Phase 3 (SF 2754)....................................... 350,000 North Palm Beach Lakeside Park Bulkhead Replacement & Groin Reinforcement (SF 2372)........................... 350,000 Oak Hill Canal Avenue Stormwater Improvements (SF 2803)... 650,000 Oakland- South Lake Apopka Initiative - N. Pollard Street Wastewater Extension (SF 2765).......................... 650,000 One Rake At A Time's Rainbow River Restoration Project (SF 1339)............................................... 350,000 Opa-locka Drinking Water and Transmission Distribution System Improvement- Phase 1 (SF 2388)................... 500,000 Osceola County Boggy Creek Shoal and Vegetation Removal (SF 1601)............................................... 500,000 Osceola County C-31 Canal Bank Stabilization (SF 1602).... 350,000 Palm Beach County Australian Avenue Drainage Improvements (SF 1696)............................................... 430,000 Palm Beach County Peanut Island Coast Guard Facility and Bunker Restoration (SF 1695)............................ 350,000 Palm Beach County Water Treatment Plant No. 8 Membrane Expansion (SF 1109)..................................... 500,000 Panacea Area Water System (PAWS) Upgrades (SF 1564)....... 350,000 Pembroke Park - Park Road S. Stormwater Improvements (SF 1669)................................................... 500,000 Pinellas County - Sanitary Sewer Pump Stations Electrical Improvements (SF 1717).................................. 3,427,154 Pinellas Park Pond Dredging of the Autumn Run Neighborhood (SF 2507).................................. 350,000 Polk County - Headwaters of Peace River Floodplain Protection and Restoration (SF 2324).................... 1,000,000 Pompano Beach Industrial Area Stormwater Improvement Project (SF 1655)....................................... 985,000 Ponce Inlet Stormwater Capacity Improvements (SF 2404).... 215,000 Port Orange Portona Stormwater Ponds & Infrastructure Upgrades (SF 2412)...................................... 350,000 Port St. Lucie Rangeline Reverse Osmosis Water Treatment Facility Class I Deep Injection Well (SF 2144).......... 500,000 Punta Gorda Storm Recovery and Modernization of Water Metering Infrastructure (SF 3531)....................... 1,000,000 Putnam County Waste Water Treatment Expansion Phase I (SF 2584)................................................... 650,000 Riviera Beach Utility Special District New Water Treatment Plant Construction (SF 2379).................. 500,000 Rockledge WWTP Nutrient Uptake (AWT Phase II) (SF 1363)... 650,000 Sanford Nutrient Reduction at Lake Jesup and Lake Monroe (SF 1274)............................................... 1,000,000 Sanibel Tradewinds Drainage Project - Hurricane Recovery (Ian, Helene, and Milton) (SF 2438)..................... 650,000 Sarasota County Phillippi Creek Dredging: Residential and Commercial Flood Prevention Phase 1 and 2 (SF 1165)..... 2,000,000 Sarasota Whitaker Bayou Dredging Project (SF 1419)........ 650,000 Save Crystal River, Inc. Kings Bay Restoration Project (SF 3275)............................................... 650,000 Seminole County Advanced Metering Infrastructure (SF 1276) 500,000 Sewall's Point South Resiliency Project (SF 3360)......... 350,000 South Broward Drainage District Pembroke Falls Sluice Gate & Telemetry Project (SF 1079)...................... 125,000 South Broward Drainage District S-2, S-3, S-7 Sluice Gates (SF 1156)......................................... 328,892 South Miami Septic to Sewer Conversion (Sub-Area K Phase II) (SF 3215)........................................... 650,000 Southwest Ranches - Rolling Oaks Drainage Project (SF 1104)................................................... 340,375 St. Leo Stormwater Infrastructure for Town Center (SF 2287)................................................... 995,000 St. Petersburg Childs Park Storm Drainage Improvements (SF 3633)............................................... 500,000 St. Petersburg Shore Acres Denver Street Storm Damage Improvements (SF 3502).................................. 1,000,000 Sunrise Stormwater Pump Station #8 Rehabilitation (SF 3341)................................................... 750,000 Sweetwater Stormwater Infrastructure & Improvement (SF 2216)................................................... 602,000 Tamarac Water Main and Fire Protection System Improvements Phase 1 (SF 2134).......................... 500,000 Tampa Bay Watch Shoreline Protection and Water Quality Improvements (SF 1714).................................. 750,000 Tampa Bay Water Regional Surface Water Resilience and Expansion Initiative (SF 2266).......................... 350,000 Tampa South Howard Flood Relief Project (SF 2885)......... 750,000 Tarpon Springs Gulfview Drive/Ross Property Project (SF 1742)................................................... 1,708,319 Tarpon Springs North Disston Heights Water Main Renewal Project (SF 1741)....................................... 600,000 Tarpon Springs Pinellas Trail Culvert Project (SF 1743)... 175,708 Umatilla Water System Critical Needs & Fire Flow Improvements (SF 1927).................................. 400,000 Virginia Gardens - Pump Station Rehabilitation/SWMP GIS Update (SF 2190)........................................ 350,000 Virginia Gardens - Upgrade of Aged Water Mains Phase I (SF 2191)............................................... 600,000 Warner University Critical Wastewater System / Treatment Facility Improvements (SF 2339)......................... 350,000 Wauchula - Airport Deep Well Potable Water and Fire Safety Improvements (SF 3542)........................... 8,917,062 Wauchula Effluent Spray Field Site Development (SF 3547).. 2,000,000 Wauchula Wastewater Treatment Plant Centrifuge Dewatering System (SF 3548)........................................ 2,000,000 Wellington Pump Station Improvements (SF 1080)............ 650,000 Wellington Water and Sewer Extension (SF 3510)............ 350,000 West Melbourne, Industrial Injection Well (SF 1126)....... 650,000 West Palm Beach Membrane Pilot Testing for Use of Alternative Water Supply (SF 2796)...................... 350,000 Winter Park - Mead Garden Regional Nutrient Reduction Facility (SF 1271)...................................... 350,000 Yeshua El Pan De Vida, Inc. Community Drainage and Flood Mitigation Project (SF 2167)............................ 250,000 Zephyrhills Meadowood Estates Stormwater Pump Station Generator (SF 2283)..................................... 500,000 Zolfo Springs - Wastewater Collection System Sanitary Sewer Evaluation Study (SSES) (SF 3527)................. 850,000 Zolfo Springs - Wastewater Treatment Facility (WWTF) Rehabilitation (SF 3528)................................ 1,950,000 1767 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AID - NON-POINT SOURCE (NPS) MANAGEMENT PLANNING GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,000,000 1768 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - APALACHICOLA BAY AREA OF CRITICAL STATE CONCERN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1768 are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purpose of entering into financial assistance agreements with local governments located in the Apalachicola Bay Area of Critical State Concern to finance or refinance the cost of constructing sewage collection, treatment, and disposal facilities, building projects that protect, restore, or enhance nearshore water quality and fisheries, such as stormwater restoration projects and projects to protect water resources available to the Apalachicola Bay. 1769 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - WATER FIRST NORTH FLORIDA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000,000 1770 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA KEYS AREA OF CRITICAL STATE CONCERN FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1770 are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purpose of entering into financial assistance agreements with local governments located in the Florida Keys Area of Critical State Concern or the City of Key West Area of Critical State Concern. The funds shall be held in reserve contingent on the submission of a distribution plan detailing the recipients of the funds. The distribution plan must be consistent with the most recent executed interlocal agreement among the Village of Islamorada, the Key Largo Wastewater Treatment District, the City of Marathon, the Monroe County/Florida Keys Aqueduct Authority, the City of Key West, and Key Colony Beach, to finance or refinance the cost of constructing sewage collection, treatment, and disposal facilities, building projects that protect, restore, or enhance nearshore water quality and fisheries, such as stormwater or canal restoration projects and projects to protect water resources available to the Florida Keys, or for the purpose of land acquisition within the Florida Keys Area of Critical Concern as authorized pursuant to section 259.045, Florida Statutes, with increased priority given these acquisitions that achieve a combination of conservation goals, including protecting Florida's water resources and natural groundwater recharge. 1771 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - ALTERNATIVE WATER SUPPLY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1771, are provided to the water supply and water resource development grant program to help communities plan for and implement conservation, reuse, and other water supply and water resource development projects. Priority funding will be given to regional projects in the areas of greatest need and for projects that provide the greatest benefit. The department shall identify and research all viable alternative water supply resources and provide an assessment of funding needs critical to supporting Florida's growing economy. 1772 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SMALL COUNTY WASTEWATER TREATMENT GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,720,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1772, $800,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for sand and grit removal grants for wastewater treatment facilities. This funding will continue a statewide Department of Environmental Protection administered grants program which allows publicly owned utilities to remove sand and grit from wastewater treatment plants and associated collection systems. Distribution is on a first-come, first-serve basis with local matches, except that waiver of the match is allowed for publicly owned and utilities in rural counties, and impoverished counties and municipalities. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1772, $1,920,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to contract for mapping and loss estimation in publicly owned utilities. This funding will provide valuable planning and budgeting information for utilities throughout Florida, especially rural communities. 1773 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - SEWER OVERFLOW AND STORMWATER REUSE MUNICIPAL GRANTS (OSG) PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,244,286 1774 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AID - WASTEWATER GRANT PROGRAM FROM WATER PROTECTION AND SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM TRUST FUND . 125,000,000 1775 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - STATE REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM ASSISTANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,500,000 1776 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DRINKING WATER - EMERGING CONTAMINANTS FROM DRINKING WATER REVOLVING LOAN TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,424,000 1777 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY WASTEWATER - EMERGING CONTAMINANTS FROM WASTEWATER TREATMENT AND STORMWATER MANAGEMENT REVOLVING LOAN TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . 7,550,000 TOTAL: WATER RESTORATION ASSISTANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 255,148,328 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 269,590,448 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 94.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 524,738,776 PROGRAM: ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT AND RESTORATION WATER SCIENCE AND LABORATORY SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,260,263 1778 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 189.00 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,009,433 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 140,972 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 8,915,894 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,959,349 1779 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,197 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 94,215 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 227,268 1780 EXPENSES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 196,727 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,577,612 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 92,774 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 459,467 1781 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 66,267 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 132,533 1782 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 150,000 1783 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GROUND WATER QUALITY MONITORING NETWORK FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,399,855 1784 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICTS LABORATORY SUPPORT FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 176,425 1785 SPECIAL CATEGORIES EVERGLADES LAB SUPPORT FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 231,564 1786 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF BOATS, MOTORS, AND TRAILERS FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 110,000 1787 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT/PLANNING GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 378,126 1788 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LABORATORY SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 150,000 1789 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,000,000 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 207,354 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 214,205 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1789, $6,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Environmental Protection to contract with the Water School at the Florida Gulf Coast University to update and expand the comprehensive, statewide water quality study to identify and analyze impaired rivers, lakes, estuaries, and coastal systems, including upstream sources, and determine the root cause of such impairments. The water school shall also recommend potential solutions for each of the impaired waterways. 1790 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARDOUS WASTE CLEANUP FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 312,710 1791 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 28,178 FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 991 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 62,662 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,827 1792 SPECIAL CATEGORIES U.S. GEOLOGIC SURVEY COOPERATIVE AGREEMENT FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 214,897 1793 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO INSTITUTE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE SCIENCES (IFAS) - LAKEWATCH FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 500,000 1794 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO INDIAN RIVER LAGOON NATIONAL ESTUARY PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 250,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1794 shall be used for National Estuary Program activities necessary to achieve the total maximum daily load adopted by the Department of Environmental Protection for the Indian River and Banana River Lagoons. The Indian River Lagoon National Estuary Program shall report to the department annually on use of these funds. 1795 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 12,338 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 40,115 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,882 1796 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOADS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,231,358 1798 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AID - NON-POINT SOURCE (NPS) MANAGEMENT PLANNING GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,500,000 TOTAL: WATER SCIENCE AND LABORATORY SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,250,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 27,842,195 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 189.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 34,092,195 PROGRAM: WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 15,920,192 1799 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 252.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,381,257 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,430,203 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 317,079 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 785,909 FROM MINERALS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,971,289 FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,991,186 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,865,693 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,016,669 1800 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 40,000 FROM MINERALS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 26,601 FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 34,759 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 11,503 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 150,878 1801 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 588,468 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 637,318 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 47,338 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 103,964 FROM MINERALS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 7,339 FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 325,305 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 353,825 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 155,207 1802 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 21,132 1803 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLEAN WATERWAYS ACT ONSITE SEWAGE PROGRAM FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,882,248 1804 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT/PLANNING GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,269,389 1805 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NATIONAL POLLUTANT DISCHARGE ELIMINATION SYSTEM PROGRAM FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 140,228 1806 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM MINERALS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 15,353 FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 7,000 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 6,136 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 740,000 1807 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARDOUS WASTE CLEANUP FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,000 1808 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 21,659 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,135 FROM MINERALS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 7,863 FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 7,942 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 23,396 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,032 1809 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HABITAT RESTORATION FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 145,610 1810 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,239 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 7,059 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,117 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 15,928 FROM MINERALS TRUST FUND . . . . . . 8,900 FROM NON-MANDATORY LAND RECLAMATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 8,001 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 15,252 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,540 1811 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AID - NON-POINT SOURCE (NPS) MANAGEMENT PLANNING GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,000,000 TOTAL: WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,990,964 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,652,985 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 252.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 36,643,949 PROGRAM: WASTE MANAGEMENT WASTE MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,361,595 1812 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 180.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 181,533 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 6,481,993 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,363,188 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,679,689 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,726,881 1813 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 23,780 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 215,441 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 42,552 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 42,000 1814 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,998 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 522,941 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 179,291 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 235,519 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 376,886 1815 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - SOUTHERN WASTE INFORMATION EXCHANGE CLEARING HOUSE FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 300,000 1816 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - LOCAL HAZARDOUS WASTE COLLECTION FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,109,994 1817 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,000 1818 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STORAGE TANK COMPLIANCE VERIFICATION FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 7,500,000 1819 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR BIOMEDICAL WASTE REGULATION FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 880,000 1820 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 109,045 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,200 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 174,000 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 62,100 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1820, $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Municipal Waste Reduction and Research Using Cerawave Microwave Plasma (SF 2074). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1820, $3,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Stock Island Landfill Study (SF 3789). 1821 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FEDERAL WASTE PLANNING GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 804,153 1822 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARDOUS WASTE CLEANUP FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,719,108 1823 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARDOUS WASTE SITES RESTORATION FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,733,285 1823A SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES - MOSQUITO CONTROL PROGRAM FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,660,000 1824 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 25,466 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 13,213 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,528 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,571 1825 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE - ADMINISTRATION OF LEAD ACID BATTERY FEE FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 231,092 1826 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA - RESEARCH AND TESTING FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 700,000 1827 SPECIAL CATEGORIES UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK CLEANUP FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 4,727,055 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,892,467 1828 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LOCAL GOVERNMENT CLEANUP CONTRACTING FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 14,000,000 1829 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 601 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 29,412 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,458 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,777 FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,973 1830 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES - OPERATION CLEAN SWEEP FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 1831 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DRY CLEANING SOLVENT CONTAMINATED SITE CLEANUP FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,000,000 1831A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PETROLEUM TANKS CLEANUP FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 40,000,000 1832 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HAZARDOUS WASTE CONTAMINATED SITE CLEANUP FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,000,000 1833 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 1834 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - REEF PROTECTION AND TIRE ABATEMENT FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,000,000 1834A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PURCHASE OF UTILITY VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,625,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1834A are provided for the following Utility Vehicles: Bowling Green Utility and Stormwater Maintenance - Vacuum (VAC) Truck (SF 3570)................................... 475,000 Port Richey VACTOR Truck for Utility Department (SF 1825). 650,000 Wauchula Mechanical Street Sweeper (SF 3549).............. 500,000 TOTAL: WASTE MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,825,132 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 125,740,058 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 180.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 132,565,190 PROGRAM: RECREATION AND PARKS STATE PARK OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 46,819,596 1835 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,032.50 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 43,162,226 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 30,002,785 1836 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 82,622 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 14,240,607 1837 EXPENSES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 38,545 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 331,215 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 19,832,029 1838 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 535,986 1839 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,250,000 1840 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF BOATS, MOTORS, AND TRAILERS FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 220,000 1841 SPECIAL CATEGORIES POINT OF SALE - PARK BUSINESS SYSTEM FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,500,000 1842 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DISTRIBUTION OF SURCHARGE FEES FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 900,000 1843 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DISBURSE DONATIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 208,274 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 755,650 1844 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAND MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,304,617 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 203,130 1845 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,000 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 50,000 1846 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AMERICORPS PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,748,064 1847 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OUTSOURCING/PRIVATIZATION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 100,000 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,675,206 1848 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MANAGEMENT OF WATER CONTROL STRUCTURES FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 150,000 1849 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTROL OF INVASIVE EXOTICS FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 316,610 1850 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,112,568 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,468,473 1851 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GREENWAYS CARL MANAGEMENT FUNDING FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,231,044 1852 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAND USE PROCEEDS DISBURSEMENTS FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,200,538 1853 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 226,093 FROM STATE PARK TRUST FUND . . . . . 163,493 1854 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY STATE PARK FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS FROM INTERNAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1854, $2,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Internal Improvement Trust Fund is provided to return swimming to Silver Springs State Park (SF 1577). 1855 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY LAND AND RESOURCE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 10,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1855 from the Land Acquisition Trust Fund are provided for the Department of Environmental Protection to perform land management activities consistent with the land management mission of the department. From these funds, the department shall submit a detailed spend and activity plan for the funds and shall focus on invasive species removal beyond the recurring funding the department has for land management activities by August 1, 2026. 1856 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FEDERAL LAND AND WATER CONSERVATION FUND GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 15,000,000 1858 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY NATIONAL RECREATIONAL TRAIL GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,000,000 1858A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY LOCAL PARKS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,821,270 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1858A are provided for the following local parks: Citrus County - Chassahowitzka River Campground Repairs and Improvements (SF 3280).............................. 350,000 Clay County Moccasin Slough Construction (SF 3085)........ 400,000 Girl Scouts of Southeast Florida Camp Welaka Revitalization (SF 2045)................................ 750,000 Hardee County - Hardee Lakes Park Critical Water Quality Infrastructure and Utility Improvements (SF 3559)....... 4,000,000 Jacksonville - Shipyards West Riverwalk (SF 3317)......... 2,000,000 Jupiter Athletic Field Repairs and Restoration (SF 2097).. 700,000 Lake County Neighborhood Lakes Gateway Center (SF 1918)... 400,000 Lakeland - Se7en Wetlands Water Education Center - Exhibits (SF 2337)...................................... 115,000 Mangonia Park Addie Greene Regional Park Improvements (SF 2381)................................................... 220,000 Okaloosa County - Shalimar Bridge Park Project (SF 3253).. 350,000 Palmetto 14th Ave West Recreational Area (SF 3720)........ 750,000 Parkland Special Needs Accommodations at Pine Trails Park (SF 1298)............................................... 500,000 Peace River Botanical & Sculpture Gardens (SF 3533)....... 100,000 Sneads Regional Sport Lighting Recovery (SF 3126)......... 400,000 St. Cloud Safety Alerting System for Local Parks (SF 1599) 116,270 Wauchula - Community Court Park (SF 3550)................. 2,000,000 Wauchula Farr Field Park Improvements Phase 2 (SF 3546)... 3,500,000 Wauchula Oak Street Park Public Restroom Improvements (SF 3565)................................................... 500,000 Wekiva Youth Camp Swimming Pool Refinishing Project (SF 2643)................................................... 70,000 West Miami Senior Recreation Development Initiative (SF 1754)................................................... 600,000 TOTAL: STATE PARK OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 17,821,270 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 185,011,775 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,032.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 202,833,045 COASTAL AND AQUATIC MANAGED AREAS APPROVED SALARY RATE 13,374,156 1859 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 222.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 332,489 FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 5,022,361 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,982,661 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 9,894,095 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,374,912 1860 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 410,652 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,054,075 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 813,801 1861 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 177,172 FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 549,461 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 176,600 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,442,630 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 170,318 1862 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - REGIONAL RESILIENCE COALITIONS FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 2,000,000 1863 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 216,000 1865 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORAL REEF PROTECTION AND RESTORATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1865 are provided for coral reef restoration and protection efforts. 1866 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF BOATS, MOTORS, AND TRAILERS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 200,000 1867 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUBMERGED RESOURCE DAMAGED RESTORATIONS FROM WATER QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 258,429 1868 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RESILIENT FLORIDA FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 775,000 1869 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SEAGRASS RESTORATION TECHNICAL DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 1870 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT/PLANNING GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 700,000 1872 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,700,000 FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 6,500,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 784,443 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1872, $4,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Resilient Florida Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Environmental Protection to contract for post-storm seafloor mapping and to extend the Florida Seafloor Mapping Initiative. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1872, $1,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Resilient Florida Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Environmental Protection to contract for a physics-based satellite-derived bathymetry technology to monitor Florida's coastline. Satellite imagery may be utilized to augment the existing seafloor mapping program, assess changes to sand resources, characterize marine habitat including coral and seagrass, and inform the state's resilience planning and monitoring efforts. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1872, $650,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Monroe County Mobile Vessel Pumpout Program to be administered by the Department of Environmental Protection. Administrative cost for the program shall not exceed five percent. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1872, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Nova Southeastern University: Oceanographic Campus Wharf Renewal and Seagrass Mitigation (SF 1106). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1872, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Lake Apopka Native Submerged Aquatic Vegetation Aquaculture Planting Program (SF 3120). From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1872, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Biscayne Bay Seagrass Restoration (SF 1204). 1873 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MARINE RESEARCH GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,628,301 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 341,758 1874 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 69,448 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 55,071 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 137,564 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 19,012 1875 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COASTAL AND AQUATIC MANAGED AREAS (CAMA) - CARL MANAGEMENT FUNDS FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 890,129 1876 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,201 FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 17,622 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 11,506 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 44,637 FROM PERMIT FEE TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,655 1877 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE UNIVERSITY OF SOUTH FLORIDA - FLORIDA FLOOD HUB FOR APPLIED RESEARCH AND INNOVATION FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 5,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1877 are provided for the Florida Flood Hub for Applied Research and Innovation pursuant to section 380.0933, Florida Statutes. 1878 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAINTENANCE, REPAIRS AND CONSTRUCTION - STATEWIDE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,000,000 1879 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FLORIDA COASTAL ZONE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,440,443 1880 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FLOODING AND SEA LEVEL RISE RESILIENCE PLAN - STATEWIDE FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 100,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1880 are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection for the Statewide Flooding and Sea Level Rise Resilience Plan. In the event that projects included in the plan are unable to continue or if excess funds are identified by completed projects, the department may reallocate funds to projects on its Statewide Flooding and Sea Level Rise Resilience Plan to the next project on the ranked list or to projects already funded and that have identified funding needs in subsequent years. 1881 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RESILIENT FLORIDA PLANNING GRANTS FROM RESILIENT FLORIDA TRUST FUND . 20,000,000 1882 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CLEAN MARINA FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 200,000 1883 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY BEACH PROJECTS - STATEWIDE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 64,141,067 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1883 are provided to the Department of Environmental Protection for distribution to beach and inlet management projects consistent with any component of the comprehensive long-term management plan developed in accordance with section 161.161, Florida Statutes. Funds shall be used to fund post-construction monitoring and projects 1 through 4 on the Strategic Beach Management Plan and projects 1 through 6 on the Inlet Management Plan. 1883A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HARBOUR ISLAND SHORELINE RESTORATION AND STABILIZATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1883A are provided for Harbour Island Shoreline Restoration and Stabilization (SF 2900). TOTAL: COASTAL AND AQUATIC MANAGED AREAS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 13,121,514 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 236,416,999 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 222.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 249,538,513 PROGRAM: AIR RESOURCES MANAGEMENT AIR RESOURCES MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,472,117 1884 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 65.00 FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,653,004 1885 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,000 1886 EXPENSES FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 874,213 1887 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,147,680 1888 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 550,000 1889 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DISTRIBUTION TO COUNTIES - MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION PROCEEDS FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,705,936 1890 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ASBESTOS REMOVAL PROGRAM FEES FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,000 1891 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,880,755 1892 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,270 1893 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM AIR POLLUTION CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,491 TOTAL: AIR RESOURCES MANAGEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,902,349 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 65.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,902,349 PROGRAM: ENVIRONMENTAL LAW ENFORCEMENT ENVIRONMENTAL LAW ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,187,028 1894 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 44.00 FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 1,665,656 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 3,324,205 1895 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 61,443 1896 EXPENSES FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 150,259 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 534,235 1897 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF PATROL VEHICLES FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 107,000 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 132,000 1898 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 10,000 1899 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARDOUS WASTE CLEANUP FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 725,883 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 207,000 1900 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ON-CALL FEES FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 199,527 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 25,902 1901 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 44,800 1902 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENTS FOR RESTORATION AND DAMAGE FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 25,000 1903 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ABANDONED DRUM REMOVAL AND DISPOSAL FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 100,000 1904 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 8,739 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 24,803 1905 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 24,719 1906 SPECIAL CATEGORIES UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK CLEANUP FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 114,759 1906A SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND OR STATE GAME TRUST FUND IN THE FWCC FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 10,510,256 FROM SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,622,599 1907 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM COASTAL PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 6,108 FROM INLAND PROTECTION TRUST FUND . 8,862 TOTAL: ENVIRONMENTAL LAW ENFORCEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,633,755 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 44.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,633,755 TOTAL: ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 719,653,367 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,601,489,133 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 3,123.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,321,142,500 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 180,236,085 FISH AND WILDLIFE CONSERVATION COMMISSION PROGRAM: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES OFFICE OF EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,131,896 1908 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 224.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 72,117 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 10,321,400 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 8,325,948 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,855,561 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 156,556 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 278,697 1909 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,872,982 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 273,381 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 500,000 1910 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,866,259 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 517,542 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 42,622 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 19,107 1911 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 35,728 1913 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FISH AND WILDLIFE CONSERVATION COMMISSION YOUTH HUNTING AND FISHING PROGRAMS FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 159,000 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,301,255 1914 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NON-CARL WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 72,205 1915 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 118,516 1916 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,433,674 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 91,491 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 1,685 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,754,188 1917 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 543,685 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1917 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 1918 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 861,020 1919 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 382,270 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 5,867 1920 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 11,100 1921 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FINAL NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 750,000 1922 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 34,731 1923 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GULF COAST RESTORATION FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 425,510 1924 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RESTORE ACT - DEEPWATER HORIZON SPILL FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,000 1925 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 86,903 1926 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - DEEPWATER HORIZON - STATE OPERATIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 115,000 1927 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT AND GRANT REIMBURSED ACTIVITIES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 900,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,168 1928 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITIES REPAIRS AND MAINTENANCE FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 175,000 TOTAL: OFFICE OF EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,945,995 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 38,437,173 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 224.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 40,383,168 PROGRAM: LAW ENFORCEMENT FISH, WILDLIFE AND BOATING LAW ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 81,136,802 1929 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,083.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 48,683,410 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,215,197 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 25,892,811 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,563,314 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 1,130,957 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,460,163 1930 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 439,295 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 90,794 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 468,057 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 254,693 1931 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,131,992 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,083,693 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,184,627 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,978,680 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,252,532 1932 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,584 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 62,500 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 141,891 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 74,257 1933 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF PATROL VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 1933A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF BOATS, MOTORS, AND TRAILERS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 1934 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENHANCED WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 272,166 1935 SPECIAL CATEGORIES 800 MHZ RADIO LAW ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM EQUIPMENT AND MAINTENANCE FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 44,760 1936 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NUISANCE WILDLIFE CONTROL FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 150,000 1937 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,628,012 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,500 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 853,663 1938 SPECIAL CATEGORIES BOAT RAMP MAINTENANCE CATEGORY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 306,754 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,279,730 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 67,048 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 143,750 1939 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,274,388 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,824,918 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 41,804 1940 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,561,969 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 107,898 1941 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 353,243 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 14,926 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 20,160 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 423,298 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 154,562 1942 SPECIAL CATEGORIES BOATING AND WATERWAYS ACTIVITIES FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,626,025 1943 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SPECIAL CATEGORIES - AIRCRAFT MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,026,473 1944 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FINAL NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,247,814 1945 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 376,524 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,843 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 12,413 1946 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT AND GRANT REIMBURSED ACTIVITIES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 7,510,830 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 36,450 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 608,989 1947 SPECIAL CATEGORIES BOATING SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAM FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 625,650 1948 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DERELICT VESSEL REMOVAL PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,600,000 1951 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DERELICT VESSEL REMOVAL PROGRAM FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,400,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1951 are provided to the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission for grants to local governments or to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, or to pay private contractors to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, derelict vessels or vessels declared a public nuisance. 1952 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FLORIDA BOATING IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,000,000 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 783,844 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,250,000 1952A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - FINAL NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 1952B GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AID - SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,950,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1952B are provided for the following special projects: Eckerd College Search and Rescue (SF 2504)................ 350,000 Glades County Indian Prairie Boat Ramp Improvements (SF 3345)................................................... 2,000,000 Indialantic Riverside Park Fishing Pier (SF 1127)......... 450,000 Melbourne Pineapple Pier Restoration (SF 1178)............ 150,000 TOTAL: FISH, WILDLIFE AND BOATING LAW ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 75,347,644 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 124,365,207 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,083.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 199,712,851 PROGRAM: WILDLIFE HUNTING AND GAME MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,673,435 1953 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 43.00 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,019,936 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 687,606 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,222,584 1954 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 388,362 1955 EXPENSES FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 393,985 1956 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,638 1957 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 432,000 1958 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENHANCED WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 22,079 1959 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NON-CARL WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 80,315 1960 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEER MANAGEMENT PROGRAM FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 400,000 1961 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 244,710 1962 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DUCKS UNLIMITED MARSH PROJECT FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 106,792 1963 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC DOVE FIELD DEVELOPMENT FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 49,000 1964 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 43,061 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 8,584 1965 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT AREA USER PAY FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 436,325 1966 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,730 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,173 1967 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT AND GRANT REIMBURSED ACTIVITIES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,676,384 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,017 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 25,000 1968 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WILD TURKEY PROJECTS FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 800,000 1969 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SHOOTING SPORTS FACILITIES MAINTENANCE, REPAIRS, AND CONSTRUCTION FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,000,000 TOTAL: HUNTING AND GAME MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 57,791 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,040,490 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 43.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,098,281 PROGRAM: HABITAT AND SPECIES CONSERVATION HABITAT AND SPECIES CONSERVATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 22,274,436 1970 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 378.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 986,925 FROM INVASIVE PLANT CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,077,247 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,488,248 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 328,135 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 701,290 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 12,606,502 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 855,616 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 2,751,035 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 1,151,850 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,701,294 1971 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 229,574 FROM INVASIVE PLANT CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 677,004 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 56,902 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 183,702 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 122,054 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 104,851 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 1,013,064 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 54,228 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 483,852 1972 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 584,398 FROM INVASIVE PLANT CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 253,938 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 99,912 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 89,831 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,376,254 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 119,097 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 485,213 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 93,072 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 802,349 1973 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 10,625 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 55,922 1974 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INVASIVE PLANT CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 135,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 139,000 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 405,000 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 1976 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENHANCED WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 8,876,690 1977 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NON-CARL WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,551,534 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 18,566,378 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 411,412 1978 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NUISANCE WILDLIFE CONTROL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,000,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,983,115 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 384,309 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 347,947 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1978, $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to expand existing management and contractual removal of Burmese Pythons and other priority nonnative fish and wildlife. Funds may also be used for research and to assess risk and the efficacy of control efforts, and for the development and implementation of innovative technologies and techniques as approved by the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission. Innovative technologies should include the use of artificial intelligence enabled python trapping networks to lure and segregate invasive pythons from non-invasive species. Funds may also be used for publicly procured nonnative snake control contracts to implement these innovative technologies. The department shall submit an annual report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House Budget Committee specifying the expenditures and research activities for the removal of Burmese Pythons and other priority nonnative fish and wildlife. 1979 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAND MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1979 from the General Revenue Fund are provided for the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission to perform land management activities consistent with the land management mission of the department. From these funds, the department shall submit a detailed spend and activity plan for the funds and shall focus on invasive species removal beyond the recurring funding the department has for land management activities by August 1, 2026. 1980 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,425,000 FROM INVASIVE PLANT CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 194,250 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 99,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,844 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 65,196 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,000 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 40,270 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 10,771 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 34,182 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1980, $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Captive Wildlife Grant Program to support organizations that care and manage captive native Florida wildlife, in compliance with Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission (FWC) regulations. The FWC shall administer the program, establish application and award criteria via rulemaking, and distribute funding to eligible organizations. Eligible organizations shall be a Florida registered not-for-profit with an annual operating budget of less than $7,500,000; attest to serving more than 50,000 visitors in the prior fiscal year; maintain either ESA or ESB permits from the FWC, or alternatively, be a Florida-based member in good-standing of the Manatee Rescue and Rehabilitation Partnership; and, provide educational programming to their community. Recipients shall allow the FWC use of their facility, for the purposes of relocation and rehabilitation of captive native wildlife, staff training, education, or outreach programs. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1980, $350,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Sebring - Lake Jackson Aquatic Restoration Project (SF 3652). 1981 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAKE RESTORATION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 5,181,904 1982 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FEDERAL ENDANGERED SPECIES - SECTION 6 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 561,758 1983 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAND MANAGEMENT/SAVE OUR RIVERS FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 394,187 1984 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTROL OF INVASIVE EXOTICS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,797,751 FROM INVASIVE PLANT CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,200,000 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 31,735,280 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 1984, $4,200,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Invasive Plant Control Trust Fund is contingent on the execution of a memorandum of understanding between the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission, the South Florida Water Management District, and the United States Army Corps of Engineers, that recognizes the need for coordination and public input when developing management strategies for aquatic plants in Lake Okeechobee. The memorandum of understanding must require management activities to be coordinated among the parties and conducted so as to improve the overall health of the Lake's ecosystem, protect human health, endangered species, safety and recreation and, to the greatest degree practicable, to prevent incidental injury to plant and animal life and property. 1985 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 525,410 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,863 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 133,787 1986 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HABITAT RESTORATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,361,980 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 281,833 1987 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FINAL NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 280,000 1988 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES/ IFAS/INVASIVE EXOTIC PLANT RESEARCH FROM INVASIVE PLANT CONTROL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 633,128 Funds in Specific Appropriation 1988 are provided to the University of Florida Institute of Food and Agricultural Sciences for Invasive Exotic Plant Research. 1989 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GULF COAST RESTORATION FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,351,000 1990 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 104,480 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,272 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,899 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 56,221 1991 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HABITAT CONSERVATION PLAN LANDS ACQUISITION PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,000,000 1992 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - DEEPWATER HORIZON - STATE OPERATIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 273,347 1993 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT AND GRANT REIMBURSED ACTIVITIES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 16,746,187 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 418,510 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 192,809 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 30,201 1994 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 1995 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - FINAL NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 600,000 TOTAL: HABITAT AND SPECIES CONSERVATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 30,305,072 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 138,964,617 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 378.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 169,269,689 PROGRAM: FRESHWATER FISHERIES FRESHWATER FISHERIES MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,268,878 1996 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 58.00 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,786,287 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 108,982 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,903,628 1997 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 57,175 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 71,417 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 50,322 1998 EXPENSES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 387,680 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 31,664 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 275,321 1999 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 15,625 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 15,914 2002 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENHANCED WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 40,800 2003 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 37,553 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 21,996 2004 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAKE RESTORATION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 915,000 2005 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,196 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 21,204 2006 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAND USE PROCEEDS DISBURSEMENTS FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,612 2007 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,884 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 106 2008 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT AND GRANT REIMBURSED ACTIVITIES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 529,391 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 138,926 2009 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY BLACKWATER FISHERIES RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT CENTER RENOVATION FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,000,000 TOTAL: FRESHWATER FISHERIES MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 44,080 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,413,603 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 58.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,457,683 PROGRAM: MARINE FISHERIES MARINE FISHERIES MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,580,325 2010 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 41.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 250,625 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 709,898 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,900,070 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,019 2011 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,229 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,269 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 91,984 2012 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,500 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 628,095 2013 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 265,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,000 2014 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF BOATS, MOTORS, AND TRAILERS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 150,000 2015 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AQUATIC RESOURCES EDUCATION FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 552,828 2016 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,005,987 2017 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GULF STATES MARINE FISHERIES FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,500 2018 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 196,556 2019 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FINAL NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 630,000 2020 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,561 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,463 2021 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - DEEPWATER HORIZON - STATE OPERATIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 178,362 2022 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT AND GRANT REIMBURSED ACTIVITIES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 457,713 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 2023 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY OYSTER RESTORATION AND RECOVERY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000,000 2024 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ARTIFICIAL FISHING REEF CONSTRUCTION PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,300,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 300,000 TOTAL: MARINE FISHERIES MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,047,471 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,703,188 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 41.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 28,750,659 PROGRAM: RESEARCH FISH AND WILDLIFE RESEARCH INSTITUTE APPROVED SALARY RATE 20,182,987 2025 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 331.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,361,888 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,952,751 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 317,083 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 549,203 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 264,867 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,292,313 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 1,548,086 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 1,345,601 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,307,538 2026 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,520,457 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,096 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 110,648 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,527 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,814,939 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 969,822 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 517,819 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 462,273 2027 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,577,207 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 72,241 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,952 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,533,961 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 502,923 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 265,100 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 542,861 2028 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 151,239 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 7,335 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 36,932 2029 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 400,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 299,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,000 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 403,000 2030 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT OF BOATS, MOTORS, AND TRAILERS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 368,200 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 395,750 2031 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENHANCED WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 80,576 2032 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NUISANCE WILDLIFE CONTROL FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 147,280 2033 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,263,124 FROM FLORIDA PANTHER RESEARCH AND MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 24,105 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,459,404 FROM NON-GAME WILDLIFE TRUST FUND . 237,889 FROM SAVE THE MANATEE TRUST FUND . . 358,310 FROM STATE GAME TRUST FUND . . . . . 50,501 2034 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 992,229 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 3,670 2035 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FINAL NATURAL RESOURCE DAMAGE RESTORATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,617,209 2036 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 325,945 2037 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GULF COAST RESTORATION FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,936,962 2038 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RESTORE ACT - DEEPWATER HORIZON SPILL FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 943,585 2039 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 154,078 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,982 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 892 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,289 2040 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - DEEPWATER HORIZON - STATE OPERATIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 565,203 2041 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RED TIDE RESEARCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,240,000 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 640,993 2042 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA RED TIDE MITIGATION AND TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 2043 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HARMFUL ALGAL BLOOMS GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 600,000 2044 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACT AND GRANT REIMBURSED ACTIVITIES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,754,608 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,667,382 FROM MARINE RESOURCES CONSERVATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,897,587 2044A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FISH AND WILDLIFE RESEARCH INSTITUTE WILDLIFE RESEARCH LAB FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 250,000 2045 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY NATIONAL FISH AND WILDLIFE FOUNDATION - DEEPWATER HORIZON OIL SPILL FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,082,000 2046A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AID - SPECIAL PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,942,231 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2046A are provided for the following special projects: Central Florida Zoological Society, Inc. 50th Anniversary Modernization Project (SF 1417)......................... 750,000 Coastal Conservation Association FL Mariculture Center (SF 1073)............................................... 750,000 Florida Wildlife Interactive Education Center (SF 3532)... 14,000,000 Hubbs-Seaworld Research Institute Community Partnerships to Rebuild Florida's Fisheries (SF 2408)................ 647,231 Peace River Wildlife Center New Education Center (SF 3672) 500,000 Undersea Human Presence and Technology Advancement Program (SF 3658)....................................... 350,000 ZooTampa - Expanding Endangered Florida Wildlife Conservation (SF 3319).................................. 1,945,000 TOTAL: FISH AND WILDLIFE RESEARCH INSTITUTE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 36,301,214 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 73,908,432 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 331.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 110,209,646 TOTAL: FISH AND WILDLIFE CONSERVATION COMMISSION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 165,049,267 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 410,832,710 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,158.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 575,881,977 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 146,248,759 TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF Funds in Specific Appropriations 2055 through 2068, 2069D through 2069E, 2080 through 2090, 2092 through 2100, and 2138 through 2151 are provided from the named funds to the Department of Transportation to fund the five-year Work Program developed pursuant to provisions of section 339.135, Florida Statutes. Those appropriations used by the department for grants and aids may be advanced in part or in total. The Work Program is further supported by up to $1.0052 billion in principal amount of bonds, authorized and issued pursuant to section 338.227, Florida Statutes, and any other payments necessary or incidental to the repayment of bonds as directly managed by the State Board of Administration, Division of Bond Finance. TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM: TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS DEVELOPMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 147,434,049 2047 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,680.00 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 208,650,465 FROM TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,355,124 2048 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,546 2049 EXPENSES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,794,573 FROM TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 234,030 2050 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,535,146 2051 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSULTANT FEES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 7,497,325 2052 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 8,682,651 FROM TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 557,738 2053 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 157,907 FROM TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,830 2054 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED FROM TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 66,356,668 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2054, $6,000,000 shall be used by the Commission for the Transportation Disadvantaged to continue the Innovative Service Development Grant program. Funds shall be used to provide competitive grants to community transportation coordinators and non-traditional transportation service providers, such as transportation network companies, that provide door-to-door, on-demand, or scheduled transportation services for innovative service delivery that is more cost efficient for the program and time efficient for users. Projects serving a single county may receive up to $750,000; projects serving multiple counties with a goal of providing regional mobility may receive a maximum of $1,500,000. A ten percent local match is required for all grants. All funds shall be used to provide direct services to transportation disadvantaged clients. 2055 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TRANSPORTATION PLANNING CONSULTANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 86,503,035 2056 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY AVIATION DEVELOPMENT/GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 388,815,731 2057 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PUBLIC TRANSIT DEVELOPMENT/GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 363,503,591 2058 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RIGHT-OF-WAY LAND ACQUISITION FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 333,857,291 FROM RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION AND BRIDGE CONSTRUCTION TRUST FUND . . 138,245,871 2059 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SEAPORT - ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 15,000,000 2060 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SEAPORTS ACCESS PROGRAM FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 10,000,000 2061 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SEAPORT GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 120,324,833 2062 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SEAPORT INVESTMENT PROGRAM FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 10,161,599 2063 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RAIL DEVELOPMENT/GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 53,848,685 2064 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY INTERMODAL DEVELOPMENT/GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 85,236,218 2065 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PRELIMINARY ENGINEERING CONSULTANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 954,620,759 2066 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RIGHT-OF-WAY SUPPORT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 52,960,292 FROM RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION AND BRIDGE CONSTRUCTION TRUST FUND . . 687,698 2067 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TRANSPORTATION PLANNING GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 75,628,725 2068 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEBT SERVICE FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 134,012,139 FROM RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION AND BRIDGE CONSTRUCTION TRUST FUND . . 237,620,790 There is hereby authorized to be issued up to $704.1 million in principal amount of bonds authorized and issued pursuant to section 215.605, Florida Statutes, and any other payments necessary or incidental to the repayment of bonds. Specific Appropriation 2068 includes $237,620,790 to support Fiscal Year 2026-2027 debt service associated with such projects. There is hereby authorized to be issued up to $204.1 million in principal amount of bonds to finance construction, reconstruction, and improvement of projects that are eligible to receive federal-aid highway funds in accordance with section 215.616, Florida Statutes. Specific Appropriation 2068 includes $46,744,308 to support Fiscal Year 2026-2027 debt service associated with such projects. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2068, $87,267,831 is provided for additional payments required under the service contract pursuant to section 339.0809, Florida Statutes, and used to secure up to $551 million in principal amount of bonds to finance projects authorized in section 339.0809(14), Florida Statutes. TOTAL: PROGRAM: TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS DEVELOPMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,361,874,260 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,680.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,361,874,260 FLORIDA RAIL ENTERPRISE APPROVED SALARY RATE 244,060 2069 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1.00 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 319,192 2069A EXPENSES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 25,200 2069B SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSULTANT FEES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 4,089 2069C SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,714 2069D FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PUBLIC TRANSIT DEVELOPMENT/GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 96,542,810 2069E FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RAIL DEVELOPMENT/GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 179,325,595 TOTAL: FLORIDA RAIL ENTERPRISE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 276,222,600 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 276,222,600 TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS OPERATIONS PROGRAM: HIGHWAY OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 213,624,835 2070 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 2,941.00 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 313,731,108 2071 EXPENSES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 17,994,133 2072 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,653,671 2073 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 14,026,439 2074 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSULTANT FEES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,975,387 2075 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 9,999,428 2076 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - KEEP AMERICA BEAUTIFUL STATEWIDE AFFILIATE FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 800,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2076 are provided for the Keep America Beautiful Statewide Affiliate, as provided in section 403.709(1)(d), Florida Statutes. 2077 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSPORTATION MATERIALS AND EQUIPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 29,510,491 2078 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 299,554 2079 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MINOR RENOVATIONS, REPAIRS, AND IMPROVEMENTS - STATEWIDE FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 17,955,731 2080 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY STATE INFRASTRUCTURE BANK LOAN REPAYMENTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 60,704,798 2081 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SMALL COUNTY RESURFACE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (SCRAP) FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 25,850,001 2082 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SMALL COUNTY OUTREACH PROGRAM (SCOP) FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 81,940,710 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2082, $9,000,000 is provided for transportation projects in municipalities pursuant to section 339.2818(7), Florida Statutes. 2084 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - MAJOR DISASTERS - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION WORK PROGRAM FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 26,374,145 2085 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY COUNTY TRANSPORTATION PROGRAMS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 69,701,194 2086 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY BOND GUARANTEE FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 500,000 2087 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TRANSPORTATION HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 718,651,474 2088 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY INTRASTATE HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,311,107,544 2089 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ARTERIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 381,215,924 2090 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CONSTRUCTION INSPECTION CONSULTANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 526,610,447 2091 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ENVIRONMENTAL SITE RESTORATION FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 485,000 2092 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HIGHWAY SAFETY CONSTRUCTION/GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 269,210,229 2093 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RESURFACING FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,430,107,067 2094 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY BRIDGE CONSTRUCTION FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 852,837,954 FROM RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION AND BRIDGE CONSTRUCTION TRUST FUND . . 5,500,000 2095 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CONTRACT MAINTENANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 500,000 2096 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HIGHWAY BEAUTIFICATION GRANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,000,000 2097 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MATERIALS AND RESEARCH FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 35,548,851 2097A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY LOCAL TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 100,000,000 The nonrecurring funds from the State Transportation Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 2097A shall be allocated as follows: Aventura - NE 191 Street Roadway Improvements (SF 1985)... 650,000 Belleair - Barbara Circle Reconstruction (Carl & Shirley PH 2) (SF 3670)......................................... 4,200,000 Belleair - Scour Critical Bridge Project (SF 2352)........ 400,000 Brevard County - North Banana River Drive South Bridge Replacement (SF 1185)................................... 1,000,000 Cape Coral - Evacuation Route Improvements - NE 24th Avenue (SF 2434)........................................ 800,000 Cedar Key - Dock Street Protection (SF 2417).............. 1,150,000 Charlotte County CyberLock Security for Traffic Signal Cabinets (SF 3669)...................................... 325,000 Charlotte County Intersection Hardening/Resiliency (SF 3668)................................................... 350,000 Citrus County Halls River Multi-Use Path Construction Phase (SF 3264)......................................... 1,000,000 City of Oldsmar Patty/Country Club Drive (SF 3755)........ 3,000,000 Clay County CR 218 Expansion (SF 2955).................... 1,500,000 Clearwater - Elevate Bayshore (SF 2494)................... 650,000 Clewiston - Berner Road Culvert Reconstruction (SF 3040).. 250,000 Cocoa - Multi-modal Station Access Road (SF 1575)......... 350,000 Coral Gables - Traffic Calming and Safety Improvements (SF 1101)............................................... 400,000 Crestview - SR 85 Traffic Alleviation Project (SF 3467)... 1,500,000 Delray Beach - Swinton Ave & Atlantic Ave Intersection Improvements (SF 1798).................................. 650,000 DeSoto County CR 769 Expansion (SF 3680).................. 350,000 Dixie County Middle High School Access Road (SF 1499)..... 744,288 Doral - NW 117th Avenue from NW 25 St to NW 34 St Improvements (SF 2225).................................. 350,000 Downtown West Palm Beach Signalization Upgrades - Phase 3 (SF 3323)............................................... 800,000 Escambia County - South Navy Boulevard Improvements (SF 3726)................................................... 350,000 Estero - Williams Road & Atlantic Gulf Drive Improvements (SF 2994)............................................... 800,000 Fort Lauderdale - Galt Ocean Mile Corridor Improvements Final Phase (SF 1649)................................... 1,250,000 Fort Lauderdale - Roadway Resurfacing Project (SF 1653)... 350,000 Fort Walton Beach - Design Phase for U.S. 98 "Around the Mound" (SF 3193)........................................ 750,000 Gulfport - Police & Fire Rapid Response Roadway Reconstruction (SF 2466)................................ 377,987 Hillsborough County East 26th Avenue Road Improvements (SF 2463)............................................... 3,900,000 Howard C. Forman Human Services Campus Improvements Phase 1 (SF 3385)............................................. 350,000 I-95 Interchange / SR-442 Stormwater Resilience Project (SF 2800)............................................... 1,000,000 Improving Safety & Security in Downtown Jacksonville (SF 2627)................................................... 1,000,000 Industrial Park Connector at Punta Gorda Airport (PGD) (SF 3673)............................................... 4,200,000 Jacksonville - 11th and 12th Street Connector (SF 2931)... 350,000 Jacksonville - Baymeadows Road Crosswalk Improvements (SF 3163)................................................... 972,000 Jacksonville - Hogan Street Emerald Trail from Union Street to 1st Street (SF 3119).......................... 1,150,000 Jacksonville - Regional Corridor - I-295 to US-1 (SF 2622) 1,000,000 Jupiter - Toney Penna & Central Boulevard Intersection Improvements (SF 2099).................................. 350,000 Lee County I-75 Interchange Justification Report and PD&E Study (SF 2424)......................................... 350,000 Lighthouse Point - NE 31 Court Bridge Replacement Project (SF 1664)............................................... 350,000 Madeira Beach - Area 6 Roadway Project (SF 2492).......... 350,000 Manatee County 51st Street West Extension - 53rd Ave W to El Conquistador Pkwy (SF 2533).......................... 3,000,000 Manatee County Fort Hamer Interchange (SF 1993)........... 1,000,000 Miami - Southwest 15th Road Drainage & Roadway Improvements (SF 1751).................................. 1,500,000 Miami - Wagner Creek Embankment & Right-of-Way Improvements (SF 1383).................................. 2,000,000 Miami Lakes - NW 155th Street Roadway Improvements (SF 2185)................................................... 790,000 Miami Shores Village - NE 94 Street Roadway Improvements (SF 1771)............................................... 750,000 Miami Springs - Oakwood Drive Roadway Safety Improvements (SF 2195)............................................... 650,000 Miami Springs - Westward Drive Roadway Improvements (SF 2193)................................................... 800,000 Miami-Dade - Biscayne-Everglades Greenway (SF 2657)....... 350,000 Miami-Dade County Ludlam Trail Corridor (SF 2599)......... 1,250,000 Nassau County CR 107 Widening & Intersection Improvements - Right-of-Way Acquisition/Construction (SF 2683)....... 1,000,000 Ocala - SW 42nd Street at SW 7th Avenue Intersection Improvements (SF 1381).................................. 350,000 Osceola County Waterlin Boulevard Interchange (SF 1600)... 1,250,000 Palm Bay - Babcock Street Phase One Widening Improvement Project (SF 3451)....................................... 500,000 Palm Bay - Intelligent Transportation System (ITS) Traffic Enhancement Project (SF 1361)................... 750,000 Palm Bay - Malabar Road SE and Emerson Drive Intersection Improvements Project (SF 1360).......................... 600,000 Palm Beach County CR 880 Bridge Replacements (SF 2023).... 10,000,000 Palm Springs - Dolan Road Safety Improvements (SF 1875)... 750,000 Palmetto Bay - SW 82 Avenue Multi-Modal Safety Improvements (SF 1377).................................. 142,725 Panama City - Bay County Airport and Industrial District North Terminal Expansion Program (SF 3104).............. 1,150,000 Pasco County Rangeland Boulevard Extension (SF 1718)...... 3,000,000 Pasco County Shady Hills Road Sidewalk Project (SF 3399).. 350,000 Pinellas County East Lake Road - Phase I Capacity Improvements (SF 1723).................................. 7,500,000 Polk County Power Line Road Segment 2 Right-of-Way (SF 2323)................................................... 1,500,000 Pompano Beach - North Riverside Drive Multimodal Safety and Resilience Corridor (SF 1372)....................... 895,000 Port Richey - Grand Blvd and US Hwy 19 Multi-Vehicle Crossing Construction (SF 2037)......................... 250,000 PortMiami North Bulkhead Improvement Project (SF 2538).... 350,000 Sanibel - Shared Use Path Reconstruction - Hurricane Recovery (SF 2437)...................................... 350,000 Santa Rosa County Whiting Aviation Park - Taxiway Extension (SF 3469)..................................... 500,000 Sarasota County Lorraine Road, Segment C, Phase 2 Capacity and Mobility Improvement Project (SF 1682)..... 1,500,000 South Bay - Palm Beach Road Improvements and Beautification Project (SF 1025)........................ 900,000 Southwest Ranches - Safety Guardrail (SF 1077)............ 694,000 St. Johns County State Road 16 - Phase 2 (SF 2561)........ 1,000,000 St. Pete Beach - Boca Ciega Drive Reconstruction (SF 2932) 350,000 Surfside - Safe Streets Project (SF 1404)................. 700,000 Village of Virginia Gardens - Roadway Improvements (SF 2189)................................................... 350,000 Volusia County North Beach Street Flood Mitigation Upgrades for Design/Construction (SF 2630).............. 1,000,000 Wauchula - Critical Citywide Roadway Improvements (SF 3681)................................................... 2,500,000 Wauchula - Municipal Airport Taxi Lane and T-Hangars Improvements - Phase 2 (SF 3545)........................ 5,000,000 West Palm Beach - Old Okeechobee Rail Safety Intersection Improvements (SF 2361).................................. 350,000 Windermere - Upgrade Roundabout - 6th Avenue and Main St. - Phase I (SF 1904)..................................... 784,000 Zephyrhills - Municipal Airport FBO (SF 2284)............. 1,500,000 2098 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY BRIDGE INSPECTION FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 34,459,224 2099 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TRAFFIC ENGINEERING CONSULTANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 320,027,055 2100 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY LOCAL GOVERNMENT REIMBURSEMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 19,970,115 TOTAL: PROGRAM: HIGHWAY OPERATIONS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,680,247,674 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,941.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,680,247,674 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 57,412,764 2101 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 741.00 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 82,739,256 2102 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,360,557 2103 EXPENSES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 8,959,559 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2103, the Department of Transportation must work with the Auditor General to monitor Work Program construction projects in progress which are anticipated to take more than two years to complete. The Auditor General must select such projects for auditing where construction is delayed more than one year past the original scheduled completion date and report the status of their findings to the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee on a quarterly basis with recommendations for corrective action. 2104 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 94,025 2105 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 28,828 2106 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSULTANT FEES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,636,611 2107 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 11,719,888 2108 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 10,745,691 2109 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE - OTHER FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 979,058 2110 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO SOUTH FLORIDA WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICT FOR EVERGLADES RESTORATION FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 6,132,690 2111 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR HIGHWAY TAX COMPLIANCE FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 34,640 2112 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 428,974 2113 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,105,193 FROM TRANSPORTATION DISADVANTAGED TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,355 2114 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MINOR RENOVATIONS, REPAIRS, AND IMPROVEMENTS - STATEWIDE FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 11,894,269 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2114, $2,000,000 shall be provided for improvements to the Burns Building as determined by the Secretary of the department. For improvements with a total cost of $100,000 or more, the department shall notify the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee prior to the execution of a work order with a vendor. 2115 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MIAMI EMERGENCY OPERATIONS CENTER / MULTIPURPOSE BUILDING FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 8,034,739 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 146,898,333 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 741.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 146,898,333 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,357,346 2116 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 179.00 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 18,419,358 2117 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 53,077 2118 EXPENSES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 11,907,211 2119 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 471,192 2120 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSULTANT FEES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 335,670 2121 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 16,697,285 2122 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 9,154,634 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2122 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 2123 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 6,864,878 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2123, $5,347,708 in recurring funds from the State Transportation Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Transportation for the Data Infrastructure Migration and Modernization (DIMM) program. The department may not commence new initiatives for the DIMM program, including the migration or modernization of legacy applications that were not underway prior to June 30, 2025, during Fiscal Year 2026-2027, using funds provided in this section. 2124 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,383,781 2125 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 14,287 2126 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 9,491,505 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 74,792,878 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 179.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 74,792,878 FLORIDA'S TURNPIKE SYSTEMS FLORIDA'S TURNPIKE ENTERPRISE APPROVED SALARY RATE 28,613,128 2127 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 345.00 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 42,793,301 2128 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 521,452 2129 EXPENSES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 21,610,471 2130 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 107,709 2131 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 61,633 2132 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSULTANT FEES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,168,631 2133 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 69,469,527 2134 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENT TO EXPRESSWAY AUTHORITIES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 8,370,420 2135 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA HIGHWAY PATROL SERVICES FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 30,054,657 2136 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 214,000 2137 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MINOR RENOVATIONS, REPAIRS, AND IMPROVEMENTS - STATEWIDE FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 150,000 2138 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY STATE INFRASTRUCTURE BANK LOAN REPAYMENTS FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 736,000 2139 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TRANSPORTATION HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 88,329,412 2140 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY INTRASTATE HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION FROM TURNPIKE RENEWAL AND REPLACEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 82,753,318 FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,278,027,348 2141 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ARTERIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,397,272 2142 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CONSTRUCTION INSPECTION CONSULTANTS FROM TURNPIKE RENEWAL AND REPLACEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 20,106,167 FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 124,620,932 2143 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RIGHT-OF-WAY LAND ACQUISITION FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,495,194 2144 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RESURFACING FROM TURNPIKE RENEWAL AND REPLACEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 17,026,489 2145 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY BRIDGE CONSTRUCTION FROM TURNPIKE RENEWAL AND REPLACEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 14,621,122 2146 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY PRELIMINARY ENGINEERING CONSULTANTS FROM TURNPIKE RENEWAL AND REPLACEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 13,961,916 FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 273,949,806 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 7,351,733 2147 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY RIGHT-OF-WAY SUPPORT FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,650,457 2148 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TRAFFIC ENGINEERING CONSULTANTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 46,702,617 2149 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TOLL OPERATION CONTRACTS FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 228,138,545 2150 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TURNPIKE SYSTEM EQUIPMENT AND DEVELOPMENT FROM TURNPIKE GENERAL RESERVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,550,380 FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,100,000 2151 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY TOLLS SYSTEM EQUIPMENT AND DEVELOPMENT FROM STATE TRANSPORTATION (PRIMARY) TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 73,755,075 TOTAL: FLORIDA'S TURNPIKE ENTERPRISE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,537,795,584 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 345.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,537,795,584 TOTAL: TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,077,831,329 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 5,887.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,077,831,329 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 459,686,182 TOTAL OF SECTION 5 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,415,992,505 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 18,303,269,246 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 15,014.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,719,261,751 SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the named funds to Administered Funds, Department of Business and Professional Regulation, Department of Citrus, Department of Commerce, Department of Financial Services, Executive Office of the Governor, Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, Legislative Branch, Department of the Lottery, Department of Management Services, Department of Military Affairs, Public Service Commission, Department of Revenue, and Department of State as the amounts to be used to pay the salaries, other operational expenditures, and fixed capital outlay of the named agencies. PROGRAM: ADMINISTERED FUNDS 2152A LUMP SUM NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER - DATA CENTER SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 777,517 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,578,259 2153 LUMP SUM EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 259,150,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 196,600,000 2154 LUMP SUM TRANSITION ASSISTANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 2155 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ASSOCIATION DUES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 215,170 2156 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADMINISTRATION COMMISSION AND FLORIDA LAND AND WATER ADJUDICATORY COMMISSION - ADMINISTRATIVE APPEALS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 2157 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,479,801 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,479,801 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2157 are provided for distribution to state agencies as recurring funding for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for Enterprise Cybersecurity Resiliency based on approved budget amendment EOG#2026-B0019 in the amount of $5,215,752. The remaining funds are to be distributed to state agencies as recurring funding based on quarter three and four allocations from Fiscal Year 2025-2026. 2158 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO PLANNING AND BUDGETING SYSTEM TRUST FUND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,670,056 TOTAL: PROGRAM: ADMINISTERED FUNDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 279,302,544 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 205,658,060 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 484,960,604 BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONAL REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY AND ADMINISTRATION EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,313,043 2159 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 174.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 832,966 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 17,672,681 2160 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 598,388 2161 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 51,204 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,452,370 2162 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 12,088 2163 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 130,006 2164 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 70,469 2165 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 499,780 2166 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2166 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 2167 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 500,000 2168 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 15,500 2169 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 69,298 2170 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 7,650 2171 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 90,000 2172 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 77,506 2173 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,756 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 63,132 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 886,926 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,758,868 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 174.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,645,794 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,512,917 2174 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 60.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 163,418 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,374,663 2175 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 122,537 2176 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,939 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,944,068 2177 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 100,000 2178 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 66,000 2179 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,160,911 2180 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,300,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2180 are provided to the Department of Business and Professional Regulation for sustainment of the modernized customer service system. 2181 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA BUSINESS INFORMATION PORTAL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 119,236 2182 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 829,105 2183 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,000 2184 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 37,497 2185 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,001 2186 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 239 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 19,764 2187 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,391,260 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 288,832 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,355,806 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 60.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,644,638 PROGRAM: SERVICE OPERATION CALL CENTER AND LICENSE PROCESSING APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,368,665 2188 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 197.50 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 14,487,944 2189 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 713,769 2190 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,483,825 2191 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,000 2192 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,459,853 2193 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 103,643 2194 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 22,380 2195 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 72,851 TOTAL: CALL CENTER AND LICENSE PROCESSING FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,350,265 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 197.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,350,265 PROGRAM: PROFESSIONAL REGULATION COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 13,275,620 2196 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 247.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 280,522 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,434,095 2197 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 807,504 2198 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,713 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,359,883 2199 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 156,900 2200 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEGAL SERVICES CONTRACT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,073,928 2201 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 282,637 2202 SPECIAL CATEGORIES UNLICENSED ACTIVITIES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,306,440 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2202, up to $500,000 from the Professional Regulation Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Business and Professional Regulation to fund unlicensed activity enforcement relating to real estate. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2202, up to $100,000 from the Professional Regulation Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Business and Professional Regulation to fund unlicensed activity enforcement relating to certified public accountants. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2202, up to $500,000 from the Professional Regulation Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Business and Professional Regulation to enhance department enforcement activities, which include stings and sweeps, relating to unlicensed construction activity in Florida. The department may not allocate overhead charges to these unlicensed activity functions. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2202, the Department of Business and Professional Regulation shall submit a report to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget by November 2, 2026, detailing the unlicensed activity functions performed by the department during Fiscal Year 2025-2026. The report shall contain a detailed breakout of activities, revenues, and expenditures by board and/or profession, and include any relevant information to indicate the department's compliance with section 455.2281, Florida Statutes. 2203 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLAIMS PAYMENTS FROM CONSTRUCTION RECOVERY FUND FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,500,000 The Department of Business and Professional Regulation is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2203 in the event the amount of claims available for payment exceeds the amount appropriated. 2204 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLAIMS PAYMENT/AUCTIONEER RECOVERY FUND FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 106,579 2205 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER ARCHITECT & INTERIOR DESIGN ACTIVITIES CH. 2002-274 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 425,239 2206 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,183,838 2207 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA BUILDING CODE COMPLIANCE AND MITIGATION PROGRAM FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 925,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2207 are provided for the Florida Building Code Compliance and Mitigation Program as authorized in section 553.841, Florida Statutes. 2208 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,000 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 201,298 2209 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 227,791 2210 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLAY FORD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM - CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING MINORITY SCHOLARSHIPS FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 2211 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,162 2212 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,378 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 103,246 2213 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA ENGINEERING MANAGEMENT CORPORATION (FEMC) CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,270,000 2214 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS REAL ESTATE RECOVERY FUND FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 300,000 TOTAL: COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 314,613 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 38,919,540 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 247.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 39,234,153 FLORIDA ATHLETIC COMMISSION APPROVED SALARY RATE 494,700 2215 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 7.00 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 760,750 2216 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 417,884 2217 EXPENSES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 289,734 2218 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,000 2219 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,500 2220 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,000 2221 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,260 2222 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,598 TOTAL: FLORIDA ATHLETIC COMMISSION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,544,726 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 7.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,544,726 TESTING AND CONTINUING EDUCATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,755,744 2223 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 38.00 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,747,665 2224 EXPENSES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 388,196 2225 SPECIAL CATEGORIES EXAMINATION TESTING SERVICES FOR PROFESSIONAL REGULATION FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,702,420 2226 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,000 2227 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,161 2228 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,211 2229 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,430 TOTAL: TESTING AND CONTINUING EDUCATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,869,083 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 38.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,869,083 FARM AND CHILD LABOR REGULATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,362,520 2230 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 30.00 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,197,996 2231 EXPENSES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 209,517 2232 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 90,000 2233 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,090 2234 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 69,400 2235 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,916 2236 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,648 2237 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,839 TOTAL: FARM AND CHILD LABOR REGULATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,599,406 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 30.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,599,406 DRUGS, DEVICES, AND COSMETICS APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,053,703 2238 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 28.00 FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,975,519 2238A OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 32,547 2239 EXPENSES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 429,912 2240 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 118,000 2241 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 40,300 2242 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,938 2243 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,178 2244 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,900 2245 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PROFESSIONAL REGULATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,416 TOTAL: DRUGS, DEVICES, AND COSMETICS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,691,710 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 28.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,691,710 PROGRAM: HOTELS AND RESTAURANTS COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,836,269 2246 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 360.00 FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,058,339 2247 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 98,363 2248 EXPENSES FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,267,578 2249 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 908,001 2250 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFERS TO DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR EPIDEMIOLOGICAL SERVICES FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 864,762 2251 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SCHOOL-TO-CAREER FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,017,782 2252 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 54,458 2253 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 741,141 2254 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 866,654 2255 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,000 2256 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HOTEL AND RESTAURANT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 119,684 TOTAL: COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 35,026,762 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 360.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 35,026,762 PROGRAM: ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND TOBACCO COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,514,632 2257 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 186.75 FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 19,177,015 2258 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 7,335 2259 EXPENSES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 2,244,058 2260 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 470,700 2261 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 42,044 2262 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF PATROL VEHICLES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 896,017 2263 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 491,257 2264 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 172,846 2265 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER FOR CONTRACTED DISPATCH SERVICES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 140,000 2266 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 28,219 2267 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 63,394 TOTAL: COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,732,885 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 186.75 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 23,732,885 STANDARDS AND LICENSURE APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,237,733 2268 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 57.00 FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 4,876,114 2269 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 579,281 2270 EXPENSES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 592,163 2271 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 5,000 2272 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 12,733 2273 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 11,517 2274 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 12,229 2275 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 23,925 TOTAL: STANDARDS AND LICENSURE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,112,962 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 57.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,112,962 TAX COLLECTION The Department of Business and Professional Regulation shall use the operating budget authority provided in Specific Appropriations 2284, 2285, 2286, and 2287 to make the payments required in section 561.121(1)(b), Florida Statutes. The Department of Business and Professional Regulation shall use the operating budget authority provided in Specific Appropriation 2288 to make the payments required in section 210.20(2)(b), Florida Statutes. APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,663,479 2276 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 80.00 FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 7,135,778 2277 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 22,819 2278 EXPENSES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 681,731 2279 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 13,680 2280 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CIGARETTE TAX STAMPS FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 866,505 2281 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 15,772 2282 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 12,998 2283 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 29,996 2284 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO UNIVERSITY OF MIAMI - SYLVESTER COMPREHENSIVE CANCER CENTER FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 20,000,000 2285 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO MAYO CLINIC COMPREHENSIVE CANCER CENTER FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 20,000,000 2286 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA HEALTH - SHANDS CANCER CENTER BRAIN TUMOR IMMUNOTHERAPY PROGRAM FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 10,000,000 2287 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO UNIVERSITY OF FLORIDA HEALTH - NORMAN FIXEL INSTITUTE OF NEUROLOGICAL DISEASES FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 10,000,000 2288 SPECIAL CATEGORIES H. LEE MOFFITT CANCER CENTER AND RESEARCH INSTITUTE FROM CIGARETTE TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,400,000 2289 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AND TOBACCO TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 22,087 TOTAL: TAX COLLECTION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 107,201,366 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 80.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 107,201,366 PROGRAM: FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,206,267 2290 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 181.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,068,242 FROM DIVISION OF FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES TRUST FUND . . . . . . 10,074,901 2291 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM DIVISION OF FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES TRUST FUND . . . . . . 37,404 2292 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 745,081 FROM DIVISION OF FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,299,122 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2292, the Department of Business and Professional Regulation must maintain an office in Miami-Dade County to be staffed with compliance investigators of the Division of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes. 2293 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 362,646 FROM DIVISION OF FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES TRUST FUND . . . . . . 578,434 2294 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 90,000 2295 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM DIVISION OF FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES TRUST FUND . . . . . . 56,956 2296 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM DIVISION OF FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES TRUST FUND . . . . . . 11,856 2297 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,257 FROM DIVISION OF FLORIDA CONDOMINIUMS, TIMESHARES AND MOBILE HOMES TRUST FUND . . . . . . 45,363 TOTAL: COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 5,284,226 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,104,036 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 181.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,388,262 TOTAL: BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONAL REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 6,774,597 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 297,267,415 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,647.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 304,042,012 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 92,595,292 PROGRAM: CITRUS, DEPARTMENT OF CITRUS RESEARCH APPROVED SALARY RATE 907,199 2298 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 6.00 FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 1,159,929 2299 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 107,098 2300 EXPENSES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 401,896 2301 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 251,000 2302 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 650,000 FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 1,520,494 2303 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAID ADVERTISING AND PROMOTION FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 82,000 2304 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 2,844 TOTAL: CITRUS RESEARCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 650,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,525,261 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 6.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,175,261 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,464,847 2305 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 16.00 FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 2,268,994 2306 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 66,000 2307 EXPENSES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 492,625 2308 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 419,779 2309 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 307,655 2311 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAID ADVERTISING AND PROMOTION FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 75,000 2312 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 16,640 2313 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 4,698 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,651,391 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 16.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,651,391 AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS MARKETING APPROVED SALARY RATE 956,591 2315 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 6.00 FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 1,395,511 2316 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 17,000 2317 EXPENSES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 261,331 2318 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 100,000 2319 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAID ADVERTISING AND PROMOTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000,000 FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 12,961,163 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2319, no funds are appropriated for activities intended for any other purpose than to produce consumer or influencer engagement and awareness of the health, safety, wellness, nutrition, and uses of Florida citrus products. 2320 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CITRUS RECOVERY PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2320 are provided to the Department of Citrus for the purpose of entering into agreements; (1) to increase the production of trees that show tolerance or resistance to citrus greening, (2) to advance technologies that produce tolerance or resistance to citrus greening, and (3) for the advancement of greening tolerant or resistant trees using clustered regularly interspaced short palindromic repeats. 2321 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM CITRUS ADVERTISING TRUST FUND . 2,544 TOTAL: AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS MARKETING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 17,000,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,737,549 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 6.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,737,549 TOTAL: PROGRAM: CITRUS, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 17,650,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,914,201 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 28.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 39,564,201 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 3,328,637 COMMERCE, DEPARTMENT OF From the funds in Specific Appropriations 2322 through 2413, any expenditure from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) Block Grant must be expended in accordance with the requirements and limitations of Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act, as amended, or any other applicable federal requirement or limitation. Before any funds are released by the Department of Children and Families, each provider shall identify the number of clients to be served and certify its eligibility under Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act. Funds may not be released for services to any clients except those so identified and certified. The department head or a designee must certify that controls are in place to ensure that such funds are expended in accordance with the requirements and limitations of federal law and that reporting requirements of federal law are met. It is the responsibility of any entity to which such funds are provided to obtain the required certification prior to any expenditure of funds. From the funds in Specific Appropriations 2322 through 2416, no federal or state funds shall be used to pay for space being leased by a Local Workforce Development Board, CareerSource Florida, or the Department of Commerce if it has been determined by whichever entity is the lessee that there is no longer a need for the leased space. All leases, and performance and obligations under the leases, are subject to and contingent upon an annual appropriation by the Florida Legislature. In the event that such annual appropriation does not occur, or in the alternative, there is either a reduction in funding from the prior annual appropriation or the entity which is the lessee determines that the annual appropriation is insufficient to meet the requirements of the leases, then the lessee has the right to terminate the lease upon written notice by the lessee and the lessee shall have no further obligations under the contracts. The Department of Commerce must submit monthly status reports on the outstanding obligations for the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, the Weatherization Assistance Program, the Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program, the Community Development Block Grant - Disaster Recovery Program, the Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, and the Capital Projects Fund to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee no later than the 15th day of the month. To demonstrate fiscal responsibility, at a minimum, each status report must include expenditures and obligations compared to appropriated budget authority. PROGRAM: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES EXECUTIVE LEADERSHIP APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,805,281 2322 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 60.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,283,168 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,790,532 2323 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 115,132 2324 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 446,953 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 492,650 2325 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 64,063 2326 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 150,000 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 533,778 2327 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 352,727 2328 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 7,808 2329 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 12,082 2330 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 606 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE LEADERSHIP FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,880,121 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,369,378 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 60.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 9,249,499 FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,551,036 2331 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 106.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 9,927,565 FROM REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,221,095 2332 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 521,835 FROM REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . 52,835 2333 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 708,744 FROM REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,418,634 2334 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 477,698 FROM REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,536,300 2335 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 67,598 FROM REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . 11,634 2336 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 24,783 FROM REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,937 2337 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 17,957 2338 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY REED ACT BUILDINGS PROJECTS - STATEWIDE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,936,150 TOTAL: FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,936,150 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,990,615 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 106.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,926,765 INFORMATION SYSTEMS AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,826,851 2339 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 100.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 10,868,340 2340 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 275,361 2341 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 150,000 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,070,410 2342 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 68,723 2343 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,344,154 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 833,190 2344 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,291,800 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2344 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 2345 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 25,465 2346 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 29,194 2347 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 8,464 TOTAL: INFORMATION SYSTEMS AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 8,785,954 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,179,147 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 100.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,965,101 PROGRAM: WORKFORCE SERVICES WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT From the funds in Specific Appropriations 2348 through 2377, the Department of Commerce must determine if any funds provided for specific workforce programs, projects, or initiatives are not an allowable use of federal funds. If the department finds that any workforce program, project, or initiative for which funds are specifically provided in this act is not an allowable use of federal funds, the department must notify the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee. When allocating full-time equivalent (FTE) positions to individual local workforce development boards, the Department of Commerce must ensure that workforce services are effectively and efficiently provided throughout the state. The department is authorized to reallocate any FTE position allocated to a local workforce development board that has been or becomes vacant for more than 180 days. When reallocating a vacant FTE position, the department must give priority to a local workforce development board that would use the FTE position to provide additional services to veterans. APPROVED SALARY RATE 29,282,473 2348 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 557.50 FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 41,012,430 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 1,288,070 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 284,869 2349 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,543,612 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 67,759 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 90,791 2350 EXPENSES FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 968,193 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 1,105,389 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 49,198 2351 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 56,055 2352 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - WORKFORCE PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,080,000 The nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 2352 shall be allocated as follows: AMI - Cybersecurity Training for Critical Infrastructure (SF 3468)............................................... 950,000 Big Brothers Big Sisters - School to Work Program (SF 1738)................................................... 950,000 Corporation to Develop Communities of Tampa - Bay Works FabLab (SF 1725)........................................ 1,000,000 Employer Collaborative Workforce Initiative (SF 3747)..... 350,000 Heart of Florida United Way Digital Horizons (SF 1954).... 350,000 Home Builders Institute (HBI) Building Careers for Veterans (SF 2221)...................................... 475,000 JARC Community Works Program (SF 1966).................... 350,000 Las Olas Chabad Jewish Center Friendship Circle Grill - Job Skills Training (SF 1662)........................... 280,000 Manufacturing Talent Asset Pipeline (TAP) (SF 1278)....... 400,000 Mount Dora - Community Resource & Recreation Center Technology Lab (SF 1914)................................ 400,000 Northeast Florida Builders Association Workforce Education Expansion Operations (SF 2939)................ 100,000 Push the Line Job Readiness, Workforce Resilience, Civic Re-Entry, and Wellness Initiative (SF 2767)............. 75,000 Samaritan Resource Center - East Orange Opportunity Pathway (SF 2160)....................................... 200,000 Screen Production Marketing & Workforce Development (SF 2351)................................................... 500,000 Talent Bridge: Empowering Florida's Workforce, Strengthening Florida's Economy (SF 1096)............... 650,000 United Way of Florida - Income Tax Consulting & Preparation Assistance (SF 2937)........................ 350,000 Veterans Project for Job Recovery (SF 2469)............... 350,000 Virtual Reality Workforce Development Program (SF 1537)... 350,000 The department shall directly contract with the entities allocated funds from Specific Appropriation 2352. 2353 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - READY TO WORK CREDENTIAL PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2353, $2,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Florida Ready to Work Credential Program. The funds shall be used by the Department of Commerce to provide for the Florida Ready to Work Program as created in section 445.06, Florida Statutes. The department shall competitively procure the services for this project. The funds may only be disbursed from the Florida Department of Commerce directly to the grant award recipient when projects are certified to have met all contracted performance requirements. 2354 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NON CUSTODIAL PARENT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,550,000 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 1,416,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2354, $7,050,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided to the Department of Commerce to award grants through a competitive application process to entities to provide Noncustodial Parent Employment Programs on a statewide basis. The department may select an entity to serve as an administrator of the funds with a history of providing services to assist noncustodial parents and that demonstrates the capability of administering the program statewide. The entity must be able to provide grantees with training, best practices, and assistance to implement the grants. From the remaining funds in Specific Appropriation 2354, $1,416,000 in recurring funds from the Welfare Transition Trust Fund and $500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to fund an appropriations project (SF 1206). The recurring funds shall continue the Gulf Coast Jewish Family and Community Services' Noncustodial Parent Employment Program in Miami-Dade, Pinellas, Pasco, Hernando, and Hillsborough counties, allocated as follows: Miami-Dade County - $726,000; and Pinellas, Pasco, Hernando, and Hillsborough counties - $690,000. CareerSource Pasco Hernando shall administer these funds. 2355 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (SNAP) FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 6,000,000 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 250,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2355, $5,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Employment Security Administration Trust Fund is provided for third-party partnerships with colleges, community-based organizations, and other entities, facilitating training services for SNAP Employment & Training participants through these direct partnerships. These funds are not to be formula funded through local workforce boards, rather the Department of Commerce shall administer these funds directly to qualified programs. Qualified programs must have experience and ability to work with SNAP recipients, provide fiscal oversight of funds, and offer employment training and certifications to meet the employment needs of their individual communities. 2356 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 8,818,979 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 575,000 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 147,604 2357 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - LOCAL WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 209,344,538 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 52,514,907 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2357 from the Welfare Transition Trust Fund are allocated for workforce services based on a plan approved by CareerSource Florida. The plan must maximize funds distributed directly to the local workforce development boards, and must identify any funds allocated for state-level and discretionary initiatives. The plan must equitably distribute funds to the boards based on anticipated client caseload to maximize the ability of the state to meet performance standards, including federal work participation rate requirements, and prioritize services provided to one-parent families. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2357, any expenditures by a local workforce development board for "outreach," "advertising," or "public relations" must have a direct program benefit and must be spent in strict accordance with all applicable federal regulations and guidance. For any expenditures exceeding $5,000 for outreach purposes, a local workforce development board must obtain prior approval from the Department of Commerce before purchasing: promotional items, including but not limited to capes, blankets, and clothing; and memorabilia, models, gifts, and souvenirs. Funds in Specific Appropriation 2357 may not be used directly or indirectly to pay for meals, food, or beverages for board members, staff, or employees of local workforce development boards, CareerSource Florida, or the Department of Commerce except as expressly authorized by state law. Preapproved, reasonable, and necessary per diem allowances and travel established in section 112.061, Florida Statutes, shall be in compliance with all applicable federal and state requirements. Funds in Specific Appropriation 2357 may not be used for entertainment costs and recreational activities for board members, staff, or employees. Funds in Specific Appropriation 2357 may not be used to fund the salary, bonus, or incentive of any employee in excess of Federal Executive Level II, regardless of fund source. 2358 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 324,018 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 3,207 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,297 2359 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAW ENFORCEMENT RECRUITMENT BONUS PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,000,000 2360 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 200,666 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 4,856 2361 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 74,862 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 40,358 2361A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY WORKFORCE PROJECTS - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,500,000 The nonrecurring funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2361A shall be allocated as follows: Culinary Institute of America - Downtown Jacksonville Campus (SF 3031)........................................ 350,000 Evara Health - Addressing Medical Workforce Shortage in Florida (SF 2730)....................................... 500,000 Goodwill SWFL's Collier Community Resource Center (SF 3381)................................................... 750,000 Northeast Florida Builders Association Workforce Education Expansion (SF 2938)........................... 350,000 Secure Defense Communications and Innovation - Florida Tech (SF 1213).......................................... 350,000 Veteran Futures Academy Workforce Training & Civic Resource Center (SF 2566)............................... 200,000 The department shall directly contract with the entities allocated funds from Specific Appropriation 2361A. TOTAL: WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 45,130,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 327,186,658 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 557.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 372,316,658 REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM APPROVED SALARY RATE 21,074,799 2362 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 415.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 781,482 FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 27,228,208 2363 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 230,295 FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 15,165,468 2364 EXPENSES FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,321,610 2365 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 20,945 2366 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE TAX COLLECTION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,707,782 FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 19,000,000 2367 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,021,901 FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 17,891,311 2368 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 240,151 2369 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 202,852 2370 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 192,608 TOTAL: REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,741,460 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 92,263,153 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 415.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 114,004,613 CAREERSOURCE FLORIDA 2371 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CAREERSOURCE FLORIDA OPERATIONS FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 8,875,103 FROM WELFARE TRANSITION TRUST FUND . 753,256 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 484,182 2372 SPECIAL CATEGORIES QUICK RESPONSE TRAINING FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 4,000,000 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,500,000 2373 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INCUMBENT WORKER TRAINING PROGRAM FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 TOTAL: CAREERSOURCE FLORIDA FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 20,612,541 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 20,612,541 REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE APPEALS COMMISSION APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,659,277 2374 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 33.50 FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,905,374 2375 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE APPEALS COMMISSION - OPERATIONS FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 766,328 2376 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 7,104 2377 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,888 TOTAL: REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE APPEALS COMMISSION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,691,694 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 33.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,691,694 PROGRAM: COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,353,344 2378 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 146.00 FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 2,244,434 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,682,028 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 39,476 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 465,846 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,807,930 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 168,309 2379 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 8,241,219 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 39,365 2380 EXPENSES FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 18,470 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,033,505 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,135 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 243,155 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,544 2381 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY SERVICES BLOCK GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 21,876,498 2382 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT (CDBG) - SMALL CITIES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 36,500,000 2383 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - BLACK BUSINESS LOAN PROGRAM FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 2,225,000 2383A SPECIAL CATEGORIES HISPANIC BUSINESS INITIATIVE FUND OUTREACH PROGRAM FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 775,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2383A are provided to fund a recurring base appropriations project. The department shall directly contract with the entity allocated funds from Specific Appropriation 2383A. 2384 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 86,488,863 2385 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - WEATHERIZATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (WAP) FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,472,840 2386 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - WEATHERIZATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (WAP) - LOW INCOME HOUSING ENERGY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (LIHEAP) FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 16,000,000 2387 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,400,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2387, $6,400,000 in recurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund is provided to facilitate the transfer of the Emergency Home Energy Assistance Program from the Department of Elder Affairs. The Department of Commerce shall enter into agreements with Florida's eleven Area Agencies on Aging, established under Chapter 430, F. S., to assist with the administration of the Emergency Home Energy Assistance Program, which provides emergency home energy assistance to Florida's elderly population. 2389 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,378,905 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 223,080 2389A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,995,740 The nonrecurring funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2389A shall be allocated as follows: 2027 FIVB Women's Volleyball World Championship (SF 3746). 350,000 Greater Malibu Groves Home Repair Program (SF 2165)....... 125,000 Gulf Coast Jewish Federation Security Initiative (SF 2464) 380,000 Gulf County Veteran and First Responder Service Dog Training Center (SF 1960)............................... 36,740 Hope Partnership Community Safety and Stability Project (SF 1026)............................................... 500,000 Opa-Locka - Government Finance ERP Solution (SF 1980)..... 350,000 South Florida Home Health Workforce Development Program (SF 1957)............................................... 220,000 Southwest Florida Security Initiative (SF 3251)........... 400,000 The IDDeal Place - Intellectually and Developmentally Disabled Permanent Housing (SF 2354).................... 400,000 The Q on Dollins Avenue Housing Project (SF 2772)......... 400,000 Titusville Cybersecurity and Data Security Enhancements (SF 1848)............................................... 184,000 Urban League Regional Entrepreneurship Centers (SF 2756).. 650,000 The department shall directly contract with the entities allocated funds from Specific Appropriation 2389A. 2390 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 1,203 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 37,940 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,097 FROM SPECIAL EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 726 2391 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 3,267 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 40,862 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 12 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,017 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 48 2392 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RURAL COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 750,000 2393 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - TECHNICAL AND PLANNING ASSISTANCE FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,585,860 2394 SPECIAL CATEGORIES UTILITY RELOCATION REIMBURSEMENT GRANT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 150,000 2395 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 306 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,234 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 298 2395A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 73,526,600 The nonrecurring funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2395A shall be allocated as follows: Acquisition and Renovation of Housing for Disabled Adults and Seniors Experiencing Homelessness (SF 2207)......... 350,000 Anna Maria Public Works Building (SF 1075)................ 1,250,000 Belleair Bluffs Public Works Facility PD&E (SF 2484)...... 750,000 Brooksville-Tampa Bay Regional Airport (BKV) Taxiway and Infrastructure Project (SF 3271)........................ 750,000 Burt Aaronson South County Regional Park Improvements (SF 1038)................................................... 850,000 Cape Coral YMCA Community Health & Youth Development Center (SF 2012)........................................ 750,000 Central County Sports Field House (SF 1694)............... 1,250,000 Clearwater Marine Aquarium Renovation (SF 2731)........... 350,000 Coconut Creek Public Courtyard Renovations (SF 2075)...... 593,000 Cox Science Center and Aquarium Expansion (SF 2663)....... 850,000 Downtown Wauchula Historic Preservation and Revitalization Initiative (SF 3748)..................... 6,000,000 Earlington Heights Metrorail and Bus Station (SF 3078).... 350,000 Florida Keys Trumbo Affordable Workforce Housing Project (SF 2535)............................................... 5,000,000 Florida Studio Theatre Workforce Housing (SF 1225)........ 350,000 Greater Malibu Groves Home Repair Program (SF 2165)....... 375,000 Gulf Coast JFCS Renovation for Security and Technology Enhancements - Phase II (SF 2481)....................... 500,000 Gulf County Veteran and First Responder Service Dog Training Center (SF 1960)............................... 423,000 Habitat for Humanity Lake-Sumter - Affordable Housing and Construction Education (SF 1937)........................ 180,000 Habitat for Humanity of Greater Volusia County - Legacy Woods Affordable Homeownership (SF 2003)................ 400,000 Habitat for Humanity of Tampa Bay Hillsborough - Resilient Homes for Heroes (SF 2281).................... 350,000 Habitat for Humanity Tampa Bay Gulfside - Century Drive (SF 3265)............................................... 500,000 Hardee County Annex 1 Facility Hardening Resiliency Improvements (SF 3552).................................. 4,200,000 Hardee County Facilities Maintenance Warehouse Building (SF 3556)............................................... 1,900,000 Hardee County Governmental Services Complex - Phase 2 (SF 3551)................................................... 4,500,000 Hardee County Multi-Government Complex Parking Garage (SF 3553)................................................... 9,000,000 Hardee County Public Safety Complexes Critical Hardening (SF 3560)............................................... 5,200,000 Hardee County Services Extension Office Improvements (SF 3555)................................................... 4,500,000 Horseshoe Beach - Rebuilding Town Hall (SF 1514).......... 350,000 Land and Building for American Legion Babcock Ranch Post 415 (SF 3537)........................................... 1,000,000 Liberty County Industrial Land Acquisition & Site Development Initiative (SF 1490)........................ 650,000 Manatee County Habitat for Humanity Affordable Townhome Infrastructure (SF 1296)................................ 750,000 Northwest Florida Workforce & Military Rental Housing Initiative (SF 3713).................................... 350,000 OCEARCH Mayport Research and Operations Center (SF 2290).. 551,100 Osceola County School District AAA High School Aquatic Center (SF 1609)........................................ 350,000 Palm Beach County Airport Renaming (SF 3790).............. 2,750,000 Palm Beach Gardens Economic Development Infrastructure (SF 2050)............................................... 300,000 Pinellas County Housing Authority - Mills Affordable Housing Development Project (SF 2854)................... 350,000 Port Panama City Intermodal Distribution Center (SF 3248). 650,000 Safety Harbor City Hall Security Improvements (SF 1721)... 160,000 SCORE Florida (SF 2159)................................... 400,000 Seafarers' House: Supporting the Maritime Community & the Port Workers (SF 2759).................................. 260,000 Sebring City Hall Hardening and Design (SF 3140).......... 1,000,000 Sebring Consolidated Facilities Complex Design (SF 3141).. 500,000 South Pasadena City Hall Hardening & Resiliency (SF 2477). 350,000 SPCA Tampa Bay - Shelter Safety & Preparedness (SF 2514).. 484,500 Speros Site Readiness Program for Economic Growth (SF 3378)................................................... 5,000,000 St. Cloud Hopkins Park Community Center (SF 1598)......... 500,000 The IDDeal Place - Intellectually and Developmentally Disabled Permanent Housing (SF 2354).................... 150,000 Trout Lake Nature Center New Education Complex - Final Phase (SF 1899)......................................... 500,000 Villages of South Florida Autism (SF 2811)................ 1,000,000 Wausau - Possum Palace Renovation Phase III (SF 3207)..... 650,000 Wesley Chapel Family YMCA Community Center (SF 2282)...... 350,000 YMCA of Central Florida Critical Infrastructure & Life-Safety Initiative (SF 2056)........................ 500,000 YMCA of Greater St. Petersburg - Gills Renovation (SF 2515)................................................... 350,000 YMCA of Southwest Florida Babcock Ranch Community Wellness Facility (SF 2435)............................. 350,000 YMCA of the Palm Beaches Community Center (SF 2359)....... 350,000 YMCA of the Suncoast and Pinellas County Schools Co-located Facility (SF 2906)........................... 650,000 Zolfo Springs - Main Street Improvements (SF 3663)........ 500,000 The department shall directly contract with the entities allocated funds from Specific Appropriation 2395A. 2396 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY SPACE, DEFENSE, AND RURAL INFRASTRUCTURE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 45,000,000 FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 5,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2396, $5,000,000 in recurring funds from the State Economic Enhancement and Development Trust Fund is provided as grant funding for the following Florida panhandle counties to facilitate the planning, preparing, and financing of infrastructure projects in these rural communities: Calhoun, Gadsden, Holmes, Jackson, Liberty, and Washington Counties. Eligible uses of these funds include roads or other remedies to transportation impediments; storm water systems; water or wastewater facilities; and telecommunications facilities and broadband facilities. Grant funds are provided pursuant to section 288.0655(6), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2396, $40,000,000 in nonrecurring funds and $5,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Office of Rural Prosperity to implement the Rural Infrastructure Fund. Provided funds may be used to administer grants to units of local government within a rural area of opportunity, rural community as those terms are defined in section 288.0656, Florida Statutes, or to a regional economic development organization, a unit of local government, or an economic development organization substantially underwritten by a unit of local government for an infrastructure project located within an unincorporated area that has a population of 15,000 or less, has been in existence for 100 years or more, is contiguous to a rural community, and has been adversely affected by a natural disaster or presents a unique economic development opportunity of regional impact. By December 1 2026, the Office of Rural Prosperity shall include detailed information about the Rural Infrastructure Fund in its annual report. Such information shall include the number of grants made for the year, active grants, grants terminated or complete, and the amount of funds not obligated as of 14 days before the date the report is due. TOTAL: HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 122,672,340 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 209,782,472 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 146.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 332,454,812 OFFICE OF RURAL PROSPERITY APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,060,000 2396A SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 17.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,585,823 2396B EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 268,288 2396C OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 2396D SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 560,000 2396E SPECIAL CATEGORIES SBDCN RURAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2396E are provided to the Small Business Development Center Network to supplement and expand service in rural communities pursuant to section 288.001, Florida Statutes, by providing either full- or part-time consultants to be available for at least 20 hours per week in rural areas or to be permanently stationed in rural areas. 2396F SPECIAL CATEGORIES RENAISSANCE GRANTS PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,000,000 2396G SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE SMART TECHNOLOGY GRANT PROGRAM FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 500,000 2396H SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,000 2396I SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,807 2396J SPECIAL CATEGORIES RURAL COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 420,000 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 250,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2396J, $250,000 in recurring funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund is provided for the Office of Rural Prosperity to administer grants to rural communities to develop and implement strategic economic development plans. Grants administered with these funds may assist with costs associated with marketing a site to interested parties as part of an economic development plan as well as for marketing costs related to advertising campaign materials and costs associated with meetings, trade missions, and professional development related to site preparation and marketing. TOTAL: OFFICE OF RURAL PROSPERITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 15,479,918 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,170,000 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 17.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 16,649,918 FLORIDA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION 2397 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION (HFC) - AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROGRAMS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 180,000,000 FROM STATE HOUSING TRUST FUND . . . 70,770,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2397, the sum of $150,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for affordable housing projects pursuant to section 420.50871, Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2397, the sum of $30,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to preserve affordable multifamily rental housing in rural communities funded through the United States Department of Agriculture to be used to issue competitive requests for applications for the rehabilitation or acquisition of such properties to ensure continued affordability. By March 1, 2027, the Florida Housing Finance Corporation shall submit a report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on projects funded pursuant to Specific Appropriation 2397, such report must include the number of units preserved and the financing portfolio for each project. 2398 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION - HOMETOWN HERO HOUSING PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 75,000,000 2399 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION (HFC) - STATE HOUSING INITIATIVES PARTNERSHIP (SHIP) PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,800,000 FROM LOCAL GOVERNMENT HOUSING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 165,670,000 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2399, $663,600 shall be used for training and technical assistance provided through the Affordable Housing Catalyst Program created by section 420.531, Florida Statutes. The Florida Housing Finance Corporation shall directly contract with an entity that meets all of the requirements of section 420.531, Florida Statutes, to provide the training and technical assistance. TOTAL: FLORIDA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 273,800,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 236,440,000 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 510,240,000 PROGRAM: ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,398,496 2400 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 55.00 FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 6,333,325 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 96,953 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 389,095 2401 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 266,046 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 7,370 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,129 2402 EXPENSES FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 2,171,640 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 17,208 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 68,834 2403 LUMP SUM ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT TOOLS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,000,000 FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 16,000,000 FROM ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,500,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2403 are provided to make payments and tax refunds in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the following programs: Qualified Target Industry (QTI) Business Tax Refund; QTI Tax Refund - Brownfield Redevelopment Bonus; Brownfield Redevelopment Tax Refund; and High-Impact Business Performance (HIPI) Grant. Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2403 from the Economic Development Trust Fund represent local matching funds for those programs. Payments may only be made for projects that meet the statutory eligibility requirements. Funds may not be released for any other purpose and may only be disbursed when projects are certified to have met all contracted performance requirements. The Department of Commerce must provide monthly reports within ten business days after the end of each month to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee regarding all escrow activity relating to the Quick Action Closing Fund and the Innovation Incentive Fund programs. The report must include information regarding any funds and interest earnings returned to the appropriate fund in the state treasury, and the anticipated date(s) of all funds held in escrow. The Department of Commerce shall provide monthly reports to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee on the status of economic development programs administered by the department pursuant to chapter 288, Florida Statutes. 2404 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SELECTFLORIDA FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 2405 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AID - FLORIDA DEFENSE SUPPORT TASK FORCE FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 2,000,000 2405A SPECIAL CATEGORIES ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,064,900 The nonrecurring funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2405A shall be allocated as follows: Florida-Israel Business Accelerator - Israeli Tech Solutions Solving Florida Industry Challenges (SF 1292). 300,000 Franklin County Comprehensive Plan Update (SF 1495)....... 104,900 From Market to Mainstream (SF 2896)....................... 250,000 Micanopy Comprehensive Planning Study (SF 2398)........... 85,000 Pine Hills Storefront and Corridor Revival Program (SF 2771)................................................... 75,000 Veterans Entrepreneurship Initiative - Space Technology Program (SF 1236)....................................... 250,000 The department shall directly contract with the entities allocated funds from Specific Appropriation 2405A. 2406 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 1,563,550 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 32,901 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 131,605 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2406, the Department of Commerce must contract for an independent third-party to verify that each business that receives an incentive award under an economic development program satisfies all of the requirements of the economic development agreement or contract, including job creation numbers, before a payment may be made under such agreement or contract. These comprehensive performance audit functions must include reviewing: 100 percent of all incentive claims for payment, including audit confirmations; the procedures used to verify incentive eligibility; and the department's records for accuracy and completeness. The independent third-party contractor must perform all functions and conduct all of the activities necessary to verify compliance with the performance terms of economic development incentive agreements or contracts. 2407 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA SPORTS FOUNDATION FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 1,700,000 FROM PROFESSIONAL SPORTS DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,000,000 From the recurring funds in Specific Appropriation 2407 from the State Economic Enhancement and Development Trust Fund, $200,000 is allocated for the Sunshine State Games and $500,000 is allocated for the Florida International Seniors Games and State Championships. 2408 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - MILITARY BASE PROTECTION FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 1,500,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2408 are allocated for the Military Base Protection and Defense Reinvestment Grant Programs. The funds may only be disbursed from the Department of Commerce directly to the grant award recipient when projects are certified to have met all contracted performance requirements. 2409 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 14,628 2410 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - VISIT FLORIDA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,000,000 FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 26,000,000 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,000,000 2411 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 8,236 FROM FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND PROMOTION TRUST FUND . . . . . 13 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,127 2412 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPACE FLORIDA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 12,500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2412, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the State Economic Enhancement and Development Trust Fund is provided to support collaborative research, development, and commercialization of projects related to aerospace and other technology and life sciences as further described through a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) which Space Florida has entered into with the State of Israel. 2413 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - SPACE FLORIDA - AEROSPACE INDUSTRY FINANCING, BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND INFRASTRUCTURE NEEDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 2415 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA JOB GROWTH GRANT FUND FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,000,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2415 are provided to make payments for the Job Growth Grant Fund. Payments may only be made for projects that meet the statutory eligibility requirements. Funds may not be released for any other purpose and may only be disbursed when projects are certified to have met all contracted performance requirements. The Department of Commerce must provide monthly reports within ten business days after the end of each month to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee regarding all activity relating to the Job Growth Grant Fund program. The report must include information regarding all funds appropriated over the past five fiscal years and the status of such funds as awarded, not awarded, or reallocated; the status of all active projects as of July 1, 2026, including the type of project awarded, the scope of the project, and expected deliverables and dates. 2416 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM STATE ECONOMIC ENHANCEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT TRUST FUND . . . . 2,576 FROM TOURISM PROMOTIONAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 681 TOTAL: ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 93,064,900 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 106,336,917 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 55.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 199,401,817 TOTAL: COMMERCE, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 586,490,843 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,036,022,575 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,490.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,622,513,418 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 88,011,557 FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: OFFICE OF CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER AND ADMINISTRATION EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,313,721 2417 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 138.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 14,101,327 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 351,599 2418 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 116,475 2419 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,446,004 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,107 2421 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,240,217 2422 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,000 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 377,325 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2422, $100,000 in nonrecurring General Revenue funds are provided to the Financial Literacy Program for People at Risk (SF 2164). 2423 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 847,753 Funds in Specific Appropriations 2423, 2468, and 2498 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 2427 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,500 2428 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 51,422 2429 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 300,000 2430 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 134,268 2431 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 51,265 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,056 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 100,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,043,318 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 138.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,143,318 LEGAL SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,169,008 2432 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 84.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 9,192,065 2433 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 290,147 2434 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 717,375 2435 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,000 2436 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC COMMERCE FEES FOR COLLECTION OF REVENUE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 175,000 2437 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 198,594 2438 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 253,306 2439 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,920,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2439 are provided to the Department of Financial Services to contract with an Independent Validation and Verification (IV&V) provider for the Florida Planning Accounting and Ledger Management (FL PALM) project. The department shall contract with an IV&V provider to provide IV&V services for all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project. The IV&V contract shall require that all deliverables be simultaneously provided to the department, the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity. IV&V services must include, but are not limited to the following: (1) Oversight of all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project; (2) An evaluation of the project's schedule to highlight variances and ensure it aligns with project objectives, remains feasible, and mitigates risks; and (3) A thorough review of all project budget requests and monthly and quarterly reporting submitted by the agency to the Legislature. (4) The monthly IV&V reports shall include technical reviews of all project deliverables submitted or accepted within the reporting period and an analysis of whether: a. The project is being built and implemented in accordance with defined technical architecture, specifications, and requirements; b. The project is adhering to established project management and governance processes; c. Solicitation and procurement documentation of products, tools, or services, and resulting contracts, are compliant with current statutory and regulatory requirements and aligned with project objectives; d. The outcomes and benefits of services performed are commensurate with the amounts invoiced; and e. If the project is on track to achieve the original business benefits and project objectives. 2440 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 31,460 2441 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 17,361 2442 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 27,982 2443 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PAYMENTS TO CLAIMANTS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,000,000 TOTAL: LEGAL SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,824,290 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 84.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,824,290 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,097,190 2444 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 104.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 12,540,254 2445 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 101,479 2446 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,441,402 2447 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 771,720 2448 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 10,925,916 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 175,000 2449 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 393,480 2450 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,900 2451 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 70,581 2452 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 184,076 2453 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 9,275 2454 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 43,984 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,660,067 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 104.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 31,660,067 CONSUMER ADVOCATE APPROVED SALARY RATE 668,279 2455 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 5.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 861,812 2456 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 66,357 2457 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 78,726 2458 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,471 2459 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,774 2460 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,888 2461 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,083 TOTAL: CONSUMER ADVOCATE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,061,111 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 5.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,061,111 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY - FLAIR INFRASTRUCTURE APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,217,616 2462 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 57.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 395,438 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,968,688 2463 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,621 2464 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 370,129 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,198,941 2465 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 104,880 2466 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM - OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,351,294 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 900,956 2467 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,744,239 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,123,077 2468 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 709,560 2469 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 390,209 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 221,669 2470 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,424 2471 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,455 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,811 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY - FLAIR INFRASTRUCTURE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,515,391 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 57.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,515,391 PROGRAM: TREASURY DEPOSIT SECURITY APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,159,267 2472 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 19.00 FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,977,440 2473 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,540 2474 EXPENSES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 323,896 2475 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 895,205 2476 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 6,616 2477 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 6,932 TOTAL: DEPOSIT SECURITY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,211,629 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 19.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,211,629 STATE FUNDS MANAGEMENT AND INVESTMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,715,566 2478 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 25.50 FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,660,085 2479 EXPENSES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 391,245 2480 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,177,785 2481 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TREASURY INVESTMENT ACCOUNTING SYSTEM FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 800,000 2482 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 8,454 2483 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 4,000 2484 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 8,777 TOTAL: STATE FUNDS MANAGEMENT AND INVESTMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,050,346 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 25.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,050,346 SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN APPROVED SALARY RATE 676,491 2485 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 12.00 FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,074,813 2486 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 20,637 2487 EXPENSES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 137,328 2488 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,252 2489 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 823,190 2490 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,047 2491 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 4,405 2492 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM TREASURY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INVESTMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 3,434 TOTAL: SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,067,106 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 12.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,067,106 PROGRAM: FINANCIAL ACCOUNTABILITY FOR PUBLIC FUNDS STATE FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND STATE AGENCY ACCOUNTING APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,282,944 2493 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 163.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,019,867 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,122,087 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriations 2493, 2495, and 2501, the Department of Financial Services shall audit all court-related expenditures of the Clerks of Court pursuant to sections 28.241 and 28.35, Florida Statutes. The department shall report the audit findings to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, on a quarterly basis. The department shall submit a report by August 1, 2026, for the period April 1, 2026, through June 30, 2026, and quarterly thereafter. 2494 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 24,175 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,986 2495 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 116,201 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,158,069 2496 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000 2497 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 80,000 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,283,882 2498 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,354,589 2499 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 25,380 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,086 2500 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 17,055 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,122 2501 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,944 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 47,188 2502 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE PRISON INDUSTRY ENHANCEMENT (PIE) PROGRAM FROM PRISON INDUSTRIES TRUST FUND . 1,250,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2502 are provided for transfer to the Prison Industry Enhancement Program. Funds in the Prison Industries Trust Fund may be expended by the corporation for allowable expenditures under sections 946.522 and 946.523, Florida Statutes. Such funds may be paid by warrants drawn by the Chief Financial Officer upon receipt of a corporate resolution that has been duly authorized by the board of directors of the corporation, authorized under part II of chapter 946, Florida Statutes. 2503 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MAINTENANCE AND SUPPORT OF THE VENDOR PAYMENT REGISTRATION SYSTEM FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,000,000 2504 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA CLERKS OF COURT OPERATIONS CORPORATION FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,300,000 TOTAL: STATE FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND STATE AGENCY ACCOUNTING FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,836,631 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 163.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,836,631 RECOVERY AND RETURN OF UNCLAIMED PROPERTY APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,623,244 2505 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 66.00 FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 5,387,724 2506 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 488,131 2507 EXPENSES FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 1,024,036 2508 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 7,500 2509 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 1,906,269 2510 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 19,907 2511 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 11,524 2512 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND . 20,398 TOTAL: RECOVERY AND RETURN OF UNCLAIMED PROPERTY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,865,489 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 66.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,865,489 FLORIDA PLANNING ACCOUNTING AND LEDGER MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,514,205 2513 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 91.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,286,792 2514 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 39,040,586 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2514 are provided to the Department of Financial Services for the Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) project. The department must provide dedicated on-site support at its location, including both department and vendor personnel, to assist state agencies with user acceptance testing. User Acceptance Testing cannot conclude until, at a minimum, the following have been completed: (1) State Agencies are able to produce a General Ledger Trial Balance Report in Florida PALM that reconciles to the conversion balance from FLAIR as of the point in time the conversion snapshot was taken, for each fund within the State Agency. (2) State Agencies are able to produce Schedule of Allotment Balance Reports that properly reflect their Agencies' budgetary allotments with the associated encumbrances, expenditures, and remaining balance. (3) State Agencies are able to verify all active and valid contracts and grants properly recorded in FLAIR can be converted to Florida PALM and the associated encumbrances will be properly established. (4) State Agencies can verify all their active asset management records recorded in FLAIR can be converted with the proper asset and depreciation values established in Florida PALM and Users are able to run property inventory reports that include attractive assets. (5) State Agencies are able to run their operational reports from Florida PALM. (6) State Agencies are able to verify their critical business systems, as identified by the agency as part of their interface selections prior to the start of interface testing, are functioning as anticipated with Florida PALM. 2515 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,572 2516 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,609 TOTAL: FLORIDA PLANNING ACCOUNTING AND LEDGER MANAGEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 52,369,559 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 91.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 52,369,559 PROGRAM: FIRE MARSHAL COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,821,371 2517 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 65.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,483,524 2518 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,924 2519 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 769,579 2520 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC COMMERCE FEES FOR COLLECTION OF REVENUE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,200 2521 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS MINING ACTIVITIES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 605,705 2522 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 113,305 2523 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,200 2524 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUPPLEMENTAL FIREFIGHTERS COMPENSATION FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,000 2525 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,442 2526 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,220 TOTAL: COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,097,099 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 65.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,097,099 PROFESSIONAL TRAINING AND STANDARDS APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,396,902 2527 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 24.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,147,237 2528 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 407,391 2529 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 501,568 2530 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS DECONTAMINATION MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 2531 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 23,294 2532 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FIREFIGHTER ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2532 are provided for the Firefighter Assistance Grant Program and shall be awarded to entities pursuant to section 633.135, Florida Statutes. 2533 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC COMMERCE FEES FOR COLLECTION OF REVENUE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,200 2534 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 247,765 2535 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE FIRE MARSHAL CONTINUED EDUCATION SYSTEM FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 630,000 2536 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,900 2537 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUPPLEMENTAL FIREFIGHTERS COMPENSATION FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,500 2538 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 25,519 2539 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,312 2540 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE FIRE COLLEGE - MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 475,000 TOTAL: PROFESSIONAL TRAINING AND STANDARDS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,519,686 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 24.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,519,686 FIRE MARSHAL ADMINISTRATIVE AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,238,496 2542 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 20.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,061,197 2543 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 187,568 2544 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 475,030 2544A AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - LOCAL GOVERNMENT FIRE SERVICE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,327,786 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,336,215 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2544A, $3,336,215 in nonrecurring funds from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund is provided for local government fire service as follows: Desoto County Fire Ladder Truck (SF 3540)................. 1,000,000 Dunedin High Water Rescue Vehicle (SF 3516)............... 200,000 Franklin County - St. George Island Ladder Truck Down Payment (SF 1497)....................................... 1,000,000 Overstreet Fire Department Fire Tanker (SF 1457).......... 600,000 Southwest Ranches Fire Truck (SF 1066).................... 536,215 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2544A, $7,327,786 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for local government fire service as follows: Almarante Fire District Pumper (SF 3780).................. 554,800 Broward County Sheriff's Office Fire Rescue Safety and Prevention Program (SF 2734)............................ 671,320 Cooper City Fire Rescue Critical Care Transport Vehicle (SF 1395)............................................... 600,000 Dellwood VFD Critical Fire Apparatus (SF 3212)............ 524,700 Franklin County - Alligator Point Volunteer Fire Department Fire Truck (SF 3170)......................... 624,791 Gretna Fire Rescue Department - Fire Engine/Pumper (SF 1565)................................................... 350,000 Holt Fire District Pumper/Tanker (SF 3655)................ 489,000 Lafayette County Fire Equipment Upgrade (SF 1484)......... 550,000 Liberty County Commercial Fire Tanker (SF 1493)........... 549,900 Mental Health Services for Police Officers and Firefighters (SF 2783).................................. 250,000 Miami-Dade Fire Rescue All Hazards Emergency Support Trailer (SF 1785)....................................... 300,000 Palm Beach County Fire Rescue Water Vessels for Hazard Mitigation (SF 1051).................................... 200,000 Pasco County Board of County Commissioners - Fire Rescue Department- Decon 2 (SF 1719)........................... 600,000 Tamarac Aerial Ladder Fire Truck (SF 2133)................ 900,000 West Palm Beach Fire Department Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Package (SF 2378).................... 163,275 2545 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,549,805 2546A SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO UNIVERSITY OF MIAMI - SYLVESTER COMPREHENSIVE CANCER CENTER - FIREFIGHTERS CANCER RESEARCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,500,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2546A shall be transferred to the University of Miami - Sylvester Comprehensive Cancer Center for the purpose of Firefighter Cancer Research. The funds shall be utilized to: expand firefighters' access to cancer screenings across the state; enable prevention and earlier detection of the disease; identify exposures that account for increased cancer risk; and field test new technology and methods that measure exposure in the field. The University of Miami - Sylvester Comprehensive Cancer Center shall develop a report on cancer research outcomes and cancer mitigation efforts being examined. The report shall be submitted to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chief Financial Officer, and the Governor by June 30, 2027 (SF 1391). 2547 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,189 2548 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,300 2549 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 288,753 2550 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUPPLEMENTAL FIREFIGHTERS COMPENSATION FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,500 2551 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,485 2552 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,196 2552A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,467,000 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,279,900 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2552A, $16,279,900 in nonrecurring funds from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund is provided to local government fire services as follows: Charlotte County Fire Training Tower (SF 3674)............ 2,000,000 Hardee County Fire Station #1 Training Tower (SF 3557).... 2,500,000 Hendry County Public Safety Station (SF 3044)............. 3,500,000 Hernando County Public Safety Training Center (SF 3284)... 1,000,000 Highlands County Lake Placid Fire Station (SF 3286)....... 2,500,000 Jackson County - Fire Rescue Station Hardening (SF 3142).. 1,000,000 Madeira Beach Fire Department Emergency Operations Center and Training Facility (SF 2493)......................... 1,500,000 Palm Bay Fire Station 8 (St. John's Preserve) (SF 1409)... 1,000,000 Safety Harbor Firefighter Safety & Infrastructure Resiliency Project (SF 1722)............................ 1,279,900 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2552A, $23,467,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to local government fire services as follows: Baker County Fire Rescue Ambulance Purchase (SF 3093)..... 400,000 Bartow New Central Fire Station Headquarters and Training Facility (SF 3575)...................................... 4,000,000 Blackman Fire Resilience and Readiness Expansion (SF 3603) 150,000 Brooker Fire Station Phase II (SF 3091)................... 350,000 Clewiston Volunteer Firefighter Training Tower and Equipment (SF 3192)..................................... 1,800,000 Crossroads Fire Station (SF 1487)......................... 350,000 Deerfield Beach Fire Station 4 Rehabilitation Project (SF 1065)................................................... 500,000 Fanning Springs Fire Station Design and Permitting (SF 2940)................................................... 400,000 Fort Myers - Fire Station 18 (SF 2844).................... 750,000 Hardee County - Fire Station #2 (SF 3561)................. 7,000,000 Hillsborough County Fire Rescue Fallen Firefighter Memorial (SF 2302)...................................... 675,000 Melbourne Fire Department Training Center Replacement (SF 1041)................................................... 400,000 Melbourne Fire Station Alerting System (SF 1042).......... 300,000 North Auburndale Fire Rescue Station #2 (SF 2320)......... 500,000 North Bay Village Hall & Public Safety Complex (SF 1399).. 350,000 North Central Florida Fire Rescue Firegrounds Training Tower (SF 2972)......................................... 350,000 Orange City Municipal Government - Fire Station Hurricane Rated Facility (SF 2407)................................ 450,000 Oviedo Public Safety Training Center (SF 1247)............ 500,000 Perry Fire Hydrant Replacement (SF 1557).................. 792,000 Port St. Joe Public Safety Complex (SF 3744).............. 650,000 Southwest Ranches Fire Station (SF 1067).................. 450,000 St. Augustine Design, Construction of Resilient Structure on Anastasia Blvd Phase II (SF 2524).................... 1,000,000 Suwannee County Fire Station (SF 1482).................... 750,000 Union County Fire Rescue Station (SF 3075)................ 250,000 Washington County - Old Shores Fire Station (SF 3222)..... 350,000 TOTAL: FIRE MARSHAL ADMINISTRATIVE AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 34,294,786 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 27,240,138 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 20.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 61,534,924 PROGRAM: STATE PROPERTY AND CASUALTY CLAIMS STATE SELF-INSURED CLAIMS ADJUSTMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,630,869 2553 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 111.00 STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 10,247,308 2554 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 43,224 2555 EXPENSES STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 3,860,036 2556 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 750 2557 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 55,000 STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 5,668,456 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2557, $55,000 is provided to Responders First Wellness Program (SF 3277). 2558 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 91,125 2559 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES - OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 6,083,924 2560 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 30,843,520 2561 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED MEDICAL SERVICES STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 20,574,182 2563 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INFORMATION CLAIMS SYSTEM STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 833,530 2563A SPECIAL CATEGORIES VETERAN / FIRST RESPONDER ELECTROENCEPHALOGRAM PILOT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 2564 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 82,658 2565 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 27,831 2566 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT STATE RISK MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . 34,926 TOTAL: STATE SELF-INSURED CLAIMS ADJUSTMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 10,055,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 78,391,470 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 111.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 88,446,470 PROGRAM: LICENSING AND CONSUMER PROTECTION INSURANCE COMPANY REHABILITATION AND LIQUIDATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 420,619 2567 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 299,264 2568 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,166 2569 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 721,329 2570 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,698,945 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2570 are provided to the Department of Financial Services for the replacement of the Division of Rehabilitation and Liquidation claims system. The department shall submit quarterly project status reports to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity no later than thirty days from the close of the previous quarter. Each status report must include copies of new or updated relevant task order(s), contract(s), and purchase order(s). The status report must also describe progress made to date for each project milestone and deliverable, planned and actual completion dates, planned and actual costs incurred, and any current project issues or risks. 2571 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 65,115 2572 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 44,000 2573 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,606 TOTAL: INSURANCE COMPANY REHABILITATION AND LIQUIDATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,845,425 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,845,425 LICENSURE, SALES APPOINTMENT AND OVERSIGHT APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,477,373 2574 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 114.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,712,681 2575 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,463 2576 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,113,219 2577 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC COMMERCE FEES FOR COLLECTION OF REVENUE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 975,000 2578 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 666,292 2579 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,400 2580 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 209,787 2581 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,734 2582 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,004 TOTAL: LICENSURE, SALES APPOINTMENT AND OVERSIGHT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,764,580 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 114.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,764,580 CONSUMER ASSISTANCE APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,284,465 2583 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 115.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,506,789 2584 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 182,849 2585 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,447,957 2586 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,155,374 2587 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOLOCAUST VICTIMS ASSISTANCE ADMINISTRATION FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 609,130 2588 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,500 2589 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,020 2590 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,224 2591 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 39,771 TOTAL: CONSUMER ASSISTANCE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,001,614 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 115.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,001,614 FUNERAL AND CEMETERY SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,601,679 2592 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 27.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,445,844 2593 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 70,983 2594 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 376,059 2595 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC COMMERCE FEES FOR COLLECTION OF REVENUE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 39,100 2596 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 121,549 2597 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 8,700 2598 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,409 2599 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 7,662 2600 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 13,670 TOTAL: FUNERAL AND CEMETERY SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,087,976 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,087,976 PROGRAM: WORKERS' COMPENSATION WORKERS' COMPENSATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 15,351,418 2601 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 272.00 FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 23,298,067 FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION SPECIAL DISABILITY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 821,801 2602 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 394,863 FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION SPECIAL DISABILITY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 18,020 2603 EXPENSES FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,435,200 FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION SPECIAL DISABILITY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 143,721 2604 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 35,021 2605 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTRONIC COMMERCE FEES FOR COLLECTION OF REVENUE FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 188,000 2606 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DISTRICT COURTS OF APPEAL - WORKERS' COMPENSATION APPEALS FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,324,599 2607 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE UNIVERSITY OF SOUTH FLORIDA - OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY GRANT MATCH FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 250,000 2608 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO JUSTICE ADMINISTRATIVE COMMISSION FOR PROSECUTION OF WORKERS' COMPENSATION FRAUD FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 850,429 2609 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,336,789 FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION SPECIAL DISABILITY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 76,360 2610 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 84,800 2611 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PURCHASED CLIENT SERVICES FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 555,000 2612 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 216,035 2613 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - WORKERS' COMPENSATION PREMIUM REIMBURSEMENT FOR STUDENTS FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 2614 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 62,320 FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION SPECIAL DISABILITY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,280 2615 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . 98,190 FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION SPECIAL DISABILITY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,404 TOTAL: WORKERS' COMPENSATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 37,196,899 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 272.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 37,196,899 PROGRAM: INVESTIGATIVE AND FORENSIC SERVICES FIRE AND ARSON INVESTIGATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 10,724,717 2616 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 136.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,858,806 2617 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 133,840 2618 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,702,710 2619 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 427,109 2620 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 606,014 2621 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ON-CALL FEES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 686,000 2622 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 235,225 2623 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 230,284 2624 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUPPLEMENTAL FIREFIGHTERS COMPENSATION FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,000 2625 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 33,817 2626 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,176 TOTAL: FIRE AND ARSON INVESTIGATIONS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,964,981 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 136.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,964,981 FORENSIC SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 708,690 2627 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 10.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,141,877 2628 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 80,785 2629 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 135,487 2630 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 151,000 2631 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,200 2632 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 356 2633 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ARSON LAB - MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 TOTAL: FORENSIC SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,566,705 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 10.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,566,705 INSURANCE FRAUD APPROVED SALARY RATE 16,117,918 2634 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 208.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,900,028 2635 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 92,817 2636 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,461,383 2637 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO JUSTICE ADMINISTRATIVE COMMISSION FOR PROSECUTION OF PIP FRAUD FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,689,385 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2637 are provided for transfer to the Justice Administrative Commission for the specific purpose of funding attorneys and paralegals dedicated solely to the prosecution of insurance fraud cases in Duval, Orange, Miami-Dade, Hillsborough, Palm Beach, Lee, and Broward counties. These funds may not be used for any purpose other than the funding of attorney and paralegal positions that prosecute crimes of insurance fraud. 2638 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION COMMISSION FOR PROSECUTION OF PROPERTY INSURANCE FRAUD FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 255,667 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2638 are provided for transfer to the Justice Administrative Commission for the specific purpose of funding attorneys and paralegals dedicated solely to the prosecution of property insurance fraud cases in Miami-Dade County. These funds may not be used for any purpose other than the funding of attorney and paralegal positions that prosecute crimes of property insurance fraud. 2639 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 807,514 2640 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ANTI-FRAUD DATABASE SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,052,880 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2640 are provided to the Department of Financial Services to obtain access to an anti-fraud database. The department shall create metrics that demonstrate efficiencies and/or the increase of fraud detection based on access to the anti-fraud database and provide a report to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee by November 16, 2026. 2641 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 196,303 2642 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,005,859 2643 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 280,276 2644 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 186,000 2645 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 47,247 2646 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 64,918 TOTAL: INSURANCE FRAUD FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 35,040,277 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 208.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 35,040,277 OFFICE OF FISCAL INTEGRITY APPROVED SALARY RATE 881,003 2647 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 13.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,406,954 2648 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 89,864 2649 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,300 2650 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,425 2651 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,784 2652 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,068 TOTAL: OFFICE OF FISCAL INTEGRITY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,519,395 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 13.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,519,395 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE FRAUD APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,689,034 2653 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 79.00 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 529,729 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,134,025 2654 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 527,200 2655 EXPENSES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 881,694 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 313,032 2656 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 189,418 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2656, $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Financial Services to competitively procure and implement a public assistance fraud software solution to assist in preventing, detecting, and investigating Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program fraud. The solution shall apply analytics to already existing transactional data to detect fraudulent transactions. 2657 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 39,507 2658 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 15,821 2659 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 19,900 2660 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 42,160 TOTAL: PUBLIC ASSISTANCE FRAUD FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,692,486 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 79.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,692,486 PROGRAM: FINANCIAL SERVICES COMMISSION OFFICE OF INSURANCE REGULATION COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT - INSURANCE APPROVED SALARY RATE 22,070,823 2661 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 288.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 31,181,877 2662 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,042,220 2663 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,572,107 2664 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000 2665 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA PUBLIC HURRICANE LOSS MODEL - OFFICE OF INSURANCE REGULATION FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,273,439 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2665 shall be transferred to Florida International University and utilized to promote and enhance collaborative research among state universities. The Florida Public Hurricane Loss Model located at Florida International University may consult with the private sector and the Florida Catastrophic Storm Risk Management Center located at the Florida State University to enhance the marketability, viability, and applications of the Florida Public Hurricane Loss Model. The Office of Insurance Regulation (Office) shall have the ability to accurately calculate hurricane risk and project catastrophic losses, and nothing shall interfere with or supersede the Office's authority to enter into agreements with Florida International University. 2666 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FINANCIAL EXAMINATION CONTRACTS - PROPERTY AND CASUALTY EXAMINATIONS FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,951,763 2667 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FINANCIAL EXAMINATION CONTRACTS - LIFE AND HEALTH EXAMINATIONS FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,950,000 2668 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,853,016 2669 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,190 2670 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 116,451 2671 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,989 2672 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 103,535 TOTAL: COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT - INSURANCE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 49,094,587 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 288.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 49,094,587 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,281,073 2673 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 33.00 FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,723,375 2674 EXPENSES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 118,543 2675 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 92,710 2676 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,614 2677 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,307 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,952,549 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 33.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,952,549 OFFICE OF FINANCIAL REGULATION SAFETY AND SOUNDNESS OF STATE BANKING SYSTEM APPROVED SALARY RATE 8,392,192 2678 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 94.00 FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 11,472,143 2679 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 376,964 2680 EXPENSES FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,111,752 2680A OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 19,130 2681 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 117,012 2682 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 120,534 2683 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 26,872 2684 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 36,138 TOTAL: SAFETY AND SOUNDNESS OF STATE BANKING SYSTEM FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,280,545 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 94.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,280,545 FINANCIAL INVESTIGATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,173,103 2685 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 40.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,428,461 2686 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 5,462 2687 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 327,957 2687A OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 20,600 2688 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 35,000 2689 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 16,354 2690 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 10,114 2691 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 15,809 2692 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 19,552 TOTAL: FINANCIAL INVESTIGATIONS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,879,309 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 40.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,879,309 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,142,962 2693 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 21.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,187,498 2694 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 160,369 2695 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 280,755 2695A OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 7,000 2696 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 56,164 2697 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 8,915 2698 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 6,703 2699 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 16,349 2700 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT AND LICENSING SYSTEM - OFFICE OF FINANCIAL REGULATION FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,435,807 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,159,560 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 21.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,159,560 FINANCE REGULATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,300,220 2701 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 94.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,289,541 2702 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 264,069 2703 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 720,035 2703A OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 35,631 2704 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED PRESENTMENT PROVIDER DATABASE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,930,000 2705 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CHECK CASHING TRANSACTION DATABASE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 251,000 2706 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 236,565 2707 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 16,713 2708 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 34,995 2709 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 40,298 TOTAL: FINANCE REGULATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,818,847 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 94.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 14,818,847 SECURITIES REGULATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,551,877 2710 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 84.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 9,472,405 2711 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 384,970 2712 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 742,389 2712A OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 4,566 2713 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ANTI-FRAUD INVESTIGATIONS AND OUTREACH EDUCATION FROM ANTI-FRAUD TRUST FUND . . . . . 200,336 2714 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 205,500 2715 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,123 2716 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 27,253 2717 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 33,287 TOTAL: SECURITIES REGULATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 11,082,829 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 84.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 11,082,829 LEGAL SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,975,213 2718 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 35.00 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,420,074 2719 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 177,422 2720 EXPENSES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 233,223 2721 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,884 2722 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,301 2723 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 568 TOTAL: LEGAL SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,839,472 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 35.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,839,472 TOTAL: FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 44,449,786 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 569,541,366 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,648.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 613,991,152 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 190,669,548 GOVERNOR, EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PROGRAM: GENERAL OFFICE EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES 2724 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 130.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,999,894 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 303,976 2725 LUMP SUM EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR - EXECUTIVE/ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,810,337 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 488,033 2726 LUMP SUM EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR - WASHINGTON OFFICE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 116,858 2727 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,025,341 2728 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTINGENT - DISCRETIONARY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 29,244 2729 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 49,808 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,630 2730 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 150,000 2731 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 36,543 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,752 2732 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54,283 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 23,272,308 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 808,391 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 130.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,080,699 LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATIONS SYSTEM/PLANNING AND BUDGETING SUBSYSTEM 2733 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 54.00 FROM PLANNING AND BUDGETING SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,517,950 2734 LUMP SUM LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATION SYSTEM/PLANNING AND BUDGETING SUBSYSTEM FROM PLANNING AND BUDGETING SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,936,581 2735 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM PLANNING AND BUDGETING SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 136,404 2736 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PLANNING AND BUDGETING SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 39,515 2737 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PLANNING AND BUDGETING SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,136 2738 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM PLANNING AND BUDGETING SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,470 TOTAL: LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATIONS SYSTEM/PLANNING AND BUDGETING SUBSYSTEM FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,670,056 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 54.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,670,056 EXECUTIVE PLANNING AND BUDGETING 2739 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 114.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,322,859 2740 LUMP SUM EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR - OFFICE OF PLANNING AND BUDGETING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,001,169 2741 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 51,645 2742 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,130 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE PLANNING AND BUDGETING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 15,408,803 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 114.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,408,803 PROGRAM: EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT EMERGENCY PREVENTION, PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE The Division of Emergency Management must submit quarterly status reports on the outstanding obligations for each federally declared disaster event to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee no later than the 15th day of the month following the end of a quarter. Based on the most recent quarterly report, the division must also provide an allocation of funding by appropriation category and funds needed to meet these obligations for the budget request year. APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,790,582 2743 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 225.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,710,085 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 4,131,302 FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,043,773 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,152,328 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 348,496 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 57,239 FROM U.S. CONTRIBUTIONS TRUST FUND . 1,421,585 2744 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 352,679 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 386,236 FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,268,418 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,244,585 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 222,669 2745 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,269,505 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 706,418 FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,756,853 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,168,055 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 180,261 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 255,113 2746 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS DISASTER PREPAREDNESS PLANNING AND ADMINISTRATION FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,342,270 2747 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 8,008 FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 17,525 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 36,113 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 17,100 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 233 2748 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 38,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 38,000 2749 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PAYMENT FLORIDA WING/ CIVIL AIR PATROL FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 49,500 2750 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,123,321 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 237,791 FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 837,709 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 985,595 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 163,737 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 233,722 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2750, $500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Division of Emergency Management to provide baseline capabilities allowing fiscally constrained counties access to WebEOC through the state hosted web application. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2750, $2,096,959 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to continue the statewide emergency and mass notification system with the capability to provide alerts of imminent or actual hazards to all Florida's citizens, businesses, and visitors. 2752 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 67,646 2753 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,400,000 FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,481,265 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2753, $4,150,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated as follows: City of Live Oak - Flood Alert, Monitoring, and Analytics (SF 1963)............................................... 450,000 Data Analytics Software for Hurricane Preparedness, Response and Recovery (SF 3233)......................... 500,000 Emergency Operations Support - SaaS-Based Hyperlocal Weather Radar Coverage - Expansion (SF 1170)............ 350,000 Emergency Operations Support - SaaS-Based Hyperlocal Weather Radar Coverage - Renewal (SF 1169).............. 350,000 Florida Civil Air Patrol Volunteers: Education, Training and Emergency Services Mission Support (SF 1258)........ 250,000 Florida Severe Weather Mesonet - Operational Readiness and Training Enhancements (SF 3230)..................... 1,900,000 Gadsden County Emergency Operations Center and Public Safety: Final Stage (SF 1801)........................... 350,000 2754 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - STATE DOMESTIC PREPAREDNESS PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,888 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 266,694 2755 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 162,062 2756 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - STATE AND FEDERAL DISASTER RELIEF OPERATIONS - ADMINISTRATIVE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,442,910 2757 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMMISSION ON COMMUNITY SERVICE FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 300,000 2758 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE HURRICANE PREPAREDNESS AND PLANNING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,064,539 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 926,154 2759 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,838 FROM U.S. CONTRIBUTIONS TRUST FUND . 129,300 2760 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CORONAVIRUS (COVID-19) - PUBLIC ASSISTANCE - STATE OPERATIONS FROM U.S. CONTRIBUTIONS TRUST FUND . 16,693 2761 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARD MITIGATION - STATE OPERATIONS FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 40 FROM U.S. CONTRIBUTIONS TRUST FUND . 64,860 2762 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DISASTER ACTIVITY - STATE OBLIGATIONS FROM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PREPAREDNESS AND ASSISTANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 400,000 2763 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MIAMI-DADE COUNTY SURFSIDE CONDOMINIUM - STATE OPERATIONS FROM U.S. CONTRIBUTIONS TRUST FUND . 3,041 2764 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PREDISASTER MITIGATION FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,689,346 2765 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HURRICANE LOSS MITIGATION FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,384,280 The funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund in the following Specific Appropriations (SA) and appropriation categories reflect the transfer of $7,000,000 of mitigation funds from the Florida Hurricane Catastrophe Fund pursuant to section 215.555(7), Florida Statutes, as follows: Salaries and Benefits (SA 2743)........................... 117,620 Other Personal Services (SA 2744)......................... 171,958 Expenses (SA 2745)........................................ 69,286 Operating Capital Outlay (SA 2747)........................ 7,500 Contracted Services (SA 2750)............................. 137,000 Grants and Aids - Hurricane Loss Mitigation (SA 2765)..... 6,384,280 Indirect Costs............................................ 112,356 These funds must be used for Hurricane Loss Mitigation programs as specified in section 215.559, Florida Statutes. The funds allocated in section 215.559(2)(a), Florida Statutes, must be distributed directly to Gulf Coast State College for the uses described in section 215.559(2)(a), Florida Statutes. 2766 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLOOD MITIGATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,797,256 2767 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,091 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 92,613 2768 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA HAZARDOUS MATERIALS PLANNING PROGRAM FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 65,000 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,286,597 2769 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HAZARDOUS MATERIALS EMERGENCY PLANNING GRANT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,114,764 2770 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - UNAUTHORIZED ALIEN TRANSPORT PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,198 2771 GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT CRITICAL FACILITY NEEDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,854,150 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2771 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund reflect the transfer of $3,000,000 of mitigation funds from the Hurricane Catastrophe Fund pursuant to section 215.555(7), Florida Statutes. These funds shall be used to retrofit existing facilities used as public hurricane shelters as specified in section 215.559(1)(b), Florida Statutes. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2771, $15,854,150 of nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated as follows: Calhoun County Emergency Operations Center and Courthouse Improvements (SF 3118).................................. 350,000 Charlotte County Emergency Operations Center Improvements (SF 3678)............................................... 350,000 City of Homestead Joint Operations Center (SF 1788)....... 650,000 City of North Port Emergency Operations Center Outfitting (SF 1252)............................................... 400,000 City of Treasure Island Public Safety Building (SF 2486).. 1,500,000 Cutler Bay - Sheriff Emergency Operations Command Center (Legacy Park Municipal Complex) (SF 1130)............... 1,000,000 East Pasco Emergency Shelter (SF 2268).................... 350,000 Eastern Central Florida Emergency Shelter Hardening (SF 2962)................................................... 1,000,000 Good Counsel Camp Safety and Resilience Initiative: Protecting Florida's Youth and Property (SF 2853)....... 950,000 Levy County Government Complex Permanent Generators (SF 2419)................................................... 1,000,000 Menorah Life St. Petersburg - Security & Safety Initiative (SF 2513).................................... 490,000 Multi-Mission Aircraft - Emergency Response Expansion for Palm Beach County (SF 2356)............................. 650,000 Nathan Benderson Park Secondary-Post Storm Shelter and Support Facility (SF 1471).............................. 1,000,000 Polk County Emergency Operations Center Expansion (SF 2325)................................................... 750,000 Sarasota Manatee Jewish Housing Council - Aviva Safe and Secure Campus (SF 2557)................................. 927,150 SendMeMissions - Disaster Volunteer Village (SF 3572)..... 987,000 Suwannee County Regional Shelter Master Planning & Design Project (SF 1483)....................................... 2,500,000 The Center at Vista Park (SF 1233)........................ 1,000,000 TOTAL: EMERGENCY PREVENTION, PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 38,737,917 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 75,128,532 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 225.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 113,866,449 TOTAL: GOVERNOR, EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 77,419,028 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 84,606,979 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 523.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 162,026,007 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 14,790,582 HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,569,032 2772 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 219.00 FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,389,754 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . 191,631 2773 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 92,669 2774 EXPENSES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 859,240 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . 6,764 2775 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 67,930 2776 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,000 2777 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 44,844 2778 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,562,204 2779 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 98,573 2780 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 95,152 2781 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 86,566 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,540,327 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 219.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 24,540,327 PROGRAM: FLORIDA HIGHWAY PATROL HIGHWAY SAFETY APPROVED SALARY RATE 175,195,358 2786 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 2,173.00 FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 263,937,761 2787 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,985,964 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 327,150 2788 EXPENSES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,340,789 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 77,370 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . 353,970 FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 292,500 2789 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 932,862 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,000 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . 150,000 2790 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,135,838 2791 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA HIGHWAY PATROL COMMUNICATION SYSTEMS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,650,719 FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,000 2792 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,673,801 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 258,609 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . 50,020 2793 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 23,605,050 2794 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA HIGHWAY PATROL AUXILIARY FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 172,360 2795 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,345,916 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,014,900 2796 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENT OF DEATH AND DISMEMBERMENT CLAIMS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 325,995 2797 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,909,576 2798 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,275,892 2799 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SPECIAL CATEGORIES - AIRCRAFT MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,123,927 2800 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 2801 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 153,460 2802 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MOBILE DATA TERMINAL SYSTEM FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,555,358 2803 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 702,177 TOTAL: HIGHWAY SAFETY FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 380,405,964 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,173.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 380,405,964 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,322,458 2806 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 23.00 FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,367,981 2807 EXPENSES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 257,585 2808 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,135 2809 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,790 2810 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 76,025 2811 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,315 2812 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,150 2813 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,742 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,744,723 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 23.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,744,723 COMMERCIAL VEHICLE ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 26,858,756 2814 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 291.00 FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 41,183,940 2815 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 257,521 2816 EXPENSES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,932,936 2817 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 969,513 2818 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,508,511 2819 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,306,514 2820 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,435,841 2821 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,466,646 2822 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,351,306 2823 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 218,240 2824 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 23,020 2825 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 91,291 TOTAL: COMMERCIAL VEHICLE ENFORCEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 55,745,279 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 291.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 55,745,279 PROGRAM: MOTORIST SERVICES MOTORIST SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 63,125,057 2826 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,257.00 FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 93,197,692 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 462,607 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 5,157,642 2827 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,033,726 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 336,238 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 62,712 2828 EXPENSES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,845,935 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 390,335 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 413,306 2829 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 134,866 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,705 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 5,001 2830 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 584,000 2831 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,246,637 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 219,401 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 3,040 2832 SPECIAL CATEGORIES AUTOMATED UNIFORM TRAFFIC ACCOUNTING SYSTEM FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 913,905 2833 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENT TO OUTSIDE CONTRACTOR FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,249,454 2834 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PURCHASE OF DRIVER LICENSES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,684,168 2835 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - PURCHASE OF LICENSE PLATES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,984,430 2836 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 679,643 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 35,770 2837 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 2838 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 134,488 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 11,000 2839 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 527,036 TOTAL: MOTORIST SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 154,372,737 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,257.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 154,372,737 PROGRAM: INFORMATION SERVICES ADMINISTRATION INFORMATION SERVICES ADMINISTRATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 10,317,343 2840 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 136.00 FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,142,462 2841 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 384,495 2842 EXPENSES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,190,260 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 213,265 2843 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 53,931 2844 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,504,605 FROM GAS TAX COLLECTION TRUST FUND . 619,833 2844A SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 415,105 2845 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 622,667 2846 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,444 2847 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TAX COLLECTOR NETWORK - COUNTY SYSTEMS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,507,332 2848 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,420,309 2849 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,607 2850 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 56,660 2851 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM HIGHWAY SAFETY OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,271,556 TOTAL: INFORMATION SERVICES ADMINISTRATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 59,463,531 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 136.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 59,463,531 TOTAL: HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES, DEPARTMENT OF FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 678,272,561 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4,099.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 678,272,561 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 292,388,004 LEGISLATIVE BRANCH SENATE 2852 LUMP SUM SENATE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 66,633,824 HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES 2853 LUMP SUM HOUSE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 79,132,923 LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES 2854 LUMP SUM LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES - SENATE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,145,378 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,143,057 FROM LEGISLATIVE LOBBYIST REGISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 178,354 2855 LUMP SUM LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES - HOUSE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,248,575 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,126,879 FROM LEGISLATIVE LOBBYIST REGISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 173,688 2856 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 444,771 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,518 FROM LEGISLATIVE LOBBYIST REGISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 315 TOTAL: LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 56,838,724 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,624,811 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 59,463,535 OFFICE OF PUBLIC COUNSEL 2857 LUMP SUM PUBLIC COUNSEL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,662,877 2858 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,518 TOTAL: OFFICE OF PUBLIC COUNSEL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 2,665,395 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,665,395 ETHICS, COMMISSION ON 2859 LUMP SUM LOBBY REGISTRATION FROM EXECUTIVE BRANCH LOBBY REGISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 194,171 2860 LUMP SUM ETHICS COMMISSION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,138,243 FROM EXECUTIVE BRANCH LOBBY REGISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,984 2861 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,609 2862 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 36,049 FROM EXECUTIVE BRANCH LOBBY REGISTRATION TRUST FUND . . . . . . 157 TOTAL: ETHICS, COMMISSION ON FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,183,901 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 197,312 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,381,213 AUDITOR GENERAL 2863 LUMP SUM AUDITOR GENERAL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 46,170,763 2864 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 61,613 2865 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 65,189 TOTAL: AUDITOR GENERAL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 46,297,565 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 46,297,565 TOTAL: LEGISLATIVE BRANCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 254,752,332 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,822,123 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 257,574,455 LOTTERY, DEPARTMENT OF THE PROGRAM: LOTTERY OPERATIONS EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,195,814 2866 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 53.00 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 6,277,068 2867 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 120,718 2868 EXPENSES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,794,283 2869 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,000 2870 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 442,000 2871 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 989,749 2872 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 810,365 2873 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 120,000 2874 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 496,385 2875 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,000 2876 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 149,467 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,213,035 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 53.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,213,035 LOTTERY GAMES AND OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 21,985,713 2877 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 395.00 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 35,923,596 2878 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,149,714 2879 EXPENSES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 6,565,633 2880 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 38,990 2881 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 269,500 2882 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,119,702 2883 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 67,161 2884 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INSTANT TICKET PURCHASE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 57,556,161 In the event instant ticket sales are greater than the projected sales used to calculate the amount appropriated, the Department of the Lottery is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2884 to account for the additional tickets and associated licensing fees. 2885 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GAMING SYSTEM CONTRACT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 74,242,038 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 2885, the Department of the Lottery is authorized to have up to 4,000 Full-Service Vending Machines with functionality to sell terminal tickets and instant tickets. The department shall give priority to new sales locations. In the event terminal games ticket sales are greater than the projected sales used to calculate the amount appropriated, the Department of the Lottery is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2885. The Department of the Lottery is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2885 to acquire up to 500 additional ticket terminals. Prior to the submission of any budget amendment that increases the size of the lottery retailer network, the Revenue Estimating Conference shall determine if sales will increase sufficiently to cover the cost of the terminals, offset any losses to the existing network, and generate additional revenue that benefits the state. The budget amendments will be contingent upon the department's submission of a plan that includes not only a positive Revenue Estimating Conference impact analysis, but also identifies the specific terminal needs and a plan for distribution of the additional terminals. 2886 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADVERTISING AGENCY FEES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,907,939 2887 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAID ADVERTISING AND PROMOTION FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 36,812,514 2888 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RETAILER INCENTIVES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,325,000 2889 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 22,060 2890 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 38,000 2891 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 14,807 2892 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 409,762 TOTAL: LOTTERY GAMES AND OPERATIONS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 228,462,577 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 395.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 228,462,577 TOTAL: LOTTERY, DEPARTMENT OF THE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 241,675,612 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 448.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 241,675,612 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 26,181,527 MANAGEMENT SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,772,587 2893 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 116.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 789,481 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 13,405,765 2894 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 120,249 2895 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 225,467 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 976,147 2896 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 3,202 2897 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 61,680 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 297,684 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 50,000 2898 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 750,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2898 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 2899 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,933,571 2900 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE TRAVEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,900,000 2901 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,479 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 247,810 2902 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MAIL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 50,004 2903 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,898 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 23,769 2904 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,391,000 2905 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 22,427 2906 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,197 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 40,066 2907 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 21,400 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 219,739 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,013,602 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,531,433 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 116.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,545,035 PROGRAM: FACILITIES PROGRAM FACILITIES MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 14,731,957 2908 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 271.50 FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 22,091,012 2909 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 278,970 2910 EXPENSES FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 5,985,008 2911 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 323,727 2912 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 150,000 2913 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE FLORIDA DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT - CAPITOL POLICE FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 9,912,643 2914 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 14,632,170 2915 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES PROVISIONS FOR FACILITIES SECURITY FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 1,778,387 2916 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INTERIOR REFURBISHMENT - LEASE SPACE FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 2,500,000 2917 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HEATING, VENTILATION, AND AIR CONDITIONING CONTROL DEVICE REFRESH - FLORIDA FACILITIES POOL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 2918 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 711,500 2919 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE UTILITY PAYMENTS FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 17,802,406 The Department of Management Services is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2919, in the event utility costs exceed the amount appropriated. 2920 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DEFERRED-PAYMENT COMMODITY CONTRACTS FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 1,227,007 2921 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 97,570 2922 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 91,357 2923 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE CAPITOL - MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 250,000 2924 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 288,598 2925 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY COMPLIANCE WITH THE AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,345,700 FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 1,100,000 Funds in Specific Appropriations 2925 through 2927 shall be held in reserve contingent upon the submission of a project plan to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee detailing the request for building repair, code correction, and other deficiency projects. The project plan must include all high priority deficiency issues and all issues affecting life, health, and safety. The project plan shall also include the facility, location, and estimated cost for each project and shall be submitted by August 3, 2026. The Department of Management Services shall request the release of funds pursuant to the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. 2926 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY LIFE SAFETY CODE COMPLIANCE PROJECTS STATEWIDE - DMS MGD FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 1,000,000 2927 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY STATEWIDE CAPITAL DEPRECIATION - GENERAL - DMS MGD FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 59,371,791 FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 6,100,000 2928 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ANNUAL GENERAL BUILDING REPAIRS AND MAINTENANCE - DMS MGD FROM SUPERVISION TRUST FUND . . . . 6,789,000 2929 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY DEBT SERVICE FROM FLORIDA FACILITIES POOL CLEARING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 12,553,494 TOTAL: FACILITIES MANAGEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 65,717,491 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 105,662,849 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 271.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 171,380,340 BUILDING CONSTRUCTION Funds provided in Specific Appropriations 2930 through 2937 from the Architects Incidental Trust Fund are based on an assessment against each fixed capital outlay appropriation in which the Department of Management Services serves as the owner-representative on behalf of the state. The assessments for appropriations made for the 2025-2026 fiscal year shall be calculated in accordance with the formula submitted by the Department of Management Services to the Executive Office of the Governor on October 7, 1991, as required by chapter 91-193, Laws of Florida. APPROVED SALARY RATE 774,156 2930 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 11.00 FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,160,611 2931 EXPENSES FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 122,002 2932 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 46,341 2933 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 23,352 2934 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,613 2935 SPECIAL CATEGORIES BUILDING RELOCATION FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2935 are provided to the Department of Management Services for lease costs associated with the temporary relocation of state employees and equipment located at state-owned buildings that are in the process of being renovated. The funds shall be placed in reserve. The department is authorized to submit budget amendments for the release of funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. Budget amendments for the release of funds shall include a detailed plan and total estimated leasing costs. 2936 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,795 2937 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM ARCHITECTS INCIDENTAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,783 TOTAL: BUILDING CONSTRUCTION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,364,497 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 11.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,364,497 PROGRAM: SUPPORT PROGRAM FEDERAL PROPERTY ASSISTANCE Funds provided in Specific Appropriations 2938 through 2943, from the Surplus Property Revolving Trust Fund, may be used only for the direct and indirect operating expenses of the Federal Surplus Personal Property Donation Program administered by the Department of Management Services. APPROVED SALARY RATE 228,683 2938 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 4.00 FROM SURPLUS PROPERTY REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 342,289 2939 EXPENSES FROM SURPLUS PROPERTY REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,420 2940 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM SURPLUS PROPERTY REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 42,445 2941 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM SURPLUS PROPERTY REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 630 2942 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM SURPLUS PROPERTY REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,919 2943 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM SURPLUS PROPERTY REVOLVING TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,282 TOTAL: FEDERAL PROPERTY ASSISTANCE FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 425,985 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 425,985 MOTOR VEHICLE AND WATERCRAFT MANAGEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 475,585 2944 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 6.00 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 735,183 2945 EXPENSES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 58,708 2946 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 68,784 2947 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLEET MANAGEMENT INFORMATION SYSTEM FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 595,390 2948 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 945 2949 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,247 2950 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,809 2951 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENT OF EXPENSES FROM SALE OF AGENCY VEHICLES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 695,000 2953 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 24,956 TOTAL: MOTOR VEHICLE AND WATERCRAFT MANAGEMENT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,183,022 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 6.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,183,022 PURCHASING OVERSIGHT APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,102,150 2954 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 56.00 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,929,651 From the funds and positions provided in Specific Appropriation 2954, the Department of Management Services shall competitively procure telematic asset tracking services for use by state agencies through a state term contract. The services must include, at a minimum, real-time automated tracking, monitoring, and reporting of vehicle usage, maintenance, location, and fuel consumption. Each participating vendor must agree to provide data in accordance with a unified standard established by the department. 2955 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,066 2956 EXPENSES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 540,928 2957 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,705,220 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2957 are provided to the department to utilize the enterprise risk monitoring tool to provide quarterly supply chain cyber health metrics reports to state agencies, summarizing critical vulnerabilities and minimizing cyber risks across the state's digital ecosystem. 2958 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,529 2959 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 30,000 2960 SPECIAL CATEGORIES WEB-BASED E-PROCUREMENT SYSTEM FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 11,550,049 Funds in Specific Appropriation 2960 are provided to the Department of Management Services for the operations and maintenance of MyFloridaMarketPlace (MFMP). The department shall continue to provide enterprise agency read-only user access to legislative members, legislative staff, and staff of the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, to include the ability to view purchase orders, invoices, payment reconciliations, purchasing documents, solicitations, and contracts for all state agencies. 2961 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PROJECT MANAGEMENT PROFESSIONAL - TRAINING FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 180,000 2962 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,000 2963 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 20,914 2964 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO THE DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,500,000 2965 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 135,273 TOTAL: PURCHASING OVERSIGHT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,617,630 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 56.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,617,630 WORKFORCE PROGRAMS PROGRAM: INSURANCE BENEFITS ADMINISTRATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,362,461 2966 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 33.00 FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 504,715 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES LIFE INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 28,511 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 3,014,227 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES DISABILITY INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 37,326 2967 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 15,034 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 146,301 2968 EXPENSES FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 47,531 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES LIFE INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,984 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 353,901 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES DISABILITY INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,875 2969 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 10,000 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 8,000 2970 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACTUARY AND CONSULTING SERVICES FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 850,000 2971 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 19,219 2972 SPECIAL CATEGORIES POST PAYMENT CLAIMS AUDIT SERVICES FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 583,000 The Department of Management Services is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2972, in the event the contractor identifies claim overpayments that result in compensation that exceeds the amount appropriated. 2973 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 348,505 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 2,059,157 2974 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ONLY CONTRACT FOR HEALTH INSURANCE FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 45,000,000 The Department of Management Services is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2974 in the event administrative service payments for health insurance exceed the amount appropriated. From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2974, the Department of Management Services may competitively procure a contractor that identifies pre-65 year old retirees who may qualify for Social Security Disability Income based on their medical history and assists them in applying for those benefits. The department may submit budget amendments to request additional funds pursuant to the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. 2975 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PRESCRIPTION DRUG CLAIMS ADMINISTRATION FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,700,000 2976 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSPARENCY-BUNDLED-ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES FOR STATEWIDE CONTRACTS FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 7,700,000 The Department of Management Services is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2976 in the event costs exceed the amount appropriated. 2977 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 3,762 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES LIFE INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 986 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 23,542 2978 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 300,000 2979 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PAYMENT OF EMPLOYER CONTRIBUTIONS TO HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT CUSTODIAN FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,680,000 2980 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 9,235 2981 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSPARENCY-BUNDLED SERVICES FOR EMPLOYEE TRANSFERS FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 4,500,000 The Department of Management Services is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 2981 in the event costs exceed the amount appropriated. 2982 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 4,045 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 15,488 2983 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM PRETAX BENEFITS TRUST FUND . . 2,476 FROM STATE EMPLOYEES HEALTH INSURANCE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 7,715 TOTAL: PROGRAM: INSURANCE BENEFITS ADMINISTRATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 76,977,535 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 33.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 76,977,535 PROGRAM: RETIREMENT BENEFITS ADMINISTRATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 13,057,735 2984 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 221.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,022,306 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 16,612,331 FROM OPTIONAL RETIREMENT PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 354,599 FROM POLICE AND FIREFIGHTER'S PREMIUM TAX TRUST FUND . . . . . . 1,096,984 FROM RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 174,022 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 2984, the Department of Management Services shall expend available cash balances from the Police and Firefighter's Premium Tax Trust Fund prior to the use of funds from the General Revenue Fund. Funds provided in Specific Appropriations 2984 through 2994 from the Optional Retirement Program Trust Fund are based on an assessment of .01 percent of the participants' salaries and shall be used only for administration of the Optional Retirement Program. 2985 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 436,340 FROM OPTIONAL RETIREMENT PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,100 2986 EXPENSES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,149,029 FROM OPTIONAL RETIREMENT PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 28,011 FROM POLICE AND FIREFIGHTER'S PREMIUM TAX TRUST FUND . . . . . . 57,139 FROM RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 17,817 2987 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,000 2988 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 22,422 2989 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 65,500 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 7,338,531 FROM OPTIONAL RETIREMENT PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,000 FROM POLICE AND FIREFIGHTER'S PREMIUM TAX TRUST FUND . . . . . . 238,305 FROM RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 52,700 2990 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OVERTIME FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 122,571 2991 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 44,611 2992 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 160,891 2993 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 193,571 FROM POLICE AND FIREFIGHTER'S PREMIUM TAX TRUST FUND . . . . . . 2,000 2994 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 68,221 FROM OPTIONAL RETIREMENT PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,323 FROM POLICE AND FIREFIGHTER'S PREMIUM TAX TRUST FUND . . . . . . 4,156 FROM RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDY TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 1,103 2995 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 304,501 2996 PENSIONS AND BENEFITS DISABILITY BENEFITS TO JUSTICES AND JUDGES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,420,700 2997 PENSIONS AND BENEFITS FLORIDA NATIONAL GUARD FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,485,797 TOTAL: PROGRAM: RETIREMENT BENEFITS ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 19,994,305 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 30,527,278 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 221.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 50,521,583 PROGRAM: STATE PERSONNEL POLICY ADMINISTRATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,599,447 2998 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 19.00 FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,276,934 Funds provided in Specific Appropriations 2998 through 3014 from the State Personnel System Trust Fund are based upon a human resources services assessment to state entities at the following rates: FTE $355.78 OPS $105.95 Justice Administrative Commission $232.22 State Court System $200.96 County Health Department $232.22 2999 EXPENSES FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 138,052 3000 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,576 3001 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,221 3002 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100,000 3003 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,191 3004 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,682 3005 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,041 TOTAL: PROGRAM: STATE PERSONNEL POLICY ADMINISTRATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,576,697 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 19.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,576,697 PROGRAM: PEOPLE FIRST No funds or positions are provided in Specific Appropriations 3006 through 3014 for the re-procurement or replacement of the People First System. APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,293,399 3006 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 16.00 FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,924,127 3007 EXPENSES FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 112,575 3008 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,128 3009 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,630,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3009 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate the People First System with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 3010 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,518 3011 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,860 3012 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,756 3013 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES / STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,500,000 FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,923,322 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3013, $1,500,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue is provided to the Department of Management Services for the People First licenses associated with the Florida College System Integration. 3014 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,567 TOTAL: PROGRAM: PEOPLE FIRST FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,130,000 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 33,001,853 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 16.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 37,131,853 PROGRAM: TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES From the funds in Specific Appropriations 3015 through 3030, the Department of Management Services shall continue to allow agencies to purchase maintenance and equipment refresh services needed to maintain current agency telephony and call center systems. APPROVED SALARY RATE 5,001,983 3015 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 70.00 FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 6,684,245 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 773,826 From the funds and positions in Specific Appropriation 3015, the Department of Management Services shall continue regional call routing projects related to providing a statewide call routing solution to interconnect the seven regions. 3016 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 394,410 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 156,035 3017 EXPENSES FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 660,979 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 227,636 3018 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS DISTRIBUTIONS TO COUNTIES - WIRELESS 911 TELEPHONE SYSTEMS FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 121,819,519 3019 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS DISTRIBUTIONS TO COUNTIES - NON-WIRELESS E911 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,967,589 3020 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS DISTRIBUTION OF COUNTY PREPAID WIRELESS 911 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,969,033 3021 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS DISTRIBUTION TO COUNTIES PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT UPGRADES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,827,360 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3021 are provided to upgrade 911 public safety answering points within Fiscally Constrained Counties across the state to allow the transfer of an emergency call from one local, multijurisdictional, or regional E911 system to another system in the state, pursuant to section 365.177, Florida Statutes. 3022 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 46,079 3023 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CENTREX AND SUNCOM PAYMENTS FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 140,974,333 The Department of Management Services is authorized to submit budget amendments in accordance with chapter 216, Florida Statutes, to increase Specific Appropriation 3023, in the event that payments for telecommunications services exceed the amount appropriated. 3024 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 2,108,404 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 966,512 3025 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 362,776 3026 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 36,792 3027 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 62,159 3028 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 3,241 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,845 3028A SPECIAL CATEGORIES FISCALLY CONSTRAINED COUNTIES - E-RATE TELECOMMUNICATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,250,000 The funds provided in Specific Appropriation 3028A are provided to the Department of Management Services to cover the local match share of E-Rate for Fiscally Constrained Counties. 3029 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 24,401 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,004 3030 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM COMMUNICATIONS WORKING CAPITAL TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . 1,163,413 FROM EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,316 3030A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 600,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3030A are provided for Orlando Sanford International Airport - Digital Twin Project (SF 2039). TOTAL: TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 4,677,360 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 318,407,547 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 70.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 323,084,907 WIRELESS SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,217,385 3031 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 14.00 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,565,061 3032 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 94,022 3033 EXPENSES FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 280,980 3033A AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - LOCAL GOVERNMENT EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,250,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3033A are provided to local government emergency communication projects as follows: Lakeland Public Safety Radio Replacement (SF 2318)........ 500,000 Liberty County Fire Rescue SLERS P25 Communications (SF 1521)................................................... 350,000 Washington County Sheriff's Office Public Safety Communications Tower Upgrades (SF 3227)................. 400,000 3034 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,000 3035 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,000,000 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,882,811 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3035, $1,000,000 in recurring funds from the Law Enforcement Radio System Trust Fund is provided to the Department of Management Services for Statewide Law Enforcement Radio System (SLERS) tower repair contingency. The funds shall be held in reserve. The funds can be used in the event SLERS towers sustain repair and replacement costs due to catastrophic events which exceed $1,000,000 in a fiscal year. The department is authorized to submit budget amendments requesting release of funds pursuant to the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. 3036 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA INTEROPERABILITY NETWORK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,250,000 3037 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MUTUAL AID BUILD-OUT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 120,000 3038 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,410 3039 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 250,000 3040 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM CONTRACT PAYMENT FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,000,000 3041 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TOWER LEASES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,014,437 FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 490,010 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3041 must be used to pay for the radio tower leases for the Statewide Law Enforcement Radio System. 3042 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FIRST NET SUBSCRIPTIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,200,000 3043 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,229 3044 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,491 3045 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM LAW ENFORCEMENT RADIO SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,136 3045A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,406,867 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3045A are provided for the following local government emergency projects: Bradford County SLERS Radio Equipment Replacement and Coverage Improvement (SF 2998).......................... 750,000 Hendry County Phase 3 Sheriff's Office SLERS Radio Coverage Improvements (SF 3256)......................... 1,656,867 TOTAL: WIRELESS SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 27,241,304 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 25,597,150 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 14.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 52,838,454 OFFICE OF THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,566,569 3046 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 56.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,539,815 From the positions in Specific Appropriation 3046, one position is provided to the Department of Management Services for a Florida Certified Contract Manager (FCCM) dedicated exclusively to contract management and oversight. From the positions in Specific Appropriation 3046, one position is provided to the Department of Management Services for a Florida Certified Contract Negotiator (FCCN) dedicated exclusively to the creation, management, execution, and oversight of IT procurements. 3047 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 212,300 3048 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 912,756 3050 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,544,600 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 3050, $2,000,000 is provided to the Department of Management Services to competitively procure a third-party vendor to conduct cybersecurity risk assessments for state agencies. Upon completion, the department shall submit a consolidated state risk assessment report to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget. 3052 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CYBERSECURITY GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,000,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3052 are provided to the Department of Management Services for a Governance, Risk, and Compliance platform from the state's allocation of federal funds awarded to the Division of Emergency Management within the Executive Office of the Governor from the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Public Law 117-58) for the State and Local Cybersecurity Grant Program. The department shall submit quarterly project status reports to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity no later than thirty days from the close of the previous quarter. Each status report must include copies of new or updated relevant task order(s), contract(s), and purchase order(s). The status report must also describe progress made to date for each project milestone and deliverable, planned and actual completion dates, planned and actual costs incurred, and any current project issues or risks. 3053 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,342 3054 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,102 3055 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,830 3056 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,565 TOTAL: OFFICE OF THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,287,310 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 56.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 13,287,310 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECT OVERSIGHT APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,236,453 3057 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 13.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,776,582 The positions and funds in Specific Appropriation 3057 are provided to the Department of Management Services in support of its project oversight responsibilities pursuant to section 282.0051, Florida Statutes. At a minimum, the Department of Management Services shall include project monitoring by a certified project management professional over each of the following agency projects: the Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) project at the Department of Financial Services; the Florida Healthcare Connections (FX) project at the Agency for Health Care Administration; the Automated Community Connection to Economic Self Sufficiency (ACCESS) Florida System and the Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System (CCWIS) modernization projects at the Department of Children and Families; the upgrade of the Child Support Automated Management System (CAMS) at the Department of Revenue; and the Consumer-First Workforce Information System projects at the Department of Commerce. Staff in project oversight positions shall be subject matter experts in state government information technology and/or possess experience in directing and managing information technology projects. Staff responsibilities are limited to project oversight and monitoring and do not include operational authority or management of agency projects. The Department of Management Services shall submit a project oversight progress report each quarter on the status of the information technology projects reviewed and monitored by the Florida Digital Service. The project oversight progress report shall be submitted to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget. The Department of Management Services shall prioritize the training facilities and project oversight activities of the Florida Digital Service to focus on the agency technical integrations, organizational change management, and training necessary for the successful implementation of PALM and other multi-agency, high-risk projects. The department shall support the Department of Financial Services to assist in the interagency coordination as needed to implement the statewide PALM system. 3058 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 33,375 3059 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 68,341 3060 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 80,000 3061 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,067 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECT OVERSIGHT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,962,365 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 13.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,962,365 PROGRAM: PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,840,326 3062 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 32.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,470,908 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 1,988,358 3063 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 277,247 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 103,985 3064 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 186,079 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 705,135 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3064, the Public Employees Relations Commission shall pay for return postage for elections held pursuant to section 447.308, Florida Statutes. Reimbursement for the cost of return postage may be requested by the Commission, only on an equitable cost-sharing basis, after such election. 3065 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,399 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 5,721 3066 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 3,203 3067 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,070 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 202,500 3068 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,952 3069 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 500,000 3070 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,466 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 21,583 3071 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADMINISTRATIVE OVERHEAD FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,328 3072 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,029 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 6,072 3073 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,667 FROM PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION TRUST FUND . . . . . . . 69,184 TOTAL: PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 3,107,145 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,605,741 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 32.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,712,886 PROGRAM: COMMISSION ON HUMAN RELATIONS HUMAN RELATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,990,034 3074 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 75.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,521,216 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,628,832 3075 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 62,856 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 43,623 3076 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 131,248 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 533,971 3076A OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,736 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,000 3077 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 794,375 3078 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 53,506 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 69,000 3079 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 67,865 3080 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADMINISTRATIVE OVERHEAD FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 272,132 3081 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 23,753 3082 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,803 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 13,858 3083 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 118,921 TOTAL: HUMAN RELATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 5,589,740 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,776,955 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 75.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 8,366,695 ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS PROGRAM: ADJUDICATION OF DISPUTES APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,531,293 3084 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 103.00 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 16,997,512 3085 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 18,082 3086 EXPENSES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,632,257 3087 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 32,500 3088 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 275,495 3089 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 34,602 3090 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 8,500 3091 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 24,000 3092 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 35,215 TOTAL: PROGRAM: ADJUDICATION OF DISPUTES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,058,163 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 103.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 19,058,163 PROGRAM: WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS COURT APPROVED SALARY RATE 11,569,536 3093 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 131.00 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 17,557,123 3094 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 17,836 3095 EXPENSES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,795,565 3096 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 38,950 3097 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 908,324 3098 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 29,905 3099 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 8,779 3100 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 32,000 3101 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 48,764 TOTAL: PROGRAM: WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS COURT FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,437,246 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 131.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,437,246 TOTAL: MANAGEMENT SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 147,720,622 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 691,751,581 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,247.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 839,472,203 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 93,351,739 MILITARY AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: READINESS AND RESPONSE DRUG INTERDICTION AND PREVENTION 3102 EXPENSES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 75,000 FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 305,000 3103 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,000 3104 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PROJECTS, CONTRACTS AND GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,000,000 3105 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 110,000 3106 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS CONTRACTS FROM FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 TOTAL: DRUG INTERDICTION AND PREVENTION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,700,000 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,700,000 MILITARY READINESS AND RESPONSE APPROVED SALARY RATE 6,309,518 3107 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 123.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,696,655 FROM CAMP BLANDING MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,966,330 3108 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,823,551 FROM CAMP BLANDING MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 66,571 3109 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 265,000 3110 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,000 FROM CAMP BLANDING MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,000 3111 SPECIAL CATEGORIES NATIONAL GUARD TUITION ASSISTANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,167,900 3114 SPECIAL CATEGORIES BUILDING/OFFICE RENT PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 327,648 3115 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 413,500 FROM CAMP BLANDING MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000 3117 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS CONTRACTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 171,000 FROM CAMP BLANDING MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,000 3118 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM CAMP BLANDING MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 206,162 3119 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 26,211 FROM CAMP BLANDING MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,339 3120 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MINOR RENOVATIONS, REPAIRS, AND IMPROVEMENTS - STATEWIDE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,000,000 3121 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY MAINTENANCE, REPAIRS AND CONSTRUCTION - STATEWIDE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,460,200 3124 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CAMP BLANDING NATIONAL GUARD READINESS CENTER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 500,000 3125 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY CAMP BLANDING - LEVEL II MISSION STANDARDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000,000 TOTAL: MILITARY READINESS AND RESPONSE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 40,891,665 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,308,402 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 123.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 43,200,067 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,869,374 3127 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 30.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,218,925 3128 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54,997 3129 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,002,169 3130 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,000 3131 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,000 3132 SPECIAL CATEGORIES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 127,437 3133 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,200 3134 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 20,290 3135 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS CONTRACTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,000 3136 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,839 3137 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 137,646 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 5,682,503 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 30.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 5,682,503 FEDERAL/STATE COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS APPROVED SALARY RATE 13,565,960 3138 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 296.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 946,078 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 19,736,592 3139 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 87,740 3140 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 896,540 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 12,098,596 3141 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 721,000 3142 FOOD PRODUCTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 500,000 3144 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 343,150 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 6,028,115 3145 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS CONTRACTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 720,000 3145A SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 30,000 3146 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 115,516 TOTAL: FEDERAL/STATE COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 2,185,768 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 40,037,559 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 296.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 42,223,327 FLORIDA STATE GUARD APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,279,956 3147 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 32.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,558,772 3148 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 900,000 3149 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,145,374 3150 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 84,000 3153 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,526,295 3154 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 302,000 3155 SPECIAL CATEGORIES OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 340,681 3156 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 12,878 3157 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,000 TOTAL: FLORIDA STATE GUARD FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 33,900,000 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 32.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 33,900,000 TOTAL: MILITARY AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 82,659,936 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 45,045,961 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 481.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 127,705,897 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 26,024,808 PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION PROGRAM: COMMISSIONERS AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSIONERS APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,828,729 3160 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 17.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,867,244 3161 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 331,722 3162 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 16,859 3163 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,372 3164 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,164 TOTAL: PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSIONERS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,224,361 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 17.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,224,361 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,791,696 3165 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 54.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,704,823 3166 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 25,667 3167 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 936,899 3168 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 236,200 3169 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 120,000 3170 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 335,325 3171 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,985 3172 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 11,741 3173 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 22,608 3174 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 75,699 3175 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 96,547 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,567,494 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 54.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,567,494 LEGAL SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 2,225,843 3176 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 27.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 3,092,133 3177 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,321 3178 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 357,938 3179 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 57,955 3180 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,418 3181 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 10,970 TOTAL: LEGAL SERVICES FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,536,735 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 3,536,735 PROGRAM: UTILITY REGULATION AND CONSUMER ASSISTANCE UTILITY REGULATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,506,231 3182 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 143.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 13,233,032 3183 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 25,667 3184 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,435,433 3185 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 373,298 3186 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 28,651 3187 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 47,446 TOTAL: UTILITY REGULATION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,143,527 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 143.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,143,527 AUDITING AND PERFORMANCE ANALYSIS APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,681,631 3188 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 23.00 FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,365,002 3189 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 15,000 3190 EXPENSES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 276,537 3191 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 57,955 3192 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,976 3193 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM REGULATORY TRUST FUND . . . . . 9,435 TOTAL: AUDITING AND PERFORMANCE ANALYSIS FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,729,905 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 23.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,729,905 TOTAL: PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 32,202,022 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 264.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 32,202,022 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 19,034,130 REVENUE, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES PROGRAM EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 17,826,237 3194 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 239.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,556,394 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 9,171,774 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,811,959 3195 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 54,902 3196 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 368,010 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 511,726 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,342,155 3197 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ACQUISITION OF MOTOR VEHICLES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 56,000 3198 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,222,776 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,314,802 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 76,875 3199 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 41,799 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 440,775 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 115,227 3200 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES - OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,810,515 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 252,947 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,037,943 3201 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 19,315 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 45,097 3202 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TENANT BROKER COMMISSIONS FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 550,000 3203 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 16,864 3204 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,289,450 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 175,659 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 262,833 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 19,305,808 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,239,989 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 239.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 40,545,797 PROPERTY TAX OVERSIGHT APPROVED SALARY RATE 10,838,286 3205 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 160.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,592,692 FROM CERTIFICATION PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 284,000 3206 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,042,346 3207 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AERIAL PHOTOGRAPHY AND MAPPING FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 208,853 FROM CERTIFICATION PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 676,266 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3207, $208,853 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Department of Revenue to fund aerial photography and mapping for counties with a population of 50,000 or less (SF 3291). 3208 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PROPERTY APPRAISER AND TAX COLLECTOR CERTIFICATION PROGRAM FROM CERTIFICATION PROGRAM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 570,148 3209 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 715,254 3210 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,115 3211 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 22,000 3212 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FISCALLY CONSTRAINED COUNTIES - CPI ADJUSTMENT OF 2ND HOMESTEAD EXEMPTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,632,748 3213 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FISCALLY CONSTRAINED COUNTIES - CONSERVATION LANDS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,449,158 3214 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FISCALLY CONSTRAINED COUNTIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 72,092,782 TOTAL: PROPERTY TAX OVERSIGHT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 92,792,948 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,530,414 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 160.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 94,323,362 CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT APPROVED SALARY RATE 110,202,479 3215 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 2,234.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54,873,278 FROM CHILD SUPPORT INCENTIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 339,425 FROM CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT APPLICATION AND PROGRAM REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,073,921 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 109,639,307 3216 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 53,996 FROM CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT APPLICATION AND PROGRAM REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 311,785 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 709,069 3217 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,303,880 FROM CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT APPLICATION AND PROGRAM REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,336 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 16,610,746 3218 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 158,348 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 307,381 3219 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 85,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 132,880 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3219 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 3220 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED LEGAL SERVICES - OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,854,415 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 7,503,355 3221 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER GENERAL REVENUE TO CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 770,169 3222 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT ANNUAL FEE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,218,639 3223 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MANATEE COUNTY CLERK OF COURT - CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,692,786 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,315,995 3224 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO MIAMI-DADE COUNTY 11TH DISTRICT STATE ATTORNEY'S OFFICE - CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,882,655 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 28,957,031 3225 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PURCHASE OF SERVICES - CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,524,583 FROM CHILD SUPPORT INCENTIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 40,247,022 FROM CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT APPLICATION AND PROGRAM REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 836,969 FROM CLERK OF THE COURT CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT COLLECTION SYSTEM TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . 858,628 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 43,756,769 3226 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 373,198 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 724,440 3227 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 98,994 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 192,164 3228 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS CHILD SUPPORT INCENTIVE PAYMENTS - POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS FROM CHILD SUPPORT INCENTIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 750,000 3229 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 370,885 FROM CHILD SUPPORT INCENTIVE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 110,158 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 725,814 TOTAL: CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 95,260,826 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 258,116,195 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 2,234.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 353,377,021 GENERAL TAX ADMINISTRATION APPROVED SALARY RATE 115,115,268 3230 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 1,995.25 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 104,076,509 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 42,164,039 3231 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,390 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 73,237 3232 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,674,327 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 13,023,281 3232A AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT/ DISTRIBUTION TO CLERKS OF COURT FROM THE CLERKS OF THE COURT TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 62,447,801 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3232A shall be placed in reserve. The Department of Revenue may request the release of funds pursuant to the provisions of section 28.36, Florida Statutes. 3232B AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS EMERGENCY DISTRIBUTIONS FROM LOCAL GOVERNMENT HALF-CENT SALES TAX CLEARING TRUST FUND . . . 35,307,042 3233 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS INMATE SUPPLEMENTAL DISTRIBUTION FROM LOCAL GOVERNMENT HALF-CENT SALES TAX CLEARING TRUST FUND . . . 592,958 3234 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 49,982 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 408,081 3235 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 37,777,434 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 260,043 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 12,541,337 From the funds provided in Specific Appropriation 3235, the nonrecurring sum of $32,105,697 from the General Revenue Fund and $5,000,000 from the Operating Trust Fund are provided to the Department of Revenue for the SUNTAX transition to SAP S/4. The department shall contract with an independent verification and validation (IV&V) provider to provide IV&V services for all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project. The IV&V contract shall require that all deliverables be simultaneously provided to the department, the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity. IV&V services must include, but are not limited to (1) Oversight of all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project; (2) An evaluation of the project's schedule to highlight variances and ensure it aligns with project objectives, remains feasible, and mitigates risks; and (3) A thorough review of all project budget requests and monthly and quarterly reporting submitted by the agency to the Legislature. The monthly IV&V reports shall include technical reviews of all project deliverables submitted or accepted within the reporting period and an analysis of whether (1) The project is being built and implemented in accordance with defined technical architecture, specifications, and requirements; (2) The project is adhering to established project management and governance processes; (3) Solicitation and procurement documentation of products, tools, or services, and resulting contracts, are compliant with current statutory and regulatory requirements and aligned with project objectives; (5) The outcomes and benefits of services performed are commensurate with the amounts invoiced; and (6) If the project is on track to achieve the original business benefits and project objectives. 3236 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3236 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 3237 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PURCHASE OF SERVICES - COLLECTION AGENCIES FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 517,500 3238 SPECIAL CATEGORIES REEMPLOYMENT SERVICES FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 32,707,782 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3238 are provided to the Department of Revenue for the reimbursement contract with the Department of Commerce for reemployment assistance tax collection services. 3239 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,044,419 3240 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 214,749 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 127,251 3240A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - COUNTY TAX COLLECTORS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 400,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3240A are provided for the Dixie County Tax Collector's Office Renovation and Expansion (SF 1807). TOTAL: GENERAL TAX ADMINISTRATION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 145,200,391 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 201,214,771 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 1,995.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 346,415,162 PROGRAM: INFORMATION SERVICES PROGRAM INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROVED SALARY RATE 12,156,885 3241 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 198.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,523,041 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,706,528 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 5,925,867 3242 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 67,009 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 123,202 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 29,839 3243 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 270,259 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 350,994 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 2,049,004 3244 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 109,029 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 274,310 3245 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,866,453 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,969,336 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,712,800 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3245, $728,610 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $220,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund are provided to the Department of Revenue to replace the existing Cherwell technology. 3246 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 91,817 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3246 are provided to implement the remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the new Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) System. 3247 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 341,358 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 374,904 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 814,622 3248 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 17,880 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 22,378 3249 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 7,100 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 40,000 3250 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,027,580 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 946,920 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 1,876,845 TOTAL: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 21,187,517 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 22,351,558 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 198.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 43,539,075 TOTAL: REVENUE, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 373,747,490 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 504,452,927 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4,826.25 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 878,200,417 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 266,139,155 STATE, DEPARTMENT OF PROGRAM: OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 7,582,871 3251 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 99.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,611,387 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 227,563 3252 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,622 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 75,603 3253 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 801,053 3254 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,250 3256 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,406 3257 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 335,808 3258 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 967 3259 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,241,000 3260 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 190,073 3262 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,244 3263 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,529 3264 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,672 3265 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000 3266 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,505,450 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 14,811,461 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 303,166 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 99.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 15,114,627 PROGRAM: ELECTIONS ELECTIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,511,544 3267 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 73.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,499,317 3268 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 451,372 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 34,950 3269 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,253,967 3270 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS SPECIAL ELECTIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,500,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,500,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3270, $4,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund is provided to the Department of State to assist counties in establishing a voting system automated independent audit program. 3271 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,211 3272 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADVERTISING OF PROPOSED AMENDMENTS TO THE CONSTITUTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,500,000 3273 SPECIAL CATEGORIES VOTING SYSTEMS ASSISTANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 525,000 3274 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,169,285 3275 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 648,560 3276 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 96,481 3277 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ELECTION FRAUD PREVENTION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 446,526 3278 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 29,669 3279 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 19,366 3280 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 451,129 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,573 TOTAL: ELECTIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 16,603,883 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,536,523 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 73.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 21,140,406 OFFICE OF ELECTION CRIMES AND SECURITY APPROVED SALARY RATE 1,064,690 3281 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 16.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,573,076 3282 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 75,000 3283 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 224,150 3284 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 410,813 3285 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,518 3286 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 10,000 3287 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,091 TOTAL: OFFICE OF ELECTION CRIMES AND SECURITY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 2,300,648 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 16.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 2,300,648 PROGRAM: HISTORICAL RESOURCES HISTORICAL RESOURCES PRESERVATION AND EXHIBITION APPROVED SALARY RATE 3,777,458 3288 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 80.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 876,628 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 471,424 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 4,702,523 3289 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,934 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 184,375 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,425,796 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 267,093 3290 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 31,628 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 465,690 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 2,043,015 FROM OPERATING TRUST FUND . . . . . 6,000 3291 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 15,625 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 25,000 3292 LUMP SUM HISTORIC PROPERTIES MAINTENANCE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 500,000 3294 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 50,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 39,245 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 571,561 3295 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - HISTORIC PRESERVATION GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 310,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 118,250 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 1,500,000 The recurring funds in the Land Acquisition Trust fund in Specific Appropriation 3295 is provided for the Department of State 2026-2027 Small Matching Historic Preservation Grants List submitted by the review panel to the Department of State pursuant to section 267.0617, Florida Statues, and Rule 1A-39.001, Florida Administrative Code. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3295, $310,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are allocated as follows: Historic Pensacola (SF 3473).............................. 250,000 The Lincoln Cemetery (SF 3609)............................ 60,000 3296 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HISTORIC CEMETERIES PROGRAM GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 446,010 3297 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 61,221 3298 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,931 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 26,437 3299 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,335 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,377 FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 24,608 3300 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM LAND ACQUISITION TRUST FUND . . 34,746 3301 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY HISTORIC STRUCTURE RENOVATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,350,000 3302 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITIES REPAIRS AND MAINTENANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 750,000 3303 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION AND MAJOR RENOVATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,500,000 3304A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - SPECIAL CATEGORIES - ACQUISITION, RESTORATION OF HISTORIC PROPERTIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,420,238 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3304A, $4,420,238 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated as follows: Morikami Museum and Japanese Garden Expansion - Morikami Amanohashidate Bridge (SF 1024)......................... 500,000 Restoration of Historic Harder Hall Hotel (SF 3793)....... 1,000,000 Ruth Eckerd Hall: Emergency Upgrades for Community & Public Safety (SF 1716)................................. 485,238 Springfield Preservation and Revitalization Council, Inc. - Drew Rehabilitation (SF 2656)......................... 350,000 The Lincoln Cemetery (SF 3609)............................ 240,000 The Navy Seal Museum - Warfare Archival Preservation Initiative (SF 3333).................................... 995,000 Theater Sound System Renovation at Dr. Phillips Center (SF 1275)............................................... 850,000 TOTAL: HISTORICAL RESOURCES PRESERVATION AND EXHIBITION FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 13,744,773 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,488,917 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 80.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 26,233,690 PROGRAM: CORPORATIONS COMMERCIAL RECORDINGS AND REGISTRATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,665,690 3306 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 101.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,117,098 3307 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 252,104 3308 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,069,319 3309 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,715 3310 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 668,954 3311 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RICO ACT - ALIEN CORPORATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 270,194 3312 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 46,922 3313 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 40,880 3314 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 34,746 3315 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER (NWRDC) FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 158,037 TOTAL: COMMERCIAL RECORDINGS AND REGISTRATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 12,664,969 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 101.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 12,664,969 PROGRAM: LIBRARY AND INFORMATION SERVICES LIBRARY, ARCHIVES AND INFORMATION SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 4,184,727 3316 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 65.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,460,905 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,108,628 FROM RECORDS MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . 990,469 3317 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 82,876 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 263,928 FROM RECORDS MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . 44,414 3318 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,717,861 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 426,392 FROM RECORDS MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . 240,658 3319 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - LIBRARY COOPERATIVES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,000,000 3320 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - LIBRARY GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 17,304,072 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,150,606 3321 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,960 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 40,498 FROM RECORDS MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . 9,740 3323 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 261,633 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 501,966 FROM RECORDS MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . 152,059 3324 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LIBRARY RESOURCES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 484,388 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 3,304,848 3325 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 25,308 3326 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,101 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 7,308 FROM RECORDS MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . 3,724 3327 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 14,976 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 10,375 FROM RECORDS MANAGEMENT TRUST FUND . 9,532 3327A FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY LIBRARY CONSTRUCTION GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 5,000,000 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3327A, $5,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Department of State 2026-2027 Public Library Construction Grants List submitted by the Division of Library and Information Services to the Department of State pursuant to section 257.91, Florida Statues, and Rule 1B-2.011, Florida Administrative Code. TOTAL: LIBRARY, ARCHIVES AND INFORMATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 30,395,080 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 10,265,145 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 65.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 40,660,225 PROGRAM: CULTURAL AFFAIRS ARTS AND CULTURE APPROVED SALARY RATE 920,333 3328 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 17.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 783,569 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 630,304 3329 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,239 3330 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 161,964 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 24,568 3331 AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS GRANTS AND AIDS - ARTS GRANTS FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 232,231 3332 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,100 3332A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CULTURE BUILDS FLORIDA FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,058,968 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3332A, $3,058,968 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Department of State 2026-2027 Specific Cultural Project Application List (Culture Builds Florida). These funds shall be held in reserve. The department is authorized to submit a budget amendment by September 15 to the Legislative Budget Commission pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, for the release of funds. Release of funds is contingent upon the submission of a list of projects recommended for funding by the department for projects that scored 85 percent or higher on the ranked list. 3333 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CULTURAL AND MUSEUM GRANTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,101,376 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3333, $11,851,376 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for projects on the Department of State 2026-2027 Cultural and Museum Grants General Program Support Application List submitted by the Florida Council on Arts and Culture to the Department of State pursuant to section 265.286, Florida Statues. These funds shall be held in reserve. The department is authorized to submit a budget amendment by September 15 to the Legislative Budget Commission pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, for the release of funds. Release of funds is contingent upon the submission of a list of projects recommended for funding by the department for projects that scored 85 percent or higher on the ranked list. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3333, $1,250,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated as follows: Arts and Agriculture Program (SF 3623).................... 350,000 ex-USS Orleck (DD 886) Project: Improving Public Access, And Safety for Naval Museum (SF 3336)................... 135,000 Historic Oneida Bungalow Court (SF 3069).................. 65,000 MOCA North Miami General Operating Support (SF 1623)...... 500,000 The Florida Museum of Black History - Phase 1B (SF 2528).. 200,000 3333A SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - FLORIDA AFRICAN-AMERICAN HERITAGE PRESERVATION NETWORK FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 660,632 3334 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54,209 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 18,000 3335 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,581 3337 SPECIAL CATEGORIES HOLOCAUST DOCUMENTATION AND EDUCATION CENTER FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,000 The recurring funds in Specific Appropriation 3337, are provided for a recurring base appropriation project. 3338 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,094 3339 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,199 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 2,182 3339A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY GRANTS AND AIDS - SPECIAL CATEGORIES - CULTURAL FACILITIES PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 28,886,656 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3339A, $5,089,656 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for the Department of State 2026-2027 Cultural Facilities Application List submitted by the Florida Council on Arts and Culture to the Department of State pursuant to section 265.701, Florida Statues. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3339A, $23,797,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund shall be allocated as follows: Dance Alive National Ballet's Khoury Family Center for the Arts (SF 1380)...................................... 1,015,000 ex-USS Orleck (DD 886) Project: Improving Public Access, And Safety for Naval Museum (SF 3336)................... 647,000 Hardee County New County Library Facility (SF 3554)....... 9,500,000 Historic Oneida Bungalow Court (SF 3069).................. 585,000 Lake Alfred Public Library Expansion (SF 2342)............ 500,000 Opera Naples Luciano Pavarotti Foundation Arts Center (SF 3383)................................................... 1,100,000 Orlando Museum of Art Building Renovation Completion (SF 1356)................................................... 750,000 Resistance: Courageous Acts in Desperate Times During the Holocaust Exhibit (SF 1424)............................. 500,000 Sanford Civic Center Improvements (SF 1591)............... 500,000 The Dali: Expanding Education, Innovation & Community Engagement (SF 2861).................................... 350,000 The Florida Holocaust Museum: Advancing Holocaust Education & Research (SF 2511).......................... 350,000 The Florida Holocaust Museum: Elie Wiesel Exhibition and Learning Center (SF 2510)............................... 2,500,000 The Florida Museum of Black History - Phase 1B (SF 2528).. 800,000 The Florida Orchestra's Center for Music Education & Innovation (CMEI) (SF 2898)............................. 350,000 The Pinellas Science Center (SF 2859)..................... 350,000 Village of Indiantown Seminole Inn Historic Preservation, Rehabilitation, and Seminole Tribe Museum (SF 3776)..... 4,000,000 TOTAL: ARTS AND CULTURE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 46,834,587 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 907,285 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 17.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 47,741,872 TOTAL: STATE, DEPARTMENT OF FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 137,355,401 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 28,501,036 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 451.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 165,856,437 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 25,707,313 TOTAL OF SECTION 6 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 2,008,322,579 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 4,439,734,419 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 18,153.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 6,448,056,998 SECTION 7 - JUDICIAL BRANCH SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 7 - JUDICIAL BRANCH The moneys contained herein are appropriated from the named funds to the State Court System as the amounts to be used to pay salaries, other operational expenditures, and fixed capital outlay. STATE COURT SYSTEM PROGRAM: SUPREME COURT COURT OPERATIONS - SUPREME COURT APPROVED SALARY RATE 9,199,667 3340 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 101.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 7,928,146 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,687,015 3341 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 641,439 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 60,583 3342 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,138,055 3343 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 19,371 3344 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 451,186 3345 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DISCRETIONARY FUNDS OF THE CHIEF JUSTICE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000 Funds provided in Specific Appropriation 3345 may be spent at the discretion of the Chief Justice to carry out the official duties of the court. These funds shall be disbursed by the Chief Financial Officer upon receipt of vouchers authorized by the Chief Justice. 3346 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 54,400 3347 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 18,418 3348 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SUPREME COURT LAW LIBRARY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 248,018 3349 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 24,308 3350 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 23,288 3351 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ELEVATOR REPLACEMENT FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,040,000 3352 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY IMPROVEMENTS TO SECURITY SYSTEMS FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 476,058 TOTAL: COURT OPERATIONS - SUPREME COURT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 10,561,629 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,263,656 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 101.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,825,285 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES APPROVED SALARY RATE 15,466,815 3353 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 202.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 11,070,062 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 597,595 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,010,873 FROM COURT EDUCATION TRUST FUND . . 1,703,903 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 1,398,235 From the funds in Specific Appropriations 3353, 3354 and 3355, one position, 89,238 in associated salary rate, $1,081,499 of recurring funds and $11,957 of nonrecurring funds from the Administrative Trust Fund are provided to enhance problem solving court reporting, contingent upon SB 820, or similar legislation, becoming law. 3354 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 301,053 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,114,216 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 32,260 FROM COURT EDUCATION TRUST FUND . . 108,607 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 132,903 3355 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,074,907 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 365,128 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 78,500 FROM COURT EDUCATION TRUST FUND . . 2,402,949 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 872,006 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,000 3356 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 113,735 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 50,000 FROM COURT EDUCATION TRUST FUND . . 10,000 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 26,332 3357 SPECIAL CATEGORIES GRANTS AND AIDS - CLERK OF COURT INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 370,000 3358 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 844,890 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 151,000 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,000 FROM COURT EDUCATION TRUST FUND . . 188,860 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 772,755 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 290 3359 SPECIAL CATEGORIES FLORIDA ACCOUNTING INFORMATION RESOURCE (FLAIR) SYSTEM REPLACEMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,069,287 3360 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ENTERPRISE CYBERSECURITY RESILIENCY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 552,144 Funds appropriated in Specific Appropriation 3360 are provided for the purchase and implementation of office productivity and related security software licenses and cloud-based services. 3361 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 75,255 3362 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LAW LIBRARY/LEGAL RESEARCH FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 953,257 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 101,124 3363 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 46,159 FROM COURT EDUCATION TRUST FUND . . 7,500 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 5,500 3364 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 36,806 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 209 FROM COURT EDUCATION TRUST FUND . . 3,847 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 4,145 3365 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,169,552 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 150,000 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 448,696 TOTAL: EXECUTIVE DIRECTION AND SUPPORT SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 23,677,107 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 17,751,433 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 202.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 41,428,540 ADMINISTERED FUNDS - JUDICIAL COURT OPERATIONS - ADMINISTERED FUNDS 3365A GRANTS AND AIDS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND NONSTATE ENTITIES - FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY - COUNTY COURTHOUSE FACILITIES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,250,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3365A are provided for the following nonrecurring fixed capital outlay projects: Judicial and Government Space Expansion (SF 3586)......... 350,000 Judicial Center Expansion (SF 2053)....................... 400,000 Osceola County Courthouse Courtroom (SF 1603)............. 350,000 Osceola County Judicial Parking Security (SF 1605)........ 350,000 Taylor County Courthouse Air Handler & Duct Replacement Project (SF 1570)....................................... 800,000 PROGRAM: DISTRICT COURTS OF APPEAL COURT OPERATIONS - APPELLATE COURTS APPROVED SALARY RATE 49,769,402 3366 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 511.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 55,007,517 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,353,018 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,809,020 3367 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 332,203 3368 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 4,469,042 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 94,669 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 125,000 3369 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 134,811 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 27,000 3370 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMPENSATION TO RETIRED JUDGES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 56,192 3371 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 857,496 3372 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 277,887 3373 SPECIAL CATEGORIES SALARY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 8,549 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,151 3374 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DISTRICT COURT OF APPEAL LAW LIBRARY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 319,269 3375 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 76,139 3376 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 100,666 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 2,071 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,498 3377 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 171,100 TOTAL: COURT OPERATIONS - APPELLATE COURTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 61,810,871 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 18,438,427 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 511.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 80,249,298 PROGRAM: TRIAL COURTS COURT OPERATIONS - CIRCUIT COURTS From the funds in Specific Appropriations 3378, 3380 and 3392, thirty-five positions, 4,057,618 in associated salary rate, $6,760,211 of recurring funds and $117,250 of nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for one additional circuit court judgeship each in the First, Fifth, Seventh, Eighteenth, and Nineteenth Judicial Circuits and eight additional circuit court judgeships in the Twentieth Judicial Circuit, contingent upon SB 2512, or similar legislation, becoming law. APPROVED SALARY RATE 307,107,450 3378 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 3,237.50 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 387,845,241 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 364,639 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 62,861,282 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 11,029,156 3379 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 941,372 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200,213 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 26,101 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 242,521 3380 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 6,820,965 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 277,701 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 154,896 3381 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 193,831 3382 SPECIAL CATEGORIES PROBLEM SOLVING COURTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 9,534,714 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3382, $7,941,267 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for treatment services, drug testing, case management, and ancillary services for participants in problem-solving courts, including, but not limited to, adult drug courts, juvenile drug courts, dependency drug courts, early childhood courts, mental health courts, and veterans courts. Funds may also be used for problem-solving court operational costs and to provide training and education for multidisciplinary problem-solving court team members to gain up-to-date knowledge on best practices. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3382, $1,425,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided for felony and/or misdemeanor pretrial or post-adjudicatory veterans' treatment intervention programs in the following counties: Alachua................................................... 150,000 Clay...................................................... 150,000 Duval..................................................... 200,000 Escambia.................................................. 150,000 Leon...................................................... 125,000 Okaloosa.................................................. 150,000 Orange.................................................... 200,000 Pasco..................................................... 150,000 Pinellas.................................................. 150,000 If any of the felony and/or misdemeanor pretrial or post-adjudicatory veterans' treatment intervention programs in the above-listed counties are unable to fully utilize their funding appropriation, the judicial circuit, upon request to the Office of the State Courts Administrator, may reallocate funds to other problem-solving courts within the county or the judicial circuit in which such county is located. 3383 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CIVIL TRAFFIC INFRACTION HEARING OFFICERS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,042,854 3384 SPECIAL CATEGORIES COMPENSATION TO RETIRED JUDGES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,360,833 3385 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 13,862,742 From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3385, $5,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for naltrexone extended-release injectable medication to treat alcohol or opioid-addicted individuals involved in the criminal justice system, individuals who have a high likelihood of criminal justice involvement, or who are in court-ordered, community-based drug treatment (recurring base appropriations project). The Office of the State Courts Administrator shall contract with a non-profit entity for the purpose of purchasing and distributing the medication. From the funds in Specific Appropriation 3385, $6,000,000 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is provided to the Office of State Court Administrator for medication-assisted treatment of substance abuse disorders in individuals involved in the criminal justice system, individuals who have a high likelihood of becoming involved in the criminal justice system, or individuals who are in court-ordered, community-based drug treatment. Such medication-assisted treatment may include, but is not limited to, methadone, buprenorphine, buprenorphine extended release injectable, and naltrexone extended release injectable. The Office of the State Courts Administrator shall contract with a non-profit entity for the purpose of purchasing and distributing the medication. 3386 SPECIAL CATEGORIES DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER MONITORING PROGRAM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 316,000 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3386 are provided to the Eighteenth Judicial Circuit to continue its program to protect victims of domestic violence with Active Global Positioning Satellite (GPS) technology (recurring base appropriations project). 3387 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,715,011 3388 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATEWIDE GRAND JURY - EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 143,310 3389 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 57,133 3390 SPECIAL CATEGORIES MEDIATION/ARBITRATION SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,079,359 3391 SPECIAL CATEGORIES STATE COURTS DUE PROCESS COSTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 30,054,590 FROM ADMINISTRATIVE TRUST FUND . . . 1,104,930 3392 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 614,842 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 400 FROM FEDERAL GRANTS TRUST FUND . . . 34,852 FROM GRANTS AND DONATIONS TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 436 3393 DATA PROCESSING SERVICES OTHER DATA PROCESSING SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 2,326,605 TOTAL: COURT OPERATIONS - CIRCUIT COURTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 461,909,402 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 76,297,127 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 3,237.50 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 538,206,529 COURT OPERATIONS - COUNTY COURTS From the funds in Specific Appropriations 3394, 3396 and 3402, twenty-four positions, 2,883,588 in associated salary rate, $4,933,413 of recurring funds and $80,400 of nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund are provided for one additional county court judgeship each in Highlands, Hillsborough, Lee, and Walton Counties; two additional county court judgeships in Orange County; and three additional county court judgeships each in Duval and Miami-Dade Counties, contingent upon SB 2512, or similar legislation, becoming law. APPROVED SALARY RATE 89,953,787 3394 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 738.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 134,540,770 FROM STATE COURTS REVENUE TRUST FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,637,742 3395 OTHER PERSONAL SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 27,244 3396 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 3,274,130 3397 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 15,000 3398 SPECIAL CATEGORIES ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION FOR COUNTY JUDGES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 75,000 3399 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 443,000 3400 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 111,060 3401 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 35,382 3402 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 140,590 TOTAL: COURT OPERATIONS - COUNTY COURTS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 138,662,176 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 7,637,742 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 738.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 146,299,918 PROGRAM: JUDICIAL QUALIFICATIONS COMMISSION JUDICIAL QUALIFICATIONS COMMISSION OPERATIONS APPROVED SALARY RATE 486,189 3403 SALARIES AND BENEFITS POSITIONS 5.00 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 711,653 3404 EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 123,761 3405 OPERATING CAPITAL OUTLAY FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 1,638 3406 SPECIAL CATEGORIES CONTRACTED SERVICES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 132,850 3407 SPECIAL CATEGORIES RISK MANAGEMENT INSURANCE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 915 3408 SPECIAL CATEGORIES LITIGATION EXPENSES FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 231,294 Funds in Specific Appropriation 3408 are to be used only for expenditures associated with investigative panel hearings and for the filing and prosecution of formal charges. These costs shall consist of attorney's fees; court reporting fees; investigators' fees; travel for attorneys, witnesses, and court reporters; and similar charges associated with the investigative hearing or adjudicatory process. 3409 SPECIAL CATEGORIES TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES SERVICES PURCHASED PER STATEWIDE CONTRACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . 943 TOTAL: JUDICIAL QUALIFICATIONS COMMISSION OPERATIONS FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 1,203,054 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 5.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 1,203,054 TOTAL: STATE COURT SYSTEM FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 700,074,239 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 127,388,385 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4,795.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 827,462,624 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 471,983,310 TOTAL OF SECTION 7 FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 700,074,239 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 127,388,385 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 4,795.00 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 827,462,624 SECTION 8 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 8. EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS - FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 This section provides instructions for implementing the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 salary and benefit adjustments provided in this act. All allocations, distributions, and uses of these funds are to be made in strict accordance with the provisions of this act and chapter 216, Florida Statutes. Unless otherwise specified in this section, references to an "eligible" employee refer to an employee who is, at a minimum, meeting his or her required performance standards, if applicable. If an ineligible employee achieves performance standards subsequent to the salary implementation date, but on or before the end of the fiscal year, the employee may receive the increase; however, the increase shall be effective on the date the employee becomes eligible but not retroactively. In addition, any salary increase or bonus provided under this section shall be pro-rated based on the full-time equivalency of the employee's position. Employees classified as other personal services employees are not eligible for an increase. It is the intent of the Legislature that the minimum and maximums for each pay grade and pay band be adjusted upward commensurate with the increases provided in subsection (1) and (2). In addition, the Legislature intends that all eligible employees receive the increases specified in this section, even if the implementation of such increases results in an employee's salary exceeding the adjusted pay grade maximum. (1) EMPLOYEE AND OFFICER COMPENSATION (a) Officer Compensation Effective July 1, 2026, the elected officers, members of commissions, and designated employees shall be paid at the annual rate listed below; however, these salaries may be reduced on a voluntary basis. Funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 to increase the annual base rate of pay over the June 30, 2026, base rate of pay for the elected officers, members of commissions, and designated employees as provided in the following table. Governor.................................................. 141,400 Lieutenant Governor....................................... 135,516 Chief Financial Officer................................... 139,988 Attorney General.......................................... 139,988 Commissioner of Agriculture............................... 139,988 Supreme Court Justice..................................... 272,060 Judges - District Courts of Appeal........................ 230,018 Judges - Circuit Courts................................... 206,861 Judges - County Courts.................................... 195,448 Judges - Compensation Claims.............................. 186,124 State Attorneys........................................... 230,018 Public Defenders.......................................... 230,018 Commissioner - Public Service Commission.................. 162,837 Commissioner - Florida Gaming Control Commission.......... 162,837 Chair - Public Employees Relations Commission............. 120,602 Commissioner - Public Employees Relations Commission...... 57,176 Chair - Commission on Offender Review..................... 153,391 Commissioner - Commission on Offender Review.............. 142,029 Criminal Conflict and Civil Regional Counsels............. 148,044 None of the officers, commission members, or employees whose salaries have been fixed in this section shall receive any supplemental salary or benefits from any county or municipality. (b) Employee Compensation Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 to increase each eligible employee's June 30, 2026, base rate of pay by the greater of 3.0 percent or $1,000 to provide a competitive pay adjustment. This pay adjustment shall apply to each eligible employee in the Career Service, the Selected Exempt Service, the Senior Management Service, the lottery pay plan, the judicial branch pay plan, the legislative pay plan, the pay plans administered by the Justice Administration Commission, a military employee of the Florida National Guard on full-time military duty, and a non-career service employee of the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind. (2) SPECIAL PAY ISSUES (a) State Law Enforcement Officers Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 to grant a special pay adjustment for eligible employees who are sworn law enforcement officers. Each eligible sworn law enforcement officer shall receive a pay adjustment to their June 30, 2026, base rate of pay, in addition to the competitive pay adjustment provided in paragraph (1)(b), of 2.0 percent (5.0 percent total). For the purposes of this subsection, the term "sworn law enforcement officer" means (1) each unit employee in the law enforcement collective bargaining unit, special agent collective bargaining unit, and Florida Highway Patrol collective bargaining unit; and (2) each non-unit employee in one of the following position classifications certified as a law enforcement officer pursuant to section 943.13, Florida Statutes: Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522); and Law Enforcement Captain (8632) Department of Business and Professional Regulation Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522); and Law Enforcement Captain (8632) Department of Environmental Protection Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522); and Law Enforcement Captain (8632) Department of Financial Services Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522); and Law Enforcement Captain (8632) Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles Florida Highway Patrol Lieutenant (8042); Florida Highway Patrol Captain (8038); and Law Enforcement Captain (8632) Department of Law Enforcement Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522); Law Enforcement Captain (8525); Special Agent Supervisor (8584); and Inspector-FDLE (8590) Department of Legal Affairs Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522); Law Enforcement Captain (8525); and Law Enforcement Captain (8632) Department of Lottery Special Agent Supervisor (1126); and Special Agent II (2608) Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522); and Law Enforcement Captain (8525) Florida Gaming Control Commission Special Agent Supervisor (8584) Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind Law Enforcement Lieutenant (8522) Justice Administration Commission Investigator I (6661); Investigator II (6662); Investigator III (6663); and Investigator IV (6664) State Court System Chief Deputy Marshal-Supreme Court (1500); Deputy Marshal-Supreme Court (1505); Deputy Marshal-District Court (1506); Deputy Marshal Supervisor Supreme Court (1510); and Deputy Marshal Supervisor District Court (1515) (b) State Security Service Employees (Correctional Officers) Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 to grant a special pay adjustment for eligible employees who are state security service employees. Each eligible state security service employee shall receive a pay adjustment to their June 30, 2026, base rate of pay, in addition to the competitive pay adjustment provided in paragraph (1)(b), of 2.0 percent (5.0 percent total). For the purposes of this subsection, the term "state security service employee" means each unit employee in the Security Services collective bargaining unit. (c) State Fire Service Employees Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 to grant a special pay adjustment for eligible employees who are state fire service employees. Each eligible state fire service employee shall receive a pay adjustment to their June 30, 2026, base rate of pay, in addition to the competitive pay adjustment provided in paragraph (1)(b), of 2.0 percent (5.0 percent total). For the purposes of this subsection, the term "state fire service employee" means (1) each unit employee in the Florida State Fire Service Association collective bargaining unit; and (2) each non-unit employee in one of the following position classifications: Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Forest Area Supervisor (7622); Forestry Operations Administrator (7634); Forestry District Manager-DACS (7635); Forestry Program Administrator (7636); Forestry Center Manager-DACS (7637); Assistant Chief-Forestry (7638); Deputy Chief of Forestry (7639); Assistant Director of Forestry (7820); Chief of Forest Protection (7839); Chief of Field Operations (7860); and Director of Forestry (9620) Department of Children and Families Fire Chief (6414) Department of Financial Services Fire College Academic Instructor (4135); Chief of Fire Prevention (7665); Assistant Director of State Fire Marshall (7779); Chief of Firefighter Stand and Training (7965); Asst Supt of Fire Fighter Stds and Training (8328); Fire Protection Specialist Supervisor-SES (8805); and Director of State Fire Marshall (9778) Department of Military Affairs Forest Area Supervisor (7622); and Forestry Program Administrator (7636) (d) Department of Environmental Protection - Park Rangers Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 to grant a special pay adjustment for eligible employees in the position classification Park Ranger (6612), in addition to the competitive pay adjustment provided in paragraph (1)(b), of 2.0 percent (5.0 percent total) or the increase necessary to attain the minimum annual base rate of pay of $40,000, whichever is greater. (e) Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 in the amount of $2,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to grant special pay adjustments, in addition to any other pay adjustment provided in this section, to the base rate of pay of eligible employees to address employee recruitment and retention. (f) Department of Financial Services Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 in the amount of $1,500,000 from trust funds to the Department of Financial Services to grant special pay adjustments, in addition to any other pay adjustment provided in this section, to the base rate of pay of eligible employees to address employee recruitment and retention. (g) Department of Legal Affairs Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153 in the amount of $800,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Legal Affairs to grant special pay adjustments, in addition to any other pay adjustment provided in this section, to the base rate of pay of eligible employees to address employee recruitment and retention. (h) Commission on Offender Review Effective July 1, 2026, funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 783, to grant special pay adjustments, in addition to the competitive pay adjustment provided in paragraph (1)(b), to eligible employees to address compression and employee recruitment and retention as proposed in the commission's legislative budget request. (Issue Codes 4005A20 and 4005A30) (3) BENEFITS: HEALTH, LIFE, AND DISABILITY INSURANCE (a) State Life Insurance and State Disability Insurance Funds are provided in each agency's budget to continue paying the state share of the current State Life Insurance Program and the State Disability Insurance Program premiums. (b) State Health Insurance Administrative Health Insurance Assessment Funds are provided in each agency's budget to pay an administrative health insurance assessment equal to the employer's cost of single employee health care coverage for each vacant position eligible for coverage through the Division of State Group Insurance. (c) State Health Insurance Plans and Benefits 1. For the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, the Department of Management Services shall continue within the State Group Insurance Program State Group Health Insurance Standard Plans, State Group Health Insurance High Deductible Plans, State Group Health Maintenance Organization Standard Plans, and State Group Health Maintenance Organization High Deductible Plans. 2. For the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, the benefits provided under each of the plans shall be those benefits as provided in the current State Employees' PPO Plan Group Health Insurance Plan Booklet and Benefit Document, and current Health Maintenance Organization contracts and benefit documents, including any revisions to such health benefits approved by the Legislature. 3. Beginning January 1, 2027, for the 2027 plan year, each plan shall continue the benefits for occupational therapy authorized for the 2026 plan year. 4. Effective July 1, 2026, the state health insurance plans, as defined in subsection (3)(c), shall limit plan participant cost sharing (deductibles, coinsurance, and copayments) for covered in-network medical services, the amount of which shall not exceed the annual cost sharing limitations for individual coverage or for family coverage as provided by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to the provisions of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010 and the Internal Revenue Code. Medical and prescription drug cost sharing amounts incurred by a plan participant for covered in-network service shall be aggregated to record the participant's total amount of plan cost sharing limitations. The plan shall pay 100 percent of covered in-network services for a plan participant during the applicable calendar year once the federal cost share limitations are reached. 5. Effective July 1, 2026, a participant has the option to receive a covered immunization from a participating provider pursuant to a participant's current State Employees' PPO Plan Group Health Insurance Plan Booklet and Benefit Document, a participating provider pursuant to a participant's current Health Maintenance Organization contract and benefits document, or a participating pharmacy in the State Employees' pharmacy benefit manager's network. 6. Effective January 1, 2027, the Division of State Group Insurance shall continue to allow service delivery through telehealth in its health benefits contracts. 7. The high deductible health plans shall continue to include an integrated Health Savings Account (HSA). Such plans and accounts shall be administered in accordance with the requirements and limitations of federal provisions related to the Medicare Prescription Drug Improvement and Modernization Act of 2003. The state shall make a monthly contribution to the employee's health savings account, as authorized in section 110.123(12), Florida Statutes, of $41.66 for employees with individual coverage and $83.33 for employees with family coverage. 8.a. The Department of Management Services shall continue the pilot program within the PPO plan and the HMO plans to provide coverage for the treatment and management of obesity and related conditions during the 2027 plan year. b. For the pilot program, the department shall contract with a third party provider through a competitive solicitation to establish the third-party solution to treat, reduce, and prevent obesity and obesity-related conditions in the State Group Insurance program population. The third party provider must demonstrate a unique competency to focus on member wellness and the capacity to educate State Group Insurance Participants regarding healthy lifestyle and habit changing decisions to improve the overall health of the participant. Specific education around the efficacy and potential impacts of glucagon-like peptide 1 agonists (GLP1) is required, along with education regarding tapering or continued use of these medications. c. The participation in the pilot program will be limited to 2,000 members. The department shall establish criteria, which shall include, but not be limited to: i. Members of the PPO plan or HMO plan during the 2026 and 2027 plan year; ii. Members 18 years of age or older; iii. Consent to provide personal and medical information to the department; and iv. Referral and supervision of a physician participating in the PPO and HMO networks during the 2026 and 2027 plan year. By January 15, 2027, the Department of Management Services will report to the Legislature the number of individuals who applied to participate in the pilot program and the number of participants who enrolled in the pilot program. d. Members participating in the pilot program will be responsible for all applicable copayments, coinsurance, deductibles, and other out-of-pocket expenses that would be incurred if the pilot program services were provided by the PPO plan or self-insured HMO plans. The pilot program will provide coverage for all Federal Drug Administration approved medications for chronic weight management for patients. e. Compensation under the contract shall be paid from the State Employees Health Insurance Trust Fund. The third-party provider shall be compensated based solely on a per-enrollee fee which in the aggregate may not exceed $3.0 million for Plan Year 2027. f. In the event the Department of Management Services does not execute a contract with a third party provider by September 30, 2026, the department shall continue the pilot program within the PPO and the HMO plans to provide coverage for the treatment and management of obesity and related conditions during the 2027 plan year. 9.a. Effective with the 2027 plan year, the Department of Management Services shall continue the Diabetes Pilot Program within the PPO and the self-insured HMO plans. b. The pilot program will be limited to 2,000 participants. Participants must be members of the PPO plan or a self-insured HMO plan during the 2027 plan year. c. The department shall establish criteria for the diabetes pilot program that includes offering participants: i. A cellular meter that provides real time feedback for glucose readings; ii. Testing strips and related supplies for enrolled members; iii. Continuous remote monitoring with emergency outreach; and iv. Live coaching from certified diabetes educators. The pilot program shall measure meaningful clinical outcomes for the enrollees including a reduction in HbA1c and hypoglycemia levels. By January 15, 2027, the department shall report to the Legislature the number of individuals who applied to participate in the diabetes pilot program and the number of participants who enrolled in the pilot program, and the costs associated with the pilot program. 10. Effective January 1, 2027, a participant shall continue to have the option to receive coordination of cancer care support from the entity the Department of Management Services contracts with pursuant to section 110.12303(2)(a), Florida Statutes. (d) State Group Health Insurance Premiums for the Period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Funds are provided in Specific Appropriation 2153, and each state agency, state university's, and state college's budget to pay the state share of the State Group Health Insurance premiums for the fiscal year. The agencies shall pay the specified premiums on behalf of employees who have enhanced benefits, including those employees participating in the Spouse Program in accordance with section 60P-2.0036, Florida Administrative Code, and those employees filling positions with "agency pay-all" benefits. 1. For the coverage period beginning August 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026, the state share of the State Group Health Insurance premiums per month for the executive, legislative, and judicial branch agencies shall be as follows: a. Standard Plan or High Deductible Plan - Individual - $925.35 b. Standard Plan or High Deductible Plan - Family - $2,015.48 c. Standard Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Individual - $967.01 d. Standard Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Family - $2,165.48 e. Standard Plan for each employee participating in the Spouse Program - Family - $1,082.74 f. High Deductible Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Individual - $928.86 g. High Deductible Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Family - $2,039.37 h. High Deductible Plan for each employee participating in the Spouse Program - Family - $1,019.70 2. For the coverage period beginning January 1, 2027, the state share of the State Group Health Insurance premiums per month for the executive, legislative, and judicial branch agencies shall be as follows: a. Standard Plan or High Deductible Plan - Individual - $1,022.90 b. Standard Plan or High Deductible Plan - Family - $2,235.04 c. Standard Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Individual - $1,064.56 d. Standard Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Family - $2,385.04 e. Standard Plan for each employee participating in the Spouse Program - Family - $1,192.52 f. High Deductible Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Individual - $1,029.56 g. High Deductible Plan for an employee with enhanced benefits, excluding the Spouse Program - Family - $2,269.34 h. High Deductible Plan for each employee participating in the Spouse Program - Family - $1,134.67 3. For the coverage period beginning August 1, 2026, the employee share of the State Group Health Insurance premiums per month shall be as follows: a. Standard Plan - Individual - $50.00 b. Standard Plan - Family - $180.00 c. High Deductible Plan - Individual - $15.00 d. High Deductible Plan - Family - $64.30 e. Standard Plan or High Deductible Plan for an employee filling a position with "agency payall" benefits - Individual - $8.34 f. Standard Plan or High Deductible Plan for an employee filling a position with "agency payall" benefits - Family - $30.00 g. Standard Plan or High Deductible Plan for each employee participating in the Spouse Program - $15.00 4. For the coverage period beginning August 1, 2026, the monthly premium for a Medicare participant participating in the State Group Health Insurance program shall be as follows: a. Standard Plan - One Eligible - $430.18 b. Standard Plan - One Under/One Over - $1,243.63 c. Standard Plan - Both Eligible - $860.35 d. High Deductible Plan - One Eligible - $324.26 e. High Deductible Plan - One Under/One Over - $1,061.06 f. High Deductible Plan - Both Eligible - $648.52 5. The monthly premium for a Medicare participant enrolled in a Health Maintenance Organization Standard Plan or High Deductible Health Plan or a Medicare Advantage Plan shall be equal to the negotiated monthly premium for the selected state-contracted Health Maintenance Organization or selected state-contracted plan. 6. For the coverage period beginning August 1, 2026, the monthly premium for an "early retiree" participating in the State Group Health Insurance program shall be as follows: a. Standard Plan - Individual - $813.46 b. Standard Plan - Family - $1,831.08 a. High Deductible Plan - Individual - $736.80 b. High Deductible Plan - Family - $1,632.05 7. For the coverage period beginning August 1, 2026, a COBRA participant participating in the State Group Health Insurance program shall continue to pay a premium equal to 102 percent of the total premium charged (state and employee contributions) for an active employee participating in the same plan option. (e) The State Employees' Prescription Drug Program shall be governed by the provisions of section 110.12315, Florida Statutes. Under the State Employees' Prescription Drug Program, the following shall apply: 1. Effective July 1, 2026, for the purpose of encouraging an individual to change from brand name drugs to generic drugs, the department may continue to waive co-payments for a six month supply of a generic statin or a generic proton pump inhibitor. 2. The State Employees' Prescription Drug Program shall provide coverage for smoking cessation prescription drugs; however, members shall be responsible for appropriate co-payments and deductibles when applicable. (4) OTHER BENEFITS (a) The following items shall be implemented in accordance with the provisions of this act and with the applicable negotiated collective bargaining agreement: 1. The state shall provide up to six (6) credit hours of tuition-free courses per term at a state university or Florida College System institution to full-time employees on a space available basis as authorized by law. 2. The state shall continue to reimburse, at current levels, for replacement of personal property. 3. Each agency, at the discretion of the agency head, may expend funds provided in this act for bar dues and for legal education courses for employees who are required to be a member of the Florida Bar as a condition of employment. 4. The state shall continue to provide, at current levels, clothing allowances and uniform maintenance and shoe allowances. (b) All state branches, departments, and agencies which have established or approved personnel policies for the payment of accumulated and unused annual leave, shall not provide payment which exceeds a maximum of 480 hours of actual payment to each employee for accumulated and unused annual leave. (c) Upon termination of employees in the Senior Management Service, Selected Exempt Service, or positions with comparable benefits, payments for unused annual leave credits accrued on the member's last anniversary date shall be prorated at 1/12th of the last annual amount credited for each month, or portion thereof, worked subsequent to the member's last anniversary date. (5) PAY ADDITIVES AND OTHER INCENTIVE PROGRAMS The following pay additives and other incentive programs are authorized for the 2026-2027 fiscal year from existing agency resources consistent with provisions of sections 110.2035 and 216.251, Florida Statutes, the applicable rules adopted by the Department of Management Services and negotiated collective bargaining agreements. (a) Each agency is authorized to continue to pay, at the levels in effect on June 30, 2007, on-call fees and shift differentials as necessary to perform normal operations of the agency. (b) Each agency that had a training program in existence on June 30, 2006, which included granting pay additives to participating employees, is authorized to continue such training program for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Such additives shall be granted under the provisions of the law administrative rules, and collective bargaining agreements. (c) Each agency is authorized to continue to grant temporary special duties pay additives to employees assigned additional duties as a result of another employee being absent from work pursuant to the Family Medical Leave Act or authorized military leave. The notification process described in section 110.2035(7)(d), Florida Statutes, does not apply to additives authorized in this paragraph. (d) Each agency is authorized to grant merit pay increases based on the employee's exemplary performance as evidenced by a performance evaluation conducted pursuant to chapter 60L-35, Florida Administrative Code, or a similar performance evaluation applicable to other pay plans. The Chief Justice may exempt judicial branch employees from the performance evaluation requirements of this paragraph. (e) Contingent upon the availability of funds and at the agency head's discretion, each agency is authorized to continue to grant temporary special duties pay additives, of up to 15 percent of the employee's base rate of pay, to each employee temporarily deployed to a facility or area closed due to emergency conditions from another area of the state that is not closed. (f) The Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission may continue to grant temporary special duty pay additives to law enforcement officers who perform additional duties as K-9 handlers, regional recruiters/media coordinators, and breath test operators/inspectors, and may grant temporary special duty pay additives to law enforcement officers who perform additional duties as offshore patrol vessel crew members, special operations group members, and long-term covert investigations. (g) The Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission is authorized to grant critical market pay additives to employees residing in and assigned to Lee County, Collier County, Monroe County, Broward County, or Miami-Dade County, at the levels that the employing agency granted salary increases for similar purposes prior to July 1, 2006. These pay additives shall be granted only during the time in which the employee resides in, and is assigned duties within, these counties. In no instance may the employee receive an adjustment to the employee's base rate of pay and a critical market pay additive based on the employee residing in and being assigned in the specified counties. (h) The Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission is authorized to grant an annual housing allowance of $5,000 to sworn law enforcement officers residing in and assigned to Lee County, Collier County, Monroe County, Broward County, or Miami-Dade County. This allowance shall be granted only during the time in which the employee resides in, and is assigned duties within, these counties. (i) The Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission may provide a duty officer shift differential pay additive of 10 percent and a midnight shift differential of 15 percent to duty officers who are assigned to work those respective shifts. (j) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is authorized to grant critical market pay additives to sworn law enforcement officers residing in and assigned to: 1. Lee County, Collier County, or Monroe County, at the levels that the employing agency granted salary increases for similar purposes prior to July 1, 2006; 2. Hillsborough, Orange, Pinellas, Duval, Marion, and Escambia counties at $5,000, or, in lieu thereof, an equivalent salary adjustment that was made during Fiscal Year 2015-2016; 3. Alachua, Baker, Brevard, Clay, Charlotte, Flagler, Indian River, Manatee, Martin, Nassau, Osceola, Pasco, Sarasota, Santa Rosa, Seminole, St. Johns, St. Lucie, and Volusia counties at $5,000. These critical market pay additives and equivalent salary adjustments may be granted only during the time in which the employee resides in, and is assigned to duties within, those counties. In no instance may the employee receive an adjustment to the employee's base rate of pay and a critical market pay additive based on the employee residing in and being assigned in the specified counties. (k) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may grant special duties pay additives of $2,000 for law enforcement officers who perform additional duties as K-9 handlers; felony officers; criminal interdiction officers; criminal investigation and intelligence officers; new recruit background checks and training, and technical support officers; drug recognition experts; hazardous material squad members; compliance investigation squad members; motorcycle squad members; Quick Response Force Team; Honor Guard; or Florida Advanced Investigation and Reconstruction Teams. (l) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may provide a critical market pay additive of $1,300 to non-sworn Florida Highway Patrol personnel working and residing in Miami-Dade and Broward counties for class codes 0108, 2236, 6466, 0162, 0045, 3142, and 0004. These critical market pay additives shall be granted only during the time in which the employee resides in, and is assigned to duties within, these counties. (m) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is authorized to grant a critical market pay additive of $5,000 per year to non-sworn Florida Highway Patrol personnel for class codes 8407, 8410, 8417, and 8513 working and residing in the following counties: Duval, Nassau, Baker, Clay, St. Johns, Hillsborough, Polk, Pinellas, Manatee, Pasco, Lee, Charlotte, Glades, Hendry, Collier, Miami-Dade, Monroe, Palm Beach, Martin, Broward, Seminole, Orange, Lake, Osceola, and Brevard. This additive shall be granted only during the time in which the employee resides in and is assigned to duties within. (n) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is authorized to grant a critical market pay additive of $5,000 per year to Motorist Services personnel for class codes 9000 and 9002 working and residing in Miami-Dade and Broward counties. This additive shall be granted only during the time in which the employee resides in and is assigned to duties within those counties. In addition, Motorist Services personnel for class code 9018 with the working class title of Community Outreach Specialist shall also receive a $5,000 critical market pay additive per year. (o) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is authorized to continue to grant a pay additive of $162.50 per pay period for law enforcement officers assigned to the Office of Motor Carrier Compliance who maintain certification by the Commercial Vehicle Safety Alliance. (p) The Department of Transportation is authorized to continue its training program for employees in the areas of transportation engineering, right-of-way acquisition, relocation benefits administration, right-of-way property management, real estate appraisal, and business valuation under the same guidelines established for the training program prior to June 30, 2006. (q) The Department of Transportation is authorized to develop and implement a training program for employees in bridge inspection, roadway technicians, transportation project manager professionals, and work program specializations. The training program shall culminate in professional licensure, or professional or departmental certification. (r) The Department of Transportation is authorized to grant a pay additive of $2.00 per hour for incident management services performed for critical coverage areas on the state highway system during nonstandard work hours, including nights and weekends. (s) The Department of Corrections may continue to grant hazardous duty pay additives, as necessary, for those employees assigned to the Department of Corrections institutions' Rapid Response Teams (including the baton, shotgun, and chemical agent teams) and the Correctional Emergency Response Teams. (t) The Department of Corrections may continue to grant a temporary special duties pay additive of up to 10 percent of the employee's base rate of pay for each certified correctional officer (class code 8003); certified correctional officer sergeant (class code 8005); certified correctional officer lieutenant (class code 8011), and certified correctional officer captain (class code 8013). For purposes of determining eligibility for this special pay additive, the term "certified" means the employee has obtained a correctional mental health certification as provided through the department. To be certified, a correctional officer must: (a) initially complete 5 courses consisting of a total of 54 hours of instruction taught by a department instructor with a correctional officer behavioral mental health certification through the American Correctional Association; (b) upon completing that instruction, satisfactorily pass a department examination; and (c) twice each year satisfactorily complete 16 additional hours of training and an examination, including in the year the correctional officer satisfies (a) and (b). The courses and training must educate correctional officers in identifying symptoms of mental illness in prisoners while helping to foster a safer environment for inmates with mental illness. Such additive may be awarded only during the time the certified officer is employed in an assigned mental health unit post. (u) The Department of Corrections may continue to grant a one-time $1,000 hiring bonus to newly-hired correctional officers (class code 8003) who are hired to fill positions at a correctional institution that had a vacancy rate for such positions of more than 10 percent for the preceding calendar quarter. The bonus may not be awarded before the officer obtains his or her correctional officer certification. Current employees and former employees who have had a break in service with the Department of Corrections of 31 days or less are not eligible for this bonus. (v) The Department of Corrections may grant a one-time $1,000 hiring bonus to newly hired teachers and instructors (class codes 1313, 1315, 4133, 8085, 8093, 9095) at a correctional institution. Current employees and former employees who have had a break in service with the Department of Corrections of 31 days or less are not eligible for this bonus. (w) The Department of Corrections may continue to grant a one-time $5,000 hiring and retention bonus for correctional officers at 15 targeted high vacancy correctional facilities. Current employees and former employees who have had a break in service with the Department of Corrections of 31 days or less are not eligible for this bonus. (x) The Department of Children and Families may grant a temporary special duties pay additive of five percent of the employee's base rate of pay to: 1. All employees in the Human Services Worker I, Human Services Worker II, and Unit Treatment and Rehabilitation Specialist classes who work within the 13-1E, 13-1W, 32N, or 32S living areas at the Northeast Florida State Hospital. Such additive may be awarded only during the time the employees work within those living areas at the Northeast Florida State Hospital. 2. All employees in the Human Services Worker I, Human Services Worker II, and Unit Treatment and Rehabilitation Specialist classes who work within the Specialty Care Unit or Medical Services Unit at the Florida State Hospital. Such additive may be awarded only during the time those employees work within the Specialty Care Unit or Medical Services Unit at the Florida State Hospital. 3. All employees in Child Protective Investigator and Senior Child Protective Investigator classes who work in a weekend unit. Such additive may be awarded only during the time such employees work in a weekend unit. 4. All Adult Registry Counselors who work in a weekend unit at the Abuse Hotline. Such additive may be awarded only during the time such employees work in a weekend unit. (y) The Department of Lottery is authorized to provide a critical market pay (CMP) additive of $1,300 to Lottery personnel working in the following district offices: Hillsborough, Lee, Palm Beach and Miami-Dade. These critical market pay additives shall be granted only during the time the employee resides in, and is assigned duties within those areas. (z) The Department of Financial Services may grant temporary special duty pay additives of $2,000 for law enforcement officers who perform additional duties as K-9 handlers. (aa) The Department of Revenue may provide a critical market pay increase of up to $5,200 to audit personnel in class codes 1512, 1513, 1525, 1619, 1705, 1707, 1709, and 2125. Current employees and former employees who have had a break in service with the Department of Revenue of 31 days or fewer are not eligible for this increase. (ab) The State Attorney's offices in judicial circuits 6, 11, 13, 15, 16, 17, 19, and 20 may continue to grant competitive area differential special pay adjustments for assistant state attorneys, investigators, and support staff as authorized in sec 8 chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida. (ac) The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may grant temporary special duty pay additives of up to $2,000 for law enforcement officers who perform additional duties as K-9 handlers. (ad) The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is authorized to grant critical market pay additives to sworn law enforcement officers residing in and assigned to the following counties: Lee, Collier, Monroe, Hillsborough, Orange, Pinellas, Duval, Marion, Escambia, Alachua, Baker, Brevard, Clay, Charlotte, Flagler, Indian River, Manatee, Martin, Nassau, Osceola, Pasco, Sarasota, Santa Rosa, Seminole, St. Johns, St. Lucie, and Volusia at $5,000. These critical market pay additives and equivalent salary adjustments may be granted only during the time in which the employee resides in, and is assigned to duties within, those counties. In no instance may the employee receive an adjustment to the employee's base rate of pay and a critical market pay additive based on the employee residing in and being assigned in the specified counties. (6) COLLECTIVE BARGAINING All collective bargaining issues at impasse relating to mandatory subjects of collective bargaining shall be resolved by the Legislature. SECTION 9 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 9. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $9,332,958 in nonrecurring funds from the School District and Community College Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund to community colleges and school districts pursuant to section 9, Article XII, of the State Constitution. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 10 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 10. Pursuant to sections 1010.62 and section 1013.171, Florida Statutes, and section 11(d) and (f), Article VII of the Florida Constitution, the following fixed capital outlay projects may be constructed, acquired, and financed by a university or university direct support organization. Financing mechanisms include any form of approved debt or bonds authorized by the Board of Governors. No state appropriation of funds will be associated with these projects. The Legislature has provided the Board of Governors general authority to consider debt financing for most classes of projects. However, certain athletic and commercial facilities require specific Legislative authorization as a prerequisite condition for these projects. Legislative authorization does not supersede any of the requirements for Board of Governors review and approval of all projects to be financed from debt, unless the project as proposed meets an exception in the Board of Governors Debt Management Guidelines or Public-Private Partnership Guidelines. Florida Atlantic University - Indoor Basketball Practice Facility Phase 1. Florida Polytechnic University - Campus Expansion Land Acquisition. Florida State University - Healthcare Facilities; Athletic Facilities; and Academic and/or Athletic Hotel Convention Center. University of Florida - Ben Hill Griffin Stadium Renovation; and Recreation Sport Complex Eastside. University of South Florida - Fletcher District Project. University of West Florida - Stadium. SECTION 11 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 11. A university board of trustees may expend available reserves or carryforward balances from previous years' operational and programmatic appropriations for deferred maintenance needs at the Donald L. Tucker Civic Center. SECTION 12 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 12. A university board of trustees may expend available reserves or carryforward balances from previous years' operational and programmatic appropriations for operational and maintenance and capital needs relative to FSU Health. SECTION 13 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 13. Florida State University may expend available reserves or carryforward balances from previous years' operational and programmatic appropriations for land acquisitions. Land purchased under this provision may subsequently be used in support of any element of an updated campus master plan. SECTION 14 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 14. A university may expend available appropriations or carryforward balances from previous years' operational and programmatic appropriations in support of fixed capital outlay projects at National Research Laboratories. SECTION 15 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 15. The Board of Trustees of State Universities may expend available reserves or carryforward balances from previous years' operational and programmatic appropriations for the construction, maintenance and capital needs relative to Title IX facilities. SECTION 16 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 16. A university board of trustees may expend available reserves or carryforward balances from previous years' operational and programmatic appropriations for operational and maintenance and capital needs relative to the Florida Flood Hub for Applied Research and Innovation at the University of South Florida. SECTION 17 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 17. Pursuant to section 1013.40, Florida Statutes, the specified Florida College System institutions are authorized to acquire or construct the following facilities from non-PECO sources, which could require general revenue funds for operation and maintenance. If existing facilities are part of these projects, each such building or site must be certified to be free of asbestos or other hazardous materials before the stated college may acquire or expend construction funds on the facility. If the property to be acquired is not adjacent to an existing approved center or campus, then all necessary approvals from the State Board of Education must be received before any funds may be expended to acquire the property. College of Central Florida Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking, from local funds at the State Board of Education approved campuses, centers, and special purpose centers. Daytona State College - Acquire land and facilities and construct, remodel, or renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking for the State Board of Education approved Main Daytona Beach Campus, Advanced Technology College, Flagler/Palm Coast Campus, DeLand (West) Campus, Deltona Campus, and New Smyrna Beach-Edgewater (South) Campus using local funds. Florida SouthWestern State College - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking, from local funds at the State Board of Education approved campuses, centers, and special purpose centers. The College of the Florida Keys - Construct a Workforce Training Center at the Big Pine Key site to support the Commercial Driver's License Program and the Institute for Public Safety, using local funds. The facility will not exceed 5,000 square feet and will include a multipurpose vehicle operation training track. The College of the Florida Keys - Construct legislatively approved student housing to include 240 student beds and a minimum of 25 beds for employees, educators and first responders on the Key West Campus using local funds. The College of the Florida Keys - Construct a Workforce Training Center at the Big Pine Key site to support the Commercial Driver's License Program and the Institute for Public Safety, using local funds. The facility will include a multipurpose vehicle operation training track. Indian River State College - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking using local funds for the State Board of Education approved Massey (Ft. Pierce) Campus, Chastain (Stuart) Center, Mueller (Vero Beach) Special Purpose Center, Pruitt (Port St. Lucie) Center, Marine Science Special Purpose Center, Human Development & Resources Special Purpose Center, and the Dixon Hendry (Okeechobee) Center. Florida Gateway College Acquire land/facilities for future expansion of our health care programs, and remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking, using local funds, and subject to State/Board of Education approval. Lake-Sumter State College - Acquire land/facilities for anticipated enrollment and population growth and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, meeting rooms, student support space, and parking using local funds, private-public partnership funding, and/or capital improvement fees for State Board of Education approved Leesburg Campus, South Lake (Clermont) Campus, and Sumter Center. Lake-Sumter State College - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, and student support space, from local funds, private-public partnership funding, and/or capital improvement fees, for future growth and development of a new campus or special purpose center in Lake or Sumter counties, subject to the State Board of Education approval. State College of Florida, Manatee-Sarasota - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking, from local funds at the State Board of Education approved campuses, centers, and special purposes centers. Miami Dade College - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities of classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking for the State Board of Education approved North Campus, Kendall Campus, Wolfson Campus, Medical Campus, Homestead Campus, Padron Campus, Hialeah Campus, West Campus, and Entrepreneurial Education Center. Miami Dade College - Acquire land/facilities for future growth and development of a new campus/center in Miami-Dade County and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking from local funds, subject to State Board of Education approval. Northwest Florida State College - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking, from local funds at the State Board of Education approved campuses, centers, and special purpose centers. Pasco-Hernando State College - Construct, remodel, renovate for a nursing simulator which includes but not limited to ER Bay, triage, nurse station, ICU, maternity, radiography, medical technician lab, surgery suite, doctor office, approximately 8,950 square feet, using funds from public-private partnerships. The simulator will be located at the West Campus, New Port Richey. Pensacola State College - Construct a Soccer Field and Athletic Complex, approximately 25,000 square feet, from local funds at the State Board of Education approved Pensacola Campus. Pensacola State College - Construct Workforce Education Building, approximately 11,688 gross square feet, from local funds at the State Board of Education approved South Santa Rosa Center. Pensacola State College - Construct a Workforce Education Building (Diesel and Marine Mechanics), approximately 12,000 gross square feet, from local funds at the State Board of Education approved Milton Campus. Pensacola State College - Acquire adjacent land from local funds for future growth and development at the State Board of Education approved Main Pensacola campus. Polk State College - Acquire land/facilities and construct, remodel, or renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, utilities, and parking using local private-public partnership funding and/or capital improvement fees at the State Board of Education approved campuses, centers, and special purpose centers. St. Johns River State College - Construct classrooms, labs, offices, and support spaces, not to exceed 25,000 square feet, utilities, and parking, using local funds at the State Board of Education approved Palatka Campus. Santa Fe College - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, academic and student support spaces, utilities, and parking from local funds, grants, and/or capital improvement fees at the State Board of Education campuses, centers, and special purpose centers. Seminole State College of Florida - Acquire land and facilities and construct, remodel, or renovate facilities for classrooms; labs; offices; meeting rooms; instructional, student, and institutional support spaces; athletic areas; walkways; or parking, utilizing public-private partnership funding or other local funds at the State Board of Education approved Sanford/Lake Mary Campus, Altamonte Springs Campus, Oviedo Campus, Heathrow Special Purpose Center, and/or Geneva Special Purpose Center. Tallahassee State College - Project Name: TSC Applied Learning Center for Health & Hospitality, 24,000 square feet $30 million total cost for construction. Construct a new building on college-owned property on main campus for classrooms, labs, offices, and support space to fulfill existing program needs and for development of new academic programs. Valencia College - Acquire land/facilities and construct/remodel/renovate facilities for classrooms, labs, offices, support space, and parking, from local funds and/or capital improvement fees, at the college's State Board of Education approved campuses, centers, and special purpose centers. Valencia College - Acquire land/facilities, from local funds and/or capital improvement fees, for future growth and development of a new campus/center in Southwest Orange County, Downtown Orlando, Southeast Orange County, and/or Northeast Osceola County, subject to the State Board of Education approval. SECTION 18 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 18. Miami Dade College - From the unexpended balance of funds appropriated in Specific Appropriation 17 of Chapter 2023-239, Laws of Florida, for Miami Dade College Rem/Ren Classrooms, Labs, Support Services in Facilities 1,2,3,5,7,13 and Site (North) for $13,314,498, the unexpended balance shall revert immediately and be re-appropriated to Miami Dade College for Rem/Ren Classrooms, Labs, Support Services in Facilities 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 8, 13 and Site (North), to include remodeling and renovation in Building 8. SECTION 19 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 19. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the construction of a new elementary school in Gilchrist County in Specific Appropriation 19 of Chapter 2024-231 and Specific Appropriation 18 of Chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the Department of Education as Fixed Capital Outlay for Gilchrist County - Critical Infrastructure and Maintenance (SF 3029). This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 20 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 20. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $65,263,148 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for the declining enrollment supplement for school districts. In those school districts where there is a decline in unweighted public FTE students between 2024-2025 and 2025-2026, 14.5 percent of the decline in the unweighted public FTE students shall be multiplied by the 2025-2026 base amount for the Florida Education Finance Program per unweighted public FTE student. These funds shall be prorated to the amount appropriated in this section and shall be in addition to the funds provided in the FEFP. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 21 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 21. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for Glades County School District Operational Funding (SF 3706). Any unexpended balance of funds appropriated in this section remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 22 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 22. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $2,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for Union County School District Operational Funding (SF 3684). Any unexpended balance of funds appropriated in this section remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 23 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 23. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $42,178,224 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for the Education Enrollment Stabilization Program. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 24 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 24. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the replacement of Building 12 in section 39 of Chapter 2018-3, Laws of Florida, shall revert immediately and is appropriated to the department in Fixed Capital Outlay for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the design and construction of a memorial as authorized in section 38 of Chapter 2018-3, Laws of Florida. This section shall take effect upon becoming a law. SECTION 25 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 25. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the School Readiness Plus Program in section 20 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 26 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 26. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Early Childhood Music Education Program in Specific Appropriation 106 and section 21 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 27 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 27. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund to implement Phase II of the federal Child Care and Development Fund Supplemental Disaster Recovery Grant in section 22 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 28 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 28. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $10,428,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund to the Department of Education to implement Phase II of the federal Child Care and Development Fund Supplemental Disaster Recovery Grant addressing the impact of Hurricane Ian on child care in Florida. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 29 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 29. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $15,720,109 in nonrecurring funds from the Child Care and Development Block Grant Trust Fund (CCDF) to the Department of Education for the American Relief Act, 2025 (ARA) Supplemental CCDF Non-Disaster Discretionary grant funds awarded to the department on December 21, 2024, for child care. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 30 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 30. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Heroes in the Classroom Sign-on Bonus in section 23 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 31 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 31. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Florida Safe Schools Canine Program pursuant to section 1006.121, Florida Statutes, in Specific Appropriation 106 and section 24 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education to provide grants to schools pursuant to section 1006.121, Florida Statutes. Priority shall be given to districts in fiscally constrained counties as described in section 218.67(1), Florida Statutes. Any appropriated funds that have not been designated for fiscally constrained districts by December 15, 2026, may be awarded to other school districts who apply to participate in the program. SECTION 32 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 32. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Regional Literacy Teams in Specific Appropriation 106 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 33 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 33. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Federal Grants and Aids in Specific Appropriation 116 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 34 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 34. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Summer Bridge Program in Specific Appropriation 85 and section 34 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 35 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 35. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the development of courses in section 37 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 36 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 36. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the development of assessments in Specific Appropriation 138 and section 38 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 37 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 37. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 139 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the School Choice Online Portal shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 38 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 38. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 139 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the School Choice Web Applications and Database Update shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 39 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 39. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 139 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Centralization of Panic Alert Systems shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 40 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 40. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Open Educational Resources in Specific Appropriation 139 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 41 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 41. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education in Specific Appropriation 139 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Collaborate Plan Align Motivate Share (CPALMS) - district tools shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 42 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 42. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 139 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Feasibility Study for Modernization of Department Mainframe Application Systems and Processes shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 43 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 43. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 139 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Transparency Tool shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 44 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 44. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the cloud-based information sharing system in Specific Appropriation 140 and section 40 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 45 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 45. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the School Environmental Safety Incident Reporting System in Specific Appropriation 140 and section 41 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 46 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 46. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 144 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Risk Mitigation Program shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 47 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 47. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $200,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for the Council on the Social Status of Black Men and Boys within Florida Memorial University. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 48 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 48. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $2,108,554 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for the projected deficit in the Scholarship for Children and Spouses of Deceased or Disabled Veterans Program. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 49 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 49. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $21,973,391 in nonrecurring funds from the Educational Enhancement Trust Fund to the Department of Education for the deficit in the Bright Futures Scholarship Program. This section shall take effect upon becoming a law. SECTION 50 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 50. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 58B of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Open Door Grant Program, shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 51 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 51. From the funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in section 51 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Dual Enrollment Teacher Scholarship Program, $2,000,000 shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 52 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 52. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 124 and section 52 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Pathways to Career Opportunities Grants Program, shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 53 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 53. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 127 and section 54 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Graduation Alternative to Traditional Education (GATE) Program, shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 54 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 54. From the funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in section 56 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Teacher Apprenticeship Program and Mentor Bonus,$1,500,000 shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 55 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 55. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 131 and section 58 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Linking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) Fund, shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Florida Center for Nursing at the University of South Florida, for the same purpose. SECTION 56 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 56. The unexpended balance of General Revenue funds provided to the State University System for the Linking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) Fund in Specific Appropriation 146 of Chapter 2024-231, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to the Florida Center for Nursing at the University of South Florida, for the same purpose. SECTION 57 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 57.The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Education from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 123 and section 64 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Workforce Development Capitalization Incentive Grants Program, shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Department of Education for the same purpose. SECTION 58 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 58. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Division of Universities for the Moffitt Cancer Center in Specific Appropriation 145 of Chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Moffitt Cancer Center for the same purpose. SECTION 59 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 59. The unexpended balance of General Revenue funds appropriated to the Board of Governors for litigation expenses in Specific Appropriation 168 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated for the 2026-2027 Fiscal Year to the Board of Governors for the same purpose. SECTION 60 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 60. The unexpended balance of $4,389,203 from the General Revenue Fund appropriated in Specific Appropriation 59 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Benacquisto Scholarship Program shall revert immediately. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 61 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 61. The unexpended balance of $691,500 from the General Revenue Fund appropriated in Specific Appropriation 58 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Effective Access to Student Education tuition assistance grant program shall revert immediately. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 62 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 62. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $16,200,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Rehabilitation Trust Fund to the Department of Education to accommodate a projected increase in spending in the Purchased Client Services category. Any unexpended balance of funds appropriated in this section remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the same purpose for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 63 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 63. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration in section 75 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for value-based pediatric behavioral health services shall revert and is appropriated to the agency for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 64 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 64. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds provided to the Agency for Health Care Administration in Specific Appropriation 230 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for nursing home safety and satisfaction surveys shall revert and is appropriated to the agency for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 65 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 65. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $208,065,320 in nonrecurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund to the Agency for Health Care Administration for implementation of the Rural Health Transformation Program. The agency shall submit quarterly reports to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than 30 days after the reporting period. The agency must submit the first report by October 30, 2026. At a minimum, the reports must include: the number and listing of applications received, denied, and awarded; the status of expenditures and payments made to each awardee; and an accounting of administrative funds obligated and expended by the Program Management Office. In addition, the agency shall provide all quarterly and annual progress reports submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services within three business days after submission. Any unexpended balance of funds appropriated in this section remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated to the agency for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section shall take effect upon becoming law. SECTION 66 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 66. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Agency for Persons with Disabilities in Specific Appropriation 242 and section 80 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Home and Community Based Services Waiver shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 in the Lump Sum-Home and Community Based Services (HCBS) Waiver appropriation category. The agency is authorized to submit budget amendments requesting the release of funds pursuant to the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. SECTION 67 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 67. For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the amount of $27,500,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue fund are hereby transferred from the Lump Sum-Home Community Services Waiver category to the Salary and Benefits category to enable the Agency for Persons with Disabilities to fund shift salary expenditures from the Operations and Maintenance Trust Fund for the Developmental Disability Centers. SECTION 68 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 68. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Agency for Persons with Disabilities in section 81 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Incident Management System shall revert and is appropriated to the agency for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 69 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 69. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Agency for Persons with Disabilities in Specific Appropriation 238 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for Individual and Family Supports shall revert and is appropriated to the agency for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 70 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 70. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Agency for Persons with Disabilities in Specific Appropriation 239 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for Room and Board Payments for Developmentally Disabled shall revert and is appropriated to the agency for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 71 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 71. For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the sums of $20,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $25,330,916 in nonrecurring funds from the Operations and Maintenance Trust Fund are hereby transferred from the Lump Sum-Home Community Services Waiver category to the Home and Community Services Waiver category to enable the Agency for Persons with Disabilities to develop and implement recruitment and retention incentives for the Home and Community Based Services iBudget Waiver workforce, with the goal of strengthening workforce stability, reducing turnover, and supporting continuity of care for waiver recipients. Allowable uses of the funds may include, but are not limited to, one-time recruitment or retention incentives, performance-based or merit-based incentives, workforce training and credentialing initiatives, and other nonrecurring strategies designed to enhance workforce capacity and provider participation. Funds may not be used for recurring salary increases or permanent compensation adjustments. These funds shall be placed in reserve. The agency is authorized to submit budget amendments to request release of funds held in reserve pursuant to the provisions of chapter 216, Florida Statutes. Release is contingent upon approval of a detailed spend plan that identifies the specific incentive strategies and workforce initiatives to be implemented, demonstrates that all expenditures are nonrecurring in nature, and describes how the proposed incentives are expected to support recruitment, retention, and workforce stabilization. The Agency for Persons with Disabilities shall submit a report by December 31, 2026, to the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, detailing the distribution of funds, including the amount allocated per iBudget Waiver direct support professional or provider, the incentive category or initiative funded, and a summary of workforce outcomes supported by the expenditure of these funds. SECTION 72 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 72. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $20,548,508 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and $27,201,492 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund to the Department of Children and Families, in the Florida System Modernization special category, for the modernization of the Automated Community Connection to Economic Self Sufficiency (ACCESS) Florida System. Any unexpended balance of funds appropriated in this section remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. The department shall contract with an independent verification and validation (IV&V) provider to provide IV&V services for all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project. The IV&V contract shall require that all deliverables be simultaneously provided to the department, the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity. IV&V services must include, but are not limited to the following: (1) Oversight of all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project; (2) An evaluation of the project's schedule to highlight variances and ensure it aligns with project objectives, remains feasible, and mitigates risks; and (3) A thorough review of all project budget requests and monthly and quarterly reporting submitted by the agency to the Legislature. (4) The monthly IV&V reports shall include technical reviews of all project deliverables submitted or accepted within the reporting period and an analysis of whether: (a) The project is being built and implemented in accordance with defined technical architecture, specifications, and requirements; (b) The project is adhering to established project management and governance processes; (c) Solicitation and procurement documentation of products, tools, or services, and resulting contracts, are compliant with current statutory and regulatory requirements and aligned with project objectives; (d) The outcomes and benefits of services performed are commensurate with the amounts invoiced; and (e) If the project is on track to achieve the original business benefits and project objectives. SECTION 73 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 73. The sum of $76,860,474 appropriated to the Department of Children and Families from the Opioid Settlement Trust Fund in section 86 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert immediately. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 74 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 74. All unobligated carryforward cash balances returned to the Department of Children and Families by community-based care lead agencies shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. SECTION 75 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 75. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in Specific Appropriation 293 and section 88 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the modular replacement of the Florida Safe Families Network system that is compliant with federal Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System (CCWIS) regulations and the modernization of the supporting enterprise architecture, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 76 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 76. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in Specific Appropriation 294 and section 89 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the modernization of the Automated Community Connection to Economic Self Sufficiency (ACCESS) Florida system, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 77 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 77. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in Specific Appropriation 294A of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the replacement of the Substance Abuse and Mental Health-Financial and Services Accountability Management System (FASAMS) and modernization of the supporting enterprise architecture, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 78 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 78. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in Specific Appropriation 309 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for Auditing Services for Settlement Monitoring shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 79 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 79. The unexpected balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in Specific Appropriation 354A of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, and subsequently distributed through budget amendment EOG# B2026-0432, for Community Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 80 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 80. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in section 100 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for a grant program pilot in Duval County, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 81 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 81. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in Specific Appropriation 359 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Opioid Settlement Bed Availability System shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 82 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 82. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $298,435 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Elder Affairs to cover a deficit in the Grants and Aids - Older Americans Act Program. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 83 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 83. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Elder Affairs in Specific Appropriation 397A and section 103 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the implementation of the Enterprise Client Information and Registration Tracking System (eCIRTS) shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 84 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 84. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Elder Affairs in section 104 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for Guardianship Data Transparency shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 85 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 85. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Health in Specific Appropriation 525 and section 108 of chapter 2025-198, to implement the Dr. and Mrs. Alfonse and Kathleen Cinotti Health Care Screening and Services Grant Program, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 86 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 86. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Health in Specific Appropriation 536 and section 106 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Early Steps Administrative System shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 87 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 87. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Health in Specific Appropriation 548 and section 107 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, to replace and modernize the Medical Quality Assurance Licensing, Enforcement, and Information Database System (LEIDS), shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 88 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 88. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Health from the Federal Grants Trust Fund and the County Health Department Trust Fund for COVID-19 response grants and activities in section 105 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 89 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 89. The nonrecurring sum of $118,310,733 from the General Revenue Fund is appropriated to the Department of Health for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP). These funds shall be utilized to ensure continued access to life-saving medications and health insurance premium assistance for eligible low-income individuals living with HIV/AIDS, and to maintain program eligibility at the 400 percent Federal Poverty Level. Any unexpended balance of funds appropriated in this section remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Health for the same purpose. SECTION 90 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 90. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $111,231,718, in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Corrections, to offset operational deficits. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 91 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 91. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Corrections in Specific Appropriation 698 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for inmate health services shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 92 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 92. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $15,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Corrections to address verified medical expenditures incurred by the contracted health services provider that were over the compensation cap for Fiscal Year 2023-2024. These funds shall be placed in reserve. The Department of Corrections is authorized to submit budget amendments requesting release of these funds pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes. Release of these funds is contingent upon the submission of a detailed report of all medical expenditures for Fiscal Year 2023-2024, including the expenditures that exceeded the compensation cap of the contract. SECTION 93 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 93. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Corrections from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 597C and section 261 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Offender Based Information Technology Modernization replacement shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 94 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 94. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $48,472,365 in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Offender Based Information System replacement. Any unexpended balance of funds appropriated in this section remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. The department shall contract with an independent verification and validation (IV&V) provider to provide IV&V services for all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project. The IV&V contract shall require that all deliverables be simultaneously provided to the department, the Executive Office of the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget, the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight entity. IV&V services must include, but are not limited to the following: (1) Oversight of all department staff and vendor work needed to implement the project; (2) An evaluation of the project's schedule to highlight variances and ensure it aligns with project objectives, remains feasible, and mitigates risks; and (3) A thorough review of all project budget requests and monthly and quarterly reporting submitted by the agency to the Legislature. (4) The monthly IV&V reports shall include technical reviews of all project deliverables submitted or accepted within the reporting period and an analysis of whether: (a) The project is being built and implemented in accordance with defined technical architecture, specifications, and requirements; (b) The project is adhering to established project management and governance processes; (c) Solicitation and procurement documentation of products, tools, or services, and resulting contracts, are compliant with current statutory and regulatory requirements and aligned with project objectives; (d) The outcomes and benefits of services performed are commensurate with the amounts invoiced; and (e) If the project is on track to achieve the original business benefits and project objectives. SECTION 95 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 95. The unexpended balance of funds from the General Revenue Fund appropriated to the Justice Administrative Commission in Specific Appropriations 742 and 749 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the commission for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 96 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 96. The nonrecurring sum of $1,500,000 is transferred from the Child Dependency and Civil Conflict Case appropriation category in Specific Appropriation 743 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, to the State Attorney Due Process Costs appropriation category in Specific Appropriation 749 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, within the Justice Administrative Commission to offset projected Fiscal Year 2025-2026 deficits. SECTION 97 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 97. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Juvenile Justice in Specific Appropriation 1122 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Children/Families in Need of Services (CINS/FINS) shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 98 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 98. The unexpended balance of funds from the General Revenue Fund provided to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement in Specific Appropriation 1177 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the St. Lucie County Unified Command Vehicle (SF 3636), shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 99 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 99. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement in Specific Appropriation 1915B of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida and the unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement in section 129 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for domestic security projects, shall revert and are appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 100 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 100. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement in Section 131 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida for the State Assistance for Fentanyl Eradication in Florida Program, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 101 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 101. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement in Section 147 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Online Sting Operations, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the department for the same purpose. SECTION 102 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 102. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement in Specific Appropriation 1161 and 1171 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Fort Myers Regional Operations Center furniture, fixtures, and equipment, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the department for the same purpose. SECTION 103 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 103. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Florida Department of Law Enforcement in Chapter 2025-001, Senate Bill 2C, Section 30, for the Local Law Enforcement Immigration Grant Program, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the department for the same purpose. SECTION 104 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 104. The unexpended balances of funds provided to the State Courts System for Appellate and OSCA Technology Resources issues from the General Revenue Fund and in the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 2976 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the State Courts System for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 105 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 105. The unexpended balance of General Revenue funds provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for Agricultural Nonpoint Sources Best Management Practices Implementation in Specific Appropriation 1329 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 106 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 106. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for Forestry Wildfire Protection/Suppression Equipment in Specific Appropriation 1360 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 107 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 107. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for Land Management in Specific Appropriation 1362 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 108 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 108. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for Maintenance, Repairs and Construction in Specific Appropriation 1519 of chapter 2024-231, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 in the Replace Forestry Stations category for the relocation of the Orlando Forestry Center. SECTION 109 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 109. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for cost-share funding to citrus packinghouses for purchase or refurbishment of equipment in Specific Appropriation 1408A of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 110 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 110. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the School Lunch Program in Specific Appropriation 1456 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 111 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 111. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the Resilient Food Systems Infrastructure grant in section 155 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 112 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 112. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Business and Professional Regulation from the Administrative Trust Fund in section 159 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the modernization of the current myfloridalicense.com customer service website and call center software shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 113 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 113. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Business and Professional Regulation from the Administrative Trust Fund in section 160 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the modernization of the Electronic Data Submission application in the Division of Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco, and the Controlled Substances Reporting application in the Division of Drugs, Devices and Cosmetics, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 114 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 114. The sum of $278,741,430 appropriated from the Wastewater Treatment and Stormwater Management Revolving Loan Trust Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection in section 165 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Wastewater and Stormwater Treatment Facility Construction Loan Program shall revert immediately. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 115 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 115. The nonrecurring sum of $278,741,430 from the Drinking Water Revolving Loan Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 in Fixed Capital Outlay appropriation category for the Drinking Water Facility Construction Loan Program. SECTION 116 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 116. The nonrecurring sum of $4,125,000 from the Drinking Water Revolving Loan Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 in Fixed Capital Outlay appropriation category for Drinking Water Systems Disaster Relief. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 117 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 117. The nonrecurring sum of $13,200,000 from the Wastewater Treatment and Stormwater Management Revolving Loan Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 in Fixed Capital Outlay appropriation category for Clean Water Systems Disaster Relief. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 118 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 118. The nonrecurring sums of $25,841,600 from the General Revenue Fund and $152,931,876 from the Drinking Water Revolving Loan Trust Fund are appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 in Fixed Capital Outlay appropriation category for the Drinking Water Facility Construction Loan Program. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 119 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 119. The nonrecurring sums of $27,341,600 from the General Revenue Fund and $363,117,537 from the Wastewater Treatment and Stormwater Management Revolving Loan Trust Fund are appropriated in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to the Department of Environmental Protection in Fixed Capital Outlay appropriation category for the Wastewater and Stormwater Treatment Facility Construction Loan Program. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 120 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 120. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Environmental Protection from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 1569 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for a comprehensive water quality study to identify and analyze impaired rivers shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 121 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 121. The sum of $200,000,000 appropriated from General Revenue to the Department of Environmental Protection in section 174 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for land acquisition shall revert and $100,000,000 is appropriated to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 in Fixed Capital Outlay appropriation category for Conservation and Rural Land Protection Easements and Agreements; $20,000,000 is appropriated to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for Forestry Wildfire Protection/Suppression Equipment; $65,000,000 is appropriated to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 in Fixed Capital Outlay for Forestry Emergency Wildfire Management; and $15,000,000 is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to acquire less-than-fee ownership, such as permanent conservation easements as provided for in s. 259.105, Florida Statutes, and included in the ARC Recommended 2026 Florida Forever Priority List for Less-Than-Fee Projects. SECTION 122 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 122. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 2218 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the replacement of the Florida Accounting Information Resource (FLAIR) subsystem replacement shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 123 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 123. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the Administrative Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 2177 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for operations support and maintenance of the Florida Accounting Information Resource (FLAIR) subsystem shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 124 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 124. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in section 198 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management system project contingency, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the department for the same purpose. SECTION 125 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 125. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriations 2139, 2140, and 2141 and sections 176 and 177 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the My Safe Florida Home Program, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the department for the same purpose. SECTION 126 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 126. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the General Revenue Fund in section 178 of chapter 2025-198 Laws of Florida, for the My Safe Florida Home Program - Condo Pilot, shall revert is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the department for the same purpose. SECTION 127 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 127. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in Section 181 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for staff augmentation shall revert and is appropriated to the department in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 128 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 128. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Financial Services from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in Section 180 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the replacement claims processing system for the Division of Rehabilitation and Liquidation shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the same purpose. SECTION 129 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 129. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Office of Insurance Regulation from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in section 191 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Public Hurricane Loss Model, shall revert and is appropriated to the office in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 130 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 130. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in Section 194 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the outfitting of law enforcement vehicles shall revert and is appropriated to the department in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 131 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 131. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in Section 182 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the purchase of Statewide Response Vehicles and equipment shall revert and is appropriated to the department in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 132 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 132. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services in Section 179 of Chapter 2024-231, Laws of Florida, for the Dixie County Tanker Purchase (SF 2269) shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Dixie County Tanker Truck Equipment (SF 1806) project for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. SECTION 133 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 133. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Financial Services in Specific Appropriation 2431A of chapter 2022-156, Laws of Florida, for the Dixie County Old Town Fire Station (SF 1578) shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Dixie County EOC Fire Station (SF 1805) project for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. SECTION 134 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 134. The unexpended balance of General Revenue funds provided to the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission for the Monroe County Marine Emergency Response Vessels in Section 201 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 135 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 135. The nonrecurring sum of $4,549,662 from the Operating Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of the Lottery for the Gaming System contract in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to support obligations based on estimated sales. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 136 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 136. The nonrecurring sum of $633,200 from the Operating Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of the Lottery for the Instant Ticket contract in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to support obligations based on estimated sales. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 137 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 137. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Management Services in section 209 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for contracted legal services, shall revert and is appropriated to the department in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 138 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 138. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Management Services from the Operating Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 2650 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Legacy Authentication and Identity Verification Replacement Pilot project, shall revert and is appropriated to the department in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 139 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 139. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Management Services in Specific Appropriation 2678 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, to upgrade 911 public safety answering points within fiscally constrained counties, shall revert and is appropriated to the department in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 140 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 140. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Management Services in section 210 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the upgrade of the Statewide Law Enforcement Radio System to Project 25 compliance with the current operator, shall revert and is appropriated to the department in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 141 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 141. The nonrecurring sum of $15,900,870 is appropriated in the CENTREX and SUNCOM Payments special category from the Communications Working Capital Trust Fund to the Department of Management Services in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for telecommunications services needs. Any unexpended balance of funds remaining on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated for the same purpose for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. This section is effective upon becoming a law. SECTION 142 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 142. The nonrecurring sum of $22,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is appropriated to the Department of Management Services in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for replacement of windows and building repairs at the Knott Building and adjacent bridge located in Tallahassee, Florida. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 143 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 143. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Revenue in Specific Appropriations 2858 and 2862 and section 222 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, to implement the Child Support Automated Management System (CAMS) upgrade shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 144 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 144. The unexpended balance of nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Revenue in Specific Appropriation 2868 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the implementation of the Suntax Transition to SAP S4 shall revert and is appropriated in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to the Department of Revenue for the same purpose. SECTION 145 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 145. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Revenue from in Specific Appropriation 2868 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the implementation of Electronic File and Pay System shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 146 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 146. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Commerce in section 225 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 147 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 147. The nonrecurring sum of $73,000,000 from the Federal Grants Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Commerce for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the Community Development Block Grant-Disaster Recovery Program. The unexpended balance of funds provided in this section on June 30, 2026, and from Specific Appropriation 2107 and section 227 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 148 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 148. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Commerce for the Capital Projects Fund Program in section 229 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 149 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 149. The nonrecurring sum of $25,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund is appropriated to the Florida Housing Finance Corporation for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the Florida Hometown Heroes Housing Program. The unexpended balance of funds provided in this section on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated to the corporation for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 150 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 150. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Commerce from the Administrative Trust Fund in Specific Appropriations 2068 and 2070 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the support of department-wide information technology needs shall revert and are appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 151 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 151. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Commerce from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 2089 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the operations and maintenance of the Reemployment Assistance system shall revert and are appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 152 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 152. The unexpended balance of $135,268,813 from the funds appropriated in section 260 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Public Law 117-2) to the Department of Commerce for the Workforce Information System shall revert immediately. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 153 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 153. The nonrecurring sum of $50,000,000 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Commerce for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the Utility Relocation Grant Program. The unexpended balance of funds provided in this section on June 30, 2026 and from section 9 of chapter 2025-122, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 154 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 154. The nonrecurring sum of $30,000,000 from the Federal Grants Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Commerce for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for Home Energy Assistance programs. The unexpended balance of funds provided in this section on June 30, 2026 and from Specific Appropriation 2104 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 155 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 155. The nonrecurring sum of $20,000,000 from the Federal Grants Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Commerce for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the Weatherization Assistance Program (WAP). The unexpended balance of funds provided in this section on June 30, 2026 and from Specific Appropriation 2105 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 156 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 156. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of Commerce for the OCEARCH Mayport Research and Operations Center (Jacksonville University) (SF 2756) in Specific Appropriation 2336A of chapter 2023-239, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the OCEARCH Mayport Research and Operations Center to the City of Jacksonville (SF 3801). SECTION 157 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 157. The unexpended balance of funds in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the U.S. Contributions Trust Fund appropriated to the Executive Office of the Governor, Division of Emergency Management in section 247 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the division for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 158 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 158. The unexpended balance of funds in the Grants and Donations Trust Fund and the U.S. Contributions Trust Fund appropriated to the Executive Office of the Governor, Division of Emergency Management in Specific Appropriations 2446, 2447, 2450, and 2451 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the division for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 159 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 159. There is hereby appropriated for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $70,000,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Federal Grants Trust Fund and $1,750,000 in nonrecurring funds from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund to the Executive Office of the Governor, Division of Emergency Management for the Flood Mitigation Assistance Swift Current Program. The unexpended balance of funds in this section, Specific Appropriation 2457, and section 245 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Swift Current Program, shall revert and is appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 year to the division for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 160 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 160. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Executive Office of the Governor, Division of Emergency Management for the State Non-Profit Security Grant Program in section 246 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the division for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 161 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 161. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Executive Office of the Governor, Division of Emergency Management from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 2432 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for technology infrastructure at the Emergency Operations Center shall revert and is appropriated to the division for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 162 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 162. The nonrecurring sum of $1,500,000 from the General Revenue Fund is appropriated to the Department of Military Affairs for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for tuition assistance for the Florida National Guard. The unexpended balance of funds provided in this section on June 30, 2026, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 163 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 163. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Military Affairs from the General Revenue Fund in Specific Appropriation 2797 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Florida State Guard Personnel System shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 164 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 164. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of State in section 251 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, to document the requirements of the current SUNBIZ and Florida Voter Registration System systems shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 165 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 165. The unexpended balance of funds provided to the Department of State for the Pensacola Little Theatre Family Arts Education Expansion (SF 2987) in Specific Appropriation 2955 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the Revert and Reappropriate - Pensacola Little Theatre (2025 LFIR Form #: 2987) (SF 3474). SECTION 166 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 166. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation in Specific Appropriation 1846 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Acquisition of Motor Vehicles, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 167 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 167. The nonrecurring sum of $1,797,023,127 from the State Transportation (Primary) Trust Fund is appropriated to the Department of Transportation in the Moving Florida Forward Work Program category for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, for the Moving Florida Forward projects currently programmed in Fiscal Year 2026-2027. The currently programmed projects are hereby advanced to the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 Adopted Work Program. The unexpended balance of funds provided in this section on June 30,2026, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. This section is effective upon becoming law. SECTION 168 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 168. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation in section 255 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Moving Florida Forward Work Program category, shall revert and is appropriated to the department for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 169 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 169. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation from the State Transportation (Primary) Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 1893 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Data Infrastructure Modernization project shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 170 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 170. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation from the State Transportation (Primary) Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 1892 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Security Risk Management Program shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 171 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 171. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation from the State Transportation (Primary) Trust Fund in Specific Appropriation 1892 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the Transportation Systems Disruption Mitigation Plan shall revert and is appropriated to the department for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 172 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 172. Pursuant to section 215.32(2)(b)4.a., Florida Statutes, $64,000,000 from unobligated cash balance amounts specified from the following trust funds shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund for Fiscal Year 2026-2027: DEPARTMENT OF BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONAL REGULATION Professional Regulation Trust Fund........................ 10,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES Financial Institutions' Regulatory Trust Fund............. 5,000,000 Regulatory Trust Fund / Office of Financial Regulation.... 5,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH Biomedical Research Trust Fund............................ 7,000,000 Grants and Donations Trust Fund........................... 20,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund....................... 10,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT Criminal Justice Standards and Training Trust Fund........ 4,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES Operating Trust Fund / Purchasing......................... 3,000,000 Funds specified above from each trust fund shall be transferred in four equal installments on a quarterly basis during the fiscal year. SECTION 173 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 173. The unexpended balances of funds appropriated in Specific Appropriations 139A, 175A, 249A, 249A, 281A, 281A, 395, 416A, 572A, 597A, 738A, 763A, 769B, 775B, 782A, 788B, 794B, 800B, 806B, 812B, 818B, 824B, 829B, 835B, 841B, 847B, 853B, 859B, 865B, 870A, 876B, 881B, 887A, 892B, 897A, 903A, 909A, 915A, 920B, 926A, 931A, 936A, 941A, 945B, 950A, 955B, 960B, 965A, 970B, 975B, 980B, 1010A, 1016A, 1021A, 1027A, 1033A, 1039A, 1046A, 1091A, 1194A, 1243A, 1277A, 1374A, 1470A, 1691A, 1892A, 1895, 1925A, 2044A, 2070A, 2138, 2179, 2205, 2257, 2435A, 2524A, 2568A, 2668, 2852A, 2868A, 2877A, and 2972A and section 263 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) system shall revert and are appropriated to the agency from which the appropriation was originally made for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 174 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 174. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the agencies in section 262 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for application modernization shall revert and is appropriated to the agency from which the appropriation was originally made for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 175 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 175. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the agencies in section 264 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for remediation tasks necessary to integrate agency applications with the Florida Planning, Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) system shall revert and is appropriated for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 176 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 176. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated to the agencies in Specific Appropriation 1919A of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for cybersecurity tools shall revert and is appropriated for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 177 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 177. The unexpended balance of funds appropriated in Administered Funds in section 270 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, for the State Match for Federal FEMA Funding, which is held in reserve, shall revert and is appropriated in Administered Funds for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purpose. SECTION 178 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 178. The unexpended balance from the General Revenue Fund provided in the appropriation category "Salaries and Benefits" in chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, that is reverted pursuant to section 216.301, Florida Statutes, shall be transferred by the Chief Financial Officer to the State Employees' Health Insurance Trust Fund in the Department of Management Services no later than October 15, 2026. SECTION 179 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 179. The Chief Financial Officer shall transfer $375,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the State Employees' Health Insurance Trust Fund for Fiscal Year 2026-2027. SECTION 180 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 180. The Chief Financial Officer shall transfer $250,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund for Fiscal Year 2026-2027, as authorized by section 252.3711, Florida Statutes. SECTION 181 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 181. The Chief Financial Officer shall transfer $118,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the Budget Stabilization Fund for Fiscal Year 2026-2027, as authorized by Article III, section 19(g), of the Florida Constitution. SECTION 182 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 182. The Chief Financial Officer shall transfer $750,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the Budget Stabilization Fund for Fiscal Year 2026-2027, contingent on voter approval of the constitutional amendment proposed by House Joint Resolution 5019. SECTION 183 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 183. The unexpended balances of operating funds appropriated from the state's award from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Public Law 117-2), in section 260 of chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, remaining on June 30, 2026, other than funds appropriated to the Department of Commerce for the Workforce Information System, shall revert and are appropriated for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the same purposes. SECTION 184 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 184. The unexpended balances of funds appropriated from the state's award from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Public Law 117-2), in section 183 of this act, and sections 271, 272, and 274 of chapter 2024-231, Laws of Florida, remaining on January 1, 2027, shall be held in reserve. SECTION 185 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 185. Any section of this act, or any appropriation herein contained, if found to be invalid shall in no way affect other sections or specific appropriations contained in this act. SECTION 186 SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION SECTION 186. Except as otherwise provided herein, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or upon becoming law, whichever occurs later; however, if this act becomes law after July 1, 2026, then it shall operate retroactively to July 1, 2026. TOTAL THIS GENERAL APPROPRIATION ACT FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND . . . . . . 52,346,679,058 FROM TRUST FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 62,679,100,975 TOTAL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . 111,889.56 TOTAL ALL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . 115,025,780,033 TOTAL APPROVED SALARY RATE . . . . 7,108,434,209 ITEMIZATION OF EXPENDITURE TOTALS (FOR INFORMATION ONLY) SB 2500 FY 26-27 ($ IN MILLIONS) GENERAL OTHER ALL REVENUE LOTTERY PECO TOBACCO TRUST FUNDS POSITIONS ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- OPERATING _________ A - STATE OPERATIONS 9,663.4 .0 .0 92.5 10,005.7 19,761.5 111,889.56 B - AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 23,657.9 1,468.2 .0 .0 5,210.3 30,336.4 .00 C - PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS 520.1 808.1 .0 .0 48.3 1,376.6 .00 D - PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 2,688.7 103.8 .0 .0 4,946.3 7,738.9 .00 E - MEDICAID AND TANF 14,215.0 .0 .0 208.4 23,199.9 37,623.3 .00 H - TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 244.0 .0 .0 .0 289.7 533.7 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL OPERATING 50,989.2 2,380.1 .0 300.9 43,700.2 97,370.3 111,889.56 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ I - STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DMS 59.4 .0 .0 .0 13.9 73.3 .00 J - ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY 220.1 .0 .0 .0 488.9 709.0 .00 K - STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DOT .0 .0 .0 .0 12,599.4 12,599.4 .00 L - STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY-PECO .0 .0 1,102.1 .0 53.8 1,155.8 .00 M - AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 1,038.2 .0 .0 .0 965.2 2,003.4 .00 N - DEBT SERVICE 39.8 78.9 469.9 .0 526.0 1,114.6 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY 1,357.5 78.9 1,572.0 .0 14,647.1 17,655.4 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ TOTAL ITEM. OF EXPENDITURES 52,346.7 2,459.0 1,572.0 300.9 58,347.3 115,025.8 111,889.56 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ NOTE: AMOUNTS ACROSS AND DOWN MAY NOT EQUAL DUE TO ROUNDING. SUMMARY BY SECTION (FOR INFORMATION ONLY) SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 1 - EDUCATION ENHANCEMENT OPERATING _________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 1,468,152,482 1,468,152,482 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 1,468,152,482 1,468,152,482 ________________ ________________ ________________ PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 808,135,656 808,135,656 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS 808,135,656 808,135,656 ________________ ________________ ________________ PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 103,776,356 103,776,356 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 103,776,356 103,776,356 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ DEBT SERVICE STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 78,888,148 78,888,148 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL DEBT SERVICE 78,888,148 78,888,148 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SECTION 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,458,952,642 2,458,952,642 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 2,458,952,642 2,458,952,642 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,380,064,494 2,380,064,494 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 78,888,148 78,888,148 ________________ ________________ ________________ SECTION 2 - EDUCATION (ALL OTHER FUNDS) OPERATING _________ STATE OPERATIONS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 394,853,204 43,664,626 438,517,830 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,159,699 2,560,280 57,719,979 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 350,928,740 350,928,740 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 622,261 622,261 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- POSITIONS 2,234.75 TOTAL STATE OPERATIONS 450,012,903 397,775,907 847,788,810 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 19,276,098,577 468,341,976 19,744,440,553 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 208,425,546 208,425,546 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,022,845,132 1,022,845,132 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 19,484,524,123 1,491,187,108 20,975,711,231 ________________ ________________ ________________ PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 435,401,661 1,393,506 436,795,167 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 105,000 105,000 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS 435,401,661 1,498,506 436,900,167 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 2 - EDUCATION (ALL OTHER FUNDS) OPERATING _________ PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 2,462,597,956 86,161,098 2,548,759,054 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,704,073,395 2,704,073,395 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 2,462,597,956 2,790,234,493 5,252,832,449 ________________ ________________ ________________ TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 3,696,887 5,829,999 9,526,886 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 107,661 107,661 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,638,780 2,638,780 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 3,804,548 8,468,779 12,273,327 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY-PECO STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 1,155,841,564 1,155,841,564 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY-PECO 1,155,841,564 1,155,841,564 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 43,924,780 43,924,780 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 43,924,780 43,924,780 ________________ ________________ ________________ DEBT SERVICE STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 611,745,709 611,745,709 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL DEBT SERVICE 611,745,709 611,745,709 ________________ ________________ ________________ POSITIONS 2,234.75 TOTAL SECTION 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,880,265,971 6,456,752,066 29,337,018,037 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 22,616,573,065 2,372,978,478 24,989,551,543 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . 263,692,906 2,560,280 266,253,186 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,080,591,047 4,080,591,047 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . 622,261 622,261 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 22,836,341,191 4,689,164,793 27,525,505,984 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 43,924,780 1,767,587,273 1,811,512,053 ________________ ________________ ________________ SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES OPERATING _________ STATE OPERATIONS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 415,165,295 1,124,977,328 1,540,142,623 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 827,049,373 399,442,410 1,226,491,783 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,949,684,611 1,949,684,611 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 150,463,782 150,463,782 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- POSITIONS 30,596.06 TOTAL STATE OPERATIONS 1,242,214,668 3,624,568,131 4,866,782,799 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES OPERATING _________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 1,374,666,873 354,760,924 1,729,427,797 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,109,783,451 18,170,126 2,127,953,577 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,432,059,079 2,432,059,079 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 18,209,582 18,209,582 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 3,484,450,324 2,823,199,711 6,307,650,035 ________________ ________________ ________________ PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 52,081,069 52,081,069 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,727,432 13,727,432 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 10,492 10,492 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS 65,808,501 10,492 65,818,993 ________________ ________________ ________________ PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 15,000,000 15,000,000 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 1,000,000 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 15,000,000 1,000,000 16,000,000 ________________ ________________ ________________ MEDICAID AND TANF STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 12,463,991 12,463,991 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,202,533,466 3,369,909,618 17,572,443,084 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,038,390,625 20,038,390,625 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL MEDICAID AND TANF 14,214,997,457 23,408,300,243 37,623,297,700 ________________ ________________ ________________ TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 79,781,596 17,386,528 97,168,124 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,667,030 4,727,231 16,394,261 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 16,646,117 16,646,117 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 375,734 375,734 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 91,448,626 39,135,610 130,584,236 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 7,884,691 8,613,691 16,498,382 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,092,009 3,092,009 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY 7,884,691 11,705,700 19,590,391 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 59,158,023 5,900,000 65,058,023 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 59,158,023 5,900,000 65,058,023 ________________ ________________ ________________ POSITIONS 30,596.06 TOTAL SECTION 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,180,962,290 29,913,819,887 49,094,782,177 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 2,016,201,538 1,511,638,471 3,527,840,009 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . 17,164,760,752 3,792,249,385 20,957,010,137 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,440,872,441 24,440,872,441 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . 169,059,590 169,059,590 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,113,919,576 29,896,214,187 49,010,133,763 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 67,042,714 17,605,700 84,648,414 ________________ ________________ ________________ SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS OPERATING _________ STATE OPERATIONS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 5,506,254,564 555,244,086 6,061,498,650 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,117,119 17,397,677 25,514,796 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 47,539,235 47,539,235 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 87,530,673 87,530,673 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- POSITIONS 41,096.00 TOTAL STATE OPERATIONS 5,514,371,683 707,711,671 6,222,083,354 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 423,472,597 48,886,924 472,359,521 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,112 6,112 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,667,828 50,667,828 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 5,764,183 5,764,183 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 423,478,709 105,318,935 528,797,644 ________________ ________________ ________________ PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 16,000,000 16,000,000 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,600,000 9,600,000 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS 25,600,000 25,600,000 ________________ ________________ ________________ PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 6,439,200 2,529,702 8,968,902 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 126,221,502 126,221,502 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 6,439,200 128,751,204 135,190,404 ________________ ________________ ________________ TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 23,484,660 2,508,239 25,992,899 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 15,557 27,289 42,846 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8,965,530 8,965,530 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 101,462 101,462 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 23,500,217 11,602,520 35,102,737 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 107,748,640 107,748,640 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY 107,748,640 107,748,640 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 45,743,750 200,000 45,943,750 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 45,743,750 200,000 45,943,750 ________________ ________________ ________________ DEBT SERVICE STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 39,779,275 39,779,275 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL DEBT SERVICE 39,779,275 39,779,275 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS POSITIONS 41,096.00 TOTAL SECTION 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,161,061,474 979,184,330 7,140,245,804 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 6,152,922,686 625,368,951 6,778,291,637 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . 8,138,788 17,424,966 25,563,754 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 242,994,095 242,994,095 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . 93,396,318 93,396,318 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,967,789,809 978,984,330 6,946,774,139 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 193,271,665 200,000 193,471,665 ________________ ________________ ________________ SECTION 5 - NATURAL RESOURCES/ENVIRONMENT/GROWTH MANAGEMENT/TRANSPORTATION OPERATING _________ STATE OPERATIONS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 564,304,864 1,972,959,546 2,537,264,410 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 578,604 48,274,226 48,852,830 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 217,199,992 217,199,992 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- POSITIONS 15,014.25 TOTAL STATE OPERATIONS 564,883,468 2,238,433,764 2,803,317,232 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 81,945,849 118,368,125 200,313,974 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,165,197 9,165,197 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,905,086 11,905,086 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 91,111,046 130,273,211 221,384,257 ________________ ________________ ________________ PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 12,657,261 12,657,261 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,489,982,379 1,489,982,379 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 1,502,639,640 1,502,639,640 ________________ ________________ ________________ TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 2,268,805 51,411,160 53,679,965 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 376 376 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 176,986 176,986 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 2,268,805 51,588,522 53,857,327 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 72,625,000 447,130,998 519,755,998 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 27,401,250 27,401,250 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY 72,625,000 474,532,248 547,157,248 ________________ ________________ ________________ STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DOT STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 9,196,732,673 9,196,732,673 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,384,635 7,384,635 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,395,235,940 3,395,235,940 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DOT 12,599,353,248 12,599,353,248 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 5 - NATURAL RESOURCES/ENVIRONMENT/GROWTH MANAGEMENT/TRANSPORTATION FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 684,937,519 866,084,057 1,551,021,576 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 166,667 166,667 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 68,731,627 68,731,627 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 685,104,186 934,815,684 1,619,919,870 ________________ ________________ ________________ DEBT SERVICE STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 371,632,929 371,632,929 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL DEBT SERVICE 371,632,929 371,632,929 ________________ ________________ ________________ POSITIONS 15,014.25 TOTAL SECTION 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,415,992,505 18,303,269,246 19,719,261,751 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 1,406,082,037 13,036,976,749 14,443,058,786 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . 9,910,468 55,659,237 65,569,705 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,210,633,260 5,210,633,260 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 658,263,319 3,922,935,137 4,581,198,456 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 757,729,186 14,380,334,109 15,138,063,295 ________________ ________________ ________________ SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATING _________ STATE OPERATIONS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 1,123,361,525 2,502,031,326 3,625,392,851 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 71,985,887 19,177,801 91,163,688 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 443,907,035 443,907,035 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 38,750,850 38,750,850 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- POSITIONS 18,153.50 TOTAL STATE OPERATIONS 1,195,347,412 3,003,867,012 4,199,214,424 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 166,904,856 172,434,309 339,339,165 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,095,052 8,447,346 15,542,398 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 478,403,529 478,403,529 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000,000 1,000,000 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 173,999,908 660,285,184 834,285,092 ________________ ________________ ________________ PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 18,906,497 21,221,704 40,128,201 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS 18,906,497 21,221,704 40,128,201 ________________ ________________ ________________ PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 204,709,266 436,073,331 640,782,597 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 87,646,594 87,646,594 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 204,709,266 523,719,925 728,429,191 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATING _________ TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 107,830,600 123,290,700 231,121,300 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,253,544 196 14,253,740 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 55,523,367 55,523,367 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 3,937 3,937 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 122,084,144 178,818,200 300,902,344 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 59,371,791 13,889,000 73,260,791 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DMS 59,371,791 13,889,000 73,260,791 ________________ ________________ ________________ ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 27,381,850 1,100,000 28,481,850 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,460,200 4,460,200 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY 31,842,050 1,100,000 32,942,050 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 202,061,511 21,279,900 223,341,411 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 3,000,000 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 202,061,511 24,279,900 226,341,411 ________________ ________________ ________________ DEBT SERVICE STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 12,553,494 12,553,494 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL DEBT SERVICE 12,553,494 12,553,494 ________________ ________________ ________________ POSITIONS 18,153.50 TOTAL SECTION 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,008,322,579 4,439,734,419 6,448,056,998 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 1,910,527,896 3,303,873,764 5,214,401,660 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . 97,794,683 30,625,343 128,420,026 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,065,480,525 1,065,480,525 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . 39,754,787 39,754,787 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,715,047,227 4,387,912,025 6,102,959,252 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 293,275,352 51,822,394 345,097,746 ________________ ________________ ________________ SECTION 7 - JUDICIAL BRANCH OPERATING _________ STATE OPERATIONS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 696,537,104 110,597,537 807,134,641 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,152,751 3,152,751 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 12,074,581 12,074,581 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- POSITIONS 4,795.00 TOTAL STATE OPERATIONS 696,537,104 125,824,869 822,361,973 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- SECTION 7 - JUDICIAL BRANCH OPERATING _________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 370,000 370,000 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 370,000 370,000 ________________ ________________ ________________ TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 917,135 8,461 925,596 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,145 4,145 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 34,852 34,852 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 917,135 47,458 964,593 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 1,516,058 1,516,058 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY 1,516,058 1,516,058 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 2,250,000 2,250,000 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 2,250,000 2,250,000 ________________ ________________ ________________ POSITIONS 4,795.00 TOTAL SECTION 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 700,074,239 127,388,385 827,462,624 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 700,074,239 112,122,056 812,196,295 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,156,896 3,156,896 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . 12,109,433 12,109,433 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 697,824,239 125,872,327 823,696,566 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 2,250,000 1,516,058 3,766,058 ________________ ________________ ________________ SUMMARY FOR ALL SECTIONS (FOR INFORMATION ONLY) SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- ALL SECTIONS OPERATING _________ STATE OPERATIONS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 8,700,476,556 6,309,474,449 15,009,951,005 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 962,890,682 486,852,394 1,449,743,076 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,012,412,364 3,012,412,364 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 289,442,147 289,442,147 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- POSITIONS 111,889.56 TOTAL STATE OPERATIONS 9,663,367,238 10,098,181,354 19,761,548,592 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 21,323,458,752 2,630,944,740 23,954,403,492 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,334,475,358 26,617,472 2,361,092,830 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,995,880,654 3,995,880,654 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 24,973,765 24,973,765 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOV - OPERATION 23,657,934,110 6,678,416,631 30,336,350,741 ________________ ________________ ________________ PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 506,389,227 846,750,866 1,353,140,093 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,727,432 13,727,432 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,705,000 9,705,000 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 10,492 10,492 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PYMT OF PEN, BEN & CLAIMS 520,116,659 856,466,358 1,376,583,017 ________________ ________________ ________________ PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 2,688,746,422 641,197,748 3,329,944,170 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,408,923,870 4,408,923,870 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL PASS THRU/ST & FED FUNDS 2,688,746,422 5,050,121,618 7,738,868,040 ________________ ________________ ________________ MEDICAID AND TANF STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 12,463,991 12,463,991 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,202,533,466 3,369,909,618 17,572,443,084 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20,038,390,625 20,038,390,625 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL MEDICAID AND TANF 14,214,997,457 23,408,300,243 37,623,297,700 ________________ ________________ ________________ TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 217,979,683 200,435,087 418,414,770 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 26,043,792 4,755,092 30,798,884 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 83,954,925 83,954,925 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . 515,985 515,985 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL TRANS TO OTHER ENTITIES 244,023,475 289,661,089 533,684,564 ________________ ________________ ________________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DMS STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 59,371,791 13,889,000 73,260,791 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DMS 59,371,791 13,889,000 73,260,791 ________________ ________________ ________________ ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 215,640,181 458,360,747 674,000,928 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,460,200 4,460,200 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 30,493,259 30,493,259 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL ST CAPITAL OUTLAY - AGENCY 220,100,381 488,854,006 708,954,387 ________________ ________________ ________________ SB 2500 FY 26-27 GEN REVENUE TRUST FUNDS ALL FUNDS ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- ALL SECTIONS FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DOT STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 9,196,732,673 9,196,732,673 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,384,635 7,384,635 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,395,235,940 3,395,235,940 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY - DOT 12,599,353,248 12,599,353,248 ________________ ________________ ________________ STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY-PECO STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 1,155,841,564 1,155,841,564 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL STATE CAPITAL OUTLAY-PECO 1,155,841,564 1,155,841,564 ________________ ________________ ________________ AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 1,038,075,583 893,463,957 1,931,539,540 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . . 166,667 3,000,000 3,166,667 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 68,731,627 68,731,627 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL AID TO LOC GOVT-CAP OUTLAY 1,038,242,250 965,195,584 2,003,437,834 ________________ ________________ ________________ DEBT SERVICE STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . . . . . 39,779,275 1,074,820,280 1,114,599,555 ---------------- ---------------- ---------------- TOTAL DEBT SERVICE 39,779,275 1,074,820,280 1,114,599,555 ________________ ________________ ________________ POSITIONS 111,889.56 TOTAL ALL SECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 52,346,679,058 62,679,100,975 115,025,780,033 ________________ ________________ ________________ FUNDING SOURCE RECAP STATE FUNDS - NONMATCHING . . . . . . . 34,802,381,461 23,421,911,111 58,224,292,572 STATE FUNDS - MATCHING . . . . . . . . . 17,544,297,597 3,898,519,211 21,442,816,808 FEDERAL FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . . 35,043,728,264 35,043,728,264 TRANS/RECIPIENT/FED FUNDS . . . . . . . 314,942,389 314,942,389 ________________ ________________ ________________ TOTAL SPENDING AUTHORIZATIONS OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 50,989,185,361 46,381,147,293 97,370,332,654 FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY . . . . . . . . . . 1,357,493,697 16,297,953,682 17,655,447,379 ________________ ________________ ________________ SUMMARY BY SECTION BY DEPARTMENT (FOR INFORMATION ONLY) SB 2500 FY 26-27 ($ IN MILLIONS) GENERAL OTHER ALL REVENUE LOTTERY PECO TOBACCO TRUST FUNDS POSITIONS ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- OPERATING _________ SECTION 1 - EDUCATION ENHANCEMENT EDUCATION, DEPT OF........... .0 2,380.1 .0 .0 .0 2,380.1 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 1 .0 2,380.1 .0 .0 .0 2,380.1 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 2 - EDUCATION (ALL OTHER FUNDS) EDUCATION, DEPT OF........... 22,836.3 .0 .0 .0 4,689.2 27,525.5 2,234.75 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 2 22,836.3 .0 .0 .0 4,689.2 27,525.5 2,234.75 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ EDUCATION RECAP EDUCATION/EARLY LEARNING... 604.0 .0 .0 .0 1,001.0 1,605.0 97.00 EDUCATION/PUBLIC SCHOOLS... 15,737.2 719.8 .0 .0 3,266.4 19,723.4 .00 EDUCATION/FL COLLEGES...... 1,621.2 239.7 .0 .0 .0 1,860.9 .00 EDUCATION/UNIVERSITIES..... 4,092.2 612.4 .0 .0 5.2 4,709.8 .00 EDUCATION/OTHER............ 781.7 808.1 .0 .0 416.6 2,006.4 2,137.75 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL EDUCATION RECAP 22,836.3 2,380.1 .0 .0 4,689.2 29,905.6 2,234.75 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES AGENCY/HEALTH CARE ADMIN..... 13,547.2 .0 .0 208.4 24,304.3 38,059.9 1,563.50 AGENCY/PERSONS WITH DISABL... 1,187.1 .0 .0 .0 132.1 1,319.2 2,709.00 CHILDREN & FAMILIES.......... 3,039.0 .0 .0 .0 1,762.9 4,801.9 12,496.25 ELDER AFFAIRS, DEPT OF....... 268.5 .0 .0 .0 231.4 499.9 425.00 HEALTH, DEPT OF.............. 1,020.0 .0 .0 92.5 2,990.3 4,102.8 11,882.31 VETERANS' AFFAIRS, DEPT OF... 52.2 .0 .0 .0 174.2 226.4 1,520.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 3 19,113.9 .0 .0 300.9 29,595.3 49,010.1 30,596.06 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS CORRECTIONS, DEPT OF......... 3,817.1 .0 .0 .0 78.9 3,895.9 23,729.00 FL COMMISN/OFFENDER REVIEW... 18.2 .0 .0 .0 .0 18.2 164.00 JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION....... 1,153.1 .0 .0 .0 255.0 1,408.1 10,451.00 JUVENILE JUSTICE, DEPT OF.... 583.2 .0 .0 .0 169.1 752.3 3,229.50 LAW ENFORCEMENT, DEPT OF..... 289.7 .0 .0 .0 193.9 483.6 2,038.00 LEGAL AFFAIRS/ATTY GENERAL... 106.5 .0 .0 .0 282.1 388.6 1,484.50 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 4 5,967.8 .0 .0 .0 979.0 6,946.8 41,096.00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 5 - NATURAL RESOURCES/ENVIRONMENT/GROWTH MANAGEMENT/TRANSPORTATION AGRIC/CONSUMER SVCS/COMMR.... 493.1 .0 .0 .0 1,947.2 2,440.3 3,845.25 ENVIR PROTECTION, DEPT OF.... 45.2 .0 .0 .0 523.2 568.3 3,123.50 FISH/WILDLIFE CONSERV COMM... 120.0 .0 .0 .0 384.2 504.2 2,158.50 TRANSPORTATION, DEPT OF...... .0 .0 .0 .0 1,068.3 1,068.3 5,887.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 5 658.3 .0 .0 .0 3,922.9 4,581.2 15,014.25 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT ADMINISTERED FUNDS........... 279.3 .0 .0 .0 205.7 485.0 .00 BUSINESS/PROFESSIONAL REG.... 6.8 .0 .0 .0 297.3 304.0 1,647.25 CITRUS, DEPT OF.............. 17.7 .0 .0 .0 21.9 39.6 28.00 COMMERCE..................... 461.5 .0 .0 .0 1,031.0 1,492.6 1,490.00 FINANCIAL SERVICES........... 21.0 .0 .0 .0 553.3 574.2 2,648.50 NOTE: AMOUNTS ACROSS AND DOWN MAY NOT EQUAL DUE TO ROUNDING. SB 2500 FY 26-27 ($ IN MILLIONS) GENERAL OTHER ALL REVENUE LOTTERY PECO TOBACCO TRUST FUNDS POSITIONS ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- OPERATING _________ SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT GOVERNOR, EXECUTIVE OFFICE... 61.6 .0 .0 .0 81.6 143.2 523.00 HIWAY SAFETY/MTR VEH, DEPT... .0 .0 .0 .0 678.3 678.3 4,099.00 LEGISLATIVE BRANCH........... 254.8 .0 .0 .0 2.8 257.6 .00 LOTTERY, DEPARTMENT OF THE... .0 .0 .0 .0 241.7 241.7 448.00 MANAGEMENT SRVCS, DEPT OF.... 82.0 .0 .0 .0 664.2 746.2 1,247.50 MILITARY AFFAIRS, DEPT OF.... 65.7 .0 .0 .0 45.0 110.7 481.00 PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.... .0 .0 .0 .0 32.2 32.2 264.00 REVENUE, DEPARTMENT OF....... 373.3 .0 .0 .0 504.5 877.8 4,826.25 STATE, DEPT OF............... 91.4 .0 .0 .0 28.5 119.9 451.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 6 1,715.0 .0 .0 .0 4,387.9 6,103.0 18,153.50 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 7 - JUDICIAL BRANCH STATE COURT SYSTEM........... 697.8 .0 .0 .0 125.9 823.7 4,795.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 7 697.8 .0 .0 .0 125.9 823.7 4,795.00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ TOTAL OPERATING 50,989.2 2,380.1 .0 300.9 43,700.2 97,370.3 111,889.56 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ SECTION 1 - EDUCATION ENHANCEMENT EDUCATION, DEPT OF........... .0 78.9 .0 .0 .0 78.9 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 1 .0 78.9 .0 .0 .0 78.9 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 2 - EDUCATION (ALL OTHER FUNDS) EDUCATION, DEPT OF........... 43.9 .0 1,572.0 .0 195.6 1,811.5 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 2 43.9 .0 1,572.0 .0 195.6 1,811.5 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ EDUCATION RECAP EDUCATION/EARLY LEARNING... .0 .0 .0 .0 .0 .0 .00 EDUCATION/PUBLIC SCHOOLS... 37.0 .0 .0 .0 .0 37.0 .00 EDUCATION/FL COLLEGES...... .6 .0 .0 .0 .0 .6 .00 EDUCATION/UNIVERSITIES..... .5 .0 .0 .0 .0 .5 .00 EDUCATION/OTHER............ 5.8 78.9 1,572.0 .0 195.6 1,852.3 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL EDUCATION RECAP 43.9 78.9 1,572.0 .0 195.6 1,890.4 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES AGENCY/PERSONS WITH DISABL... 16.2 .0 .0 .0 .0 16.2 .00 CHILDREN & FAMILIES.......... 14.2 .0 .0 .0 1.9 16.1 .00 ELDER AFFAIRS, DEPT OF....... 1.8 .0 .0 .0 .0 1.8 .00 HEALTH, DEPT OF.............. 27.7 .0 .0 .0 11.4 39.1 .00 VETERANS' AFFAIRS, DEPT OF... 7.2 .0 .0 .0 4.3 11.5 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 3 67.0 .0 .0 .0 17.6 84.6 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS CORRECTIONS, DEPT OF......... 135.9 .0 .0 .0 .2 136.1 .00 JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION....... .4 .0 .0 .0 .0 .4 .00 JUVENILE JUSTICE, DEPT OF.... 15.6 .0 .0 .0 .0 15.6 .00 NOTE: AMOUNTS ACROSS AND DOWN MAY NOT EQUAL DUE TO ROUNDING. SB 2500 FY 26-27 ($ IN MILLIONS) GENERAL OTHER ALL REVENUE LOTTERY PECO TOBACCO TRUST FUNDS POSITIONS ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY ____________________ SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS LAW ENFORCEMENT, DEPT OF..... 41.3 .0 .0 .0 .0 41.3 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 4 193.3 .0 .0 .0 .2 193.5 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 5 - NATURAL RESOURCES/ENVIRONMENT/GROWTH MANAGEMENT/TRANSPORTATION AGRIC/CONSUMER SVCS/COMMR.... 38.2 .0 .0 .0 265.9 304.1 .00 ENVIR PROTECTION, DEPT OF.... 674.5 .0 .0 .0 1,078.3 1,752.8 .00 FISH/WILDLIFE CONSERV COMM... 45.0 .0 .0 .0 26.6 71.6 .00 TRANSPORTATION, DEPT OF...... .0 .0 .0 .0 13,009.5 13,009.5 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 5 757.7 .0 .0 .0 14,380.3 15,138.1 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT COMMERCE..................... 125.0 .0 .0 .0 5.0 130.0 .00 FINANCIAL SERVICES........... 23.5 .0 .0 .0 16.3 39.7 .00 GOVERNOR, EXECUTIVE OFFICE... 15.9 .0 .0 .0 3.0 18.9 .00 MANAGEMENT SRVCS, DEPT OF.... 65.7 .0 .0 .0 27.5 93.3 .00 MILITARY AFFAIRS, DEPT OF.... 17.0 .0 .0 .0 .0 17.0 .00 REVENUE, DEPARTMENT OF....... .4 .0 .0 .0 .0 .4 .00 STATE, DEPT OF............... 45.9 .0 .0 .0 .0 45.9 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 6 293.3 .0 .0 .0 51.8 345.1 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 7 - JUDICIAL BRANCH STATE COURT SYSTEM........... 2.3 .0 .0 .0 1.5 3.8 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 7 2.3 .0 .0 .0 1.5 3.8 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ TOTAL FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY 1,357.5 78.9 1,572.0 .0 14,647.1 17,655.4 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ OPERATING AND FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY __________________________________ SECTION 1 - EDUCATION ENHANCEMENT EDUCATION, DEPT OF........... .0 2,459.0 .0 .0 .0 2,459.0 .00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 1 .0 2,459.0 .0 .0 .0 2,459.0 .00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 2 - EDUCATION (ALL OTHER FUNDS) EDUCATION, DEPT OF........... 22,880.3 .0 1,572.0 .0 4,884.8 29,337.0 2,234.75 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 2 22,880.3 .0 1,572.0 .0 4,884.8 29,337.0 2,234.75 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ EDUCATION RECAP EDUCATION/EARLY LEARNING... 604.0 .0 .0 .0 1,001.0 1,605.0 97.00 EDUCATION/PUBLIC SCHOOLS... 15,774.1 719.8 .0 .0 3,266.4 19,760.3 .00 EDUCATION/FL COLLEGES...... 1,621.8 239.7 .0 .0 .0 1,861.5 .00 EDUCATION/UNIVERSITIES..... 4,092.8 612.4 .0 .0 5.2 4,710.4 .00 EDUCATION/OTHER............ 787.5 887.0 1,572.0 .0 612.1 3,858.7 2,137.75 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL EDUCATION RECAP 22,880.3 2,459.0 1,572.0 .0 4,884.8 31,796.0 2,234.75 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ NOTE: AMOUNTS ACROSS AND DOWN MAY NOT EQUAL DUE TO ROUNDING. SB 2500 FY 26-27 ($ IN MILLIONS) GENERAL OTHER ALL REVENUE LOTTERY PECO TOBACCO TRUST FUNDS POSITIONS ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- OPERATING AND FIXED CAPITAL OUTLAY __________________________________ SECTION 3 - HUMAN SERVICES AGENCY/HEALTH CARE ADMIN..... 13,547.2 .0 .0 208.4 24,304.3 38,059.9 1,563.50 AGENCY/PERSONS WITH DISABL... 1,203.3 .0 .0 .0 132.1 1,335.4 2,709.00 CHILDREN & FAMILIES.......... 3,053.1 .0 .0 .0 1,764.8 4,818.0 12,496.25 ELDER AFFAIRS, DEPT OF....... 270.3 .0 .0 .0 231.4 501.7 425.00 HEALTH, DEPT OF.............. 1,047.7 .0 .0 92.5 3,001.7 4,141.9 11,882.31 VETERANS' AFFAIRS, DEPT OF... 59.4 .0 .0 .0 178.5 237.9 1,520.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 3 19,181.0 .0 .0 300.9 29,612.9 49,094.8 30,596.06 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 4 - CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND CORRECTIONS CORRECTIONS, DEPT OF......... 3,953.0 .0 .0 .0 79.1 4,032.0 23,729.00 FL COMMISN/OFFENDER REVIEW... 18.2 .0 .0 .0 .0 18.2 164.00 JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION....... 1,153.5 .0 .0 .0 255.0 1,408.4 10,451.00 JUVENILE JUSTICE, DEPT OF.... 598.8 .0 .0 .0 169.1 768.0 3,229.50 LAW ENFORCEMENT, DEPT OF..... 331.0 .0 .0 .0 193.9 524.9 2,038.00 LEGAL AFFAIRS/ATTY GENERAL... 106.5 .0 .0 .0 282.1 388.6 1,484.50 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 4 6,161.1 .0 .0 .0 979.2 7,140.2 41,096.00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 5 - NATURAL RESOURCES/ENVIRONMENT/GROWTH MANAGEMENT/TRANSPORTATION AGRIC/CONSUMER SVCS/COMMR.... 531.3 .0 .0 .0 2,213.1 2,744.4 3,845.25 ENVIR PROTECTION, DEPT OF.... 719.7 .0 .0 .0 1,601.5 2,321.1 3,123.50 FISH/WILDLIFE CONSERV COMM... 165.0 .0 .0 .0 410.8 575.9 2,158.50 TRANSPORTATION, DEPT OF...... .0 .0 .0 .0 14,077.8 14,077.8 5,887.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 5 1,416.0 .0 .0 .0 18,303.3 19,719.3 15,014.25 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 6 - GENERAL GOVERNMENT ADMINISTERED FUNDS........... 279.3 .0 .0 .0 205.7 485.0 .00 BUSINESS/PROFESSIONAL REG.... 6.8 .0 .0 .0 297.3 304.0 1,647.25 CITRUS, DEPT OF.............. 17.7 .0 .0 .0 21.9 39.6 28.00 COMMERCE..................... 586.5 .0 .0 .0 1,036.0 1,622.5 1,490.00 FINANCIAL SERVICES........... 44.4 .0 .0 .0 569.5 614.0 2,648.50 GOVERNOR, EXECUTIVE OFFICE... 77.4 .0 .0 .0 84.6 162.0 523.00 HIWAY SAFETY/MTR VEH, DEPT... .0 .0 .0 .0 678.3 678.3 4,099.00 LEGISLATIVE BRANCH........... 254.8 .0 .0 .0 2.8 257.6 .00 LOTTERY, DEPARTMENT OF THE... .0 .0 .0 .0 241.7 241.7 448.00 MANAGEMENT SRVCS, DEPT OF.... 147.7 .0 .0 .0 691.8 839.5 1,247.50 MILITARY AFFAIRS, DEPT OF.... 82.7 .0 .0 .0 45.0 127.7 481.00 PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.... .0 .0 .0 .0 32.2 32.2 264.00 REVENUE, DEPARTMENT OF....... 373.7 .0 .0 .0 504.5 878.2 4,826.25 STATE, DEPT OF............... 137.4 .0 .0 .0 28.5 165.9 451.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 6 2,008.3 .0 .0 .0 4,439.7 6,448.1 18,153.50 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ SECTION 7 - JUDICIAL BRANCH STATE COURT SYSTEM........... 700.1 .0 .0 .0 127.4 827.5 4,795.00 ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- ---------- TOTAL SECTION 7 700.1 .0 .0 .0 127.4 827.5 4,795.00 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ TOTAL OPERATING AND FCO 52,346.7 2,459.0 1,572.0 300.9 58,347.3 115,025.8 111,889.56 __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ __________ NOTE: AMOUNTS ACROSS AND DOWN MAY NOT EQUAL DUE TO ROUNDING.